<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BABY/BABY-8K-20020906152544.txt.gz
TIME:20020906152544
EVENTS:	Other events	Financial statements and exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other events
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
ITEM 5.    OTHER EVENTS.
 
On September 5, 2002, Natus Medical Incorporated ("Natus") announced that its board of directors had approved the adoption of a stockholder rights plan. A copy of Natus' press release is attached hereto.
 
 
ITEM 7.    FINANCIAL STATEMENTS, PRO FORMA FINANCIAL INFORMATION AND EXHIBITS.
 
(c)    Exhibits.
 
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 

 
Exhibit 99.1
 
 
 
 
SAN CARLOS, Calif. (September 5, 2002)  Natus Medical Incorporated (Nasdaq NM: BABY), a leading provider of products used to identify and monitor common medical disorders that may occur from the time of conception to a baby's first birthday, today announced that its board of directors has adopted a Stockholder Rights Plan. Under the plan, Natus will issue a dividend of one right for each share of its common stock held by stockholders of record as of the close of business on October 11, 2002.
 
The stockholder rights plan is designed to guard against partial tender offers and other coercive tactics to gain control of the company without offering a fair and adequate price and terms to all of Natus' stockholders. The plan was not adopted in response to any efforts to acquire the company, and the company is not aware of any such efforts.
 
Each right will initially entitle stockholders to purchase a fractional share of the company's preferred stock for $23.00. However, the rights are not immediately exercisable and will become exercisable only upon the occurrence of certain events. If a person or group acquires, or announces a tender or exchange offer that would result in the acquisition of 15% or more of Natus' common stock while the stockholder rights plan remains in place, then, unless the rights are redeemed by Natus for $0.001 per right, the rights will become exercisable by all rights holders except the acquiring person or group for shares of Natus or shares of the third party acquirer having a value of twice the right's then-current exercise price. Further details of the plan are outlined in a letter that will be mailed to stockholders as of the record date.
 
Natus develops, manufactures and markets proprietary, non-invasive, easy-to-use, crib-side screening devices for the detection and/or monitoring of common disorders in babies. Natus is a market leader in sales of Newborn Hearing Screening equipment. Natus also manufactures and distributes MiniMuffs
Neonatal Noise Attenuators and the CO-Stat End Tidal Breath Analyzer, a technology that non-invasively detects the rate of hemolysis in newborns, an important tool in the management of neonatal jaundice. Natus sells and supports its products domestically through direct field sales representatives and clinical educators. Natus products are distributed by its wholly owned subsidiaries in Japan and in the U.K., and have been distributed in 20 other countries. Additional information can be found at www.natus.com.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BABY/BABY-8K-20020930210142.txt.gz
TIME:20020930210142
EVENTS:	Other events	Financial statements and exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other events
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Registrant's telephone number, including area code:         (650) 802-0400                                        
 
 
 
ITEM 5.    OTHER EVENTS.
 
On September 30, 2002 Natus Medical Inc. announced a workforce reduction by approximately 14%.
 
A copy of Natus' press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1.
 
 
 
ITEM 7.    FINANCIAL STATEMENTS, PRO FORMA FINANCIAL INFORMATION AND EXHIBITS.
 
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 
 

 
Exhibit 99.1
 
[NATUS LOGO]
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
(Nasdaq NM: BABY), a leading provider of products used to identify and monitor common medical disorders that may occur from the time of conception to a baby's first birthday, today announced cost reduction initiatives intended to bring the Company's operating expenses in line with anticipated revenues. The Company's new cost structure is expected to support its core business strategy and to assist the company in achieving profitability, which the Company expects to achieve beginning in mid-2003.
SAN CARLOS, Calif. (September 30, 2002)  Natus Medical Incorporated
 
These initiatives, implemented in the third and fourth quarters, are expected to significantly reduce operating costs going forward. In connection with these cost reduction initiatives, the Company expects to record a non-recurring charge of between $250,000 and $300,000 during the quarter ending September 30, 2002.
 
Among the initiatives is a workforce reduction of approximately 14% of headcount. Additional savings are expected to come from reducing costs of outside consultants and other discretionary expenses. The Company also anticipates that it will streamline operations by combining its research and development and engineering divisions and, in connection, has eliminated the position of vice president of engineering.
 
"We have planned these initiatives with a view to aligning our operations and expenses with our expected revenues, without impacting our important ALGO
newborn hearing screener sales or customer service functions. We intend to continue our product development programs, including CO-Stat
End Tidal Breath Analyzer clinical trials. However, in light of a maturing domestic market for neonatal hearing testing, continued uncertain demand in international markets for our core Natus ALGO
product line as well as a slower-than-expected sales ramp of our Natus CO-Stat
product, we are taking this assertive action to put us on the right path," said Tim Johnson, Natus Medical's president and chief executive officer.
 
"Natus had approximately $48.2 million in cash and cash equivalents on August 31, 2002," added Mr. Johnson. "We are taking these measures because we believe they are in the best long-term interest of our customers and our stockholders."
 
Natus develops, manufactures and markets easy-to-use medical products for the detection and management of common disorders in babies. Natus is a market leader in sales of Newborn Hearing Screening equipment. Natus also manufactures and distributes MiniMuffs
Neonatal Noise Attenuators and the CO-Stat
End Tidal Breath Analyzer, a technology that non-invasively detects the rate of hemolysis in newborns, an important tool in the management of neonatal jaundice. Natus sells and supports its products domestically through direct field sales representatives and clinical educators. Natus products are distributed by its wholly owned subsidiaries in Japan and in the U.K. and have been distributed in 20 other countries. Additional information can be found at www.natus.com.
 
This press release contains forward-looking statements as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, particularly statements regarding the expectations, beliefs, plans, intentions, and strategies of Natus. These forward looking statements include, but are not limited to, statements regarding bringing operating expenses in line with revenues, support of Natus' core business strategy, future profitability and timing thereof, reduction in future operating costs and the magnitude of the reduction, charges relating to cost reduction initiatives, reduction in costs related to outside consultants and other discretionary expenses, streamlining of operations, the impact of cost reduction initiatives on ALGO newborn hearing screener sales, customer service functions and product development programs, effectiveness of the cost reduction measures, Natus' future international and domestic sales opportunities, operating costs or expenses, expected savings from cost reduction initiatives or otherwise, and anticipated revenues, losses and bottomline results in fiscal 2002 and 2003. These statements relate to future events or Natus' future financial performance or results and involve known and unknown risks, uncertainties and other factors that may cause Natus' actual results, levels of activity, performance or achievements to differ materially from those expressed or implied by the forward-looking statements. In some cases, you will be able to identify forward-looking statements by terminology such as "anticipates," "intends," "may," "believe," "should," "plan," "will," "offer," "expects," "potential," "continue" or the negative or derivatives of these terms or other comparable terminology. Forward-looking statements are only predictions and the actual events or results may differ materially. Natus cannot provide any assurance that its future results will meet expectations. Natus' operating results could differ materially due to a number of factors, including Natus' ability to implement cost-reductions, the continued growth of demand (or absence of continued growth of demand) for newborn screening products, acceptance of Natus' existing products, the successful development, introduction and widespread market acceptance of Natus' new products and domestic and global economic conditions.
 
For additional information and considerations regarding the risks faced by Natus, see the Company's periodic reports on Forms 10-Q and 10-K filed and to be filed with the SEC. Natus cannot guarantee future results, levels of activity, performance or achievements. In addition, historical information should not be considered a predictor of future performance. Moreover, neither Natus nor any other person assumes responsibility for the accuracy and completeness of these forward-looking statements. Natus disclaims any obligation to update information contained in any forward-looking statement.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BABY/BABY-8K-20030224214941.txt.gz
TIME:20030224214941
EVENTS:	Other events	Financial statements and exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other events
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
ITEM 5. OTHER EVENTS.
 
On February 14, 2003, Natus Medical Incorporated ("Natus") entered into a voting agreement with Perry Corp., a stockholder of Natus, and amended its stockholder rights plan to permit Perry Corp. to acquire up to 34% of Natus' outstanding common stock. The voting agreement and amendment to the rights plan are attached as exhibits hereto.
 
ITEM 7. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS, PRO FORMA FINANCIAL INFORMATION AND EXHIBITS.
 
(4) Exhibits.
 
 
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 

 
EXHIBIT 4.2
 
 
This Amendment No. 1 dated as of February 14, 2003 (this "Amendment") is to the Preferred Stock Rights Agreement originally dated as of September 4, 2002 and amended and restated as of October 8, 2002 (the "Rights Agreement"), between Natus Medical Incorporated, a Delaware corporation, (the "Company"), and EquiServe Trust Company, N.A. (the "Rights Agent"). Terms not defined herein have the meanings assigned to them in the Rights Agreement.
 
WHEREAS on February 14, 2003, the Company desires to permit Perry Corp. increase its holdings of the Company's Common Stock without becoming an Acquiring Person; and
 
WHEREAS pursuant to Section 27 of the Rights Agreement, the Company and the Rights Agent have agreed to amend the Rights Plan to effect such change;
 
NOW, THEREFORE, in consideration of the promises and the mutual agreements herein set forth, the parties hereby agree to amend the Rights Agreement as follows:
 
1. . Section 1(a) of the Rights Agreement is amended and restated as follows:
Amendment of Section 1(a)
 
"Acquiring Person" shall mean any Person, who or which, together with all Affiliates and Associates of such Person, shall be the Beneficial Owner of 15% or more of the Common Shares then outstanding, but shall not include the Company, any Subsidiary of the Company or any employee benefit plan of the Company or of any Subsidiary of the Company, or any entity holding Common Shares for or pursuant to the terms of any such plan; , , that Perry Corp. ("Perry") shall not be deemed an "Acquiring Person" until such time as Perry shall be the Beneficial Owner of more than 34% of the Common Shares then outstanding or until such time as Perry shall be required to file a report of beneficial ownership on Schedule 13D reporting holdings in excess of 34% of the Company's Common Shares (the "Limitations"). Notwithstanding the foregoing, no Person shall be deemed to be an Acquiring Person as the result of an acquisition of Common Shares by the Company which, by reducing the number of shares outstanding, increases the proportionate number of shares beneficially owned by such Person to 15% or more of the Common Shares of the Company then outstanding or with respect to Perry, causes Perry not to be in compliance with the applicable Limitations; , , that if a Person shall become the Beneficial Owner of 15% or more of the Common Shares of the Company then outstanding or, with respect to Perry, Perry shall fail to comply with the applicable Limitations, by reason of share purchases by the Company and shall, after such share purchases by the Company, become the Beneficial Owner of any additional Common Shares of the Company (other than pursuant to a dividend or distribution paid or made by the Company on the outstanding Common Shares in Common Shares or pursuant to a split or subdivision of the outstanding Common Shares), then such Person shall be deemed to be an Acquiring Person unless upon becoming the Beneficial Owner of such additional Common Shares of the Company such Person does not beneficially own 15% or more of the Common Shares of the
provided
however
provided
however
 
Company then outstanding or, with respect to Perry, Perry is in compliance with the applicable Limitations. Notwithstanding the foregoing, (i) if the Company's Board of Directors determines in good faith that a Person who would otherwise be an "Acquiring Person," as defined pursuant to the foregoing provisions of this paragraph (a), has become such inadvertently (including, without limitation, because (A) such Person was unaware that it beneficially owned a percentage of the Common Shares that would otherwise cause such Person to be an "Acquiring Person," as defined pursuant to the foregoing provisions of this paragraph (a), or (B) such Person was aware of the extent of the Common Shares it beneficially owned but had no actual knowledge of the consequences of such beneficial ownership under this Agreement) and without any intention of changing or influencing control of the Company, and if such Person divested or divests as promptly as practicable a sufficient number of Common Shares so that such Person would no longer be an "Acquiring Person," as defined pursuant to the foregoing provisions of this paragraph (a), then such Person shall not be deemed to be or to have become an "Acquiring Person" for any purposes of this Agreement including, without limitation Section 1(gg) hereof; and (ii) if, as of the date hereof, any Person is the Beneficial Owner of 15% or more of the Common Shares outstanding, or, with respect to Perry, Perry is in compliance with the applicable Limitations, such Person shall not be or become an "Acquiring Person," as defined pursuant to the foregoing provisions of this paragraph (a), unless and until such time as such Person shall become the Beneficial Owner of additional Common Shares (other than pursuant to a dividend or distribution paid or made by the Company on the outstanding Common Shares in Common Shares or pursuant to a split or subdivision of the outstanding Common Shares), unless, upon becoming the Beneficial Owner of such additional Common Shares, such Person is not then the Beneficial Owner of 15% or more of the Common Shares then outstanding or, with respect to Perry, Perry is not in compliance with the applicable Limitations.
 
2. . Except as expressly amended by this Amendment, all provisions of the Rights Agreement shall remain in full force and effect.
Remaining Provisions
 
3. . Notices or demands authorized by this Amendment to be given or made by the Rights Agent to or on the Company shall be sufficiently given or made if sent by first-class mail, postage prepaid, addressed (until another address is filed in writing with the Rights Agent) as follows:
Notices
 
Natus Medical Incorporated
1501 Industrial Road
San Carlos, California 94070
Attention: Chief Executive Officer
 
with a copy to:
 
Wilson Sonsini Goodrich & Rosati
Professional Corporation
650 Page Mill Road
Palo Alto, California 94304-1050
Attention: Robert P. Latta, Esq.
 
Any notice or demand authorized by this Amendment to be given or made by the Company to or on the Rights Agent shall be sufficiently given or made if sent by first-class mail, postage prepaid, addressed (until another address is filed in writing with the Company) as follows:
 
EquiServe Trust Company, N.A.
150 Royall Street
Canton, MA 02021
Attn: Client Administration
 
4. . Nothing in this Amendment shall be construed to give to any Person other than the Company, the Rights Agent and the registered holders of the Rights Certificates (and, prior to the Distribution Date, the Common Shares) any legal or equitable right, remedy or claim pursuant to this Amendment; but this Amendment shall be for the sole and exclusive benefit of the Company, the Rights Agent and the registered holders of the Rights Certificates (and, prior to the Distribution Date, the Common Shares).
Benefits of this Amendment
 
5. . If any term, provision, covenant or restriction of this Amendment is held by a court of competent jurisdiction or other authority to be invalid, void or unenforceable, the remainder of the terms, provisions, covenants and restrictions of this Amendment shall remain in full force and effect and shall in no way be affected, impaired or invalidated.
Severability
 
6. . This Amendment shall be deemed to be a contract made under the laws of the State of Delaware and for all purposes shall be governed by and construed in accordance with the laws of such State applicable to contracts to be made and performed entirely within such State.
Governing Law
 
7. . This Amendment may be executed in any number of counterparts and each of such counterparts shall for all purposes be deemed to be an original, and all such counterparts shall together constitute but one and the same instrument.
Counterparts
 
8. . Descriptive headings of the several Sections of this Amendment are inserted for convenience only and shall not control or affect the meaning or construction of any of the provisions hereof.
Descriptive Headings
 
 
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have caused this Amendment to be duly executed as of the day and year first above written.
 
 
 
 

 
EXHIBIT 4.3
 
 
 
THIS VOTING AGREEMENT (the "Agreement") is made and entered into as of this 14
th
day of February 2003, by and among NATUS MEDICAL INCORPORATED, a Delaware corporation (the "Company"), and PERRY CORP., a New York corporation (the "Investor").
 
 
WHEREAS, the Investor currently owns 27% of the outstanding shares of the Company's common stock, par value $0.001 per share (the "Common Stock"); and
 
WHEREAS, the Investor wishes to purchase from a third party an additional One Million (1,000,000) shares of Common Stock, representing approximately an additional 6% of the outstanding shares of Common Stock (the "Subject Shares"); and
 
WHEREAS, the Investor would be deemed an "Acquiring Person" under that certain Preferred Stock Rights Agreement dated as of September 4, 2002, as amended, between the Company and EquiServe Trust Company, N.A., as Rights Agent (the "Shareholder Rights Plan"), if it purchases the Subject Shares; and
 
WHEREAS, pursuant to a certain Non-Disclosure Agreement entered into by and between the Investor and the Company, dated October 14, 2002 (the "NDA"), the Investor may not buy, sell or otherwise trade securities of the Company until the Company's 2002 earnings information is released, and such earnings information has not yet been released; and
 
WHEREAS, the Company wishes to allow the Investor to acquire the Subject Shares;
 
NOW, THEREFORE in consideration of the foregoing, the parties hereto agree as follows:
,
 
 
1. Amendment of Shareholders' Rights Plan.
 
The Company agrees to amend the Shareholder Rights Plan, subject to the terms of this Agreement, so as to permit the Investor to acquire the Subject Shares without becoming an "Acquiring Person" under the Shareholder Rights Plan.
 
2. Waiver of NDA.
 
The parties hereto agree that nothing contained in the NDA shall prohibit, limit or impose conditions on the purchase by Investor of the Subject Shares.
 
3. Transfer of Shares.
 
(a) In the event Investor sells, transfers or otherwise conveys any or all of the Subject Shares (i) in a market transaction, or
Termination of Limitations.
(ii) to a person or entity who owns less than 5% of the Company's voting capital stock before such transfer and will not be deemed an "acquiring person" pursuant to the Shareholder Rights Plan after such transfer, then the transferred Subject Shares will not be subject to this Agreement and, among other things, shall not be required to bear the Legend set forth in Section 5 hereof.
 
(b) Until such time as Investor no longer owns in excess of Four Million Three Hundred Forty-Eight Thousand Four Hundred (4,348,400) shares (subject to adjustment for stock splits, dividends and the like) ("Investor Shares"), and even if Investor sells or otherwise transfers a portion of the Subject Shares, any shares of Common Stock held by Investor in excess of the number of Investor Shares shall be deemed to be Subject Shares for purposes of this Agreement.
Deemed Retention of Subject Shares.
 
4. Voting.
 
(a) Subject to the provisions of subsection (b) below, so long as the Investor holds or beneficially owns more than 29% of the outstanding Common Stock, it shall vote the Subject Shares in the same manner and in proportion to all other shares of Common Stock present at each annual or special meeting. By way of illustration, if 80% of the shares of Common Stock (exclusive of all of the Investor Shares) are present at a meeting of shareholders and if 60% of the shares of Common Stock vote in favor of a proposal, 16% vote against and 4% abstain, then 75% of the Subject Shares shall be voted in favor of the proposal, 20% against and 5% of the Subject Shares shall abstain from voting on the proposal.
Proportional Voting.
 
(c) For a period of one year from the date hereof, the Investor will vote all Investor Shares in accordance with the recommendation of the Board of Directors of the Company (the "Board of Directors") as reflected in any Company proxy or information statement in connection with such vote. Investor will give irrevocable instructions to each broker holding shares of the Common Stock in an account for the benefit of Investor or its affiliates that shall remain in effect until the first anniversary of this Agreement. The irrevocable instructions shall direct the broker to vote the shares of Common Stock held in such accounts on all matters put before the Company's stockholders in accordance with the recommendations of the Board of Directors.
Voting With Management.
 
(d) Investor agrees to deliver to the Company a proxy in the form attached hereto as Exhibit A (the "Proxy"), which shall be irrevocable to the fullest extent permissible by applicable law, with respect to the Subject Shares. The Company acknowledges and agrees that Investor will purchase the Subject Shares in street name and, at its earliest opportunity, will convert them to certificate form, bearing the Legend (as defined below), registered to Investor. The Company shall require the Transfer Agent to expedite the issuance of share certificates representing Subject Shares. Promptly following re-registration of the Subject Shares in the name of Investor, Investor shall deliver the Proxy to the Company.
Proxy.
 
(e) In the event the Investor does not vote the Investor Shares or the Subject Shares, as the case may be, in accordance with this Agreement, the vote of any shares voted in contravention of this Agreement shall be null and void and such shares shall be deemed to have been voted in accordance with the terms of this Agreement.
Deemed Voting.
 
 
(e) If Investor fails to vote the Subject Shares or, with respect to Section 4(b) hereof, all shares of Common Stock held by it strictly in accordance with the provisions of this Section 4, Investor agrees to take, at its own expense, any additional steps deemed necessary by the Company to effect and to assure compliance with the provisions of this Section 4.
Further Assurances.
 
5. Legend.
 
(a) Investor agrees that the Company shall be entitled to impose on any and allcertificates representing Subject Shares (and that Investor shall hold all Subject Shares in certificated form) the following restrictive legend (the "Legend"):
 
"THE SHARES REPRESENTED BY THIS CERTIFICATE ARE SUBJECT TO THE TERMS AND CONDITIONS OF A VOTING AGREEMENT DATED AS OF FEBRUARY 14, 2003, WHICH PLACES CERTAIN RESTRICTIONS ON THE VOTING OF THE SHARES REPRESENTED HEREBY. ANY PERSON ACCEPTING ANY INTEREST IN SUCH SHARES SHALL BE DEEMED TO AGREE TO AND SHALL BECOME BOUND BY ALL THE PROVISIONS OF SUCH AGREEMENT. A COPY OF SUCH VOTING AGREEMENT WILL BE FURNISHED TO THE RECORD HOLDER OF THIS CERTIFICATE WITHOUT CHARGE UPON WRITTEN REQUEST TO THE COMPANY AT ITS PRINCIPAL PLACE OF BUSINESS."
 
(b) Subject to Section 3 hereof, Investor agrees that, during the term of this Agreement, it shall not have the right to cause to be removed (upon registration of transfer, reissuance or otherwise) any Legend from any certificate representing Subject Shares and that it consents to the imposition of the Legend on any new certificate issued (upon registration of transfer, reissuance or otherwise) to represent the Subject Shares theretofore represented by a certificate carrying the Legend. The Company shall cause the Transfer Agent to remove such Legend upon the occurrence of an event that constitutes a termination of limitations under Section 3(a) hereof.
 
Investor (i) is the beneficial owner of the Investor Shares (other than the Subject Shares) set forth on the signature page hereto, free and clear of any liens, claims, options, rights of first refusal, co-sale rights, charges or other encumbrances, and (ii) does not beneficially own any securities of the Company other than the Investor Shares set forth on the signature page hereto. Each of Investor and the Company has full power and authority to make, enter into and carry out the terms of this Agreement and the Proxy. The Company certifies that the number of shares of Common Stock outstanding as of February 13, 2003 is 16,328,033.
6.
Representations and Warranties of Investor and the Company.
 
 
7. Termination.
 
This Agreement shall continue in full force and effect from the date hereof through the earliest of the following dates, on which date it shall terminate in its entirety:
a.
 
(i) the date that theInvestor owns a number of shares of Common Stock that is equal to or less than the number of the Investor Shares and upon which date the Investor provides notice to the Company of such fact;
 
(ii) the date of the closing of a sale, lease, or other disposition of all or substantially all of the Company's assets or the Company's merger into or consolidation with any other corporation or other entity, or any other corporate reorganization, in which the holders of the Company's outstanding voting stock immediately prior to such transaction own, immediately after such transaction, securities representing less than fifty percent (50%) of the voting power (determined on an as-converted basis) of the corporation or other entity surviving such transaction; or
 
(iii) the date that is the 10 year anniversary of the execution of this Agreement; or
 
(iv) the date as of which the parties hereto terminate this Agreement by written consent of both parties.
 
Upon termination, the Company shall promptly remove any Legend on any Subject Shares following a request therefore from the Investor or any other holder of such Shares.
b.
 
8. Miscellaneous.
 
(a) This Agreement shall be governed and construed under the laws of the State of Delaware, and shall be binding upon the parties hereto in the United States and worldwide. The federal and state courts in the State of Delaware sitting in New Castle County shall have exclusive jurisdiction to adjudicate any dispute arising out of this Agreement and the Investor consents to personal jurisdiction in such courts.
Governing Law.
 
(b) In the event one or more of the provisions of this Agreement should, for any reason, be held to be invalid, illegal or unenforceable in any respect, such invalidity, illegality or unenforceability shall not affect any other provisions of this Agreement, and this Agreement shall be construed as if such invalid, illegal or unenforceable provision had never been contained herein.
Severability.
 
(c) This Agreement shall inure to the benefit of and be binding upon the parties hereto and their respective heirs, successors, administrators, executors and other legal representatives; however, neither this Agreement nor any of the rights, interests or obligations of the parties hereto may be assigned to any party other than their respective heirs, successors, administrators, executors and other legal representatives by either of the parties hereto without prior written consent of the other party hereto
Successors.
.
 
 
(d) This Agreement may be executed in one or more counterparts, each of which will be deemed an original but all of which together shall constitute one and the same agreement.
Counterparts.
 
(e) . This Agreement may not be modified, amended, altered or supplemented except upon the execution and delivery of a written agreement executed by the parties hereto.
Amendments and Modification
 
(f) . No failure on the part of any party to exercise any power, right, privilege or remedy under this Agreement, and no delay on the part of any party in exercising any power, right, privilege or remedy under this Agreement, shall operate as a waiver of such power, right, privilege or remedy, and no single or partial exercise of any such power, right, privilege or remedy shall preclude any other or further exercise thereof or of any other power, right, privilege or remedy. No party shall be deemed to have waived any claim arising out of this Agreement, or any power, right, privilege or remedy under this Agreement, unless the waiver of such claim, power, right, privilege or remedy is expressly set forth in a written instrument duly executed and delivered on behalf of such party, and any such waiver shall not be applicable or have any effect except in the specific instance in which it is given.
Waiver
 
(g) . The parties hereto acknowledge that the Company will be irreparably harmed and that there will be no adequate remedy at law for a violation of any of the covenants or agreements of Investor set forth in this Agreement and the Proxy. Therefore, it is agreed that, in addition to any other remedies that may be available to the Company upon any such violation, the Company shall have the right to enforce such covenants and agreements by specific performance, injunctive relief or by any other means available to Company at law or in equity.
Specific Performance; Injunctive Relief
 
(h) . Any notice or communication must be in writing and given by depositing the same in the United States mail, addressed to the party to be notified, postage prepaid and registered or certified with return receipt requested, or by delivering the same by hand delivery (including by a nationally recognized overnight carrier) or by fax. Such notice shall be deemed received on the date on which it is delivered to the party or faxed (with confirmation received). For purposes of notice, the addresses of the parties shall be:
Notices
 
If to Company: Natus Medical Incorporated
1501 Industrial Road
San Carlos, CA 94070
Attention: Mark E. Foster, General Counsel
Telephone: (650) 802-0400
Facsimile:  (650) 802-0401
 
With a copy to: Wilson Sonsini Goodrich & Rosati
Professional Corporation
650 Page Mill Road
Palo Alto, CA 94304
Attention: Robert P. Latta, Esq.
 
 
Telephone: (650) 493-9300
Facsimile: (650) 493-6811
 
 
If to Investor: Perry Corp.
599 Lexington Avenue, 36
th
Floor
New York, NY 10022
Attention:
Telephone: (212) 583-4100
Facsimile: (212) 583-4125
 
With a copy to: Willkie Farr & Gallagher
787 Seventh Avenue
New York, NY 10019-6099
Attention: Michael A. Schwartz
Telephone: (212) 728-8000
Facsimile: (212) 728-9267
 
(i) If any legal action or other legal proceeding relating to the enforcement of any provision of this Agreement is brought against a party, the prevailing party shall be entitled to recover reasonable attorneys' fees, costs and disbursements (in addition to any other relief to which the prevailing party may be entitled). In addition, the Investor agrees to pay the reasonable fees and costs of the Company's legal fees incurred to a maximum of $10,000) in connection with the negotiation and preparation of this agreement and the amendment of the Shareholder Rights Plan.
Attorney's Fees and Expenses.
(
 
(j) Neither this Agreement nor the Proxy are intended to confer upon any other person any rights or remedies hereunder or thereunder.
No Third-Party Beneficiaries.
 
(k) This Agreement and the Proxy constitute the full, final and entire understanding and agreement between the parties with regard to the subject matter hereof and, other than as expressly set forth in this Agreement and the Proxy, supercede all previous communications, negotiations, warranties, representations, covenants or agreements with respect to such subject matter, whether oral or written. This agreement may not be modified or amended except in writing by the parties hereto.
Entire Agreement.
 
 
 
, the parties hereto have executed this V A as of the date first above written.
IN WITNESS WHEREOF
OTING
GREEMENT
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Perry Corp. ("Investor"), a securityholder of Natus Medical Incorporated, a Delaware corporation (the "Company"), hereby irrevocably (to the fullest extent permitted by law) appoints the Chief Executive Officer and President and Chief Financial Officer of the Company, and each of them, as the sole and exclusive attorneys and proxies of Investor, with full power of substitution and resubstitution, to vote and exercise all voting and related rights (to the full extent that Investor is entitled to do so) with respect to all of the Subject Shares (as defined in the Voting Agreement referred to below) of capital stock of the Company that now are or hereafter may be beneficially owned by Investor, and any and all other shares or equity securities of the Company issued or issuable in respect thereof on or after the date hereof (in this Proxy, collectively the "Shares") in accordance with the terms of this Proxy. The Shares beneficially owned by Investor as of the date of this Proxy are listed on the final page of this Proxy. Upon Investor's execution of this Proxy, any and all prior proxies given by Investor with respect to any Shares are hereby revoked and Investor agrees not to grant any subsequent proxies with respect to the Shares until after the Expiration Date (as defined below).
 
This Proxy is irrevocable (to the fullest extent permitted by applicable law), is coupled with an interest and to secure the obligations of Stockholder thereunder, is granted pursuant to that certain Voting Agreement of even date herewith by and between the Company and Investor (the "Voting Agreement"), and is granted in consideration of the Company entering into the Voting Agreement and carrying out its obligations thereunder. As used herein, the term "Expiration Date" shall mean the earliest to occur of:
 
the date that the Investor owns a number of shares of Common Stock of the Company equal to or less than the number of the Investor Shares and upon which date the Investor provides notice to the Company of such fact;
 
the date of the closing of a sale, lease, or other disposition of all or substantially all of the Company's assets or the Company's merger into or consolidation with any other corporation or other entity, or any other corporate reorganization, in which the holders of the Company's outstanding voting stock immediately prior to such transaction own, immediately after such transaction, securities representing less than fifty percent (50%) of the voting power (determined on an as-converted basis) of the corporation or other entity surviving such transaction;
 
the date that is the 10 year anniversary of the execution of the Proxy; or
 
the date as of which the parties hereto terminate this Proxy by written consent of both parties.
 
The attorneys and proxies named above, and each of them, are hereby authorized and empowered by Investor, at any time prior to the Expiration Date, to act as Investor's attorney and proxy to vote the Shares, and to exercise all voting, consent and similar rights of the undersigned with respect to the Shares (including, without limitation, the power to execute and deliver written
 
consents) at every annual, special or adjourned meeting of stockholders of the Company, and in every written consent in lieu of such meeting, in the manner that Investor is required so to do in Section 4 of the Voting Agreement.
 
The attorneys and proxies named above may not exercise this Proxy on any matter except as provided in Section 4 of the Voting Agreement. Investor may vote the Shares on all other matters as Investor determines appropriate.
 
Any authority granted by Investor hereunder shall be binding upon the successors and assigns of Investor.
 
This Proxy is irrevocable (to the fullest extent permitted by applicable law). This Proxy shall terminate, and be of no further force and effect, automatically upon the Expiration Date.
 
Dated: February 14, 2003
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BABY/BABY-8K-20030506161653.txt.gz
TIME:20030506161653
EVENTS:	Financial statements and exhibits	Regulation FD Disclosure
TEXT:
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
ITEM 7.    FINANCIAL STATEMENTS, PRO FORMA FINANCIAL INFORMATION AND EXHIBITS.
 
 
 
 
On May 6, 2003, Natus Medical Inc. (the "Company") is issuing a press release and holding a conference call regarding its financial results for the first quarter of fiscal 2003 ended March 31, 2003. A copy of the press release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 to this Form 8-K.
 
The information in this Form 8-K and the exhibit attached hereto shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act") or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, regardless of any general incorporation language in such filing.
 
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 
 
 

 
Exhibit 99.1
 
 
 
(Nasdaq NM: BABY) today announced financial results for the three months ended March 31, 2003.
SAN CARLOS, Calif. (May 6, 2003)  Natus Medical Incorporated
 
Revenue for the first quarter of 2003 increased 10% to $6.7 million, compared with revenue of $6.1 million for the first quarter of 2002. First quarter 2003 revenue from ALGO
disposable supplies increased $181,000 to $4.5 million, and revenue from ALGO screening equipment increased $327,000 to $1.8 million, both compared with the first quarter of 2002.
 
Revenue for the first quarter of 2003 from U.S. operations was $4.8 million, down 5% from $5.1 million reported for the first quarter of 2002. Revenue from international operations increased by 90% to $1.8 million, compared with $959,000 reported for the first quarter of 2002, due primarily to higher screening equipment sales. Gross margin improved to 62.3% in the first quarter of 2003, compared with 58.6% in the first quarter of 2002. Total operating expenses declined 6% to $5.2 million for the first quarter of 2003, compared with $5.6 million for the first quarter of 2002.
 
The net loss available to common stockholders for the first quarter of 2003 was $917,000, or $0.06 per share, compared with a net loss available to common stockholders of $1.8 million, or $0.11 per share, for the first quarter of 2002.
 
As of March 31, 2003, Natus had cash, cash equivalents and short-term investments of $43.5 million, stockholders' equity of $53.8 million and working capital of $50.3 million.
 
The Company's domestic cumulative installations of ALGO Newborn Hearing Screening system units, net of trade ins, increased during the quarter by 24 to 2,916 units on March 31, 2003, while its international cumulative installations, net of trade ins, increased by 133 to 1,596 units.
 
"We are pleased to report record first quarter revenue and improved gross margin resulting in a 17% increase in gross profit, while simultaneously reducing operating expenses due to cost restructuring measures implemented in the third quarter of 2002," said Tim Johnson, president and chief executive officer of Natus. "We continue to target reaching profitability by mid-2003."
 
The Company's first quarter 2003 operating expenses decreased by approximately $352,000, compared with the first quarter 2002 and by approximately $726,000, compared with the third quarter of 2002. Natus further reported that it expects additional reductions in operating expenses related to actions taken specifically in regard to its international operations.
 
"With better cost controls in place, we can devote our attention to maintaining our domestic newborn hearing screening leadership position, driving growth with new product offerings and to increasing ALGO sales in international markets," explained Mr. Johnson.
 
Conference Call Information
 
Natus has scheduled an investor conference call to discuss this announcement beginning at 4:45 p.m. Eastern Time today. Individuals interested in listening to the conference call may do so by dialing (888) 802-5257 for domestic callers, or (706) 634-0175 for international callers. A telephone replay will be available for 48 hours following the conclusion of the call by dialing (800) 642-1687 for domestic callers, or (706) 645-9291 for international callers, and entering passcode 9691139. The live conference call will also be available via the Internet at , and a recording of the call will be available on the Company's Web site for 14 days following the completion of the call.
http://investor.natus.com
 
About Natus Medical
 
Natus develops, manufactures and markets easy-to-use medical products for the detection and management of common disorders in newborns. Natus is a market leader in sales of newborn hearing screening equipment and supplies with its ALGO
product line. Natus also manufactures and distributes MiniMuffs
Neonatal Noise Attenuators and the CO-Stat
End Tidal Breath Analyzer, a technology that non-invasively detects the rate of hemolysis in newborns, an important tool in the management of neonatal jaundice. Additionally, Natus manufactures and sells the neoBLUE
LED Phototherapy light for the treatment of neonatal jaundice. Natus sells and supports its products domestically through direct field sales representatives and clinical educators. Natus products are distributed by its wholly owned subsidiaries in Japan and in the U.K. and have been distributed in approximately 23 other countries. Additional information can be found at .
www.natus.com
 
This press release contains forward-looking statements as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, particularly statements regarding the expectations, beliefs, plans, intentions, and strategies of Natus. These forward-looking statements include, but are not limited to, statements regarding the achievement of profitability, future domestic or international sales levels or opportunities and anticipated additional expense reductions. These statements relate to future events or Natus' future financial performance or results and involve known and unknown risks, uncertainties and other factors that may cause Natus' actual results, levels of activity, performance or achievements to differ materially from those expressed or implied by the forward-looking statements. In some cases, you will be able to identify forward-looking statements by terminology such as "anticipates," "may," "believe," "should," "plan," "will," "offer," "expects," "potential," "continue" or the negative or derivatives of these terms or other comparable terminology. Forward-looking statements are only predictions and the actual events or results may differ materially. Natus cannot provide any assurance that its future results will meet expectations. Natus' operating results could differ materially due to a number of factors, including the continued growth of demand (or absence
of continued growth of demand) for newborn hearing screening equipment, continued acceptance of Natus' existing products, the successful development, introduction and widespread market acceptance of Natus' new products, domestic and global economic conditions, competition from other companies selling newborn screening products, the failure of states or foreign countries to adopt mandates or guidelines requiring screening for the disorders for which Natus' products screen, the failure of third party payors to provide adequate reimbursement for the use of Natus' products, adverse changes in Natus' relationships with its suppliers, reduced revenue as a result of discounts given to organizations representing several end customers for Natus' products, failure to obtain necessary regulatory clearances or approvals, adverse changes in Natus' relationships with its distributors, and product liability and intellectual property disputes or litigation.
 
For additional information and considerations regarding the risks faced by Natus, see Natus' reports on Forms 10-Q and 10-K filed and to be filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission. Although Natus believes that the expectations reflected in the forward-looking statements are reasonable, Natus cannot guarantee future results, levels of activity, performance or achievements. In addition, historical information should not be considered a predictor of future performance. Moreover, neither Natus nor any other person assumes responsibility for the accuracy and completeness of these forward-looking statements. Natus disclaims any obligation to update information contained in any forward-looking statement.
 
Natus
; 70-40
; ALGO
; ALGO 1e
; ALGO 2
; ALGO 2e; ALGO 2e Color
TM
; ALGO DataBook
; CO-Stat
; Dri-Prep
; Ear Couplers
; Jelly Button
; MiniMuffs
; AABR
, ALGO 3
TM
, and neoBLUE
TM
are Natus trademarks.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BABY/BABY-8K-20030606180810.txt.gz
TIME:20030606180810
EVENTS:	Other events	Financial statements and exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other events
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
ITEM 5. OTHER EVENTS AND REQUIRED REGULATION FD DISCLOSURE.
 
On June 3, 2003, Natus Medical Incorporated (the "Company") issued a press release regarding the appointment of Steven J. Murphy as vice president, finance and the resignation of Glenn A. Bauer, its chief financial officer. A copy of the press release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 to this Form 8-K.
 
ITEM 7. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS, PRO FORMA FINANCIAL INFORMATION AND EXHIBITS.
 
(c) Exhibits.
 
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 
 
 

 
Exhibit 99.1
 
 
), a leading provider of products used to identify and monitor common medical disorders that may occur from the time of conception to a baby's first birthday, today announced that Glenn A. Bauer has resigned as chief financial officer and vice president, finance to pursue other business interests. He will serve as a consultant to the Company for a three month period. The Company further announced the promotion of Steven J. Murphy to vice president, finance. Mr. Murphy, who has served as the Company's director of finance and controller since September 30, 2002, will assume responsibility for overseeing the Company's financial operations effective immediately.
SAN CARLOS, Calif. (June 3, 2003)  Natus Medical Incorporated (Nasdaq NM: BABY
 
"We have enjoyed working with Glenn and we appreciate his assistance in supporting a smooth transition," said Tim Johnson, Natus president and chief executive officer. "Steve has demonstrated strong accounting, financial, and management skills and has developed a solid understanding of our business during his exemplary service as director of finance and controller. We welcome him to our senior management team."
 
Mr. Murphy brings over 20 years of business and financial experience with expertise in both domestic and overseas operations. Prior to joining Natus, he served for two years as controller at AdvisorTech Corporation, a multi-national software development company that targets financial intermediaries, where he was responsible for consolidated financial reporting of domestic, Asian and European operations. His duties also included significant reporting responsibilities to the board of directors and investor groups, which included preparation of monthly investor packages, annual budgets, variance reports and financial analysis.
 
Before AdvisorTech, Mr. Murphy served as vice president of finance at RWS Group, LLC, an international service company providing management of language-related projects primarily to Fortune 500 companies. In this position, he served as the senior financial executive responsible for preparation of all financial reporting. Additionally he was principal of Business Analysis Group, providing accounting consulting services on a contract basis; controller with Dahlin Group Architecture-Planning, a regional architecture and land planning firm; and an accountant with Jones, Henle & Schunck. Mr. Murphy is a certified public accountant.
 
About Natus Medical
 
Natus Medical develops, manufactures and markets proprietary, non-invasive, easy-to-use crib-side devices that assist in the detection, treatment, and/or monitoring of common disorders in newborns. Natus' product lines also include MiniMuffs
Neonatal Noise Attenuators, the CO-Stat
End Tidal Breath Analyzer and, neoBLUE
LED Phototherapy, which assist clinicians in the management of neonatal jaundice. Natus sells and supports its products domestically through field Sales Representatives and Clinical Consultants. Natus products are distributed by its wholly owned
 
 
subsidiaries in Japan and in the U.K. and have been distributed in approximately 22 other countries. Additional information can be found at .
www.natus.com
 
natus
; 70/40
; ALGO
; AABR
; ALGO 1e
; ALGO-1 Plus
; ALGO 2
; ALGO DataBook
; Dri-Prep
; Ear Couplers
; Jelly Button
; Flexicoupler
; Jelly Tab
; MiniMuffs
; CO-Stat
; and neoBLUE
are Natus trademarks.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BABY/BABY-8K-20030702080611.txt.gz
TIME:20030702080611
EVENTS:	Other events	Financial statements and exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other events
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On July 1, 2003, Natus Medical Incorporated (the "Company") is issuing a press release regarding the acquisition of Neometrics Inc. A copy of the press release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 to this Form 8-K.
 
The information in this Form 8-K and the exhibit attached hereto shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act") or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, regardless of any general incorporation language in such filing.
 
 
(c)  Exhibits.
 
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
 
) today announced the acquisition of privately held Neometrics Inc., a leading supplier of data systems used in 18 state health departments for various newborn screenings, including hearing screening data collection and management. Neometrics is also an established provider of diagnostic reagents for the metabolic screening of infants. With this acquisition, Natus expands its ability to provide newborn screening products and services with new software tools to gather, record, integrate and report metabolic screening, hearing screening, and birth statistics from individual hospitals to state governments and, ultimately, to the U.S. Centers for Disease Control and Prevention (CDC).
SAN CARLOS, Calif. (July 1, 2003)  Natus Medical Incorporated ("Natus") (Nasdaq NM: BABY
 
Under terms of the agreement, Natus has acquired the assets of Neometrics for $3.6 million cash with the potential for additional consideration contingent upon Neometrics achieving certain financial results. Neometrics has 40 employees, and reported unaudited revenues of $6.0 million for its fiscal year ended February 28, 2003, up approximately 28% from the prior fiscal year. Natus expects the Neometrics acquisition to be accretive to earnings and will discuss its outlook for the combined operations during its upcoming conference call on second quarter earnings. Neometrics founders Martin Wolfson and David Schwartz have signed consulting agreements with Natus to assist with integration and the transition of Neometrics employees and customers.
 
"We believe our purchase of Neometrics is an excellent transaction for Natus from both strategic and financial perspectives," stated Tim Johnson, Natus president and chief executive officer. "We look forward to offering our expanded customer base the opportunity to purchase an integrated solution of devices, supplies and software for newborn screening and data management. Every state in the U.S. requires newborn metabolic screening, with ever-increasing pressures to standardize and add new tests and effectively manage the massive quantities of test results. We expect this to be a trend in developed countries throughout the world, as well, thereby representing a significant opportunity for Natus."
 
Neometrics has developed proprietary data management and reporting software systems specifically designed for use by public health organizations. Neometrics also sells diagnostic reagents, providing a complete and integrated solution for state health departments and laboratories. The company's headquarters and software operations are located in East Northport, New York, and its diagnostic reagent operations are in Portland, Oregon. Additional information about Neometrics is available at .
www.neometrics.com
 
"Since beginning operations in 1978, our vision has been to provide state-of-the-art screening and diagnostic services for newborns," said David Schwartz, president and chief executive officer of
 
Neometrics. "We are confident that by joining with Natus, we will further improve customer service, expand our customer base, and enhance efficiencies in the critical follow-up of children with genetic and metabolic disorders."
 
"We believe this acquisition is a strong fit with Natus' strategic vision of broadening our product offering in our core area of focus, namely the delivery to discharge' space," said George Ryan, Natus vice president of business development. "We also expect to benefit by increasing our domestic customer base and by gaining Neometrics' experience in screening over 20 million babies. We now have more products to bring to an expanded customer base, which we think enhances Natus' future growth prospects and helps to broaden our market presence."
 
Conference Call Information
 
Natus has scheduled an investor conference call to discuss this announcement beginning at 11:00 a.m. Eastern Daylight Time Wednesday July 2, 2003. Individuals interested in listening to the conference call may do so by dialing (888) 802-5257 for domestic callers, or (706) 634-0175 for international callers. A telephone replay will be available for 48 hours following the conclusion of the call by dialing (800) 642-1687 for domestic callers, or (706) 645-9291 for international callers, and entering pass code 1595598. The live conference call will also be available via the Internet at , and a recording of the call will be available on the Company's Web site for 90 days following the completion of the call.
http://investor.natus.com
 
About Natus Medical
 
Natus develops, manufactures and markets proprietary, non-invasive, easy-to-use crib-side devices that assist in the detection, treatment, and/or monitoring of common disorders in newborns. Natus' product lines include: ALGO Newborn Hearing Screeners, MiniMuffs Neonatal Noise Attenuators, the CO-Stat End Tidal Breath Analyzer and, neoBLUE LED Phototherapy, which assist clinicians in the management of neonatal jaundice. Natus sells and supports its products domestically through field Sales Representatives and Clinical Consultants. Natus products are distributed by its wholly owned subsidiaries in Japan and in the U.K. and have been distributed in approximately 26 other countries. Additional information can be found at .
www.natus.com
 
This news release contains forward-looking statements as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, particularly statements regarding the exceptions, beliefs, plans, intentions, and strategies of Natus. These forward looking statements include, but are not limited to, statements regarding the expected financial results of Neometrics and its several products and services; the extent to which the acquisition complements Natus' current products or services; the expectation that the acquisition will be accretive during 2003; the expectation of customers purchasing an integrated solution of products and services from Natus' new Neometrics product offerings; the continuation of required newborn metabolic screening by states in the U.S., and the trend for that to occur in other developed countries; the expected benefit to Natus of access to Neometrics' customer base and experience in the infant screening business; and the expectation that the Neometrics acquisition will
 
enhance Natus' growth. These statements relate to future events or Natus' future financial performance and involve known and unknown risks, uncertainties and other factors that may cause Natus' actual results, levels of activity, performance or achievements to differ materially from those expressed or implied by the forward-looking statements. In some cases, you will be able to identify forward-looking statements by terminology such as "anticipates," "believes," "can," "may," "will," "expects," "expands," "potential," "continue," "versatile," "unique," "complements," "think," "confident" or the negative of these terms or other comparable terminology. Forward-looking statements are only predictions and the actual events or results may differ materially. Natus cannot provide any assurance that its future results will meet expectations. Natus' operating results could differ materially due to a number of factors, including the continued growth of demand for and acceptance of Natus' products, competition from other companies selling newborn hearing screening products or services and the failure of states to continue to require newborn metabolic screening or the failure of third party payors to provide adequate reimbursement for the use of Natus' products.
 
For additional information and considerations regarding the risks faced by Natus, see its periodic reports on Forms 10-K and 10-Q filed and to be filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission. Although Natus believes that the expectations reflected in the forward-looking statements are reasonable, Natus cannot guarantee future results, levels of activity, performance or achievements. In addition, historical information should not be considered a predictor of future performance. Moreover, neither Natus nor any other person assumes responsibility for the accuracy and completeness of these forward-looking statements. Natus disclaims any obligation to update information contained in any forward-looking statement.
 
natus; 70/40; ALGO; AABR; ALGO 1e; ALGO-1 Plus; ALGO 2; ALGO DataBook; Dri-Prep; Ear Couplers; Jelly Button; Flexicoupler; Jelly Tab; MiniMuffs; CO-Stat; and neoBLUE are Natus trademarks.
 
Neometrics; Accuwell; Accuscreen; CEM; CMS; Neocoat; MSDS; VRS; and WebEBP are Neometrics trademarks.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BABY/BABY-8K-20030807165252.txt.gz
TIME:20030807165252
EVENTS:		Financial statements and exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: 
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
ITEM 7.    Financial Statements, Pro Forma Financial Information and Exhibits.
 
 
 
 
ITEM 13.    Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
 
On August 7, 2003, Natus Medical Incorporated (the "Company") is issuing a press release and holding a conference call regarding its financial results for the second quarter of fiscal 2003 ended June 30, 2003. A copy of the press release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 to this Form 8-K.
 
The information in this Form 8-K and the exhibit attached hereto shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act") or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
(Nasdaq NM: BABY) today announced financial results for the three and six months ended June 30, 2003.
SAN CARLOS, Calif. (August 7, 2003)Natus Medical Incorporated
 
Natus reported revenue for the three months ended June 30, 2003 of $7.1 million, an increase of 9%, compared with revenue of $6.5 million in the second quarter of 2002. Revenue from disposable supplies increased 14% to $5.2 million for the three months ended June 30, 2003, compared with $4.5 million in the second quarter of 2002, due primarily to the Company's greater international installed base of ALGO hearing screening devices. Revenue from medical device sales was $1.6 million for the three months ended June 30, 2003, a decrease of 5%, compared with $1.7 million in the second quarter of 2002.
 
Revenue from U.S. operations was $5.3 million for the three months ended June 30, 2003, compared with $5.6 million in the second quarter of 2002. Revenue from international operations was $1.8 million for the three months ended June 30, 2003, an increase of 102% from $881,000 in the second quarter of 2002. The increase in international revenue was the result of stronger sales of both medical devices and disposable supplies.
 
Gross margin was 59.7% in the three months ended June 30, 2003, compared with 54.9% in the second quarter of 2002. Total operating expenses were $5.6 million for the three months ended June 30, 2003, compared with $6.0 million in the second quarter of 2002. The Company reported a net loss available to common stockholders for the second quarter of 2003 of $1.2 million, or $0.07 per share, compared to a net loss available to common stockholders of $2.0 million, or $0.12 per share, in the second quarter of 2002.
 
For the six months ended June 30, 2003, revenue increased 9% to $13.7 million, from $12.5 million in the six months ended June 30, 2002. For the six months ended June 30, 2003, the Company reported a net loss available to common stockholders of $2.1 million, or $0.13 per share, compared with a net loss available to common stockholders of $3.8 million, or $0.24 per share, in the six months ended June 30, 2002.
 
As of June 30, 2003, the Company reported cash, cash equivalents and short-term investments of $43.3 million, stockholders' equity of $53.0 million and working capital of $49.6 million.
 
The Company's domestic cumulative installations, net of trade ins, of ALGO hearing screening devices increased to 2,949 on June 30, 2003, while its international cumulative installations, net of trade ins, totaled 1,656 at that date.
 
"As expected, our development of new overseas distributors has contributed to strong international sales growth, with second quarter international revenue more than doubling compared with the same quarter last year," said Tim Johnson, president and chief executive officer of Natus. "While domestic sales of disposable supplies remained strong, supply sales in international markets were particularly strong as we benefited from an increased ALGO installed base. Our plan for the remainder of this year is to continue to develop new distributor relationships in countries where we see the greatest potential.
 
"In addition to growing our international business and reducing costs, we are executing on our strategy to add products to our established distribution channel," added Mr. Johnson. "In June, we introduced our newest product in the ALGO family, the hand-held ALGO 3i Newborn Hearing Screener, developed from technology we acquired last year. Last month, we acquired privately held Neometrics, a supplier of data systems. We believe that our acquisition of Neometrics provides us with synergistic product lines allowing us to leverage our core business. We also believe that the acquisition provides us with a strategic platform to expand our product offerings in the newborn medical market.
"We also benefited from cost control measures we took at the end of last year's third quarter," added Mr. Johnson. "These measures contributed to the reduction in our operating expenses, down $421,000 compared to second quarter 2002, and to our improved gross margin. With our international expansion, recent acquisition, reduced operating expenses and improved gross margin, we feel that we are well positioned for future growth and profitability."
 
Natus has scheduled an investor conference call to discuss this announcement beginning at 4:45 p.m. Eastern Time today. Individuals interested in listening to the conference call may do so by dialing (888) 802-5257 for domestic callers, or (706) 634-0175 for international callers. A telephone replay will be available for 48 hours following the conclusion of the call by dialing (800) 642-1687 for domestic callers, or (706) 645-9291 for international callers, and entering pass code 1896068. The live conference call will also be available via the Internet at , and a recording of the call will be available on the Company's Web site for 30 days following the completion of the call.
http://investor.natus.com
 
About Natus Medical
 
Natus Medical Incorporated develops, manufactures and markets proprietary, easy-to-use medical products that assist in the detection, treatment, monitoring and tracking of common disorders in newborns. Headquartered in San Carlos, California, the Company has operations in New York, Oregon, the U.K. and Japan.
 
Natus' product lines include: ALGO Newborn Hearing Screeners, MiniMuffs Neonatal Noise Attenuators, the CO-Stat End Tidal Breath Analyzer, neoBLUE LED Phototherapy device; Neometrics software products: MSDS Metabolic Screening Database System, CMS Case Management System, WebEBP Web Based Electronic Birth Page, VRS Voice Response System, and the Neometrics Accuwell diagnostic reagent product line including: TSH ELISA, T4 EIA, PKU, Total Galactose, G6PD and IRT.
 
Natus' products are marketed worldwide and are sold through a direct sales force in the U.S., through wholly owned subsidiaries in the U.K. and Japan, and through distributors in 25 other countries.
 
Additional information can be found at .
www.natus.com
 
This press release contains forward-looking statements as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, particularly statements regarding the expectations, beliefs, plans, intentions, and strategies of Natus. These forward looking statements include, but are not limited to, our plan to develop new distributor relationships, our strategy and execution of our strategy, to add products to our distribution channel, our belief that our acquisition of Neometrics provides us with synergistic product lines, allows us to leverage our core business and provides a strategic platform to expand our product offering, the effect of cost control measures, and our future growth and profitability. These statements relate to future events or Natus' future financial performance or results and involve known and unknown risks, uncertainties and other factors that may cause Natus' actual results, levels of activity, performance or achievements to differ materially from those expressed or implied by the forward-looking statements.
The actual operating results could differ materially due to a number of factors, including the continued growth of demand (or absence of continued growth of demand) for newborn hearing screening equipment, acceptance of Natus' existing products, the successful development, introduction and widespread market acceptance of Natus' new products, dependence on our ALGO hearing screening devices for substantially all of our revenue, the successful addition of products to Natus' established distribution channel, domestic and global economic conditions, competition from other companies, the failure of states or foreign countries to adopt mandates or guidelines requiring screening for the disorders for which Natus' products screen, the failure of third party payors to provide adequate reimbursement for the use of Natus' products, adverse changes in Natus' relationships with its suppliers, reduced revenue as a result of discounts given to organizations representing several end customers for Natus' products, failure to obtain necessary regulatory clearances or approvals, adverse changes in Natus' relationships with its distributors difficulty integrating acquired businesses into our business, performance of newly acquired products and technologies, difficulty and increased expenses relating to foreign operations and product liability and intellectual property disputes or litigation. Natus disclaims any obligation to update information contained in any forward-looking statement.
 
For additional information and considerations regarding the risks faced by Natus, see Natus' reports on Forms 10-Q and 10-K filed and to be filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
 
natus; 70/40; ALGO; AABR; ALGO 1e; ALGO-1 Plus; ALGO 2; ALGO DataBook; Dri-Prep; Ear Couplers; Jelly Button; Flexicoupler; Jelly Tab; MiniMuffs; CO-Stat; and neoBLUE;Neometrics; Accuwell; Accuscreen; CEM; CMS; Neocoat; MSDS; VRS; and WebEBP are Natus trademarks.
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BABY/BABY-8K-20030808161718.txt.gz
TIME:20030808161718
EVENTS:		Financial statements and exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: 
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
The Company previously furnished its press release "Natus Medical Reports 2003 Second Quarter Financial Results" on a Form 8-K. The purpose of this amendment is to correct a typographical error in an item number of Form 8-K indicated in the Form 8-K previously furnished. There are no other changes, including in the press release attached as an exhibit.
 
ITEM 7.    Financial Statements, Pro Forma Financial Information and Exhibits.
 
 
 
 
ITEM 12.    Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
 
On August 7, 2003, Natus Medical Incorporated (the "Company") is issuing a press release and holding a conference call regarding its financial results for the second quarter of fiscal 2003 ended June 30, 2003. A copy of the press release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 to this Form 8-K.
 
The information in this Form 8-K and the exhibit attached hereto shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act") or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the registrant has duly caused this amended report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
(Nasdaq NM: BABY) today announced financial results for the three and six months ended June 30, 2003.
SAN CARLOS, Calif. (August 7, 2003)Natus Medical Incorporated
 
Natus reported revenue for the three months ended June 30, 2003 of $7.1 million, an increase of 9%, compared with revenue of $6.5 million in the second quarter of 2002. Revenue from disposable supplies increased 14% to $5.2 million for the three months ended June 30, 2003, compared with $4.5 million in the second quarter of 2002, due primarily to the Company's greater international installed base of ALGO hearing screening devices. Revenue from medical device sales was $1.6 million for the three months ended June 30, 2003, a decrease of 5%, compared with $1.7 million in the second quarter of 2002.
 
Revenue from U.S. operations was $5.3 million for the three months ended June 30, 2003, compared with $5.6 million in the second quarter of 2002. Revenue from international operations was $1.8 million for the three months ended June 30, 2003, an increase of 102% from $881,000 in the second quarter of 2002. The increase in international revenue was the result of stronger sales of both medical devices and disposable supplies.
 
Gross margin was 59.7% in the three months ended June 30, 2003, compared with 54.9% in the second quarter of 2002. Total operating expenses were $5.6 million for the three months ended June 30, 2003, compared with $6.0 million in the second quarter of 2002. The Company reported a net loss available to common stockholders for the second quarter of 2003 of $1.2 million, or $0.07 per share, compared to a net loss available to common stockholders of $2.0 million, or $0.12 per share, in the second quarter of 2002.
 
For the six months ended June 30, 2003, revenue increased 9% to $13.7 million, from $12.5 million in the six months ended June 30, 2002. For the six months ended June 30, 2003, the Company reported a net loss available to common stockholders of $2.1 million, or $0.13 per share, compared with a net loss available to common stockholders of $3.8 million, or $0.24 per share, in the six months ended June 30, 2002.
 
As of June 30, 2003, the Company reported cash, cash equivalents and short-term investments of $43.3 million, stockholders' equity of $53.0 million and working capital of $49.6 million.
 
The Company's domestic cumulative installations, net of trade ins, of ALGO hearing screening devices increased to 2,949 on June 30, 2003, while its international cumulative installations, net of trade ins, totaled 1,656 at that date.
 
"As expected, our development of new overseas distributors has contributed to strong international sales growth, with second quarter international revenue more than doubling compared with the same quarter last year," said Tim Johnson, president and chief executive officer of Natus. "While domestic sales of disposable supplies remained strong, supply sales in international markets were particularly strong as we benefited from an increased ALGO installed base. Our plan for the remainder of this year is to continue to develop new distributor relationships in countries where we see the greatest potential.
 
"In addition to growing our international business and reducing costs, we are executing on our strategy to add products to our established distribution channel," added Mr. Johnson. "In June, we introduced our newest product in the ALGO family, the hand-held ALGO 3i Newborn Hearing Screener, developed from technology we acquired last year. Last month, we acquired privately held Neometrics, a supplier of data systems. We believe that our acquisition of Neometrics provides us with synergistic product lines allowing us to leverage our core business. We also believe that the acquisition provides us with a strategic platform to expand our product offerings in the newborn medical market.
"We also benefited from cost control measures we took at the end of last year's third quarter," added Mr. Johnson. "These measures contributed to the reduction in our operating expenses, down $421,000 compared to second quarter 2002, and to our improved gross margin. With our international expansion, recent acquisition, reduced operating expenses and improved gross margin, we feel that we are well positioned for future growth and profitability."
 
Natus has scheduled an investor conference call to discuss this announcement beginning at 4:45 p.m. Eastern Time today. Individuals interested in listening to the conference call may do so by dialing (888) 802-5257 for domestic callers, or (706) 634-0175 for international callers. A telephone replay will be available for 48 hours following the conclusion of the call by dialing (800) 642-1687 for domestic callers, or (706) 645-9291 for international callers, and entering pass code 1896068. The live conference call will also be available via the Internet at , and a recording of the call will be available on the Company's Web site for 30 days following the completion of the call.
http://investor.natus.com
 
About Natus Medical
 
Natus Medical Incorporated develops, manufactures and markets proprietary, easy-to-use medical products that assist in the detection, treatment, monitoring and tracking of common disorders in newborns. Headquartered in San Carlos, California, the Company has operations in New York, Oregon, the U.K. and Japan.
 
Natus' product lines include: ALGO Newborn Hearing Screeners, MiniMuffs Neonatal Noise Attenuators, the CO-Stat End Tidal Breath Analyzer, neoBLUE LED Phototherapy device; Neometrics software products: MSDS Metabolic Screening Database System, CMS Case Management System, WebEBP Web Based Electronic Birth Page, VRS Voice Response System, and the Neometrics Accuwell diagnostic reagent product line including: TSH ELISA, T4 EIA, PKU, Total Galactose, G6PD and IRT.
 
Natus' products are marketed worldwide and are sold through a direct sales force in the U.S., through wholly owned subsidiaries in the U.K. and Japan, and through distributors in 25 other countries.
 
Additional information can be found at .
www.natus.com
 
This press release contains forward-looking statements as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, particularly statements regarding the expectations, beliefs, plans, intentions, and strategies of Natus. These forward looking statements include, but are not limited to, our plan to develop new distributor relationships, our strategy and execution of our strategy, to add products to our distribution channel, our belief that our acquisition of Neometrics provides us with synergistic product lines, allows us to leverage our core business and provides a strategic platform to expand our product offering, the effect of cost control measures, and our future growth and profitability. These statements relate to future events or Natus' future financial performance or results and involve known and unknown risks, uncertainties and other factors that may cause Natus' actual results, levels of activity, performance or achievements to differ materially from those expressed or implied by the forward-looking statements.
The actual operating results could differ materially due to a number of factors, including the continued growth of demand (or absence of continued growth of demand) for newborn hearing screening equipment, acceptance of Natus' existing products, the successful development, introduction and widespread market acceptance of Natus' new products, dependence on our ALGO hearing screening devices for substantially all of our revenue, the successful addition of products to Natus' established distribution channel, domestic and global economic conditions, competition from other companies, the failure of states or foreign countries to adopt mandates or guidelines requiring screening for the disorders for which Natus' products screen, the failure of third party payors to provide adequate reimbursement for the use of Natus' products, adverse changes in Natus' relationships with its suppliers, reduced revenue as a result of discounts given to organizations representing several end customers for Natus' products, failure to obtain necessary regulatory clearances or approvals, adverse changes in Natus' relationships with its distributors difficulty integrating acquired businesses into our business, performance of newly acquired products and technologies, difficulty and increased expenses relating to foreign operations and product liability and intellectual property disputes or litigation. Natus disclaims any obligation to update information contained in any forward-looking statement.
 
For additional information and considerations regarding the risks faced by Natus, see Natus' reports on Forms 10-Q and 10-K filed and to be filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
 
natus; 70/40; ALGO; AABR; ALGO 1e; ALGO-1 Plus; ALGO 2; ALGO DataBook; Dri-Prep; Ear Couplers; Jelly Button; Flexicoupler; Jelly Tab; MiniMuffs; CO-Stat; and neoBLUE;Neometrics; Accuwell; Accuscreen; CEM; CMS; Neocoat; MSDS; VRS; and WebEBP are Natus trademarks.
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BABY/BABY-8K-20030918171336.txt.gz
TIME:20030918171336
EVENTS:	Changes in registrant's certifying accountant	Financial statements and exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Changes in registrant's certifying accountant
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
ITEM 4.    CHANGES IN REGISTRANT'S CERTIFYING ACCOUNTANT.
 
On September 12, 2003, Natus Medical Incorporated ("the Company") dismissed Deloitte & Touche LLP ("Deloitte & Touche") as its outside auditors. The decision to dismiss Deloitte & Touche was approved by the Company's Board of Directors upon the recommendation of its Audit Committee.
 
On July 1, 2003 the Company acquired privately held Neometrics Inc. ("Neometrics").
 
Approximately two years prior to being acquired by the Company, Neometrics agreed to act as a subcontractor to Deloitte Consulting on a consulting project with a state government agency. Deloitte Consulting subsequently submitted a bid to the government agency and on or about September 4, 2003 a contract was awarded to Deloitte Consulting to perform the work. Thus, the Company's Neometrics division might provide services to Deloitte Consulting. The Company has determined that if the Neometrics division initiates negotiation of a material subcontract with Deloitte Consulting, the independence of Deloitte & Touche could be impaired.
 
Deloitte & Touche's report on the Company's consolidated financial statements as of and for the years ended December 31, 2002 and 2001 did not contain an adverse opinion or disclaimer of opinion and was not qualified or modified as to uncertainty, audit scope or accounting principles.
 
During the Company's two most recent fiscal years and the subsequent interim period through September 12, 2003 there were no disagreements, as that term is used in Item 304(a)(1)(iv) of Regulation S-K, between the Company and Deloitte & Touche on any matter of accounting principles or practices, financial statement disclosure, or audit scope or procedure, which disagreements, if not resolved to Deloitte & Touche's satisfaction, would have caused Deloitte & Touche to make reference to the subject matter of the disagreement in connection with its reports.
 
No "reportable events," as that term is described in Item 304(a)(1)(v) of Regulation S-K, have occurred during the Company's two most recent fiscal years and the subsequent interim period through September 12, 2003.
 
The Company has provided Deloitte & Touche with a copy of the disclosures it is making in this Item 4, and has filed as an exhibit hereto the response of Deloitte & Touche to such disclosures.
 
ITEM 7.    FINANCIAL STATEMENTS, PRO FORMA FINANCIAL INFORMATION AND EXHIBITS.
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 

EXHIBIT 16.1
 
September 18, 2003
 
Securities and Exchange Commission
Mail Stop 11-3
450 Fifth Street, N.W.
Washington, D.C. 20549
 
Dear Sirs/Madams:
 
We have read Item 4 of the Form 8-K of Natus Medical Incorporated dated September 18, 2003 and we agree with the statements made therein.
 
Yours truly,
 
/s/    Deloitte & Touche, LLP

EXHIBIT 99.1
 
 
(Nasdaq NM: BABY) today announced that it is changing its independent auditors, replacing Deloitte & Touche LLP. The Company will appoint new independent auditors in the next few weeks.
SAN CARLOS, Calif. (September 18, 2003)  Natus Medical Incorporated
 
The decision to change auditors was made by Natus to ensure the continued independence of its outside auditors and was approved by Natus' board of directors on September 12, 2003 following a recommendation made by its audit committee. The decision to change auditors was not the result of any disagreement between the Company and Deloitte & Touche on any matters of accounting principles or practices, financial statement disclosure, or auditing scope or procedure as more fully described in the Form 8-K Natus filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission this day.
 
Natus reached the decision as a consequence of its July 1, 2003 acquisition of privately held Neometrics Inc., a leading supplier of data systems used in state health departments for the collection and management of various newborn health screening data. Approximately two years prior to the acquisition, Neometrics agreed to act as a subcontractor to Deloitte Consulting on a consulting project with a state government agency. Deloitte Consulting subsequently submitted a bid to the government agency and in early September 2003 a contract was awarded to Deloitte Consulting to perform the work. Thus, Natus' new Neometrics division might provide services to Deloitte Consulting. Deloitte & Touche agrees with Natus that if the Neometrics division initiates negotiation of a material subcontract with Deloitte Consulting, the independence of Deloitte & Touche could be impaired.
 
"Deloitte & Touche has served as our outside auditor for more than 10 years and we have appreciated their professionalism and competency," stated Steven J. Murphy, Natus' Vice President, Finance. "We believe this is the correct decision based on our current circumstances and we are excited about the opportunity to work with Deloitte Consulting on a major consulting project."
 
Natus Medical Incorporated develops, manufactures and markets proprietary, easy-to-use medical products that assist in the detection, treatment, monitoring and tracking of common disorders in newborns. Headquartered in San Carlos, California, the Company has operations in New York, Oregon, the United Kingdom, and Japan.
 
Natus' product lines include: ALGO Newborn Hearing Screeners, MiniMuffs Neonatal Noise Attenuators, the CO-Stat End Tidal Breath Analyzer, neoBLUE LED Phototherapy device; Neometrics software products: MSDS Metabolic Screening Database System, CMS Case Management System, WebEBP Web Based Electronic Birth Page, VRS Voice Response
System, and the Neometrics diagnostic reagent products: Accuwell TSH ELISA and Accuwell T4 EIA. Natus markets and sells its products directly in the U.S., through its wholly owned subsidiaries in the U.K. and Japan, and through distributors in 25 other countries. Additional information about Natus Medical can be found at .
www.natus.com
 
This press release contains forward-looking statements as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, particularly statements regarding the expectations, beliefs, plans, intentions, and strategies of Natus. These forward looking statements include, but are not limited to, statements regarding our possible opportunity to provide consulting services to Deloitte Consulting in the context of a government agency contract or otherwise, as well as the possible future impact to Natus' revenue or earnings from any such contract. These statements relate to future events or Natus' future financial performance or results and involve known and unknown risks, uncertainties and other factors that may cause actual results, levels of activity, performance or achievements to differ materially from those expressed or implied by the forward-looking statements. Forward-looking statements are only predictions and the actual events or results may differ materially. Natus cannot provide any assurance that its future results or the results implied by the forward-looking statements will meet expectations. The results could differ materially due to a number of factors, including the demand (or absence of demand) for our products and services, particularly those of our new Neometrics division, our inexperience in connection with the provision, sale and distribution of Neometrics products and services, adverse changes in our relationship with Neometrics' customers including state and other government agencies, integration of our efforts to sell Neometrics services and products with our efforts to sell our existing products, the failure of third party payors to provide adequate reimbursement for the use of Natus' and Neometrics' services and products, failure to obtain necessary regulatory clearances or approvals, and product liability and intellectual property disputes or litigation. Natus disclaims any obligation to update information contained in any forward-looking statement.
 
For additional information and considerations regarding the risks faced by Natus, see Natus' reports on Forms 10-Q and 10-K filed and to be filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
 
natus; 70/40; ALGO; AABR; ALGO 1e; ALGO-1 Plus; ALGO 2; ALGO DataBook; Dri-Prep; Ear Couplers; Jelly Button; Flexicoupler; Jelly Tab; MiniMuffs; CO-Stat; and neoBLUENeometrics; Accuwell; Accuscreen; CEM; CMS; Neocoat; MSDS; VRS; and WebEBP are Natus trademarks.
;
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BABY/BABY-8K-20031020201712.txt.gz
TIME:20031020201712
EVENTS:	Changes in registrant's certifying accountant
TEXT:
ITEM: Changes in registrant's certifying accountant
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
ITEM 4.    CHANGES IN REGISTRANT'S CERTIFYING ACCOUNTANT.
 
On October 14, 2003, the Registrant appointed BDO Seidman, LLP as its independent accountants. The Audit Committee of the Registrant recommended the appointment.
 
The Registrant has not consulted with BDO Seidman, LLP regarding any of the matters or events set forth in Item 304(a)(2)(i) or (ii) of Regulation S-K during the Registrant's two most recent fiscal years and the subsequent interim period through October 14, 2003.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BABY/BABY-8K-20031112160121.txt.gz
TIME:20031112160121
EVENTS:		Financial statements and exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: 
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
ITEM 7.     FINANCIAL STATEMENTS, PRO FORMA FINANCIAL INFORMATION AND EXHIBITS.
 
        (c)    Exhibits.
 
 
ITEM 12.    Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
 
On November 12, 2003, Natus Medical Incorporated (the "Company") is issuing a press release and holding a conference call regarding its financial results for the third quarter of fiscal 2003 ended September 30, 2003. A copy of the press release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 to this Form 8-K.
 
The information in this Form 8-K and the exhibit attached hereto shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act") or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
 
(Nasdaq NM: BABY) today announced financial results for the three and nine months ended September 30, 2003.
SAN CARLOS, Calif. (November 12, 2003)  Natus Medical Incorporated
 
Natus reported record quarterly revenue for the three months ended September 30, 2003 of $8.0 million, an increase of 17%, compared with revenue of $6.8 million in the third quarter of 2002. The increase in revenue was primarily attributed to incremental revenue from the Neometrics product lines, which were obtained through the acquisition of the assets of Neometrics, Inc. in July 2003.
 
Historically, Natus has reported revenue in two categories  disposable supplies and medical devices. With the Neometrics
acquisition, Natus will report revenue in the categories: "supplies and services" and "devices and systems." Supplies and services includes revenue from Neometrics' reagent products and software maintenance agreements, as well as revenue from the sale of Natus' disposable supplies, including the Nascor product line, and extended service agreements for Natus' existing devices. Devices and systems includes revenue from the sale of Neometrics' data management systems, as well as revenue from the sale of Natus' ALGO, CO-Stat and neoBLUE devices.
 
Revenue from supplies and services increased 20% to $6.0 million for the three months ended September 30, 2003, compared with $5.0 million in the third quarter of 2002. The increase was primarily attributable to incremental revenue from the Neometrics' product lines as well as increased sales of ALGO disposable supplies. Revenue from devices and systems increased 12% to $1.9 million for the three months ended September 30, 2003, compared with $1.7 million in the third quarter of 2002. The increase was primarily attributable to incremental revenue from the Neometrics' product lines, partially offset by a decrease in sales of devices in international markets.
 
Revenue from U.S. operations increased by 20% to $6.8 million for the three months ended September 30, 2003, compared with $5.7 million in the third quarter of 2002. Revenue from international operations increased to $1.2 million for the three months ended September 30, 2003, an increase of 5% from $1.1 million in the third quarter of 2002.
 
Gross margin was 55.5% in the three months ended September 30, 2003, compared with 57.4% in the third quarter of 2002. Total operating expenses were $5.5 million for the three months ended September 30, 2003, down $428,000 compared with $6.0 million in the third quarter of 2002. The Company reported a net loss available to common stockholders for the third quarter of 2003 of $969,000, or $0.06 per share, compared with a net loss available to common stockholders of $1.6 million, or $0.10 per share, in the third quarter of 2002.
 
For the nine months ended September 30, 2003, revenue increased 12% to $21.7 million, from $19.3 million in the nine months ended September 30, 2002. For the nine months ended September 30, 2003, the Company reported a net loss available to common stockholders of $3.1 million, or $0.19 per share, compared with a net loss available to common stockholders of $5.4 million, or $0.34 per share, in the nine months ended September 30, 2002.
 
As of September 30, 2003, the Company reported cash, cash equivalents and short-term investments of $38.6
million, stockholders' equity of $52.0 million and working capital of $44.4 million. The Company's cash position at September 30, 2003 reflected the impact of the acquisition of the assets of Neometrics, Inc.
 
"While sales of our new Neometrics product lines led the way to record quarterly revenue, we also recognized increased sales from our neoBLUE phototherapy device as well as a modest increase in our core ALGO sales compared with the third quarter last year," said Tim Johnson, president and chief executive officer of Natus. "Additionally, we reduced expenses by $428,000 on a quarter-over-quarter basis as we continue to benefit from initiatives taken at the end of last year's third quarter."
 
Natus has scheduled an investor conference call to discuss this announcement beginning at 4:45 p.m. Eastern Time today. Individuals interested in listening to the conference call may do so by dialing (888) 802-5257 for domestic callers, or (706) 634-0175 for international callers. A telephone replay will be available for 48 hours following the conclusion of the call by dialing (800) 642-1687 for domestic callers, or (706) 645-9291 for international callers, and entering pass code 3800246. The live conference call will also be available via the Internet at , and a recording of the call will be available on the Company's Web site for 90 days following the completion of the call.
http://investor.natus.com
 
About Natus Medical
 
Natus Medical Incorporated develops, manufactures and markets proprietary, easy-to-use medical products that assist in the detection, treatment, monitoring and tracking of common disorders in newborns. Headquartered in San Carlos, California, the Company has operations in New York, Oregon, the United Kingdom, and Japan.
 
Natus' product lines include: ALGO Newborn Hearing Screeners, MiniMuffs Neonatal Noise Attenuators, the CO-Stat End Tidal Breath Analyzer, neoBLUE LED Phototherapy device; Biliband Eye Protectors; Oxydome, Oxypod, Oxy-Igloo, and Foldadome oxygen hoods; Igloo neonatal heatshield; Neometrics software products: MSDS Metabolic Screening Database System, CMS Case Management System, WebEBP Web Based Electronic Birth Page, VRS Voice Response System, and the Neometrics diagnostic reagent products: Accuwell TSH ELISA and Accuwell T
4
EIA.
 
Natus markets and sells its products directly in the U.S. Natus products are currently marketed and sold in 30 other countries outside of the U.S.
 
As a result of the acquisition of Neometrics on July 2, 2003, and the resultant incremental increase in revenue in the quarter ended September 30, 2003, comparison with revenue in the same period in 2002 may not be meaningful.
 
Additional information about Natus Medical can be found at www.natus.com.
 
This press release contains forward-looking statements as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, particularly statements regarding the expectations, beliefs, plans, intentions, and strategies of Natus. These forward looking statements include, but are not limited to, our belief that we will continue to benefit from cost-reduction initiatives taken in last year's third quarter. These statements relate to future events or Natus' future financial performance or results and involve known and unknown risks, uncertainties and other factors that may cause Natus' actual results, levels of activity, performance or achievements to differ materially from those expressed or implied by the forward-looking statements. The actual operating results could differ materially due to a number of factors, including the continued growth of demand (or absence of continued growth of demand) for newborn hearing screening
equipment, acceptance of Natus' existing products, the successful development, introduction and widespread market acceptance of Natus' new products, dependence on our ALGO products for substantially all of our revenue, the successful addition of products to Natus' established distribution channel, domestic and global economic conditions, competition from other companies, the failure of states or foreign countries to adopt mandates or guidelines requiring screening for the disorders for which Natus' products screen, the failure of third party payors to provide adequate reimbursement for the use of Natus' products, adverse changes in Natus' relationships with its suppliers, reduced revenue as a result of discounts given to organizations representing several end customers for Natus' products, failure to obtain necessary regulatory clearances or approvals, adverse changes in Natus' relationships with its distributors, difficulty integrating acquired businesses into our business, performance of newly acquired products and technologies, difficulty and increased expenses relating to foreign operations and product liability and intellectual property disputes or litigation. Natus disclaims any obligation to update information contained in any forward-looking statement.
 
For additional information and considerations regarding the risks faced by Natus, see Natus' reports on Forms 10-Q and 10-K filed and to be filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
 
natus; 70/40; ALGO; AABR; ALGO 1e; ALGO-1 Plus; ALGO 2; ALGO DataBook; Dri-Prep; Ear Couplers; Jelly Button; Flexicoupler; Jelly Tab; MiniMuffs; CO-Stat; and neoBLUE; Neometrics; Accuwell; Accuscreen; CEM; CMS; Neocoat; MSDS; VRS; and WebEBP are Natus trademarks; Biliband Eye Protectors; Oxydome, Oxypod, Oxy-Igloo, and Foldadome oxygen hoods; Igloo neonatal heatshield are licensed to Natus Medical by Nascor Pty. Ltd.
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BABY/BABY-8K-20040130161217.txt.gz
TIME:20040130161217
EVENTS:	Other events	Financial statements and exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other events
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
ITEM 5. OTHER EVENTS AND REQUIRED REGULATION FD DISCLOSURE.
 
On January 30, 2004, Natus Medical Incorporated (the "Company") is issuing a press release regarding the resignation of Tim C. Johnson, its president, chief executive officer and chief operating officer and a member of its Board of Directors. Mr. Johnson has agreed to continue to serve in his current capacity until a successor has been named. A copy of the press release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 to this Form 8-K.
 
The information in this Form 8-K and the exhibit attached hereto shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act") or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, regardless of any general incorporation language in such filing.
 
ITEM 7. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND EXHIBITS.
 
(c) Exhibits.
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
(Nasdaq NM: BABY) today announced the resignation of Tim Johnson, president, chief executive officer, chief operating officer and director. Mr. Johnson has agreed to continue to serve in his current capacity until a successor has been named. Natus Medical's board of directors has established a search committee to identify and retain a successor to Mr. Johnson.
SAN CARLOS, Calif. (January 30, 2004)  Natus Medical Incorporated
 
"I am upbeat about the future of Natus Medical, as the Company has continued to make progress toward its goals of introducing additional products into its distribution channel, expanding international sales and controlling expenses," stated Mr. Johnson. "In recent quarters, Natus Medical has reported a growing top line and has expanded its product lines. Natus Medical also has a seasoned management team in place, and I believe now is the time to hand over leadership to a new chief executive who can build upon this foundation."
 
Commenting on today's announcement, William New, Jr., M.D., Ph.D., founder and chairman of the board, stated, "Tim Johnson has done a commendable job during his 14 years at Natus, serving the past eight years as president. Under his leadership, the Company has captured a leading position in the U.S. newborn hearing screening market and developed brand awareness, as well as expanding our product line and improving our financial condition. On behalf of the directors and employees of Natus Medical, we offer him our thanks and we wish him well in his future endeavors."
 
Natus Medical Incorporated develops, manufactures and markets proprietary, easy-to-use medical products that assist in the detection, treatment, monitoring and tracking of common disorders in newborns. Headquartered in San Carlos, California, the Company has operations in New York, Oregon, the United Kingdom, and Japan.
 
Natus' product lines include: ALGO Newborn Hearing Screeners, MiniMuffs Neonatal Noise Attenuators, the CO-Stat End Tidal Breath Analyzer, neoBLUE LED Phototherapy device; Neometrics software products: MSDS Metabolic Screening Database System, CMS Case Management System, WebEBP Web Based Electronic Birth Page, VRS Voice Response System, and the Neometrics diagnostic reagent products: Accuwell TSH ELISA and Accuwell T4 EIA. Additional information about Natus Medical can be found at .
www.natus.com
 
This press release contains forward-looking statements as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, particularly statements regarding the expectations, beliefs, plans, intentions, and strategies of Natus. These forward looking statements include, but are not limited to, statements regarding the Company's identification and hiring of a suitable chief executive officer, the Company's achievement of its product and sales goals and the Company's achievement of expense control initiatives. These statements relate to future events or Natus' future financial performance or results and involve known and unknown risks, uncertainties and other factors that may cause actual
results, levels of activity, performance or achievements to differ materially from those expressed or implied by the forward-looking statements. Forward-looking statements are only predictions and the actual events or results may differ materially. Natus cannot provide any assurance that its future results or the results implied by the forward-looking statements will meet expectations. The results could differ materially due to a number of factors, including the availability and suitability of management candidates, the demand (or absence of demand) for our products and services and our ability to control costs. Natus disclaims any obligation to update information contained in any forward-looking statement.
 
For additional information and considerations regarding the risks faced by Natus, see Natus' reports on Forms 10-Q and 10-K filed and to be filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
 
natus; 70/40; ALGO; AABR; ALGO 1e; ALGO-1 Plus; ALGO 2; ALGO DataBook; Dri-Prep; Ear Couplers; Jelly Button; Flexicoupler; Jelly Tab; MiniMuffs; CO-Stat; and neoBLUE; Neometrics; Accuwell; Accuscreen; CEM; CMS; Neocoat; MSDS; VRS; and WebEBP are Natus trademarks; Biliband Eye Protectors; Oxydome, Oxypod, Oxy-Igloo, and Foldadome oxygen hoods; Igloo neonatal heatshield are licensed to Natus Medical by Nascor Pty. Ltd.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BABY/BABY-8K-20040226160215.txt.gz
TIME:20040226160215
EVENTS:		Financial statements and exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: 
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
(c) Exhibits.
 
 
 
On February 26, 2004, Natus Medical Incorporated (the "Company") is issuing a press release and holding a conference call regarding its financial results for the fourth quarter and year ended December 31, 2003. A copy of the press release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 to this Form 8-K.
 
The information in this Form 8-K and the exhibit attached hereto shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act") or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
NEWS RELEASE
 
Contact:
 
Steven J. Murphy
Vice President, Finance
650-802-0400
smurphy@natus.com
 
 
 
SAN CARLOS, Calif. (February 26, 2004)Natus Medical Incorporated (Nasdaq NM: BABY) today announced financial results for the three months and year ended December 31, 2003.
 
Natus announced that it was profitable for the fourth quarter of 2003. The Company reported record quarterly revenue for the three months ended December 31, 2003 of $9.9 million, an increase of 29%, compared with revenue of $7.7 million for the fourth quarter of 2002. Incremental revenue from the Neometrics product lines, which were obtained through the acquisition of the assets of Neometrics, Inc. in July 2003, and increased sales of Natus' preexisting product lines contributed approximately equally to the increase.
 
Revenue from supplies and services increased 24% to $6.1 million for the three months ended December 31, 2003, compared with $4.9 million for the fourth quarter of 2002. The increase was primarily attributable to incremental revenue from the Neometrics' product lines as well as increased sales of ALGO supplies. Revenue from devices and systems increased 40% to $3.7 million for the three months ended December 31, 2003, compared with $2.7 million for the fourth quarter of 2002. The increase was primarily attributable to incremental revenue from the Neometrics' product lines, increased ALGO Newborn Hearing Screening device sales in international markets, and increased sales, both domestic and international, of the company's neoBLUE phototherapy light, which was introduced in the fourth quarter of 2002.
 
Revenue from U.S. operations increased by 27% to $7.6 million for the three months ended December 31, 2003, compared with $5.9 million for the fourth quarter of 2002. Revenue from international operations increased to $2.4 million for the three months ended December 31, 2003, an increase of 35% from $1.7 million for the fourth quarter of 2002.
 
Gross margin was 56.2% for the three months ended December 31, 2003, compared with 48.6% for the fourth quarter of 2002. The 2002 fourth quarter gross margin reflected a write-down of excess inventory on hand of $450,000, primarily related to the CO-Stat End Tidal Breath Analyzer, offset by a decrease of $231,000 in the warranty reserve. Excluding those items, fourth quarter 2002 gross margin would have been 51.5%. For the three months ended December 31, 2003, total operating expenses decreased by $637,000 to $5.3 million, compared with $6.0 million for the fourth quarter of 2002. The Company reported net income available to common stockholders for the fourth quarter of 2003 of $338,000, or $0.02 per fully diluted share, compared with a net loss available to common stockholders of $2.1 million, or $0.13 per share, for the fourth quarter of 2002.
 
For the year ended December 31, 2003, Natus reported record revenue of $31.6 million, an increase of 17%, from $27.0 million for the year ended December 31, 2002. For the year ended December 31, 2003, the Company reported a net loss available to common stockholders of $2.7 million, or $0.17 per share, compared with a net loss available to common stockholders of $7.5 million, or $0.46 per share, for the year ended December 31, 2002.
 
As of December 31, 2003, the Company reported cash, cash equivalents and short-term investments of $37.6 million, stockholders' equity of $52.6 million and working capital of $44.7 million. The Company's cash position at December 31, 2003 reflected the impact of the acquisition of the assets of Neometrics, Inc.
"We are extremely pleased to report record quarterly revenue and our first profitable quarter since our public offering in July 2001," said Tim Johnson, president and chief executive officer of Natus. "We recorded revenue increases across the board during the fourth quarter as sales grew from domestic and international operations, as well as from both our supplies and services' and devices and systems' reporting lines. Gross margins have improved over last year, both for the quarter and year to date, and we reduced 2003 fourth quarter operating expenses by $637,000 compared with the 2002 fourth quarter. The reduction in operating expenses is even more impressive, as we have now absorbed the costs associated with operating Neometrics."
 
Natus also announced that James Bochnowski, a director of the Company, has resigned for personal reasons. Mr. Bochnowski, who has served on the board of directors since 1991, is a partner in Delphi Ventures, one of the original venture capital investors in Natus. The Company will seek an independent director to fill the vacancy caused by Mr. Bochnowski's resignation.
 
Natus also announced financial guidance for 2004. Excluding costs associated with the transition of the company's CEO, which have not yet been determined, the company expects to report a net loss of $0.05 to $0.07 per share for the first half of the year, and net income of $0.01 to $0.03 per fully diluted share for the full year, based on the company achieving revenue growth of 12% to 14%.
 
Natus has scheduled an investor conference call to discuss this announcement beginning at 4:30 p.m. Eastern Time today. Individuals interested in listening to the conference call may do so by dialing (888) 802-5257 for domestic callers, or (706) 634-0175 for international callers. A telephone replay will be available for 48 hours following the conclusion of the call by dialing (800) 642-1687 for domestic callers, or (706) 645-9291 for international callers, and entering pass code 5559962. The live conference call will also be available via the Internet at , and a recording of the call will be available on the Company's Web site for 90 days following the completion of the call.
http://investor.natus.com
 
About Natus Medical
 
Natus Medical Incorporated develops, manufactures and markets proprietary, easy-to-use medical products that assist in the detection, treatment, monitoring and tracking of common disorders in newborns. Headquartered in San Carlos, California, the Company has operations in New York, Oregon, the United Kingdom, and Japan.
 
Natus' product lines include: ALGO Newborn Hearing Screeners, MiniMuffs Neonatal Noise Attenuators, neoBLUE LED Phototherapy device; Biliband Eye Protectors; Oxydome, Oxypod, Oxy-Igloo, and Foldadome oxygen hoods; Igloo neonatal heatshield; Neometrics software products: MSDS Metabolic Screening Database System, CMS Case Management System, WebEBP Web Based Electronic Birth Page, VRS Voice Response System, and the Neometrics diagnostic reagent products: Accuwell TSH ELISA and Accuwell T
4
EIA.
 
Natus markets and sells its products directly in the U.S. Natus products are currently marketed and sold in 32 other countries outside of the U.S.
 
As a result of the acquisition of Neometrics on July 2, 2003, and the resultant incremental increase in revenue in the quarter ended December 31, 2003, comparison with revenue in the same period in 2002 may not be meaningful.
 
Additional information about Natus Medical can be found at www.natus.com.
This press release contains forward-looking statements as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, particularly statements regarding the expectations, beliefs, plans, intentions, and strategies of Natus. These forward looking statements include, but are not limited to, our belief that we will continue to benefit from cost-reduction initiatives taken during 2002 and 2003, and our outlook for revenue growth, profitability, and earnings or loss per share for 2004. These statements relate to future events or Natus' future financial performance or results and involve known and unknown risks, uncertainties and other factors that may cause Natus' actual results, levels of activity, performance or achievements to differ materially from those expressed or implied by the forward-looking statements. The actual operating results could differ materially due to a number of factors, including the continued growth of demand (or absence of continued growth of demand) for newborn hearing screening equipment, acceptance of Natus' existing products, the successful development, introduction and widespread market acceptance of Natus' new products, dependence on our ALGO and Neometrics products for substantially all of our revenue, the successful addition of products to Natus' established distribution channel, domestic and global economic conditions, competition from other companies, the failure of states or foreign countries to adopt mandates or guidelines requiring screening for the disorders for which Natus' products screen, the failure of third party payors to provide adequate reimbursement for the use of Natus' products, adverse changes in Natus' relationships with its suppliers, reduced revenue as a result of discounts given to organizations representing several end customers for Natus' products, failure to obtain necessary regulatory clearances or approvals, adverse changes in Natus' relationships with its distributors, difficulty integrating acquired businesses into our business, performance of newly acquired products and technologies, difficulty and increased expenses relating to foreign operations and product liability and intellectual property disputes or litigation. Natus disclaims any obligation to update information contained in any forward-looking statement.
 
For additional information and considerations regarding the risks faced by Natus, see Natus' reports on Forms 10-Q and 10-K filed and to be filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
 
natus; 70/40; ALGO; AABR; ALGO 1e; ALGO-1 Plus; ALGO 2; ALGO DataBook; Dri-Prep; Ear Couplers; Jelly Button; Flexicoupler; Jelly Tab; MiniMuffs; neoBLUE; Neometrics; Accuwell; Accuscreen; CEM; CMS; Neocoat; MSDS; VRS; and WebEBP are Natus trademarks; Biliband Eye Protectors; Oxydome, Oxypod, Oxy-Igloo, and Foldadome oxygen hoods; Igloo neonatal heatshield are licensed to Natus Medical by Nascor Pty. Ltd.
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BABY/BABY-8K-20040414154705.txt.gz
TIME:20040414154705
EVENTS:	Other events	Financial statements and exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other events
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
ITEM 5. OTHER EVENTS AND REQUIRED REGULATION FD DISCLOSURE.
 
On April 13, 2004, Natus Medical Incorporated (the "Company") issued a press release regarding the appointment of James B. Hawkins as its president, chief executive officer and a member of its board of directors. A copy of the press release is filed as an exhibit to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
 
ITEM 7. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND EXHIBITS.
 
 
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
SAN CARLOS, Calif. (April 13, 2004)  Natus Medical Incorporated (Nasdaq NM: BABY) today announced that James B. Hawkins (48) has been appointed president, chief executive officer and a member of the board of directors effective April 19, 2004. Mr. Hawkins joins Natus with approximately 25 years of combined medical device and financial experience.
 
Mr. Hawkins, formerly president and chief executive officer of Invivo Corporation (Nasdaq: SAFE), succeeds Tim C. Johnson, whose resignation from the Company was previously announced. Mr. Johnson will remain with the Company for a brief period to assist in the transition.
 
Commenting on Mr. Hawkins' appointment, William New, Jr., M.D., Ph.D, Natus' founder and chairman of the board, said, "After a thorough search, we are pleased to be able to attract a CEO with Jim Hawkins' background and record of success in the medical device industry. Jim has demonstrated the ability to build businesses, raise capital and effectively manage a growing company. We believe he will make an outstanding CEO for Natus Medical.
 
"This is an ideal time for Jim to come on board as Natus concentrates on reaching sustained profitability," Dr. New added. "Jim has an exceptional track record of executing aggressive business strategies while increasing shareholder value for rapidly growing organizations."
 
Commenting on his appointment, Mr. Hawkins said, "Natus has an outstanding reputation in the neonatal marketplace, with well-known and highly regarded brands. With a clear market focus and operational momentum, I look forward to building further value for Natus and its shareholders."
 
Most recently, Mr. Hawkins was president and chief executive officer of Invivo Corporation, a manufacturer of multi-parameter vital sign monitoring equipment used in hospitals. During his tenure, Invivo acquired six companies, building a highly profitable organization with an 80 percent global market share in the MRI vital sign monitoring market. Under Mr. Hawkins' leadership Invivo posted increased revenues and earnings every year since 1985. He also built a senior management team that remained intact for more than 10 years before the Company was acquired earlier this year by Intermagnetics General Corporation (Nasdaq: IMGC).
Before he joined Invivo, Mr. Hawkins founded a corporate financial consulting company and in that capacity served as chief financial officer for several technology companies in California's Silicon Valley. He earned a bachelor of commerce degree, specializing in management from Santa Clara University in 1977 and a Masters of Business Administration  Finance degree from San Francisco State University in 1980.
 
About Natus Medical
 
We develop, manufacture, and market products for the detection, treatment, monitoring, and tracking of common medical disorders in newborns. Currently, our principal product lines consist of our ALGO screening products for hearing screening, our neoBLUE LED Phototherapy device ("neoBLUE phototherapy device") for the treatment of jaundice, our Neometrics Accuwell metabolic screening products, our Neometrics newborn screening data management system, our MiniMuffs Neonatal Noise Attenuators ("MiniMuffs") products for the attenuation of noise for newborns, and the Nascor product line.
 
Natus' product lines include: ALGO Newborn Hearing Screeners, MiniMuffs Neonatal Noise Attenuators, neoBLUE LED Phototherapy device; Neometrics software products: MSDS Metabolic Screening Database System, CMS Case Management System, WebEBP Web Based Electronic Birth Page, VRS Voice Response System, and the Neometrics diagnostic reagent products: Accuwell TSH ELISA and Accuwell T4 EIA. Additional information about Natus Medical can be found at www.natus.com.
 
This press release contains forward-looking statements as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, particularly statements regarding the expectations, beliefs, plans, intentions, and strategies of Natus. These forward looking statements include, but are not limited to, statements regarding the Company's achievement of sustained profitability, the effectiveness and future success of any candidate as chief executive officer including his ability to execute any strategy, and his ability to build stockholder value. These statements relate to future events or Natus' future financial performance or results and involve known and unknown risks, uncertainties and other factors that may cause actual results, levels of activity, performance or achievements to differ materially from those expressed or implied by the forward-looking statements. Forward-looking statements are only predictions and the actual events or results may differ materially. Natus cannot provide any assurance that its future results or the results implied by the forward-looking statements will meet expectations. The results could differ materially due to a number of factors, including the availability and suitability of management candidates, the demand (or absence of demand) for our products and services and our ability to control costs. Natus disclaims any obligation to update information contained in any forward-looking statement.
 
For additional information and considerations regarding the risks faced by Natus, see Natus' reports on Forms 10-Q and 10-K filed and to be filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
 
Natus' trademarks include: AABR, Accuwell, Accuscreen, ALGO-1 Plus Newborn Hearing Screeners, ALGO1e, ALGO2, ALGO, ALGO DataBook, CEM, CMS, Dri-Prep Prepping Pads, Ear Couplers Earphones, Flexicoupler Earphones, Jelly Button Sensors, Jelly Tab Sensors, MiniMuffs Neonatal Noise Attenuators, MSDS, natus, neoBLUE LED Phototherapy device, Neocoat, Neometrics, WebEBP, VRS. The Biliband Eye Protectors, Foldadome oxygen hoods, Igloo neonatal heatshield, Oxydome, Oxypod and Oxy-Igloo products are duly licensed to Natus by Nascor Pty. Ltd.
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BABY/BABY-8K-20040513063654.txt.gz
TIME:20040513063654
EVENTS:		Financial statements and exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: 
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
ITEM 7. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS, PRO FORMA FINANCIAL INFORMATION AND EXHIBITS.
 
 
 
ITEM 12. Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
 
On May 13, 2004, Natus Medical Incorporated (the "Company") is issuing a press release and holding a conference call regarding its financial results for the first quarter of fiscal 2004 ended March 31, 2004. A copy of the press release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 to this Form 8-K.
 
The information in this Form 8-K and the exhibit attached hereto shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act") or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 

E 99.1
XHIBIT
 
 
(Nasdaq NM: BABY) today announced financial results for the three months ended March 31, 2004.
SAN CARLOS, Calif. (May 13, 2004)  Natus Medical Incorporated
 
The Company reported record first quarter revenue of $8.7 million for the three months ended March 31, 2004. Revenue increased by 31%, or $2.0 million, compared with revenue of $6.7 million for the first quarter of 2003. Revenue from Natus' ALGO product line and the neoBLUE LED Phototherapy device contributed to $1.2 million of the increase, with the remainder coming primarily from the Neometrics product lines, which were acquired in July 2003.
 
Revenue from supplies and services increased 22%, or $1.0 million, to $5.8 million for the three months ended March 31, 2004, compared with $4.7 million for the first quarter of 2003. The increase came primarily from the Neometrics product lines as well as increased sales of ALGO supplies. Revenue from devices and systems increased 59%, or $1.1 million, to $2.9 million in the three months ended March 31, 2004, from $1.9 million in the same period in 2003. The increase came primarily from sales of the ALGO Newborn Hearing Screener and neoBLUE phototherapy devices, in both domestic and international markets.
 
Revenue from U.S. operations increased by 33%, or $1.6 million, to $6.4 million for the three months ended March 31, 2003, compared with $4.8 million for the first quarter of 2003. Revenue from international operations increased 25% to $2.3 million for the three months ended March 31, 2004, from $1.8 million for the first quarter of 2003. The growth in international revenue for the first quarter of 2004 was due primarily to sales of the Company's new ALGO 3i handheld newborn hearing screener in Europe. The ALGO 3i, which was introduced in June 2003, recently won a 2004 Medical Design Excellence Award.
 
Gross margin was 55.3% for the three months ended March 31, 2004, compared with 62.3% for the first quarter of 2003. Increases in inventory reserves and cost overruns on several Neometrics data management system installations reduced gross margins. For the three months ended March 31, 2004, total operating expenses increased 4% to $5.4 million, compared with $5.2 million for the first quarter of 2003.
 
The net loss available to common stockholders for the first quarter of 2004 improved to $447,000, or $0.03 per share, compared with $917,000, or $0.06 per share, for the first quarter of 2003.
 
As of March 31, 2004, the Company reported cash, cash equivalents, and short-term investments of $38.9 million, stockholders' equity of $52.1 million, and working capital of $44.0 million.
 
Jim Hawkins, President and Chief Executive Officer of Natus commented, "I am delighted to join Natus as it reports record first quarter revenue and continued progress toward its goal of sustained profitability. Our substantial revenue growth was driven by both increased core business activities and the result of last year's acquisition of Neometrics. Additionally, I am very excited about the future growth prospects for Natus. During the next three months, I look forward to communicating our direction, goals, and opportunities, as we position the Company to build further value for Natus and its shareholders."
Natus has scheduled an investor conference call to discuss this announcement beginning at 11:00 AM Eastern Time today. Individuals interested in listening to the conference call may do so by dialing (888) 802-5257 for domestic callers, or (706) 634-0175 for international callers. A telephone replay will be available for 48 hours following the conclusion of the call by dialing (800) 642-1687 for domestic callers, or (706) 645-9291 for international callers, and entering pass code 7251373. The live conference call will also be available via the Internet at , and a recording of the call will be available on the Company's Web site for 90 days following the completion of the call.
http://investor.natus.com
 
About Natus Medical
 
We develop, manufacture, and market products for the detection, treatment, monitoring, and tracking of common medical disorders in newborns. Currently, our principal product lines consist of our ALGO screening products for hearing screening, our neoBLUE LED Phototherapy device for the treatment of jaundice, our Neometrics Accuwell metabolic screening products, our Neometrics newborn screening data management system, our MiniMuffs Neonatal Noise Attenuators products for the attenuation of noise for newborns, and the Nascor line of neonatal oxygen delivery hoods and heatshields.
 
Natus' products are marketed worldwide and are sold through a direct sales force in the U.S. and the U.K. and through distributors in approximately 30 other countries.
 
Natus' product lines include: ALGO Newborn Hearing Screeners, MiniMuffs Neonatal Noise Attenuators, neoBLUE LED Phototherapy device; Biliband Eye Protectors; Oxydome, Oxypod, Oxy-Igloo, and Foldadome oxygen hoods; Igloo neonatal heatshield; Neometrics software products: MSDS Metabolic Screening Database System, CMS Case Management System, WebEBP Web Based Electronic Birth Page, VRS Voice Response System, and the Neometrics diagnostic reagent products: Accuwell TSH ELISA and Accuwell T
4
EIA.
 
As a result of the acquisition of Neometrics on July 2, 2003, and the resultant incremental increase in revenue in the quarter ended March 31, 2004, comparison with revenue in the same period in 2003 may not be meaningful.
 
Additional information about Natus Medical can be found at www.natus.com.
 
This press release contains forward-looking statements as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, particularly statements regarding the expectations, beliefs, plans, intentions, and strategies of Natus. These forward-looking statements include, but are not limited to, our outlook for continued revenue growth of our core business and newly acquired products, and our expectations of sustained profitability. These statements relate to future events or Natus' future financial performance or results, and involve known and unknown risks, uncertainties, and other factors that may cause Natus' actual results, levels of activity, performance, or achievements to differ materially from those expressed or implied by the forward-looking statements. The actual operating results could differ materially due to a number of factors, including the continued growth of demand (or absence of continued growth of demand) for newborn hearing screening equipment, acceptance of Natus' existing products, the successful development, introduction and widespread market acceptance of Natus' new products, dependence on our ALGO and Neometrics products for substantially all of our revenue, the successful addition of products to Natus' established distribution channel, domestic and global economic conditions, competition from other companies, the failure of states or foreign countries to adopt mandates or guidelines requiring screening for the disorders for which Natus' products screen, the failure of third party payors to provide adequate reimbursement for the use of Natus' products,
 
adverse changes in Natus' relationships with its suppliers, reduced revenue as a result of discounts given to organizations representing several end customers for Natus' products, failure to obtain necessary regulatory clearances or approvals, adverse changes in Natus' relationships with its distributors, difficulty integrating acquired businesses into our business, performance of newly acquired products and technologies, difficulty and increased expenses relating to foreign operations, and product liability and intellectual property disputes or litigation. Natus disclaims any obligation to update information contained in any forward-looking statement.
 
For additional information and considerations regarding the risks faced by Natus, see Natus' reports on Forms 10-Q and 10-K filed and to be filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
 
natus; 70/40; ALGO; AABR; ALGO 1e; ALGO-1 Plus; ALGO 2; ALGO DataBook; Dri-Prep; Ear Couplers; Jelly Button; Flexicoupler; Jelly Tab; MiniMuffs; neoBLUE; Neometrics; Accuwell; Accuscreen; CEM; CMS; Neocoat; MSDS; VRS; and WebEBP are Natus trademarks. Biliband Eye Protectors; Oxydome, Oxypod, Oxy-Igloo, and Foldadome oxygen hoods; Igloo neonatal heatshield are licensed to Natus Medical by Nascor Pty. Ltd.
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BABY/BABY-8K-20040810070143.txt.gz
TIME:20040810070143
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial statements and exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
ITEM 7. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS, PRO FORMA FINANCIAL INFORMATION AND EXHIBITS.
 
 
 
ITEM 12. Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
 
On August 10, 2004, Natus Medical Incorporated (the "Company") is issuing a press release and holding a conference call regarding its financial results for the second quarter of fiscal 2004 ended June 30, 2004. A copy of the press release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 to this Form 8-K.
 
The information in this Form 8-K and the exhibit attached hereto shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act") or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 

E 99.1
XHIBIT
 
 
(Nasdaq NM: BABY) today announced financial results for the three and six months ended June 30, 2004.
SAN CARLOS, Calif. (August 10, 2004)  Natus Medical Incorporated
 
Revenue increased 19% to $8.4 million for the second quarter ended June 30, 2004, from $7.1 million recorded in the same quarter of the previous year. The net loss increased to $3.6 million, or $0.22 per share, for the second quarter of 2004, compared with a net loss of $1.2 million, or $0.07 per share, for the same period in 2003. The net loss for the second quarter of 2004 included a restructuring charge of $776,000, costs associated with the departure of the Company's former chief executive officer totaling $870,000, and a loss from discontinued operations of $584,000. Of the total $2.2 million recorded for the restructuring, CEO departure, and discontinued operations, approximately $870,000 resulted from non-cash charges.
 
For the first half of 2004, revenue increased 24% to $17.0 million, from $13.7 million reported for the first half of 2003. The net loss for the six months ended June 30, 2004 was $4.1 million, or $0.24 per share, compared with a net loss of $2.1 million, or $0.13 per share, recorded in the first half of 2003. The same restructuring, CEO departure, and discontinued operations charges are included in the results for the six months ended June 30, 2004.
 
Gross margin was 55.4% for the three months ended June 30, 2004, compared with 59.7% for the second quarter of 2003. Continued cost overruns on several Neometrics data management system installations and increases in inventory reserves reduced gross margins.
 
Operating expenses increased $2.0 million, or 36%, to $7.6 million in the three months ended June 30, 2004, from $5.6 million in the same period in 2003. Absent the charges for the restructuring and CEO departure, the increase in operating expenses compared to the second quarter of 2003 would have been 6.8%.
 
Revenue, cost of sales, and operating expenses of the Neogenesis reagent business for the three and six months ended June 30, 2004, have been excluded from the corresponding amounts presented above, and are reported as a component of the loss from discontinued operations of $584,000 and $767,000, respectively.
In June, the Company announced various restructuring actions aimed at reducing operating expenses. The restructuring initiative resulted in the immediate reduction of the Company's workforce by 24 employees. The staff reductions came from all functions of the Company's business, including the liquidation of its Japanese sales subsidiary whose functions had been absorbed by Natus corporate staff and local distributors earlier this year. At the same time, the Company announced its intent to divest the operations of its Neogenesis reagent business, which will result in the elimination of an additional 10 staff positions.
 
Taken together, the restructuring actions and divestiture of Neogenesis will result in a 24% workforce reduction, bringing headcount to approximately 105 employees worldwide. As a result of the restructuring and divestiture, Natus expects to see an improvement in quarterly operating expenses of approximately $700,000 beginning in the third quarter of 2004, compared to the second quarter of 2004, as adjusted for the restructuring and CEO departure.
 
Revenue from the Neometrics data management system, which was acquired in July 2003, contributed to $779,000 of the $1.3 million increase in second quarter 2004 revenue, with the remainder coming primarily from Natus' ALGO product line and the neoBLUE LED Phototherapy device.
 
Revenue from supplies and services was $5.3 million for both the three months ended June 30, 2004 and 2003. Revenue from devices and systems increased 83%, or $1.3 million, to $3.0 million in the three months ended June 30, 2004, from $1.6 million in the same period in 2003. The increase came primarily from sales of the ALGO Newborn Hearing Screener and neoBLUE phototherapy devices, in both domestic and international markets.
 
Revenue from U.S. operations increased by 23%, or $1.2 million, to $6.5 million for the three months ended June 30, 2004, compared with $5.3 million for the second quarter of 2003. Revenue from international operations increased to $1.9 million for the three months ended June 30, 2004, from $1.8 million for the second quarter of 2003. The growth in international revenue for the second quarter of 2004 was due primarily to sales of the Company's new ALGO 3i handheld newborn hearing screener in Europe.
 
Because the Neogenesis reagent business was acquired in July 2003, there are no associated discontinued operations in the six months ended June 30, 2003.
As of June 30, 2004, the Company reported cash, cash equivalents, and short-term investments of $38.6 million, stockholders' equity of $49.1 million, and working capital of $42.1 million.
 
"The restructuring actions announced in June position us to reach sustained profitability from continuing operations going forward," said Jim Hawkins, president and chief executive officer. "With costs under control, we intend to focus on continued growth by increasing sales of our core product lines in both the domestic and international markets. We continue to develop new products internally, such as our neoBLUE LED Phototherapy device and ALGO A3i handheld hearing screener. We also plan to evaluate opportunities to acquire technologies, products, and companies that fit our neonatal/pediatric medical focus, allowing us to leverage our established distribution network and market relationships through new product offerings."
 
Financial Guidance
 
Natus reiterated financial guidance for the second half of 2004. The Company expects to report third quarter fully-diluted earnings per share from continuing operations of $0.03 to $0.04 on revenue of $8.7 to $9.0 million, and fourth quarter fully-diluted earnings per share from continuing operations of $0.07 to $.09 on revenue of $9.9 to $10.2 million. This guidance excludes revenue, results of operations, and charges associated with the Neogenesis reagent business, which will be reported as a discontinued operation, or any unanticipated one-time charges.
 
Natus has scheduled an investor conference call to discuss this announcement beginning at 11:00 a.m. Eastern Time today. Individuals interested in listening to the conference call may do so by dialing (888) 802-5257 for domestic callers, or (706) 634-0175 for international callers. A telephone replay will be available for 48 hours following the conclusion of the call by dialing (800) 642-1687 for domestic callers, or (706) 645-9291 for international callers, and entering pass code 8966404.
 
The live conference call will also be available via the Internet at , and a recording of the call will be available on the Company's Web site for 90 days following the completion of the call.
http://investor.natus.com
About Natus Medical
 
Natus develops, manufactures, and markets products for the detection, treatment, monitoring, and tracking of common disorders in newborns. Natus markets and sells its products worldwide through a direct sales force in the U.S. and the U.K. and through distributors in over 30 other countries.
 
Natus' product lines include: ALGO Newborn Hearing Screeners, MiniMuffs Neonatal Noise Attenuators, neoBLUE LED Phototherapy device; Biliband Eye Protectors; Oxydome, Oxypod, Oxy-Igloo, and Foldadome oxygen hoods; Igloo neonatal heatshield; Neometrics software products: MSDS Metabolic Screening Database System, CMS Case Management System, WebEBP Web Based Electronic Birth Page, and VRS Voice Response System.
 
As a result of the acquisition of Neometrics on July 2, 2003, and the resultant incremental increase in revenue and costs in the three and six months ended June 30, 2004, results during the same period in 2003 may not be comparable.
 
Additional information about Natus Medical can be found at .
www.natus.com
 
This press release, together with the associated comments to be made by management during the conference call scheduled for 11:00 a.m. Eastern Time on August 10, 2004, contains forward-looking statements as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995 including, but not limited to, our outlook for revenue, operating expenses, and earnings per share from continuing operations for the third and fourth quarters of 2004 and our expectations of sustained profitability. These statements relate to future events or Natus' future financial performance or results, and involve known and unknown risks, uncertainties, and other factors that may cause Natus' actual results, levels of activity, performance, or achievements to differ materially from those expressed or implied by the forward-looking statements. The actual operating results could differ materially due to a number of factors, including the continued growth of demand (or absence of continued growth of demand) for newborn hearing screening equipment, acceptance of Natus' existing products, the successful development, introduction and widespread market acceptance of Natus' new products, dependence on our ALGO and Neometrics products for substantially all of our revenue, the successful addition of products to Natus' established distribution channel, domestic and global economic conditions, competition from other companies, the failure of states or foreign countries to adopt mandates or guidelines requiring screening for the disorders for which Natus' products screen, the failure of third party payors to
provide adequate reimbursement for the use of Natus' products, adverse changes in Natus' relationships with its suppliers, reduced revenue as a result of discounts given to organizations representing several end customers for Natus' products, failure to obtain necessary regulatory clearances or approvals, adverse changes in Natus' relationships with its distributors, difficulty integrating acquired businesses into our business, performance of newly acquired products and technologies, difficulty and increased expenses relating to foreign operations, and product liability and intellectual property disputes or litigation. Natus disclaims any obligation to update information contained in any forward-looking statement.
 
More information about potential risk factors that could affect the business and financial results of Natus is included in Natus' annual report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2003, and its quarterly reports on Form 10-Q, and from time to time in other reports filed by Natus with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
 
Natus, AABR, ALGO, ALGO 1e, ALGO 2, ALGO DataBook, 70/40, Ear Couplers, Flexicoupler, Jelly Tab, Jelly Button, and MiniMuffs are registered trademarks of Natus. Natus Elite, Convert2Natus, neoBLUE, Neometrics, Metabolic Screening Database System (MSDS), Case Management System (CMS), Voice Response System (VRS), Web Electronic Birth Page (Web-EBP), and Accuwell are non-registered trademarks of Natus. Solutions for Newborn Care
SM
is a non-registered service mark of Natus.
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BABY/BABY-8K-20040922155809.txt.gz
TIME:20040922155809
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
 
 
 
 
ITEM 8.01. OTHER EVENTS.
 
On September 22, 2004, Natus Medical Incorporated (the "Company") issued a press release announcing the appointment of Robert A. Gunst as chairman of the board of directors. A copy of the press release is filed as an exhibit to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
 
ITEM 9.01. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND EXHIBITS.
 
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
(Nasdaq NM: BABY) today announced the appointment of current director Robert A. Gunst to the position of chairman of the board effective immediately. Mr. Gunst was elected to the Natus board at the Company's annual meeting of stockholders in June 2004. He assumes the position of chairman from Natus' co-founder William New, Jr., M.D., Ph.D., who has served as chairman since the Company's inception in 1989. Dr. New will continue to serve as a director of the Company.
SAN CARLOS, Calif. (September 22, 2004)  Natus Medical Incorporated
 
About his appointment, Mr. Gunst said, "I'm exceptionally pleased to assume the chairman role at this pivotal time in our corporate history as we move toward our goal of sustained profitability. At the same time, we are fortunate that Dr. New will continue as a director. He has been a driving force behind Natus' development and will continue to bring us the valuable knowledge he has gained during his 30 years in the medical device industry."
 
Dr. New remarked that the timing was right for him to relinquish the chairman role, adding, "With the addition of three new independent board members this year, I believe Natus has brought a new level of expertise and independence to the board. I look forward to working with Bob and the other directors."
 
Natus further announced that Mark D. Michael, who joined the Company's board in April 2004, was appointed chair of the nominating and governance committee. Ken Ludlum will continue to chair the audit committee, and William M. Moore, a co-founder of the Company, will continue to chair the compensation committee. James B. Hawkins, Natus' president and chief executive officer, and Doris Engibous, who joined the board in April 2004, round out the board of directors. The board has also adopted new corporate governance principles that will be posted to the Company web site.
 
About Natus Medical
 
Natus develops, manufactures, and markets products for the detection, treatment, monitoring, and tracking of common disorders in newborns. Natus markets and sells its products worldwide through a direct sales force in the U.S. and the U.K. and through distributors in over 30 other countries. Additional information about Natus Medical can be found at www.natus.com.
 
Natus' product lines include: ALGO Newborn Hearing Screeners, MiniMuffs Neonatal Noise Attenuators, neoBLUE LED Phototherapy device; Biliband Eye Protectors; Oxydome, Oxypod, Oxy-Igloo, and Foldadome oxygen hoods; Igloo neonatal heatshield; Neometrics software products: MSDS Metabolic Screening Database System, CMS Case Management System, WebEBP Web Based Electronic Birth Page, and VRS Voice Response System.
, , , , , , , , , , , . , , , , , , , , .
Natus
AABR
ALGO
ALGO 1e
ALGO
2
ALGO DataBook
70/40
Ear Couplers
Flexicoupler
Jelly Tab
Jelly Button
and MiniMuffs
are registered trademarks of Natus
Natus Elite
Convert2Natus
neoBLUE
Neometrics
Metabolic Screening Database System (MSDS)
Case Management System
(CMS)
Voice Response System (VRS)
Web Electronic Birth Page (Web-EBP)
and Accuwell
are non-registered trademarks of Natus
Solutions for Newborn Care
SM
is a non-registered service mark of Natus
.
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BABY/BABY-8K-20040930124049.txt.gz
TIME:20040930124049
EVENTS:	Completion of Acquisition or Disposition of Assets	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Completion of Acquisition or Disposition of Assets
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
 
 
 
ITEM 2.01. COMPLETION OF ACQUISITION OR DISPOSITION OF ASSETS.
 
On September 28, 2004, pursuant to a stock purchase agreement, Natus Medical Incorporated acquired Fischer-Zoth GmbH and affiliated entities for cash of $5.5 million. Fischer-Zoth is a manufacturer of otoacoustic emissions products, with operations headquartered near Munich, Germany. Peter Zoth, President and co-founder of Fischer-Zoth will remain with the company as managing director. The stock was acquired from Mr. Zoth and several other shareholders of the closely-held entities.
 
ITEM 8.01. OTHER EVENTS.
 
On September 29, 2004, Natus Medical Incorporated (the "Company") issued a press release announcing the acquisition of Fischer-Zoth GmbH. A copy of the press release is furnished as an exhibit to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
 
The information in this Form 8-K and the exhibit attached hereto shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act") or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, regardless of any general incorporation language in such filing.
 
ITEM 9.01. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND EXHIBITS.
 
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
(Nasdaq NM: BABY) today announced the acquisition for cash of privately held Fischer-Zoth GmbH, a leading manufacturer of otoacoustic emissions (OAE) products. The acquisition adds to Natus' growth opportunities by broadening its product offerings and supporting expansion into new markets. Natus believes the acquisition will be accretive to earnings in 2005.
SAN CARLOS, Calif. (September 29, 2004)  Natus Medical Incorporated
 
Under terms of the acquisition, Natus will retain Fischer-Zoth's operations, which are headquartered near Munich, Germany, as well as its existing sales channels. Fischer-Zoth co-founder Peter Zoth will continue on as managing director of the organization. Fischer-Zoth currently has 20 employees and recorded revenue of approximately $3.1 million during calendar 2003.
 
"We believe Fischer-Zoth's complementary products will round out our hearing screening product portfolio and give Natus a stronger European presence," stated Jim Hawkins, president and chief executive officer of Natus. "Fischer-Zoth has built a growing, profitable operation with strong margins and a reputation for producing high-quality products. Natus has become the world leader in newborn hearing screening through our proprietary AABR technology. Now we can build on this position by bringing the Fischer-Zoth products into the pediatric and diagnostics markets."
 
Founded in 1995, Fischer-Zoth develops and manufactures products for the detection and diagnosis of hearing disorders that it sells through distributors in more than 40 countries. As a developer of proprietary, patented signal processing software, the company improved traditional OAE technology, which has enhanced the performance of its products over other OAE devices. Since its inception, Fischer-Zoth has sold more than 3,500 OAE devices worldwide. Fischer-Zoth devices also utilize a disposable supply, generating a recurring revenue stream.
 
"We are excited to be joining Natus, a company that shares our passion for quality, innovation and market leadership," commented Mr. Zoth. "Through this business combination, we will be able to leverage Natus' direct sales organization and our existing distribution partners to more quickly penetrate the global market for our hearing screening and diagnostic products."
 
Natus expects to record one-time charges during the 2004 third quarter related to the acquisition, primarily for the write-off of acquired in-process research and development, in the range of $600,000 to $1.0 million. These charges were not included in financial guidance previously provided by the Company.
About Natus Medical
 
Natus develops, manufactures, and markets products for the detection, treatment, monitoring, and tracking of common disorders in newborns. Natus markets and sells its products worldwide through a direct sales force in the U.S. and the U.K. and through distributors in over 30 other countries. Additional information about Natus Medical can be found at .
www.natus.com
 
Natus' product lines include: ALGO Newborn Hearing Screeners; MiniMuffs Neonatal Noise Attenuators; neoBLUE LED Phototherapy devices; Biliband Eye Protectors; Oxydome, Oxypod, Oxy-Igloo, and Foldadome neonatal oxygen hoods; Igloo neonatal heatshield; Neometrics data management products: Metabolic Screening Database System (MSDS), Case Management System (CMS), Web Based Electronic Birth Page (WebEBP), and Voice Response System (VRS); Fischer-Zoth products: Echo-Screen, Audio System DPOAE, and Cochlea-Scan.
 
This press release contains forward-looking statements as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995 including, but not limited to, charges associated with the Fischer-Zoth acquisition, and the impact of the acquisition on future earnings, new product offerings, and expansion into new markets. These statements relate to future events or Natus' future financial performance or results, and involve known and unknown risks, uncertainties, and other factors that may cause Natus' actual results, levels of activity, performance, or achievements to differ materially from those expressed or implied by the forward-looking statements. The actual operating results could differ materially due to a number of factors, including the difficulty in integrating acquired businesses, including Fischer-Zoth, into our business, the risks associated with expanding operations into other countries and doing business in foreign countries, continued growth of demand, or absence of continued growth of demand, for newborn hearing screening equipment, acceptance of Natus' existing products, the successful development, introduction and widespread market acceptance of Natus' new products, dependence on our ALGO, Neometrics and Fischer-Zoth products for substantially all of our revenue, the successful addition of products to Natus' established distribution channel, domestic and global economic conditions, competition from other companies, the failure of states or foreign countries to adopt mandates or guidelines requiring screening for the disorders for which Natus' products screen, the failure of third party payors to provide adequate reimbursement for the use of Natus' products, adverse changes in Natus' relationships with its suppliers, reduced revenue as a result of discounts given to organizations representing several end customers for Natus' products, failure to obtain necessary regulatory clearances or approvals, adverse changes in Natus' relationships with its distributors, difficulty integrating acquired businesses into our business, performance of newly acquired products and technologies, difficulty and increased expenses relating to foreign operations, and product liability and intellectual property disputes or litigation. Natus disclaims any obligation to update information contained in any forward-looking statement.
 
More information about potential risk factors that could affect the business and financial results of Natus is included in Natus' annual report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2003, and its quarterly reports on Form 10-Q, and from time to time in other reports filed by Natus with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission.
Natus, AABR, ALGO, ALGO 1e, ALGO 2, ALGO DataBook, 70/40, Ear Couplers, Flexicoupler, Jelly Tab, Jelly Button, and MiniMuffs are registered trademarks of Natus. Natus Elite, Convert2Natus, neoBLUE, neoBLUE mini, Neometrics, Metabolic Screening Database System (MSDS), Case Management System (CMS), Voice Response System (VRS), Web Electronic Birth Page (Web-EBP), and Accuwell are non-registered trademarks of Natus. Solutions for Newborn Care
SM
is a non-registered service mark of Natus. Echo-Screen, AOAE, and Cochlea-Scan are registered trademarks of Fischer-Zoth GmbH.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BABY/BABY-8K-20041109063126.txt.gz
TIME:20041109063126
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
 
 
 
ITEM 2.02. Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
 
On November 9, 2004, Natus Medical Incorporated (the "Company") is issuing a press release and holding a conference call regarding its financial results for the third quarter of fiscal 2004 ended September 30, 2004. A copy of the press release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 to this Form 8-K.
 
The registrant believes the non-GAAP financial measures of income from continuing operations and earnings per share from continuing operations discussed within the company's financial results press release assist its management and investors in understanding its operating results. The registrant believes that inclusion of these non-GAAP financial measures provide consistency and comparability with past reports of financial results.
 
The information in this Form 8-K and the exhibit attached hereto shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act") or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
 
ITEM 9.01. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS, PRO FORMA FINANCIAL INFORMATION AND EXHIBITS.
 
 
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 

E 99.1
XHIBIT
 
 
(Nasdaq NM: BABY) today reported financial results for the three and nine months ended September 30, 2004.
SAN CARLOS, Calif. (November 9, 2004)  Natus Medical Incorporated
 
Revenue increased 18%, or $1.3 million, to $9.0 million for the third quarter ended September 30, 2004, from $7.7 million in the comparable quarter of the previous year. Excluding a one-time charge of $550,000 for acquired in-process research and development related to the acquisition of Fischer-Zoth GmbH, non-GAAP income from continuing operations for the third quarter 2004 was $1.0 million, or $0.06 per diluted share. On a GAAP basis, the company reported income from continuing operations of $452,000, or $0.03 per diluted share and net income of $147,000, or $0.01 per diluted share for the third quarter 2004. This compares with a net loss of $969,000, or $0.06 per share for the comparable period in 2003. A reconciliation of GAAP results to those excluding the one-time charge is provided in the attached tables.
 
For the first nine months of 2004, revenue increased 21%, or $4.6 million, to $26.0 million, from $21.4 million reported for the first nine months of 2003. The net loss for the nine months ended September 30, 2004 was $3.9 million, or $0.23 per share, compared with a net loss of $3.1 million, or $0.19 per share, reported in the first nine months of 2003.
 
Gross margin improved to 57.1% for the three months ended September 30, 2004, compared with 56.2% for the third quarter of 2003. Operating expenses decreased by 13%, or $693,000, to $4.7 million in the three months ended September 30, 2004, from $5.4 million in the same period in 2003. Operating expenses in the 2004 period include the $550,000 charge for acquired in-process research and development.
 
Revenue from supplies and services increased by 5%, to $5.8 million for the three months ended September 30, 2004, compared with $5.6 million for the comparable period in 2003. Revenue from devices and systems increased 52%, to $3.0 million in the three months ended September 30, 2004, from $2.0 million in the comparable period in 2003. The increase came primarily from sales of the ALGO Newborn Hearing Screener and neoBLUE LED phototherapy devices, in both domestic and international markets.
Revenue from U.S. operations increased by 8%, or $519,000, to $7.0 million for the three months ended September 30, 2004, compared with $6.5 million for the third quarter of 2003. Revenue from international operations increased 70%, or $823,000, to $2.0 million for the three months ended September 30, 2004, from $1.2 million for the third quarter of 2003. The growth in U.S. and international revenue for the third quarter of 2004 came primarily from sales of the ALGO hearing screen and neoBLUE phototherapy devices.
 
As of September 30, 2004, the Company reported cash, cash equivalents, and short-term investments of $33.7 million, stockholders' equity of $50.9 million, and working capital of $39.2 million.
 
"We are exceptionally pleased to report 18% revenue growth for the third quarter, particularly since the growth came primarily from our core hearing screening and phototherapy devices, which were developed internally," said Jim Hawkins, president and chief executive officer of Natus Medical. "Further, our non-GAAP income from continuing operations of six cents per share exceeded our guidance of three to four cents per share, in part due to cost control measures implemented during the second quarter.
 
"Additionally, during the 2004 third quarter we completed the previously announced divestiture of Neogenesis, while executing on our business strategy to broaden our offering with products that complement our neonatal business through our acquisition of Fischer-Zoth," Hawkins added. "We will continue to evaluate synergistic acquisition opportunities such as this one that allow us to leverage the established Natus brand, as well as our existing sales and distribution channels."
 
Financial Guidance
 
Natus updated financial guidance for the fourth quarter of 2004 and provided new guidance for 2005. For the quarter, the Company expects to report diluted earnings per share of $0.07 to $0.09 on revenue of $10.0 to $10.3 million. For 2005 the company expects to report diluted earnings per share of $0.26 to $0.28 on revenue of $41.0 to $43.0 million. These expected results include the impact of the previously announced acquisition of Fischer-Zoth GmbH, which was completed on September 29, 2004. In addition, a customer that accounted for approximately 6% of revenue during the first nine months of 2004 recently advised the Company that it might not continue its customer relationship. This guidance reflects the loss of this customer relationship.
Conference Call
 
Natus has scheduled an investor conference call to discuss this announcement beginning at 11:00 a.m. Eastern Time today. Individuals interested in listening to the conference call may do so by dialing (888) 802-5257 for domestic callers, or (706) 634-0175 for international callers. A telephone replay will be available for 48 hours following the conclusion of the call by dialing (800) 642-1687 for domestic callers, or (706) 645-9291 for international callers, and entering pass code 1887919.
 
The live conference call will also be available via the Internet at , and a recording of the call will be available on the Company's Web site for 90 days following the completion of the call.
http://investor.natus.com
 
About Natus Medical
 
Natus develops, manufactures, and markets products for the detection, treatment, monitoring, and tracking of common disorders in newborns. Natus products are marketed under well-recognized brand names such as ALGO, Neometrics, Echo-Screen, and neoBLUE. Natus, headquartered in San Carlos, California, markets and sells its products worldwide through a direct sales force in the U.S. and the U.K., and through distributors in over 50 other countries. Additional information about Natus Medical can be found at .
www.natus.com
 
This press release contains forward-looking statements as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, particularly statements regarding the expectations, beliefs, plans, intentions, and strategies of Natus. These forward looking statements include, but are not limited to, statements regarding anticipated revenue and profitability for the fourth quarter of 2004 and for 2005. These statements relate to future events or Natus' future financial performance or results, and involve known and unknown risks, uncertainties and other factors that may cause actual results, levels of activity, performance, or achievements to differ materially from those expressed or implied by the forward-looking statements. Forward-looking statements are only predictions and the actual events or results may differ materially. Natus cannot provide any assurance that its future results or the results implied by the forward-looking statements will meet expectations. The results could differ materially due to a number of factors, including the effects of competition, the demand for our products and services, our ability to control costs, and risks associated with integration of acquired businesses. Natus disclaims any obligation to update information contained in any forward-looking statement.
 
More information about potential risk factors that could affect the business and financial results of Natus is included in Natus' annual report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2003, and its quarterly reports on Form 10-Q, and from time to time in other reports filed by Natus with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission.
 
Natus, AABR, ALGO, ALGO 1e, ALGO 2, ALGO DataBook, 70/40, Ear Couplers, Flexicoupler, Jelly Tab, Jelly Button, and MiniMuffs are registered trademarks of Natus. Natus Elite, Convert2Natus, neoBLUE, neoBLUE mini, Neometrics, Metabolic Screening Database System (MSDS), Case Management System (CMS), Voice Response System (VRS), Web Electronic
Birth Page (Web-EBP), and Accuscreen are non-registered trademarks of Natus. Solutions for Newborn CareSM is a non-registered service mark of Natus. Echo-Screen, AOAE, and Cochlea-Scan are registered trademarks of Fischer-Zoth GmbH, a subsidiary of Natus.
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BABY/BABY-8K-20041112170229.txt.gz
TIME:20041112170229
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
 
 
 
ITEM 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
 
On November 12, 2004 Natus Medical Incorporated (the "Company") issued a press release updating financial information included in its third quarter 2004 financial results press release issued on November 9, 2004.
 
The information in this Form 8-K and the exhibit attached hereto shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act") or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
 
ITEM 9.01. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS, PRO FORMA FINANCIAL INFORMATION AND EXHIBITS.
 
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 

E 99.1
XHIBIT
 
 
(Nasdaq NM: BABY) today issued updated financial information for the three and nine months ended September 30, 2004.
SAN CARLOS, Calif. (November 12, 2004)  Natus Medical Incorporated
 
In the financial results press release issued by Natus on November 9, 2004, the financial effect of the June 2004 restructuring initiatives undertaken by Natus were inadvertently allocated to the wrong operating expense line items. For both the three and nine month periods ended September 30, 2004, marketing and sales expense was overstated by $469,000 and general and administrative expense was understated by a like amount. The allocation had no effect upon gross profit, total operating expenses, net income or earnings per share. Amounts in the second quarter 2004 financial results press release issued on August 10, 2004 were reported properly. Financial statements for the three and nine month periods ended September 30, 2004 and 2003 reflecting this correction are attached to this release.
 
About Natus Medical
 
Natus develops, manufactures, and markets products for the detection, treatment, monitoring, and tracking of common disorders in newborns. Natus products are marketed under well-recognized brand names such as ALGO, Neometrics, Echo-Screen, and neoBLUE. Natus, headquartered in San Carlos, California, markets and sells its products worldwide through a direct sales force in the U.S. and the U.K., and through distributors in over 50 other countries. Additional information about Natus Medical can be found at .
www.natus.com
 
Natus, AABR, ALGO, ALGO 1e, ALGO 2, ALGO DataBook, 70/40, Ear Couplers, Flexicoupler, Jelly Tab, Jelly Button, and MiniMuffs are registered trademarks of Natus. Natus Elite, Convert2Natus, neoBLUE, neoBLUE mini, Neometrics, Metabolic Screening Database System (MSDS), Case Management System (CMS), Voice Response System (VRS), Web Electronic Birth Page (Web-EBP), and Accuscreen are non-registered trademarks of Natus. Solutions for Newborn CareSM is a non-registered service mark of Natus. Echo-Screen, AOAE, and Cochlea-Scan are registered trademarks of Fischer-Zoth GmbH, a subsidiary of Natus.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BABY/BABY-8K-20041203165832.txt.gz
TIME:20041203165832
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
 
 
 
 
ITEM 5.02 Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers.
 
(b) On December 1, 2004, William New, Jr., M.D., Ph.D., a director of the registrant, tendered his resignation from the Board of Directors. His resignation was not attributable to any disagreement with the registrant relating to its operations, policies or practices.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BABY/BABY-8K-20050225103118.txt.gz
TIME:20050225103118
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
 
 
 
ITEM 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
 
On February 25, 2005 Natus Medical Incorporated (the "Company") issued a press release updating financial information included in its fourth quarter and year ended December 31, 2004 financial results press release issued on February 25, 2005.
 
The information in this Form 8-K and the exhibit attached hereto shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act") or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
 
ITEM 9.01. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS, PRO FORMA FINANCIAL INFORMATION AND EXHIBITS.
 
 
 
 
.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 
 

E 99.1
XHIBIT
 
 
(Nasdaq NM: BABY) today announced financial results for the three months and year ended December 31, 2004.
SAN CARLOS, Calif. (February 25, 2005)  Natus Medical Incorporated
 
Natus reported revenue of $10.5 million for the fourth quarter ended December 31, 2004, representing a 10% increase, or $913,000, from $9.6 million in the comparable quarter of the previous year. The Company reported net income of $1.5 million, or $0.08 per diluted share for the fourth quarter of 2004, compared with net income of $337,000, or $0.02 per share, for the comparable period in 2003.
The Company reported record revenue of $36.5 million for the year ended December 31, 2004, an increase of 18%, from $31.0 million for the year ended December 31, 2003. The Company reported a net loss of $2.4 million, or $0.14 per share for the full year 2004, compared with a net loss of $2.7 million, or $0.17 per share, for the year ended December 31, 2003.
 
During the first half of 2004 the Company recorded a restructuring charge of $776,000 and costs associated with the departure of the Company's former chief executive officer totaling $870,000. These costs contributed to a $3.3 million loss from continuing operations reported for the first half of 2004. The Company reported income from continuing operations of $2.0 million, or $0.11 per diluted share, during the second half of 2004.
 
Gross margin improved to 65.4% for the three months ended December 31, 2004, compared with 57.7% for the fourth quarter of 2003. The gross margin for the 2004 period was favorably impacted by reductions in materials costs, as well as a reduction in manufacturing overhead as a percentage of revenue, as it is largely fixed. In addition, the Company benefited from sales of higher-margin Echo-Screen OAE devices. For the three months ended December 31, 2004, total operating expenses increased by $60,000, or approximately 1%, to $5.3 million, compared with $5.2 million for the fourth quarter of 2003.
 
As of December 31, 2004, the Company reported cash, cash equivalents and short-term investments of $35.7 million, representing an increase of approximately $2.0 million from the corresponding amount at September 30, 2004. Additionally, the Company reported stockholders' equity of $52.7 million and working capital of $40.8 million as of December 31, 2004.
 
"We are extremely pleased with our results for the fourth quarter," said Jim Hawkins, President and Chief Executive Officer of Natus Medical. "We successfully achieved our objectives of top-line growth and bottom-line profitability. We believe the cost control measures we implemented during the second quarter of this year have reduced our cost structure to an appropriate level and helped us achieve our profitability in the fourth quarter."
 
"Additionally, the integration of Natus and Fischer-Zoth has gone very well. This acquisition had a very positive impact upon our results for the fourth quarter, being immediately accretive to our bottom line. The Fischer-Zoth OAE product platform is complementary to our ALGO line of hearing screeners, and we expect a positive contribution from Fischer-Zoth in 2005."
 
Financial Guidance
 
Natus updated financial guidance for 2005. The Company expects to report earnings per diluted share of $0.27 to $0.29 on revenue of $41 to $43 million. The estimate of earnings per diluted share does not include the impact of expensing employee stock options that will occur when the Company is required to adopt Financial Accounting Standards Board Statement No. 123R, "Share-Based Payment," on July 1, 2005, and thus is presented on a non-GAAP basis. Natus is currently in the process of estimating the effect of the change.
 
In addition, Natus provided financial guidance for the first half of 2005. For the three months ending March 31, 2005, the Company expects to report diluted earnings per share of $0.02 to $0.03, on revenue of $9.4 to $9.6 million. For the second quarter of 2005, the Company expects to report diluted earnings per share of $0.04 to $0.06, on revenue of $9.7 to $10.0 million. The financial guidance for earnings per share of $0.06 to $0.09 for the first half of 2005 compares to a loss per share of $0.24 reported for the first half of 2004.
 
Conference Call
 
Natus has scheduled an investor conference call to discuss this announcement beginning at 11:00
a.m. Eastern Time today. Individuals interested in listening to the conference call may do so by dialing (800) 510-9834 for domestic callers, or (617) 614-3669 for international callers, and entering reservation code 66337849. A telephone replay will be available for 48 hours following the conclusion of the call by dialing (888) 286-8010 for domestic callers, or (617) 801-6888 for international callers, and entering reservation code 59475927.
 
The conference call also will be available real-time via the Internet at http://investor.natus.com, and a recording of the call will be available on the Company's Web site for 90 days following the completion of the call.
 
About Natus Medical
 
Natus develops, manufactures, and markets products for the detection, treatment, monitoring, and tracking of common disorders in newborns. Natus products are marketed under well-recognized brand names such as ALGO(R), Neometrics(TM), Echo-Screen(R), and neoBLUE(TM). Headquartered in San Carlos, California, Natus markets and sells its products worldwide through a direct sales force in the U.S. and the U.K., and through distributors in over 50 other countries. Additional information about Natus Medical can be found at www.natus.com.
 
This press release contains forward-looking statements as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, particularly statements regarding the expectations, beliefs, plans, intentions and strategies of Natus. These forward-looking statements include, but are not limited to, statements regarding anticipated revenue and profitability for the full-year 2005 as well as for the first and second quarters of 2005, and expectations regarding future growth and profitability and the future contribution of Fischer-Zoth. These statements relate to future events or Natus' future financial performance or results, and involve known and unknown risks, uncertainties and other factors that may cause actual results, levels of activity, performance, or achievements to differ materially from those expressed or implied by the forward-looking statements. Forward-looking statements are only predictions and the actual events or results may differ materially. Natus cannot provide any assurance that its future results or the results implied by the forward-looking statements will meet expectations. The results could differ materially due to a number of factors, including the effects of competition, the demand for our products and services, our ability to control costs, and risks associated with integration of acquired businesses. Natus disclaims any obligation to update information contained in any forward-looking statement.
 
More information about potential risk factors that could affect the business and financial results of Natus is included in Natus' annual report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2003, and its quarterly reports on Form 10-Q, and from time to time in other reports filed by Natus with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission.
 
Natus(R), AABR(R), AOAE(R), ALGO(R), ALGO DataBook(R), 70/40(R), Cochlea-Scan(R), Echo-Screen(R), Ear Couplers(R), Flexicoupler(R), Jelly Tab(R), Jelly Button(R), and MiniMuffs(R) are registered trademarks of Natus. Audio-System(TM), Convert2Natus(TM), DataLink(TM), EchoLink(TM), neoBLUE(TM), Natus Elite(TM), neoBLUE mini(TM), Neometrics(TM), Metabolic Screening Database System (MSDS)(TM), Case Management System (CMS)(TM), Voice Response System (VRS)(TM), Web Electronic Birth Page (Web-EBP)(TM), and Accuscreen(TM) are non-registered trademarks of Natus. Solutions for Newborn Care(SM) is a non-registered service mark of Natus.
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BABY/BABY-8K-20050311152716.txt.gz
TIME:20050311152716
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
 
 
 
ITEM 8.01 Other Events.
 
On March 11, 2005 Natus Medical Incorporated (the "Company") issued a press release announcing that at a meeting of its Board of Directors on March 10, 2005, the Board approved an amendment to the Company's stockholder rights plan increasing the threshold percentage of ownership that would result in a person or group being an "acquiring person" from 15% to 20%. This change to the plan will become effective as soon as practicable, pending the company's completion of the amendment to its rights plan with the rights agent.
 
The information in this Form 8-K and the exhibit attached hereto shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act") or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
 
ITEM 9.01. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS, PRO FORMA FINANCIAL INFORMATION AND EXHIBITS.
 
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 

E 99.1
XHIBIT
 
 
(Nasdaq:BABY) today announced that at a meeting of its Board of Directors on March 10, 2005, the Board approved an amendment to the Company's stockholder rights plan increasing the threshold percentage of ownership that would result in a person or group being an "acquiring person" from 15% to 20%. This change to the plan will become effective as soon as practicable, pending the company's completion of the amendment to its rights plan with the rights agent. Jim Hawkins, President and Chief Executive Officer of Natus said, "Our board determined that it was in the interests of our stockholders to increase the percentage of our shares that could be acquired under our plan, while still preserving the beneficial effects of the plan for our stockholders."
SAN CARLOS, Calif. (March 11, 2005)  Natus Medical Incorporated
 
About Natus
 
Natus develops, manufactures, and markets products for the detection, treatment, monitoring, and tracking of common disorders in newborns. Natus products are marketed under well-recognized brand names such as ALGO(R), Neometrics(TM), Echo-Screen(R), and neoBLUE(TM). Headquartered in San Carlos, California, Natus markets and sells its products worldwide through a direct sales force in the U.S. and the U.K., and through distributors in over 50 other countries. Additional information about Natus Medical can be found at .
www.natus.com
 
Information about potential risk factors that could affect the business and financial results of Natus is included in Natus' annual report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2003, and its quarterly reports on Form 10-Q, and from time to time in other reports filed by Natus with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission.
 
Natus(R), AABR(R), AOAE(R), ALGO(R), ALGO DataBook(R), 70/40(R), Cochlea-Scan(R), Echo-Screen(R), Ear Couplers(R), Flexicoupler(R), Jelly Tab(R), Jelly Button(R), and MiniMuffs(R) are registered trademarks of Natus. Audio-System(TM), Convert2Natus(TM), DataLink(TM), EchoLink(TM), neoBLUE(TM), Natus Elite(TM), neoBLUE mini(TM), Neometrics(TM), Metabolic Screening Database System (MSDS)(TM), Case Management System (CMS)(TM), Voice Response System (VRS)(TM), Web Electronic Birth Page (Web-EBP)(TM), and Accuscreen(TM) are non-registered trademarks of Natus. Solutions for Newborn Care(SM) is a non-registered service mark of Natus.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BABY/BABY-8K-20050315160357.txt.gz
TIME:20050315160357
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Material Modifications to Rights of Security Holders	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Material Modifications to Rights of Security Holders
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
 
 
 
ITEM 1.01 Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement.
 
Reference is made to the Amendment No. 2 To Preferred Stock Rights Agreement between Natus Medical Incorporated and Equiserve Trust Company, N.A. and further described under Item 3.03 of this Current Report on Form 8-K. The disclosure contained in Item 3.03 is hereby incorporated by reference into this Item 1.01, and such agreement has been filed as an exhibit to this Report.
 
ITEM 3.03 Material Modifications to Rights of Security Holders.
 
On March 15, 2005, the Preferred Stock Rights Agreement originally dated as of September 4, 2002 and amended and restated as of October 8, 2002, between the Company and Equiserve Trust Company, N.A. (the "Rights Agreement") was amended. The Amendment No. 2 dated March 15, 2005 effects the following:
 
 
 
A complete copy of Amendment No. 2 to Preferred Stock Rights Agreement is attached as Exhibit 99.1 to this report.
 
The information in this Form 8-K and the exhibit attached hereto shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act") or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
 
ITEM 9.01. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS, PRO FORMA FINANCIAL INFORMATION AND EXHIBITS.
 
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 
 
 

E 99.1
XHIBIT
 
 
This Amendment No. 2 dated as of March 15, 2005 (this "Amendment") is to the Preferred Stock Rights Agreement originally dated as of September 4, 2002 and amended and restated as of October 8, 2002 (the "Rights Agreement"), between Natus Medical Incorporated, a Delaware corporation, (the "Company"), and EquiServe Trust Company, N.A. (the "Rights Agent"). Terms not defined herein have the meanings assigned to them in the Rights Agreement.
 
WHEREAS, insofar as Perry Corp. no longer owns shares of the Company's common stock, the Company desires to remove all references in the Rights Agreement permitting Perry Corp. to increase its holdings of the Company's common stock without becoming an Acquiring Person;
 
WHEREAS, the Company desires to increase the threshold percentage of ownership that would result in a person or group being an Acquiring Person, from 15% to 20%; and
 
WHEREAS, the Company desires to change the addresses for notices; and
 
WHEREAS, pursuant to Section 27 of the Rights Agreement, the Company and the Rights Agent have agreed to amend the Rights Agreement to effect such changes;
 
NOW, THEREFORE, in consideration of the promises and the mutual agreements herein set forth, the parties hereby agree to amend the Rights Agreement as follows:
 
1. . Section 1(a) of the Rights Agreement pertaining to the definition of "Acquiring Person" is amended and restated as follows:
Amendment of Section 1(a)
 
(a) "Acquiring Person" shall mean any Person, who or which, together with all Affiliates and Associates of such Person, shall be the Beneficial Owner of 20% or more of the Common Shares then outstanding, but shall not include the Company, any Subsidiary of the Company or any employee benefit plan of the Company or of any Subsidiary of the Company, or any entity holding Common Shares for or pursuant to the terms of any such plan. Notwithstanding the foregoing, no Person shall be deemed to be an Acquiring Person as the result of an acquisition of Common Shares by the Company which, by reducing the number of shares outstanding, increases the proportionate number of shares beneficially owned by such Person to 20% or more of the Common Shares of the Company then outstanding; , that if a Person shall become the Beneficial Owner of 20% or more of the Common Shares of the Company then outstanding by reason of share purchases by the Company and shall, after such share purchases by the Company, become the Beneficial Owner of any additional Common Shares of the Company (other than pursuant to a dividend or distribution paid or made by the Company on the outstanding Common Shares in Common Shares or pursuant to a split or subdivision of the outstanding Common Shares), then such Person shall be deemed to be an Acquiring Person unless upon becoming the Beneficial Owner of such additional Common Shares of the Company such Person does not beneficially own 20% or more of the Common Shares of the Company then outstanding. Notwithstanding the foregoing, (i) if the Company's Board of Directors determines in good faith that a Person who would otherwise be an "Acquiring Person," as defined pursuant to the foregoing provisions of this paragraph (a), has become such inadvertently (including, without limitation, because (A) such Person was unaware that it beneficially owned a percentage of the Common Shares that would otherwise cause such Person to be an "Acquiring Person," as defined pursuant to the foregoing provisions of this paragraph (a), or (B) such Person was aware of the extent of the Common Shares it beneficially owned but had no actual knowledge of the consequences of such beneficial ownership under this Agreement) and without any intention of changing or influencing control of the Company, and if such Person divested or divests as promptly as practicable a sufficient number of Common Shares so that such Person would no longer be an "Acquiring Person," as defined pursuant to the foregoing provisions of this paragraph (a), then such Person shall not be deemed to be or to have become an "Acquiring Person" for any purposes of this Agreement including, without limitation Section 1(gg) hereof; and (ii) if, as of the date
provided, however
hereof, any Person is the Beneficial Owner of 20% or more of the Common Shares outstanding, such Person shall not be or become an "Acquiring Person," as defined pursuant to the foregoing provisions of this paragraph (a), unless and until such time as such Person shall become the Beneficial Owner of additional Common Shares (other than pursuant to a dividend or distribution paid or made by the Company on the outstanding Common Shares in Common Shares or pursuant to a split or subdivision of the outstanding Common Shares), unless, upon becoming the Beneficial Owner of such additional Common Shares, such Person is not then the Beneficial Owner of 20% or more of the Common Shares then outstanding.
 
2. Amendment of Section 26. Section 26 of the Rights Agreement pertaining to "Notices" is amended and restated as follows:
 
Section 26. Notices. Notices or demands authorized by this Agreement to be given or made by the Rights Agent or by the holder of any Rights Certificate to or on the Company shall be sufficiently given or made if sent by first-class mail, postage prepaid, addressed (until another address is filed in writing with the Rights Agent) as follows:
 
Natus Medical Incorporated
1501 Industrial Road
San Carlos, California 94070
Attention: Chief Executive Officer
 
with a copy to:
 
Fenwick & West LLP
801 California St.
Mountain View, California 94041
Attention: Daniel J. Winnike, Esq.
 
Subject to the provisions of Section 21 hereof, any notice or demand authorized by this Agreement to be given or made by the Company or by the holder of any Rights Certificate to or on the Rights Agent shall be sufficiently given or made if sent by first-class mail, postage prepaid, addressed (until another address is filed in writing with the Company) as follows:
 
EquiServe Trust Company, N.A.
250 Royall Street
Canton, MA 02021
Attn: Client Administration
 
Notices or demands authorized by this Agreement to be given or made by the Company or the Rights Agent to the holder of any Rights Certificate shall be sufficiently given or made if sent by first-class mail, postage prepaid, addressed to such holder at the address of such holder as shown on the registry books of the Company.
3. . Exhibit C of the Rights Agreement is amended and restated as follows:
Amendment of Exhibit C of the Rights Agreement
 
 
 
 
 
3. . Except as expressly amended by this Amendment, all provisions of the Rights Agreement shall remain in full force and effect.
Remaining Provisions
 
4. . Notices or demands authorized by this Amendment to be given or made by the Rights Agent to or on the Company shall be sufficiently given or made if sent by first-class mail, postage prepaid, addressed (until another address is filed in writing with the Rights Agent) as follows:
Notices
 
Natus Medical Incorporated
1501 Industrial Road
San Carlos, California 94070
Attention: Chief Executive Officer
 
with a copy to:
 
Fenwick & West LLP
801 California St.
Mountain View, California 94041
Attention: Daniel J. Winnike, Esq.
 
Any notice or demand authorized by this Amendment to be given or made by the Company to or on the Rights Agent shall be sufficiently given or made if sent by first-class mail, postage prepaid, addressed (until another address is filed in writing with the Company) as follows:
 
EquiServe Trust Company, N.A.
250 Royall Street
Canton, MA 02021
Attn: Client Administration
 
5. . Nothing in this Amendment shall be construed to give to any Person other than the Company, the Rights Agent and the registered holders of the Rights Certificates (and, prior to the Distribution Date, the Common Shares) any legal or equitable right, remedy or claim pursuant to this Amendment; but this Amendment shall be for the sole and exclusive benefit of the Company, the Rights Agent and the registered holders of the Rights Certificates (and, prior to the Distribution Date, the Common Shares).
Benefits of this Amendment
 
6. . If any term, provision, covenant or restriction of this Amendment is held by a court of competent jurisdiction or other authority to be invalid, void or unenforceable, the remainder of the terms, provisions, covenants and restrictions of this Amendment shall remain in full force and effect and shall in no way be affected, impaired or invalidated.
Severability
 
7. . This Amendment shall be deemed to be a contract made under the laws of the State of Delaware and for all purposes shall be governed by and construed in accordance with the laws of such State applicable to contracts to be made and performed entirely within such State.
Governing Law
 
8. . This Amendment may be executed in any number of counterparts and each of such counterparts shall for all purposes be deemed to be an original, and all such counterparts shall together constitute but one and the same instrument.
Counterparts
 
9. . Descriptive headings of the several Sections of this Amendment are inserted for convenience only and shall not control or affect the meaning or construction of any of the provisions hereof.
Descriptive Headings
 
 
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have caused this Amendment to be duly executed as of the day and year first above written.
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BABY/BABY-8K-20050505081115.txt.gz
TIME:20050505081115
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION Washington, D.C. 20549 FORM 8-K CURRENT REPORT Pursuant to Section 13 OR 15(d) of The Securities Exchange Act of 1934 Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported) May 5, 2005 Natus Medical Incorporated - -------------------------------------------------------------------------------- (Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter) Delaware 000-33001 77-0154833 - -------------------------------- ----------------- ----------------------------- (State or other jurisdiction (Commission (IRS Employer of incorporation) File Number) Identification No.) 1501 Industrial Road, San Carlos, California 94070 - -------------------------------------------------------------------------------- (Address of principal executive offices) (Zip Code) Registrant's telephone number, including area code: (650) 802-0400 ---------------------------- Not applicable - -------------------------------------------------------------------------------- (Former name or former address, if changed since last report) Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below): [ ] Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [ ] Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [ ] Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [ ] Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
- -------------------------------------------------------------------------------- ITEM 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition. On May 5, 2005, Natus Medical Incorporated (the "Company") is issuing a press release and holding a conference call regarding its financial results for the first quarter of fiscal 2005 ended March 31, 2005 and other financial information. A copy of the press release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 to this Form 8-K. The information in this Form 8-K and the exhibit attached hereto shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act") or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing. ITEM 9.01. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS, PRO FORMA FINANCIAL INFORMATION AND EXHIBITS. (c) Exhibits. Exhibit No. Description ----------- ----------- 99.1 Press release of Natus Medical Incorporated dated May 5, 2005 describing the Company's results for its first fiscal quarter ended March 31, 2005 and other financial information. - -------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 2
SIGNATURES Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized. NATUS MEDICAL INCORPORATED Dated: May 5, 2005 By: /s/ Steven J. Murphy ------------------------------------- Steven J. Murphy Vice President, Finance 3
Index to Exhibits Exhibit No. Description ----------- ----------- 99.1 Press release of Natus Medical Incorporated dated May 5, 2005 describing the Company's results for its first fiscal quarter ended March 31, 2005 and other financial information. 4

Exhibit 99.1 Natus Medical Reports Record First Quarter Revenue and Earnings; Company Increases 2005 Earnings Guidance SAN CARLOS, Calif.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--May 5, 2005--Natus Medical Incorporated (Nasdaq:BABY) today announced financial results for the three months ended March 31, 2005. Natus reported revenue of $9.7 million for the quarter ended March 31, 2005, an increase of $1.1 million or 13% from $8.6 million in the comparable quarter of the previous year. The Company reported net income of $910,000, or $0.05 per diluted share, for the first quarter of 2005, compared with a net loss of $447,000, or ($0.03) loss per share, for the comparable period in 2004. Gross margin improved to 60.1% for the three months ended March 31, 2005, compared with 56.2% for the first quarter of 2004. The gross margin for the 2005 period was favorably impacted by reductions in materials costs, as well as a reduction in manufacturing overhead as a percentage of revenue, as it is largely fixed. For the three months ended March 31, 2005, total operating expenses decreased by $290,000, or approximately 6%, to $5.0 million, compared with $5.2 million for the first quarter of 2004. As of March 31, 2005, the Company reported cash, cash equivalents and short-term investments of $37.8 million, representing an increase of approximately $2.1 million from the corresponding amount at December 31, 2004. Additionally, the Company reported stockholders' equity of $54.0 million and working capital of $42.2 million as of March 31, 2005. "We are extremely pleased with our results for the first quarter," said Jim Hawkins, President and Chief Executive Officer of Natus Medical. "We continue to benefit from the cost control measures we implemented during the middle of 2004. In addition, we have been able to grow our top line revenue while at the same time improving our margins." "The integration of Natus and Fischer-Zoth continues to go very well. This acquisition has had a very positive impact upon our results for the past two quarters, being immediately accretive to our bottom line. Our strategy continues to focus on internal growth coupled with strategic acquisitions that we expect to allow us to leverage our strong and established sales channels," Hawkins added. Financial Guidance Natus updated financial guidance for 2005. The Company expects to report earnings per diluted share of $0.28 to $0.31 on revenue of $41 to $43 million in 2005. This compares to a loss per share of $0.17 on revenue of $36.5 million reported for 2004. Natus had previously said it would earn $0.27 to $0.29 per diluted share in 2005 on the same revenue amounts. The Company also updated its guidance for the second quarter of 2005. For the three months ending June 30, 2005, the Company expects to report diluted earnings per share of $0.05 to $0.06, on revenue of $9.8 to $10.0 million. Natus had previously said it would earn $0.04 to $0.06 per diluted share on revenue of $9.7 to $10.0 million. In addition, Natus provided quarterly financial guidance for the second half of 2005. For the third quarter of 2005, the Company expects to report diluted earnings per share of $0.07 to $0.08, on revenue of $10.2 to $10.4 million. For the fourth quarter 2005, the Company expects to report diluted earnings per share of $0.11 to $0.12, on revenue of $11.3 to $12.9 million. The estimates of earnings per diluted share do not include the impact of expensing employee stock options. The SEC has delayed the effective date for adopting Financial Accounting Standards Board Statement No. 123R, "Share-Based Payment." The company will be required to begin expensing employee stock options in its first quarterly period in 2006. Conference Call Natus has scheduled an investor conference call to discuss this announcement beginning at 11:00 a.m. Eastern Time today. Individuals interested in listening to the conference call may do so by dialing (800) 510-9691 for domestic callers, or (617) 614-3453 for international callers, and entering reservation code 89915360. A telephone replay will be available for 48 hours following the conclusion of the call by dialing (888) 286-8010 for domestic callers, or (617) 801-6888 for international callers, and entering reservation code 12373136. The conference call also will be available real-time via the Internet at http://investor.natus.com, and a recording of the call will be available on the Company's Web site for 90 days following the completion of the call. About Natus Medical Natus develops, manufactures, and markets products for the detection, treatment, monitoring, and tracking of common disorders in newborns. Natus products are marketed under well-recognized brand names such as ALGO(R), Neometrics(TM), Echo-Screen(R), and neoBLUE(TM). Headquartered in San Carlos, California, Natus markets and sells its products worldwide through a direct sales force in the U.S. and the U.K., and through distributors in over 50 other countries. Additional information about Natus Medical can be found at www.natus.com. This press release contains forward-looking statements as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, particularly statements regarding the expectations, beliefs, plans, intentions and strategies of Natus. These forward-looking statements include, but are not limited to, statements regarding anticipated revenue and profitability for the full-year 2005 as well as for the second, third, and fourth quarters of 2005, and expectations regarding future growth and profitability. These statements relate to future events or Natus' future financial performance or results, and involve known and unknown risks, uncertainties and other factors that may cause actual results, levels of activity, performance, or achievements to differ materially from those expressed or implied by the forward-looking statements. Forward-looking statements are only predictions and the actual events or results may differ materially. Natus cannot provide any assurance that its future results or the results implied by the forward-looking statements will meet expectations. The results could differ materially due to a number of factors, including the effects of competition, the demand for our products and services, our ability to control costs, and risks associated with integration of acquired businesses. Natus disclaims any obligation to update information contained in any forward-looking statement. More information about potential risk factors that could affect the business and financial results of Natus is included in Natus' annual report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2004, and its quarterly reports on Form 10-Q, and from time to time in other reports filed by Natus with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission. Natus(R), AABR(R), AOAE(R), ALGO(R), ALGO DataBook(R), 70/40(R), Cochlea-Scan(R), Echo-Screen(R), Ear Couplers(R), Flexicoupler(R), Jelly Tab(R), Jelly Button(R), and MiniMuffs(R) are registered trademarks of Natus. Audio-System(TM), Convert2Natus(TM), DataLink(TM), EchoLink(TM), neoBLUE(TM), Natus Elite(TM), neoBLUE mini(TM), Neometrics(TM), Metabolic Screening Database System (MSDS)(TM), Case Management System (CMS)(TM), Voice Response System (VRS)(TM), Web Electronic Birth Page (Web-EBP)(TM), and Accuscreen(TM) are non-registered trademarks of Natus. Solutions for Newborn Care(SM) is a non-registered service mark of Natus. NATUS MEDICAL INCORPORATED AND SUBSIDIARIES UNAUDITED CONDENSED CONSOLIDATED BALANCE SHEETS (in thousands, except share amounts) March 31, December 31, 2005 2004 ASSETS Current assets: Cash and equivalents $ 26,154 $ 16,239 Short-term investments 11,659 19,504 Accounts receivable, net of allowance for doubtful accounts of $ 472 in 2005 and $395 in 2004 5,426 6,640 Inventories 3,474 4,347 Prepaid expenses and other current assets 581 625 Total current assets 47,294 47,355 Property and equipment, net 2,514 2,503 Goodwill, intangibles, and other assets 9,228 9,399 Total assets $ 59,036 $ 59,257 LIABILITIES AND STOCKHOLDERS' EQUITY Liabilities: Accounts payable $ 616 $ 1,947 Accrued liabilities 4,090 4,303 Deferred revenues 357 279 Total liabilities 5,063 6,529 Commitments and contingencies - - Stockholders' equity: Common stock, $0.001 par value, 120,000,000 shares authorized; shares issued and outstanding: 17,171,812 in 2005 and 17,140,339 in 2004 89,541 89,373 Accumulated deficit (35,992) (36,902) Accumulated other comprehensive income 424 257 Total stockholders' equity 53,973 52,728 Total liabilities and stockholders' equity $ 59,036 $ 59,257 NATUS MEDICAL INCORPORATED AND SUBSIDIARIES UNAUDITED CONDENSED CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF OPERATIONS (in thousands, except per share amounts) Three Months Ended Mar 31, Mar 31, 2005 2004 Revenue $ 9,702 $ 8,571 Cost of revenue 3,870 3,758 Gross profit 5,832 4,813 Operating expenses: Marketing and selling 2,605 2,971 Research and development 993 906 General and administrative 1,363 1,369 Total operating expenses 4,961 5,246 Income (loss) from operations 871 (433) Other income/(expense): Interest income 183 97 Interest expense - (3) Other income, net 9 76 Total other income/(expense) 192 170 Income (loss) before provision for income tax 1,063 (263) Provision for income tax 153 1 Income (loss) from continuing operations 910 (264) Discontinued operations - (183) Net income (loss) $ 910 $ (447) Earnings (loss) per share: Basic: Continuing operations $ 0.05 $ (0.02) Discontinued operations $ - $ (0.01) Net income (loss) $ 0.05 $ (0.03) Diluted: Continuing operations $ 0.05 $ (0.02) Discontinued operations $ - $ (0.01) Net income (loss) $ 0.05 $ (0.03) Weighted-average shares used to compute Basic earnings per share 17,156 16,579 Diluted earnings per share 18,435 16,579 CONTACT: Natus Medical Incorporated Steven J. Murphy, 650-802-0400 InvestorRelations@Natus.com


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BABY/BABY-8K-20050614115830.txt.gz
TIME:20050614115830
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
Item 1.01. Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement.
 
Executive Bonus Plan
 
On June 8, 2005, the Compensation Committee of the Board of Directors of Natus Medical Incorporated (the "Company") approved a cash bonus plan for executive officers of the Company based on the Company achieving its budgeted pre-tax profit for 2005. The cash bonuses may range from 50% to a maximum of 150% of the target amount (based on the amount of actual pre-tax profit relative to the budgeted amount). The target bonus for each of Messrs. Mince, Murphy and Dr. Chung is 30% of 2005 base salary, and for Mr. Hawkins is 50% of 2005 base salary. Mr. Traverso's bonus is comprised of payments made pursuant to a sales compensation plan that is paid on a regular basis throughout the year. The payment of bonuses pursuant to this plan is at the discretion of the Board of Directors.
 
Non-Employee Director Compensation
 
On June 8, 2005, the Compensation Committee approved an increase in the fees paid to members of the Audit Committee for attendance at committee meetings from $500 to $1,000. The Compensation Committee also approved payment of an annual retainer of $3,000 to the Chairman of each of the Compensation and Nominating and Corporate Governance Committees, such retainer to be paid in addition to the other fees they receive for their service as Directors.
 
Amended and Restated 2000 Stock Awards Plan
 
On June 9, 2005, the stockholders of the Company approved the Amended and Restated 2000 Stock Awards Plan (the "Restated Plan") as approved by the Board of Directors in March 2005. The Restated Plan was amended to broaden the types of equity awards available and establish quantitative and qualitative performance factors to be used as criteria for the award and vesting of certain types of equity awards. In particular, the Restated Plan now allows for the grant of restricted stock awards, stock bonuses, stock appreciation rights, and restricted stock units. The Restated Plan is attached as Exhibit 10.1 to this Report and is incorporated by reference herein.
 
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
The following exhibits are filed herewith:
(c) Exhibits.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 

Exhibit 10.1
 
 
The purposes of this Stock Awards Plan are to attract and retain the best available personnel for positions of substantial responsibility, to provide additional incentive to Employees, Directors and Consultants and to promote the success of the Company's business. Awards granted under the Plan may be Incentive Stock Options or Nonstatutory Stock Options, Restricted Stock, Stock Bonuses, Stock Appreciation Rights or Restricted Stock Units, in each instance as determined by the Administrator at the time of grant.
1. .
Purposes of the Plan
 
As used herein, the following definitions shall apply:
2. .
Definitions
 
(a) "Administrator" means the Board or any of its Committees appointed in accordance with Section 4 hereof.
 
(b) "Applicable Laws" means the requirements relating to the administration of stock award plans under U.S. state corporate laws, U.S. federal and state securities laws, the Code, any stock exchange or quotation system on which the Common Stock is listed or quoted and the applicable laws of any foreign country where Awards are, or will be, granted.
 
(c) "Award" means any award under the Plan, including any Option, Restricted Stock, Stock Bonus, Stock Appreciation Right or Restricted Stock Unit.
 
(d) "Award Agreement" means, with respect to each Award, the written agreement between the Company and the Participant setting forth the terms and conditions of the Award.
 
(e) "Board" means the Board of Directors of the Company.
 
(f) "Code" means the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.
 
(g) "Committee" means a committee of Directors appointed by the Board in accordance with Section 4 hereof.
 
(h) "Common Stock" means the Common Stock of the Company.
 
(i) "Company" means Natus Medical Incorporated, a Delaware corporation.
 
(j) "Consultant" means any person who is engaged by the Company or any Parent or Subsidiary to render consulting or advisory services to such entity and who is compensated for such services, including a Director.
 
(k) "Director" means a member of the Board of Directors of the Company.
 
(l) "Employee" means any person, including Officers and Directors, employed by the Company or any Parent or Subsidiary of the Company. A Service Provider shall not cease to be an Employee in the case of (i) any leave of absence approved by the company or (ii) transfers between locations of the Company or between the Company, its Parent, any Subsidiary, or any successor.
For purposes of Incentive Stock Options, no such leave may exceed ninety days, unless reemployment upon expiration of such leave is guaranteed by statute or contract. If reemployment upon expiration of a leave of absence approved by the Company is not so guaranteed, on the 181
st
day of such leave any Incentive Stock Option held by the Optionee shall cease to be treated as an Incentive Stock Option and shall be treated for tax purposes as a Nonstatutory Stock Option. Neither service as a Director nor payment of a director's fee by the Company shall be sufficient to constitute "employment" by the Company.
 
(m) "Exchange Act" means the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended.
 
(n) "Fair Market Value" means, as of any date, the value of Common Stock determined as follows:
 
(i) If the Common Stock is listed on any established stock exchange or a national market system including, without limitation, the Nasdaq National Market or The Nasdaq SmallCap Market of The Nasdaq Stock Market, its Fair Market Value shall be the closing sales price for such stock (or the closing bid, if no sales were reported) as quoted on such exchange or system for the last market trading day prior to the time of determination, as reported in The Wall Street Journal or such other source as the Administrator deems reliable;
 
(ii) If the Common Stock is regularly quoted by a recognized securities dealer but selling prices are not reported, its Fair Market Value shall be the mean between the high bid and low asked prices for the Common Stock on the last market trading day prior to the day of determination; or
 
(iii) In the absence of an established market for the Common Stock, the Fair Market Value thereof shall be determined in good faith by the Administrator.
 
(o) "Incentive Stock Option" means an Option intended to qualify as an incentive stock option within the meaning of Section 422 of the Code.
 
(p) "Nonstatutory Stock Option" means an Option not intended to qualify as an Incentive Stock Option.
 
(q) "Officer" means a person who is an officer of the Company within the meaning of Section 16 of the Exchange Act and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder.
 
(r) "Option" means a stock option granted pursuant to the Plan.
 
(s) "Option Agreement" means a written or electronic agreement between the Company and an Optionee evidencing the terms and conditions of an individual Option grant. The Option Agreement is subject to the terms and conditions of the Plan.
 
(t) "Option Exchange Program" means a program whereby outstanding Options are exchanged for Options with a lower exercise price.
 
(u) "Optioned Stock" means the Common Stock subject to an Option.
 
(v) "Optionee" means the holder of an outstanding Option granted under the Plan.
 
(w) "Parent" means a "parent corporation," whether now or hereafter existing, as defined in Section 424(e) of the Code.
 
(x) "Participant" means a person who receives an Award under the Plan.
 
(y) "Performance Factors" means the factors selected by the Administrator from among the following measures to determine whether the performance goals established by the Administrator and applicable to Awards have been satisfied:
 
(i) Net revenue and/or net revenue growth;
 
(ii) Earnings before income taxes and amortization and/or earnings before income taxes and amortization growth;
 
(iii) Operating income and/or operating income growth;
 
(iv) Net income and/or net income growth;
 
(v) Earnings per share and/or earnings per share growth;
 
(vi) Total stockholder return and/or total stockholder return growth;
 
(vii) Return on equity;
 
(viii) Operating cash flow return on income;
 
(ix) Adjusted operating cash flow return on income;
 
(x) Economic value added; and
 
(xi) Individual business objectives.
 
(z) "Performance Period" means the period of service determined by the Administrator, not to exceed five years, during which years of service or performance is to be measured for the Award.
 
(aa) "Plan" means this 2000 Stock Awards Plan.
 
(bb) "Restricted Stock" means an offer under the Plan to sell (or issue through a SAR or Stock Bonus) Shares that are subject to restrictions.
 
(cc) "Restricted Stock Unit" or "RSU" means an Award covering a number of Shares that may be settled in cash, or by issuance of those Shares (which may consist of Restricted Stock) for services to be rendered or for past services already rendered to the Company or any Parent or Subsidiary.
 
(dd) "Service Provider" means an Employee, Director or Consultant.
 
(ee) "Share" means a share of the Common Stock, as adjusted in accordance with Section 14 below.
 
(ff) "Stock Appreciation Right" or "SAR" means an Award that may be settled in cash, or Shares (which may consist of Restricted Stock), having a value equal to the value determined by multiplying the difference between the Fair Market Value on the date of exercise over the Fair Market Value on the date of grant and the number of Shares with respect to which the SAR is being settled.
 
(gg) "Stock Bonus" means an Award of Shares (which may consist of Restricted Stock or Restricted Stock Units) for services to be rendered or for past services already rendered to the Company or any Parent or Subsidiary.
 
(hh) "Subsidiary means a "subsidiary corporation," whether now or hereafter existing, as defined in Section 424(f) of the Code.
 
Subject to the provisions of Section 14 of the Plan, the maximum aggregate number of Shares (as adjusted for the July 2000 two-for-five reverse split) which may be subject to Awards is 1,500,000 Shares (post-split), together with an annual increase in the number of shares of Common Stock reserved for issuance hereunder on the first day of the Company's fiscal year, beginning with January 1, 2002, equal to the lesser of (i) 1,500,000 Shares (post-split), (ii) seven percent (7%) of the outstanding Shares of the Company as of the last day of the prior fiscal year or (iii) such amount as determined by the Board of Directors. No more than the maximum number of shares that may be reserved under the Plan pursuant to the preceding sentence may be issued pursuant to the exercise of Incentive Stock Options. The Shares may be authorized but unissued, or reacquired Common Stock.
3. .
Stock Subject to the Plan
 
For each Share underlying an Award the number of Shares available for grant and issuance under the Plan shall be decreased by one. Shares that are subject to: (a) issuance upon exercise of an Option or SAR granted under this Plan but which cease to be subject to the Option or SAR for any reason other than exercise of the Option or SAR; (b) Awards granted under this Plan but such Shares are forfeited or are repurchased by the Company at the original issue price; or (c) Awards granted under this Plan that otherwise terminate without Shares being issued, will return to the pool of Shares available for grant and issuance under this Plan.
 
4. .
Administration of the Plan
 
(a) Procedure.
 
(i) Multiple Administrative Bodies. The Plan may be administered by different Committees with respect to different groups of Employees and Consultants.
 
(ii) . To the extent that the Administrator determines it to be desirable to qualify Awards granted hereunder as "performance-based compensation" within the meaning of Section 162(m) of the Code, then approval and administration of such Awards shall comply with the requirements of Section 162(m) of the Code.
Section 162(m)
 
(iii) . To the extent desirable to qualify transactions hereunder as exempt under Rule 16b-3, the transactions contemplated hereunder shall be structured to satisfy the requirements for exemption under Rule 16b-3.
Rule 16b-3
 
(iv) . Other than as provided above, the Plan shall be administered by (A) the Board or (B) a Committee, which Committee shall be constituted to satisfy Applicable Laws.
Other Administration
 
(b) . Subject to the provisions of the Plan and, in the case of a Committee, the specific duties delegated by the Board to such Committee, and subject to the approval of any relevant authorities, the Administrator shall have the authority in its discretion:
Powers of the Administrator
 
(i) to determine the Fair Market Value;
 
(ii) to select the Service Providers to whom Awards may from time to time be granted hereunder;
 
(iii) to determine the number of Shares to be covered by each such award granted hereunder;
 
(iv) to approve forms of agreements for use under the Plan;
 
(v) to determine the terms and conditions, of any Awards granted hereunder. Such terms and conditions include, but are not limited to, the exercise price, the time or times when Awards may be exercised (which may be based on performance criteria), any vesting acceleration or waiver of forfeiture restrictions, and any restriction or limitation regarding any Award or the Common Stock relating thereto, based in each case on such factors as the Administrator, in its sole discretion, shall determine;
 
(vi) to determine whether and under what circumstances an Option any be settled in cash under subsection 12(e) instead of Common Stock;
 
(vii) to reduce the exercise price of any Option to the then current Fair Market Value if the Fair Market Value of the Common Stock covered by such Option has declined since the date the Option was granted;
 
(viii) to initiate an Option Exchange Program;
 
(ix) to prescribe, amend and rescind rules and regulations relating to the Plan, including rules and regulations relating to sub-plans established for the purpose of qualifying for preferred tax treatment under foreign tax laws;
 
(x) to allow Optionees to satisfy withholding tax obligations by electing to have the Company withhold from the Shares to be issued upon exercise of an Option that number of Shares having a Fair Market Value equal to the amount required to be withheld. The Fair Market Value of the Shares to be withheld shall be determined on the date that the amount of tax to be withheld is to be determined. All elections by Optionees to have Shares withheld for this purpose shall be made in such form and under such conditions as the Administrator may deem necessary or advisable; and
 
(xi) to construe and interpret the terms of the Plan and awards granted pursuant to the Plan.
 
(xii) to make all other determinations deemed necessary or advisable for administering the Plan.
 
(c) . All decisions, determinations and interpretations of the Administrator shall be final and binding on all optionees.
Effect of Administrator's Decision
 
5. .
Eligibility
 
(a) Awards may be granted only to Service Providers and provided further that Incentive Stock Options may be granted only to Employees.
 
(b) Neither the Plan nor any Award shall confer upon any Participant any right with respect to continuing the Participant's relationship as a Service Provider with the Company, nor shall it interfere in any way with his or her right or the Company's right to terminate such relationship at any time, with or without cause.
 
(c) Upon the Company, or a successor corporation, issuing any class of common equity securities required to be registered under Section 12 of the Exchange Act, or upon the Plan being assumed by a corporation having a class of common equity securities required to be registered under Section 12 of the Exchange Act, the following limitations shall apply to Awards granted to Employees:
 
(i) No Employee shall be granted in any fiscal year Awards covering more than 1,000,000 Shares (post-split).
 
(ii) In connection with his or her initial employment, an Employee may be granted Awards covering an additional 500,000 Shares (post-split) which shall not count against the amount set forth in subsection (i) above.
 
(iii) The foregoing limitations shall be adjusted appropriately in connection with any change in the Company's capitalization as described in Section 14.
 
(iv) If any Award is cancelled in the same fiscal year of the Company in which it was granted (other than in connection with a transaction described in Section 14), the Shares covered by such cancelled Award will be counted against the limits set forth in subsections (i) and (ii) above. For this purpose, if the exercise price of an Option is reduced, the transaction will be treated as a cancellation of the Option and the grant of a new Option.
 
The Plan shall become effective upon its adoption by the Board; provided, however, the Plan shall not become effective until the effective date of the Company's initial public offering pursuant to a registration statement filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission. It shall continue in effect for a term of ten (10) years unless sooner terminated under Section 15 of the Plan.
6. .
Term of Plan
 
7. .
Options
 
(a) Each Option shall be designated in the Option Agreement as either an Incentive Stock Option or a Nonstatutory Stock Option. However, notwithstanding such designation, to the extent that the aggregate Fair Market Value of the Shares with respect to which Incentive Stock Options are exercisable for the first time by the Optionee during any calendar year (under all plans of the Company and any Parent or Subsidiary) exceeds $100,000, such Options shall be treated as Nonstatutory Stock Options. For purposes of this subsection 7(a), Incentive Stock Options shall be taken into account in the order provided for in the Code and regulations promulgated thereunder. The Fair Market Value of the Shares shall be determined as of the time the Option with respect to such Shares is granted.
 
(b) The date of grant of an Option shall, for all purposes, be at the date on which the Administrator makes the determination granting such Option, or such other date as is determined by the Administrator. Notice of the determination shall be given to each Service Provider to whom an Option is so granted within a reasonable time after the date of such grant.
 
(c) The term of each Option shall be stated in the Option Agreement for such Option; provided, however, that the term shall be no more than ten (10) years from the date of grant thereof. In the case of an Incentive Stock Option granted to an Optionee who, at the time of the Option is granted, owns stock representing more than ten percent (10%) of the voting power of all classes of stock of the Company or any Parent or Subsidiary, the term of the Option shall be five (5) years from the date of grant or such shorter term as may be provided in the Option Agreement.
 
(d) The per share exercise price for the Shares to be issued upon exercise of an Option shall be such price as is determined by the Administrator, but shall be subject to the following:
 
(i) In the case of an Incentive Stock Option,
 
(A) granted to an Employee who, at the time of grant of such Option, owns stock representing more than ten percent (10%) of the voting power of all classes of stock of the Company or any Parent or Subsidiary, the exercise price shall be no less than 110% of the Fair Market Value per Share on the date of grant.
 
(B) granted to any other Employee, the Per Share exercise price shall be no less than 100% of the Fair Market Value per Share on the date of grant.
 
(ii) Notwithstanding the foregoing, Options may be granted with a per Share exercise price other than as required above pursuant to a merger or other corporate transaction.
 
(e) An Option shall be deemed exercised when the Company receives: (i) written or electronic notice of exercise (in accordance with the Option Agreement) from the person entitled to exercise the Option, and (ii) full payment for the Shares with respect to which the Option is exercised. Full payment may consist of any consideration and method of payment authorized by the Administrator and permitted by the Option Agreement and the Plan. Shares issued upon exercise of an Option shall be issued in the name of the Optionee or, if requested by the Optionee, in the name of the Optionee and his or her spouse. No adjustment will be made for a dividend or other right for which the record date is prior to the date the Shares are issued, except as provided in Section 14 of the Plan.
 
(f) . If termination of an Optionee's relationship as a Service Provider is for disability, but such disability is not a "permanent and total disability" as defined in Section 22(e)(3) of the Code, then in the case of an Incentive Stock Option, such Incentive Stock Option shall automatically cease to be treated as an Incentive Stock Option and shall be treated for tax purposes as a Nonstatutory Stock Option on the day three months and one day following the date of such termination.
Disability and Incentive Stock Options
 
8. .
Restricted Stock Awards
 
(a) The Administrator will determine to whom an offer will be made, the number of Shares the person may purchase, the purchase price, the restrictions placed on the Shares and all other terms and conditions of the Restricted Stock Award.
 
(b) All purchases under a Restricted Stock Award will be evidenced by an Award Agreement, which will be in substantially a form (which need not be the same for each Participant) that the Administrator has from time to time approved, and will comply with and be subject to the terms and conditions of the Plan. A Participant accepts a Restricted Stock Award by signing and delivering to the Company (manually or through electronic means as permitted by applicable law) an Award Agreement with full payment of the purchase price within the time allotted by the Administrator (thirty (30) days when no time is stated) from the date the Award Agreement was delivered to the Participant. If the Participant does not accept the Restricted Stock Award within the allotted time, then the offer of the Restricted Stock Award will terminate, unless the Administrator determines otherwise. The Award Agreement, Plan and other documents may be delivered in any manner (including electronic distribution or posting) that meets applicable legal requirements.
 
(c) The purchase price for a Restricted Stock Award will be determined by the Administrator and, may be less than Fair Market Value (but not less than the par value of the Shares) on the date the Restricted Stock Award is granted. Payment of the purchase price must be made in accordance with the Award Agreement, Section 12 of the Plan and any additional procedures established by the Company.
 
(d) Restrictions may be based on completion of a specified period of service with the Company or upon completion of the performance goals based on Performance Factors during any Performance Period as set out in advance in the Award Agreement. Prior to the grant of a Restricted Stock Award, the Administrator shall: (i) determine the nature, length and starting date of any Performance Period for the Restricted Stock Award; (ii) select from among the
 
Performance Factors to be used to measure performance goals, if any; and (iii) determine the number of Shares that may be awarded. Performance Periods under different Restricted Stock Awards held by the same Participant may overlap and may have different Performance Factors and other criteria. Except as may be set forth in the Award Agreement, or otherwise determined by the Administrator, all Restricted Stock Awards held by a Participant will cease to vest upon such Participant ceasing to be a Service Provider.
 
9. .
Stock Bonus Awards
 
(a) All Stock Bonus Awards shall be made pursuant to an Award Agreement, which shall be in substantially a form (which need not be the same for each Participant) that the Administrator has from time to time approved, and will comply with and be subject to the terms and conditions of the Plan. No payment will be required for Shares awarded pursuant to a Stock Bonus Award.
 
(b) The Administrator will determine the number of Shares to be awarded under a Stock Bonus Award and any restrictions thereon. These restrictions may be based upon completion of a specified period of service with the Company or upon satisfaction of performance goals based on Performance Factors during any Performance Period as set out in advance in the Award Agreement. If the Stock Bonus Award is to be earned upon the satisfaction of performance goals, the Administrator shall: (i) determine the nature, length and starting date of any Performance Period for the Stock Bonus Award; (ii) select from among the Performance Factors to be used to measure performance goals; and (iii) determine the number of Shares that may be awarded. Prior to the issuance of any Shares or other payment pursuant to a Stock Bonus Award, the Administrator will determine the extent to which the Stock Bonus Award has been earned. Performance Periods of different Stock Bonus Awards held by the same Participant may overlap and be subject to different Performance Factors and other criteria. The number of Shares may be fixed or may vary in accordance with such performance goals and criteria as may be determined by the Administrator. The Administrator may adjust the performance goals applicable to a Stock Bonus Award to take into account changes in law and accounting or tax rules and to make such adjustments as the Administrator deems necessary or appropriate to reflect the impact of extraordinary or unusual items, events or circumstances to avoid windfalls or hardships.
 
(c) The Stock Bonus Award shall be paid currently. Payment may be made in the form of cash, whole Shares, or a combination thereof, based on the Fair Market Value of the Shares earned under a Stock Bonus Award on the date of payment, and in either a lump sum payment or in installments, all as the Administrator determines. Except as set forth in the Award Agreement, or otherwise determined by the Administrator, all Stock Bonus Awards held by a Participant will cease to vest upon such Participant ceasing to be a Service Provider.
 
10. .
Stock Appreciation Rights
 
(a) Each SAR may be granted for services to be rendered or for past services already rendered to the Company, or any Parent or Subsidiary of the Company. All SARs shall be made pursuant to an Award Agreement, which shall be in substantially a form (which need not be the same for each Participant) that the Administrator has from time to time approved, and will comply with and be subject to the terms and conditions of this Plan.
 
(b) The Administrator will determine the terms of a SAR including, without limitation: (i) the number of Shares deemed subject to the SAR; (ii) the exercise price (which may not be less than the Fair Market Value on the date of grant); (iii) the time or times during which the SAR may be settled (which may not extend more than ten (10) years from the date of grant); (iv) the consideration to be distributed on settlement of the SAR; and (v) the effect on each SAR of termination as a Service Provider. A SAR may be awarded upon satisfaction of such performance goals based on Performance Factors during any Performance Period as are set out in advance in the Award Agreement. If the SAR is being earned upon the satisfaction of performance goals, then the Administrator will: (a) determine the nature, length and starting date of any Performance Period for each SAR; and (b) select from among the Performance Factors to be used to measure the performance, if any. Prior to settlement of any SAR earned upon the satisfaction of performance goals pursuant to an Award Agreement, the Administrator shall determine the extent to which such SAR has been earned. Performance Periods may overlap and different SARs held by the same Participant may be subject to different performance goals and other criteria. The Award Agreement, Plan and other documents may be delivered in any manner (including electronic distribution or posting) that meets applicable legal requirements.
 
(c) Except as may be set forth in the Award Agreement, or otherwise determined by the Administrator, each SAR held by a Participant will cease to vest upon such Participant ceasing to be a Service Provider. To the extent a SAR is not exercised within the time specified by the Administrator, or as set forth in the Award Agreement, such SAR shall terminate at the end of such time.
 
(d) The portion of a SAR being settled shall be paid currently. Payment may be made in the form of cash or whole Shares or a combination thereof, either in a lump sum payment or in installments, all as the Administrator determines.
 
11. .
Restricted Stock Units
 
(a) All RSUs shall be evidenced by an Award Agreement, which shall be in substantially a form (which need not be the same for each Participant) that the Administrator has from time to time approved, and will comply with and be subject to the terms and conditions of the Plan.
 
(b) The Administrator will determine the terms of each RSU including, without limitation: (i) the number of Shares deemed subject to the RSU; (ii) the time or times during which the RSU may be exercised; (iii) the consideration to be distributed on settlement, and the effect on each RSU of the Participant's Termination. A RSU may be awarded upon satisfaction of such performance goals based on Performance Factors during any Performance Period as are set out in advance in the Participant's individual Award Agreement. If the RSU is being earned upon satisfaction of performance goals, then the Administrator will: (a) determine the nature, length and starting date of any Performance Period for the RSU; (b) select from among the Performance Factors to be used to measure the performance, if any; and (c) determine the number of Shares deemed subject to the RSU. Performance Periods may overlap and each
 
Participant may simultaneously hold RSUs that are subject to different Performance Periods and different Performance Factors and other criteria. The number of Shares may be fixed or may vary in accordance with such performance goals and criteria as may be determined by the Administrator. The Administrator may adjust the performance goals applicable to the RSUs to take into account changes in law and accounting and to make such adjustments as the Administrator deems necessary or appropriate to reflect the impact of extraordinary or unusual items, events or circumstances to avoid windfalls or hardships.
 
(c) Except as may be set forth in the Award Agreement, or otherwise determined by the Administrator, all RSUs held by a Participant will cease to vest upon such Participant ceasing to be a Service Provider.
 
(d) The portion of a RSU being settled shall be paid currently. To the extent permissible under law, the Administrator may also permit a Participant to defer payment under a RSU to a date or dates after the RSU is earned, provided that the terms of the RSU and any deferral satisfy the requirements of Section 409A of the Code (or any successor) and any regulations or rulings promulgated thereunder. Payment may be made in the form of cash or whole Shares or a combination thereof, either in a lump sum payment or in installments, all as the Administrator determines.
 
12. .
Consideration and Issuance of Shares
 
(a) . The consideration to be paid for the Shares to be issued under an Award, including the method of payment, shall be determined by the Administrator (and, in the case of an Incentive Stock Option, shall be determined at the time of grant). In making its determination as to the type of consideration to accept, the Administrator shall consider if acceptance of such consideration may be reasonably expected to benefit the Company. Such consideration may consist of:
Permitted Consideration
 
(i) cash,
 
(ii) check,
 
(iii) promissory note,
 
(iv) consideration received by the Company under a cashless exercise program implemented by the Company in connection with the Plan,
 
(v) prior services provided to the Company or any Parent or Subsidiary of the Company as determined by the Administrator (provided the par value of the Shares shall always be paid in cash),
 
(vi) any combination of the foregoing methods of payment, or
 
(vii) such other consideration and method of payment for the issuance of Shares to the extent permitted by Applicable Laws.
 
(b) . Shares subject to any Award granted hereunder shall be issuable according to the terms hereof at such times and under such conditions as determined by the Administrator set forth in the Award Agreement. No fraction of a Share shall be issued under any Award. Until the Shares are issued (as evidenced by the appropriate entry on the books of the Company or of a duly authorized transfer agent of the Company), no right to vote or receive dividends or any other rights as a stockholder of the Company shall exist and after Shares are issued any rights to dividends are subject to the same restrictions applicable to the Shares to which such dividend rights relate.
Procedure; Rights as a Stockholder
 
(c) . Unless the Administrator determines otherwise, vesting of Awards granted hereunder shall be tolled during any unpaid leave of absence.
Leave of Absence
 
(d) . Generally upon a Participant ceasing to be a Service Provider, the remaining period during which Shares may be issued under any Award shall be as specified in the applicable Award Agreement, or as otherwise determined by the Administrator, and such Award shall cover only Shares that are vested on the date of termination. In the absence of a specified time in the applicable Award Agreement, vested Shares may be issued under such Award during the three (3) months following termination (except that this period shall be twelve (12) months if termination is due to disability or death), but in no event later than the expiration of the term of such Award. Upon expiration of the specified time, then the Award shall terminate in full. With respect to unvested Shares issued under an Award (such as a Stock Bonus), on the Participant ceasing to be a Service Provider such unvested Shares shall return to the Company and the par value or other amount paid for such unvested Shares (other than the value of services rendered) shall be refunded to such Participant. If termination as a Service Provider is due to death, exercise may be by the executor of the estate or by a person entitled to exercise the Award under the will or the laws of descent or distribution.
Termination of Relationship as a Service Provider
 
(e) . The Administrator may at any time offer to buy out for a payment in cash or Shares, an Award previously granted, based on such terms and conditions as the Administrator shall establish and communicate to the holder of such Award at the time that such offer is made.
Buyout Provisions
 
. Awards may not be sold, pledged, assigned, hypothecated, transferred, or disposed of in any manner other than by will or by the laws of descent or distribution and may be exercised, during the lifetime of the Service Provider to whom they are granted, only by such Service Provider.
13.
Non-Transferability of Awards
 
14. .
Adjustments Upon Changes in Capitalization, Merger or Asset Sale
 
(a) . Subject to any required action by the Stockholders of the Company, the number of shares of Common Stock covered by each outstanding Award (but not yet issued under such Award), and the number of shares of Common Stock which have been authorized for issuance under the Plan but as to which no Awards have yet been granted, as well as the price per share of Common Stock covered by each such outstanding Award (except for the par value per Share if that is not required to be adjusted by Applicable Law), shall be proportionately adjusted for any increase or decrease in the number of
Changes in Capitalization
 
issued shares of Common Stock resulting from a stock split, reverse stock split, stock dividend, combination or reclassification of the Common Stock, or any other increase or decrease in the number of issued shares of Common Stock effected without receipt of consideration by the Company. The conversion of any convertible securities of the Company shall not be deemed to have been "effected without receipt of consideration." Such adjustment shall be made by the Board, whose determination in that respect shall be final, binding and conclusive. Except as expressly provided herein, no issuance by the Company of shares of stock of any class, or securities convertible into shares of stock of any class, shall affect, and no adjustment by reason thereof shall be made with respect to, the number or price of shares of Common Stock subject to an Award.
 
(b) . In the event of the proposed dissolution or liquidation of the Company, the Administrator shall notify each holder of an Award as soon as practicable prior to the effective date of such proposed transaction. The Administrator in its discretion may provide for any holder of an Award to have the right to exercise his or her Award until fifteen (15) days prior to such transaction as to all of the Shares covered thereby, including Shares as to which the Award would not otherwise be exercisable. In addition, the Administrator may provide that any Company repurchase right applicable to any Shares purchased upon exercise of an Award shall lapse as to all such Shares, provided the proposed dissolution or liquidation takes place at the time and in the manner contemplated. To the extent it has not been previously exercised, an Award will terminate immediately prior to the consummation of such proposed action.
Dissolution or Liquidation
 
(c) .
Merger or Asset Sale
 
(i) In the event of a merger of the Company with or into another corporation or the sale of all or substantially all of the assets of the Company pursuant to which the shareholders of the Company prior to such transaction hold less than 50% of the outstanding capital stock of the surviving corporation immediately after the closing of such transaction a "Change in Control Transaction") within four years after the date the Securities and Exchange Commission declares effective a registration statement filed by the Company for the initial public offering of the Company's Common Stock pursuant to the Securities Act (the "IPO Effective Time"), outstanding Awards may be assumed or equivalent awards may be substituted by the successor corporation or a Parent or Subsidiary thereof (the "Successor Corporation"). Following such assumption or substitution, if a Participant's service as an Employee or employee of the Successor Corporation, as applicable, is terminated within 12 months of the Change in Control Transaction other than upon a voluntary resignation by such Participant or the termination of employment of such Participant for cause, all Awards and/or awards, as applicable shall become fully vested (and exercisable, if applicable). Thereafter, each Award (or equivalent award) held by such Participant shall remain exercisable in accordance with subsection 12(d) above. If the Successor Corporation does not assume an outstanding Award or substitute for it an equivalent award, the Award shall become fully vested (and exercisable, if applicable). In such event the Board shall notify such Participant that Shares subject to such Award have fully vested and that such Award shall be fully exercisable for a period of fifteen (15) days from the date of such notice, and that upon the expiration of such period, such Award shall terminate.
 
(ii) In the event of a Change in Control Transaction after four years after the IPO Effective Time, at the Administrator's discretion, outstanding Awards may be assumed or equivalent awards may be substituted by the Successor Corporation. If the Successor Corporation does not assume an outstanding Award or substitute for it an equivalent award, the Award shall become fully vested (and exercisable, if applicable). In such event the Board shall notify such Participant that Shares subject to such Award have fully vested and, if applicable, shall be fully exercisable for a period of time specified by the Administrator, not to be less than fifteen (15) days from the date of such notice, and upon the expiration of such period, such Award shall terminate. At the Administrator's discretion, the Administrator may provide that following an assumption or substitution of equivalent awards, if a Participant's service as an Employee, or employee of the Successor Corporation, as applicable, is terminated within 12 months of the Change in Control Transaction other than upon a voluntary resignation by such Participant or the termination of such Participant for cause, the Awards (or equivalent awards) held by such Participant shall become fully vested (and exercisable, if applicable) and shall remain exercisable in accordance with subsection 12(d) above. Even when assumed or substituted, the Administrator has the discretion to terminate the Plan and permit Participants to exercise Awards to the extent already vested and the discretion to accelerate vesting (and exercisability if applicable) of any portion of, or all of, the then outstanding Options or other Awards.
 
(iii) In the event of the merger of the Company with or into another corporation or the sale of substantially all of the assets of the Company in a transaction that is not a Change in Control Transaction, each outstanding Award shall be assumed or an equivalent award shall be substituted by the Successor Corporation. In the event the Successor Corporation refuses to assume or substitute for an Award, such Award shall terminate upon the closing of such merger or sale of assets.
 
For the purposes of this Section 14(c), an Award shall be considered assumed if, following the merger or sale of assets, the Award confers the right to purchase or receive, for each Share subject to the Award immediately prior to the merger or sale of assets, the consideration (whether stock, cash, or other securities or property) received in the merger or sale of assets by holders of Common Stock for each Share held on the effective date of the transaction (and if holders were offered a choice of consideration, the type of consideration chosen by the holders of a majority of the outstanding Shares). If such consideration received in the merger or sale of assets is not solely common stock of the successor corporation or its Parent, the Administrator may, with the consent of the successor corporation, provide for the consideration to be received upon the exercise of the Award, for each Share subject to the Award, to be solely common stock of the successor corporation or its Parent equal in fair market value to the per share consideration received by holders of Common Stock in the merger or sale of assets.
 
15. .
Amendment and Termination of the Plan
 
(a) . The Board may at any time amend, alter, suspend or terminate the Plan.
Amendment and Termination
 
(b) . The Board shall obtain stockholder approval of any Plan amendment to the extent necessary and desirable to comply with Applicable Laws.
Stockholder Approval
 
(c) . No amendment, alteration, suspension or termination of the Plan shall impair the rights of any Optionee or other holder of an Award, unless mutually agreed otherwise between such person and the Administrator, which agreement must be in writing and signed by such person and the Company. Termination of the Plan shall not affect the Administrator's ability to exercise the powers granted to it hereunder with respect to Options granted under the Plan prior to the date of such termination.
Effect of Amendment or Termination
 
16. .
Conditions Upon Issuance of Shares
 
(a) . Shares shall not be issued pursuant to an Award unless in compliance with Applicable Laws and shall be further subject to the approval of counsel for the Company with respect to such compliance.
Legal Compliance
 
(b) . As a condition to the exercise of an Award, the Administrator may require the person exercising such Award to represent and warrant at the time of any such exercise that the Shares are being purchased only for investment and without any present intention to sell or distribute such Shares if, in the opinion of counsel for the Company, such a representation is required.
Investment Representations
 
The inability of the Company to obtain authority from any regulatory body having jurisdiction, which authority is deemed by the Company's counsel to be necessary to the lawful issuance and sale of any Shares hereunder, shall relieve the Company of any liability in respect of the failure to issue or sell Shares as to which such requisite authority shall not have been obtained.
17. .
Inability to Obtain Authority
 
The Company, during the term of this Plan, shall at all times reserve and keep available such number of Shares as shall be sufficient to satisfy the requirements of the Plan.
18. .
Reservation of Shares
 
The Plan shall be subject to approval by the stockholders of the Company within twelve (12) months after the date the Plan is adopted. Such stockholder approval shall be obtained in the degree and manner required under Applicable Laws.
19. .
Stockholder Approval
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BABY/BABY-8K-20050728060918.txt.gz
TIME:20050728060918
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION Washington, D.C. 20549 FORM 8-K CURRENT REPORT Pursuant to Section 13 OR 15(d) of The Securities Exchange Act of 1934 Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported) July 28, 2005 Natus Medical Incorporated - -------------------------------------------------------------------------------- (Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter) Delaware 000-33001 77-0154833 - ----------------------------- -------------- ------------------- (State or other jurisdiction (Commission (IRS Employer of incorporation) File Number) Identification No.) 1501 Industrial Road, San Carlos, California 94070 - -------------------------------------------------------------------------------- (Address of principal executive offices) (Zip Code) Registrant's telephone number, including area code: (650) 802-0400 ----------------------------- Not applicable - -------------------------------------------------------------------------------- (Former name or former address, if changed since last report) Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below): [ ] Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [ ] Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [ ] Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [ ] Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
================================================================================ ITEM 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition. On July 28, 2005, Natus Medical Incorporated (the "Company") is issuing a press release and holding a conference call regarding its financial results for the second quarter of fiscal 2005 ended June 30, 2005 and other financial information. A copy of the press release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 to this Form 8-K. The information in this Form 8-K and the exhibit attached hereto shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act") or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that Section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing. ITEM 9.01. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS, PRO FORMA FINANCIAL INFORMATION AND EXHIBITS. (c) Exhibits. Exhibit No. Description ----------- ----------- 99.1 Press release of Natus Medical Incorporated dated July 28, 2005 describing the Company's results for its second fiscal quarter ended June 30, 2005 and other financial information. ================================================================================
SIGNATURES Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized. NATUS MEDICAL INCORPORATED Date: July 28, 2005 By: /s/ Steven J. Murphy ----------------------- Steven J. Murphy Vice President, Finance
Index to Exhibits Exhibit No. Description ----------- ----------- 99.1 Press release of Natus Medical Incorporated dated July 28, 2005 describing the Company's results for its second fiscal quarter ended June 30, 2005 and other financial information.

Exhibit 99.1 Natus Medical Reports Record Second Quarter Revenue and Earnings; Company Increases 2005 Earnings Guidance SAN CARLOS, Calif.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--July 28, 2005--Natus Medical Incorporated (Nasdaq:BABY) today announced financial results for the three and six months ended June 30, 2005. Natus reported revenue of $10.2 million for the quarter ended June 30, 2005, an increase of $1.8 million or 21% from $8.4 million in the comparable quarter of the previous year. The Company reported net income of $1.3 million, or $0.07 per diluted share, for the second quarter of 2005, compared with a net loss of $3.6 million, or ($0.22) loss per share, for the comparable period in 2004. For the first half of 2005, revenue increased 17% to $19.9 million, from $17.0 million reported in the first half of 2004. Net income for the six months ended June 30, 2005 was $2.2 million, or $0.12 per diluted share, compared to a loss of $4.1 million, or ($0.24) loss per share reported in 2004. Gross margin improved to 61.5% for the three months ended June 30, 2005, compared with 55.4% for the second quarter of 2004. The gross margin for the 2005 period was favorably impacted by reductions in materials costs and the contribution of Fischer-Zoth. For the three months ended June 30, 2005, total operating expenses decreased by $2.5 million, or approximately 33%, to $5.1 million, compared with $7.6 million for the second quarter of 2004. Operating expenses in the second quarter 2004 included $1.6 million of one-time charges; absent those charges the net reduction in operating expenses in the 2005 period was $868,000. As of June 30, 2005, the Company reported cash, cash equivalents and short-term investments of $39.9 million, representing an increase of approximately $4.1 million from the corresponding amount at December 31, 2004. Additionally, the Company reported stockholders' equity of $54.8 million and working capital of $43.5 million as of June 30, 2005. "We are extremely pleased with our results for the second quarter," said Jim Hawkins, President and Chief Executive Officer of Natus Medical. "On a comparable basis, we reduced our year-over-year operating expenses by fifteen percent, while at the same time we saw double-digit top line revenue growth coupled with improving margins. "We continue to benefit from our acquisition of Fischer-Zoth, which was completed in September 2004. Sales of Fischer-Zoth products have exceeded our expectations and have contributed to our improving margins," Hawkins added. Financial Guidance Natus updated financial guidance for 2005. The Company expects to report earnings per diluted share of $0.30 to $0.33 on revenue of $41.6 to $43.0 million in 2005. This compares to a loss per share of $0.14 on revenue of $36.5 million reported for 2004. Natus had previously said it expected to earn $0.28 to $0.31 per diluted share in 2005 on revenue of $41 to $43 million. The Company also updated its guidance for the third and fourth quarters of 2005. For the third quarter of 2005, the Company expects to report diluted earnings per share of $0.07 to $0.09, on revenue of $10.3 to $10.6 million. The Company had previously said it expected to earn $0.07 to $0.08 per diluted share on revenue of $10.2 to $10.4 million. For the fourth quarter 2005, the Company expects to report diluted earnings per share of $0.11 to $0.12, on revenue of $11.4 to $12.5 million. The Company had previously said it expected to earn the same per-share amounts on revenue of $11.3 to $12.9 million. The estimates of earnings per diluted share do not include the impact of expensing employee stock options. The SEC has delayed the effective date for adopting Financial Accounting Standards Board Statement No. 123R, "Share-Based Payment." The Company will be required to begin expensing employee stock options in its first quarterly period in 2006. Conference Call Natus has scheduled an investor conference call to discuss this announcement beginning at 11:00 a.m. Eastern Time today. Individuals interested in listening to the conference call may do so by dialing (866) 831-6162 for domestic callers, or (617) 213-8852 for international callers, and entering reservation code 19239489. A telephone replay will be available for 48 hours following the conclusion of the call by dialing (888) 286-8010 for domestic callers, or (617) 801-6888 for international callers, and entering reservation code 20281994. The conference call also will be available real-time via the Internet at http://investor.natus.com, and a recording of the call will be available on the Company's Web site for 90 days following the completion of the call. About Natus Medical Natus develops, manufactures, and markets products for the detection, treatment, monitoring, and tracking of common disorders in newborns. Natus products are marketed under well-recognized brand names such as ALGO(R), Neometrics(TM), Echo-Screen(R), and neoBLUE(TM). Headquartered in San Carlos, California, Natus markets and sells its products worldwide through a direct sales force in the U.S. and the U.K., and through distributors in over 50 other countries. Additional information about Natus Medical can be found at www.natus.com. This press release contains forward-looking statements as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, particularly statements regarding the expectations, beliefs, plans, intentions and strategies of Natus. These forward-looking statements include, but are not limited to, statements regarding anticipated revenue and profitability for the full-year 2005 as well as for the third and fourth quarters of 2005, and expectations regarding future growth and profitability. These statements relate to future events or Natus' future financial performance or results, and involve known and unknown risks, uncertainties and other factors that may cause actual results, levels of activity, performance, or achievements to differ materially from those expressed or implied by the forward-looking statements. Forward-looking statements are only predictions and the actual events or results may differ materially. Natus cannot provide any assurance that its future results or the results implied by the forward-looking statements will meet expectations. Our future results could differ materially due to a number of factors, including the effects of competition, the demand for our products and services, our ability to expand our sales in international markets, our ability to maintain current sales levels in a mature domestic market, our ability to control costs, and risks associated with bringing new products to market and integrating acquired businesses. Natus disclaims any obligation to update information contained in any forward-looking statement. More information about potential risk factors that could affect the business and financial results of Natus is included in Natus' annual report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2004, and its quarterly reports on Form 10-Q, and in other reports filed from time to time by Natus with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission. NATUS MEDICAL INCORPORATED AND SUBSIDIARIES UNAUDITED CONDENSED CONSOLIDATED BALANCE SHEETS (in thousands, except share amounts) June 30, December 31, 2005 2004 ASSETS Current assets: Cash and equivalents $ 27,183 $ 16,239 Short-term investments 12,687 19,504 Accounts receivable, net of allowance for doubtful accounts of $452 in 2005 and $472 in 2004 4,990 6,640 Inventories 3,717 4,347 Prepaid expenses and other current assets 520 625 Total current assets 49,097 47,355 Property and equipment, net 2,348 2,503 Goodwill, intangibles, and other assets 9,045 9,399 Total assets $ 60,490 $ 59,257 LIABILITIES AND STOCKHOLDERS' EQUITY Liabilities: Accounts payable $ 1,344 $ 1,947 Accrued liabilities 4,056 4,303 Deferred revenues 229 279 Total liabilities 5,629 6,529 Commitments and contingencies Stockholders' equity: Common stock, $0.001 par value, 120,000,000 shares authorized; shares issued and outstanding: 17,261,048,in 2005 and 17,140,339 in 2004 89,944 89,373 Accumulated deficit (34,728) (36,902) Accumulated other comprehensive income (355) 257 Total stockholders' equity 54,861 52,728 Total liabilities and stockholders' equity $ 60,490 $ 59,257 NATUS MEDICAL INCORPORATED AND SUBSIDIARIES UNAUDITED CONDENSED CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF OPERATIONS (in thousands, except per share amounts) Three Months Ended Six Months Ended June June June June 2005 2004 2005 2004 Revenue $ 10,168 $ 8,398 $19,870 $16,969 Cost of revenue 3,919 3,748 7,790 7,506 Gross profit 6,249 4,650 12,080 9,463 Operating expenses: Marketing and selling 2,834 3,110 5,439 6,081 Research and development 1,078 1,072 2,070 1,978 General and administrative 1,187 2,655 2,551 4,024 Restructuring cost - 776 - 776 Total operating expenses 5,099 7,613 10,060 12,859 Income (loss) from operations 1,150 (2,963) 2,020 (3,396) Other income/(expense): Interest income 253 99 436 196 Interest expense - - - (3) Other income, net 23 (177) 32 (101) Total other income/(expense) 276 (78) 468 92 Income (loss) before provision for income tax 1,426 (3,041) 2,488 (3,304) Provision for income tax 162 - 315 1 Income (loss) from continuing operations 1,264 (3,041) 2,173 (3,305) Discontinued operations - (584) - (767) Net income (loss) $ 1,264 $(3,625) $ 2,173 $(4,072) Earnings (loss) per share: Basic: Continuing operations $ 0.07 $ (0.18) $ 0.13 $ (0.20) Discontinued operations $ - $ (0.04) $ - $ (0.05) Net income (loss) $ 0.07 $ (0.22) $ 0.13 $ (0.24) Diluted: Continuing operations $ 0.07 $(0.18) $0.12 $(0.20) Discontinued operations $ - $(0.04) $ - $(0.05) Net income (loss) $ 0.07 $(0.22) $0.12 $(0.24) Weighted-average shares used to compute Basic earnings per share 17,376 16,638 17,267 16,673 Diluted earnings per share 18,912 16,638 18,646 16,673 CONTACT: Natus Medical Incorporated Steven J. Murphy, 650-802-0400 InvestorRelations@Natus.com


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BABY/BABY-8K-20050819161701.txt.gz
TIME:20050819161701
EVENTS:	Changes in Registrant.s Certifying Accountant	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Changes in Registrant.s Certifying Accountant
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
 
 
 
 
On August 15, 2005, the Audit Committee of the Board of Directors of the Company dismissed BDO Seidman, LLP as the Company's independent registered public accounting firm.
 
The reports of BDO Seidman, LLP on the Company's consolidated financial statements for each of the years ended December 31, 2004 and 2003 did not contain an adverse opinion or disclaimer of opinion, nor were they qualified or modified as to uncertainty, audit scope, or accounting principle.
 
During the years ended December 31, 2004 and 2003, and the subsequent interim period through August 15, 2005, there were no disagreements between the Company and BDO Seidman, LLP on any matter of accounting principles or practices, financial statement disclosure, or auditing scope or procedure, which disagreements, if not resolved to the satisfaction of BDO Seidman, LLP, would have caused them to make reference to the subject matter of the disagreement in connection with their reports on the financial statements of the Company for such years.
 
None of the reportable events described in Item 304(a)(1)(v) of Regulation S-K occurred during the years ended December 31, 2004 and 2003 or during the subsequent interim period through August 15, 2005.
 
The Company has provided BDO Seidman, LLP with a copy of the foregoing disclosures. Attached as Exhibit 16.1 is a letter from BDO Seidman, LLP, dated August 16, 2005, stating whether they agree or disagree with such statements.
 
The Company has identified new auditors and expects to appoint them within the next week, subject to the new independent registered public accounting firm completing their internal client acceptance process.
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 

E 16.1
XHIBIT
 
August 16, 2005
 
Securities and Exchange Commission
450 5th Street N.W.
Washington, D.C. 20549
 
We have been furnished with a copy of the response to Item 4.01 of Form 8-K for the event that occurred on August 15, 2005, to be filed by our former client, Natus Medical Incorporated. We agree with the statements made in response to that Item insofar as they relate to our Firm.
 
Very truly yours,
 
/s/ BDO Seidman, LLP


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BABY/BABY-8K-20050825142029.txt.gz
TIME:20050825142029
EVENTS:	Changes in Registrant.s Certifying Accountant	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Changes in Registrant.s Certifying Accountant
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
 
 
 
ITEM 4.01 CHANGES IN REGISTRANT'S CERTIFYING ACCOUNTANT.
 
On August 19, 2005 the Audit Committee of the Board of Directors of Natus Medical Incorporated appointed Deloitte & Touche LLP as the Company's new independent registered public accounting firm.
 
During the years ended December 31, 2004 and 2003, and the subsequent interim period through August 19, 2005, the Company did not consult with Deloitte & Touche LLP regarding any of the matters or events set forth in Item 304(a)(2)(i) of Regulation S-K, except that Deloitte and Touche LLP acted as the Company's independent registered public accounting firm for the unaudited interim financial statements of the Company for the three months ended March 31, 2003, and the three and six months ended June 30, 2003 and in that capacity Deloitte & Touche LLP discussed the application of accounting principles with the Company.
 
During the years ended December 31, 2004 and 2003, and the subsequent interim period through August 19, 2005, the Company did not consult with Deloitte & Touche LLP on any of the matters or events set forth in Item 304(a)(2)(ii) of Regulation S-K.
 
The Company has provided Deloitte & Touche LLP with a copy of the foregoing disclosures. Attached as Exhibit 16.1 is a letter from Deloitte & Touche LLP, dated August 24, 2005, stating whether they agree or disagree with such statements.
 
Attached as Exhibit 99.1 is a copy of the press release issued by the Company on August 19, 2005 announcing the appointment of Deloitte & Touche LLP as the Company's new independent registered accounting firm.
ITEM 9.01. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND EXHIBITS.
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 

E 16.1
XHIBIT
 
August 24, 2005
 
Securities and Exchange Commission
100 F Street, N.E.
Washington, D.C. 20549-7561
 
Dear Sirs/Madams:
 
We have read Item 4 of Natus Medical Incorporated's Form 8-K dated August 19, 2005, and have the following comments:
 
 
 
Very truly,
 
/s/ Deloitte & Touche LLP

E 99.1
XHIBIT
 
 
(Nasdaq: BABY) today announced that it has appointed Deloitte & Touche LLP as its new independent registered public accounting firm, replacing BDO Seidman, LLP. The decision to change auditors was made by the Company's audit committee.
SAN CARLOS, Calif. (August 19, 2005)  Natus Medical Incorporated
 
Deloitte & Touche LLP had previously served for 10 years as the Company's auditors until, in September 2003, the Company decided to change auditors solely because the Company believed it might assist the consulting arm of Deloitte on a project awarded to Deloitte by a state agency. However, the Company ultimately did not provide services to Deloitte Consulting and a potential independence issue never arose.
 
During the years ended December 31, 2004 and 2003, and the subsequent interim period through August 15, 2005, there were no disagreements between the Company and BDO Seidman, LLP on any matter of accounting principles or practices, financial statement disclosure, or auditing scope or procedure, which disagreements, if not resolved to the satisfaction of BDO Seidman, LLP, would have caused them to make reference to the subject matter of the disagreement in connection with their reports on the financial statements of the Company for such years.
 
About Natus Medical
 
Natus develops, manufactures, and markets products for the detection, treatment, monitoring, and tracking of common disorders in newborns. Natus products are marketed under well-recognized brand names such as ALGO(R), Neometrics(TM), Echo-Screen(R), and neoBLUE(R). Headquartered in San Carlos, California, Natus markets and sells its products worldwide through a direct sales force in the U.S. and the U.K., and through distributors in over 50 other countries. Additional information about Natus Medical can be found at www.natus.com.
 
COMPANY CONTACT:
 
Natus Medical Incorporated
Steven J. Murphy
Vice President Finance
(650) 802-0400
InvestorRelations@Natus.com


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BABY/BABY-8K-20051019151245.txt.gz
TIME:20051019151245
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Unregistered Sales of Equity Securities	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Unregistered Sales of Equity Securities
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
Item 1.01. Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement.
 
On October 16, 2005, Natus Medical Incorporated (the "Company"), Bio-logic Systems Corp. ("Bio-logic") and Summer Acquisition Corporation, a wholly-owned subsidiary of the Company ("Merger Sub"), entered into an Agreement and Plan of Merger (the "Merger Agreement"), a copy of which is attached to this Current Report on Form 8-K as Exhibit 10.1, pursuant to which Merger Sub is to merge with and into Bio-logic with Bio-logic surviving and becoming a wholly-owned subsidiary of the Company (the "Merger"). This description of the Merger Agreement and the Merger does not purport to be complete and is qualified in its entirety by reference to the Merger Agreement, a copy of which is attached to this Current Report on Form 8-K as Exhibit 10.1.
 
Directors (including directors who are executive officers), and certain related stockholders, of Bio-logic have entered into voting agreements with the Company and Bio-logic (the "Voting Agreements"), the form of which is attached to the Merger Agreement, pursuant to which they have agreed to vote the shares of Bio-logic common stock they own or control in favor of the Merger.
 
Pursuant to the Merger Agreement, each outstanding share of Bio-logic common stock will convert into the right to receive $8.77 in cash. Each outstanding option to acquire Bio-logic common stock will be cancelled, with the holder of the option receiving, for each share covered by the option, an amount equal to the excess (if any) of $8.77 over the exercise price per share of the option. The Merger is conditioned upon, among other things, approval by Bio-logic's stockholders and other customary conditions. The Company currently expects that the Merger will be consummated in early January 2006.
 
On October 17, 2005, the Company and Bio-logic issued a joint press release relating to the Merger, a copy of which is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1. The information contained in the press release is incorporated herein by reference.
 
It is expected that Bio-logic will file with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the "SEC") a proxy statement and other relevant materials in connection with the Merger. The proxy statement will be sent to the stockholders of Bio-logic. Before making any voting or investment decision with respect to the Merger, investors and stockholders of Bio-logic are urged to read the proxy statement and any other relevant materials filed with the SEC, when they become available, because they will contain important information about the Merger. The proxy statement and other relevant materials (when they become available), and any other documents filed by Bio-logic with the SEC, may be obtained free of charge at the SEC's web site at <www.sec.gov>. In addition, investors and stockholders of Bio-logic may obtain free copies of the documents filed with the SEC by contacting Bio-logic at 847-949-5200. You may also read and copy any reports, statements and other information filed by Bio-logic at the SEC's public reference room at 100 F Street, NE, Washington, D.C. 20549. Please call the SEC at 1-800-SEC-0330 for further information on the public reference room.
 
Bio-logic and its respective executive officers and directors may be deemed to be participants in the solicitation of proxies from Bio-logic's stockholders in favor of the merger. Certain executive officers and directors of Bio-logic have interests in the merger, including retention bonuses, severance arrangements and their ownership of Bio-logic common stock and options to acquire common stock (including acceleration of restricted stock and options), and their interests will be described in the proxy statement when it becomes available.
 
The Company and its executive officers and directors may be deemed to be participating in the solicitation of proxies from Bio-logic's stockholders in favor of the approval of the merger. Information concerning the Company's directors and executive officers is set forth in the Company's proxy statements for its 2005 annual
meeting of stockholders, which was filed with the SEC on April 15, 2005, and annual report on Form 10-K filed with the SEC for its fiscal year ended December 31, 2004. These documents are available free of charge at the SEC's web site at www.sec.gov or by going to the Company's Investors page on its corporate website at <www.natus.com>.
 
Item 3.02. Unregistered Sales of Equity Securities.
 
In anticipation of this merger, the Company has entered into a Common Stock Purchase Agreement with the D3 Family Funds, a current holder of the Company's common stock, wherein the Company agreed to sell 600,000 shares of the Company's common stock in a private placement to the D3 Family Funds for $11.88 per share, the then current trading price for the shares at the time that the Company and the D3 Family Funds agreed in principle to such sale. The Company granted certain piggyback registration rights in connection with the 600,000 shares issued in the private placement. The Company completed this sale on October 18, 2005. A copy of the Common Stock Purchase Agreement is attached as Exhibit 10.2.
 
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
The following exhibits are filed herewith:
(c) Exhibits.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
EXHIBIT INDEX
 

Exhibit 10.1
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
AGREEMENT AND PLAN OF MERGER, dated as of October 16, 2005 (this ""), among Natus Medical Incorporated, a Delaware corporation (""), Summer Acquisition Corporation, a Delaware corporation and a wholly owned subsidiary of Parent (""), and Bio-logic Systems Corp., a Delaware corporation (the "").
Agreement
Parent
Merger Sub
Company
 
A. The parties intend that, subject to the terms and conditions hereinafter set forth, Merger Sub shall merge with and into the Company (the ""), with the Company to be the surviving corporation of the Merger (the ""), on the terms and subject to the conditions of this Agreement and pursuant to the General Corporation Law of the State of Delaware (the "").
Merger
Surviving Corporation
DGCL
 
B. The Boards of Directors of both of Parent and Merger Sub and the Board of Directors of the Company (the "") have determined that the Merger is in the best interests of their respective companies and stockholders and have approved and declared advisable this Agreement and the transactions contemplated hereby. The Board of Directors of the Company has determined, subject to the terms and conditions of this Agreement, to recommend to the Company stockholders the approval of this Agreement and the Merger.
Board
 
C. Concurrently with the execution and delivery of this Agreement, and as a material inducement to Parent's willingness to enter into this Agreement, each stockholder of the Company listed on is executing and delivering to Parent a Voting Agreement substantially in the form attached hereto as (each, a "") under which such stockholder agrees to vote all shares of the Company's capital stock beneficially owned by it, and over which such stockholder has voting power, in favor of this Agreement and the transactions contemplated hereby and to give Parent a proxy to do the same.
Exhibit A-1
Exhibit A-2
Voting Agreement
 
D. Parent, Merger Sub and the Company desire to make certain representations, warranties, covenants and agreements in connection with the Merger and to prescribe various conditions to the Merger.
 
NOW, THEREFORE, in consideration of the foregoing and the mutual covenants and agreements herein contained, and intending to be legally bound hereby, Parent, Merger Sub and the Company hereby agree as follows:
 
 
 
SECTION 1.01 .
Definitions
 
(a) For purposes of this Agreement:
 
"" of a specified person means a person who, directly or indirectly through one or more intermediaries, controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with, such specified person.
affiliate
 
"", with respect to any Shares, has the meaning ascribed to such term under Rule 13d-3(a) under the Exchange Act.
beneficial owner
"" means any day on which the principal offices of the SEC in Washington, D.C. are open to accept filings, or, in the case of determining a date when any payment is due, any day (other than a Saturday or Sunday) on which banks are not required or authorized to close in the City of New York.
business day
 
"" means all IT Systems used in the business of the Company or any Subsidiary.
Company IT Systems
 
"" means any of the following (other than the Merger): (i) any merger, consolidation, share exchange, business combination, recapitalization, liquidation, dissolution or other similar transaction involving the Company or any Subsidiary; (ii) any sale, lease, exchange, transfer or other disposition of all or a substantial part of the assets of the Company or of any of the Subsidiaries, other than in the ordinary course of business; (iii) any sale, exchange, transfer or other disposition of 16% or more of any class of equity securities of the Company or of any of the Subsidiaries; (iv) any tender offer or exchange offer that, if consummated, would result in any person beneficially owning 16% or more of any class of equity securities of the Company or of any of the Subsidiaries; (v) any solicitation in opposition to the adoption of this Agreement by the Company's stockholders; or (vi) any other transaction the consummation of which would reasonably be expected to impede, interfere with, prevent or materially delay the Merger.
Competing Transaction
 
"" (including the terms "" and "under "") means the possession, directly or indirectly, or as trustee or executor, of the power to direct or cause the direction of the management and policies of a person, whether through the ownership of voting securities, as trustee or executor, by contract or credit arrangement or otherwise;
control
controlled by
common control with
 
"" means any United States federal, state, local or non United States laws, statutes, ordinances, regulations, rules, codes, orders, other requirements of law and common law relating to (i) releases or threatened releases of Hazardous Substances or materials containing Hazardous Substances; (ii) exposure or alleged exposure to Hazardous Substances; (iii) the manufacture, handling, transport, recycling, reclamation, use, treatment, storage or disposal of Hazardous Substances or materials containing Hazardous Substances; or (iv) pollution, natural resource damages or protection of the environment, health or safety.
Environmental Laws
 
"" means any trade or business (whether or not incorporated) under common control with the Company or any Subsidiary and which, together with the Company or any Subsidiary, is treated as a single employer within the meaning of Section 414(b), (c), (m) or (o) of the Code.
ERISA Affiliate
 
"" means (i) those substances defined in or regulated under the following United States federal statutes and their state and local counterparts, as each may be amended from time to time, and all regulations thereunder: the Hazardous Materials Transportation Act, the Resource Conservation and Recovery Act, the Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation and Liability Act, the Clean Water Act, the Safe Drinking Water Act, the Atomic Energy Act, the Federal Insecticide, Fungicide, and Rodenticide Act and the Clean Air Act; (ii) petroleum and petroleum products, including crude oil and any fractions thereof; (iii) natural gas, synthetic gas, and any mixtures thereof; (iv) polychlorinated biphenyls, asbestos, mold and radon; and (v) any other contaminant, substance, material or waste regulated by any Governmental Authority pursuant to any Environmental Law.
Hazardous Substances
 
"" means the following laws or regulations relating to the regulation of the healthcare industry (as such laws are currently enforced or as interpreted at the Effective Time by existing, publicly available judicial and administrative decisions and regulations): (i) Sections 1877, 1128, 1128A or 1128B of the Social Security Act (the ""); (ii) the licensure, certification or registration requirements of healthcare facilities, services or equipment; (iii) any state certificate of need or similar law governing the establishment of healthcare facilities or services or the making of healthcare capital expenditures; (iv) any state law relating to fee-splitting or the corporate practice of medicine; (v) any state physician self-referral prohibition or state anti-kickback law; (vi) any criminal offense relating to the delivery of, or claim for payment for, a healthcare item or service under any federal or state healthcare program; and (vii) any federal or state law relating to the interference with or obstruction of any investigation into any criminal offense.
Healthcare Law
SSA
 
"" means, collectively, all of the following worldwide legal rights, whether or not filed, perfected, registered or recorded, that may exist under the laws of any jurisdiction to and under all: (i) patents, patent applications, statutory invention registrations, patent rights, including all continuations, continuations-in-part, divisions, reissues, reexaminations or extensions thereof, whether now existing or hereafter filed, issues or acquired, and all inventions, whether or not patentable (ii) trademarks, service marks, domain names, (including, but not limited to Internet domain names, Internet and World Wide Web URLs, and domain name registrations and pending applications therefore) trade dress, logos, trade names, corporate names, and other identifiers of source or goodwill, including registrations and applications for registration thereof, (iii) rights associated with works of authorship (including audiovisual works) including mask works and copyrights, including copyrights in Software, and registrations and applications for registration thereof, and (iv) rights relating to the protection of trade secrets, know-how, invention rights, and other confidential or proprietary technical, business and other information, including manufacturing and production processes and techniques, research and development information, technology, drawings, specifications, designs, plans, proposals, technical data, financial, marketing and business data, pricing and cost information, business and marketing plans, customer and supplier lists and information, and all rights in any jurisdiction to limit the use or disclosure thereof.
Intellectual Property
 
"" means computer systems, programs, networks, hardware, Software, databases, operating systems, Internet websites, website content and links and equipment used to process, store, maintain and operate data, information and functions.
IT Systems
 
"" means the actual knowledge of any director or executive officer (as defined in Rule 3b-7 under the Exchange Act) of the Company. An executive officer of the Company shall be deemed to have knowledge of such matters in this Agreement which refer to the "knowledge of the Company" if such knowledge could have been obtained through such executive officer's inquiring of those employees of the Company who report directly to such executive as to such matter.
knowledge of the Company
 
"" means Intellectual Property licensed to the Company or any Subsidiary pursuant to the Licenses.
Licensed Intellectual Property
 
"" means (i) licenses of Intellectual Property or IT Systems by the Company or any Subsidiary to any third party, (ii) licenses of Intellectual Property or IT Systems by any third party to the Company or any Subsidiary, (iii) agreements between the Company or any Subsidiary and any third party relating to the development or use of Intellectual Property or IT Systems, the development or transmission of data, or the use, modification, framing, linking, advertisement, or other practices with respect to Internet web sites, and (iv) consents, settlements, decrees, orders, injunctions, judgments or rulings governing the use, validity or enforceability of Owned Intellectual Property or any other Intellectual Property used in, intended to be used in, or held for use in connection with the business of the Company or any Subsidiary.
Licenses
 
"" means, when used in connection with Parent, on the one hand, or Company or any Subsidiary, on the other, any event, circumstance, change or effect (any such item, an "") that, individually or in the aggregate with any other events, circumstances, changes and effects occurring after the date hereof, is or is reasonably likely to be materially adverse to (i) the business, financial condition, assets, liabilities or results of operations of such entity and its subsidiaries taken as a whole or (ii) the ability of such entity to consummate the Merger; provided, however, that none of the following shall be deemed to constitute a Material Adverse Effect on such entity: (A) any Effect that results from changes affecting any of the industries or countries in which such entity operates generally or the economy or financial markets generally (provided that such Effect does not affect such entity in a materially disproportionate manner as compared to other similarly-situated participants in the industry in which such entity operates), (B) any Effect resulting from weather or any natural disaster, (C) any Effect resulting from the announcement, pendency or consummation of the transaction contemplated by this Agreement or resulting from the taking of any action required by this Agreement or (D) any Effect from any change resulting from any change in laws affecting such entity (provided that such Effect does not affect such entity in a materially disproportionate manner as compared to other similarly-situated participants in the industry in which such entity operates).
Material Adverse Effect
Effect
 
"" means the Nasdaq Stock Market, Inc.
NASDAQ
 
"" means Intellectual Property owned by the Company or any Subsidiary.
Owned Intellectual Property
 
"" means $8.77.
Per Share Amount
 
"" means an individual, corporation, partnership, limited partnership, limited liability company, syndicate, person (including a "person" as defined in Section 13(d)(3) of the Exchange Act), trust, association or entity or government, political subdivision, agency or instrumentality of a government.
person
 
"" means computer software, programs and databases in any form, including Internet web sites, web content and links, all versions, updates, corrections, enhancements, and modifications thereof, and all related documentation.
Software
 
"" or "" of the Company, the Surviving Corporation, Parent or any other person means an affiliate controlled by such person, directly or indirectly, through one or more intermediaries. (For the avoidance of doubt, for the definition of "Subsidiary" with a capitalized "S", see Section 3.01.)
subsidiary
subsidiaries
 
"" means an unsolicited written bona fide offer made by a third party that is not subject to a financing condition to consummate any Competing Transaction on terms that the Board determines, in its good faith judgment (after having consulted with its financial advisor), to be more favorable to the Company's stockholders than the Merger; that, for purposes of this definition, the percentage referred to in clauses (iii) and (iv) of the definition of "Competing Transaction" shall be 50%.
Superior Proposal
provided
 
"" shall mean any and all taxes, fees, levies, duties, tariffs, imposts and other similar charges of any kind (together with any and all interest, penalties, additions to tax and additional amounts imposed with respect thereto) imposed by any Governmental Authority or taxing authority, including, without limitation: taxes or other charges on or with respect to income, franchise, windfall or other profits, gross receipts, property, sales, use, capital stock, payroll, employment, social security, workers' compensation, unemployment compensation or net worth; taxes or other charges in the nature of excise, withholding, ad valorem, stamp, transfer, value-added or gains taxes; license, registration and documentation fees; and customers' duties, tariffs and similar charges.
Taxes
 
"" means any return, report, schedule, declaration, estimate or election (including attachments to any of the foregoing) filed or required to be filed with any Governmental Authority or taxing authority with respect to Taxes.
Tax Return
 
(b) The following terms have the meaning set forth in the Sections set forth below:
 
 
 
 
SECTION 2.01 .
The Merger
 
Upon the terms hereof and subject to the conditions set forth in Article VII, and in accordance with the DGCL, Merger Sub shall be merged with and into the Company.
 
SECTION 2.02 .
Effective Time; Closing
 
As promptly as practicable after the conditions to the Merger set forth in Article VII have been satisfied (and in no event later than the fifth day thereafter), the parties hereto shall cause the Merger to be consummated by filing a certificate of merger in the form attached hereto as (the "") with the Secretary of State of the State of Delaware, in such form as is required by, and executed in accordance with, the relevant provisions of the DGCL (the date and time of such filing of the Certificate of Merger (or such later time as may be agreed by each of the parties hereto and specified in the Certificate of Merger) being the ""). Immediately prior to such filing of the Certificate of Merger, a closing (the "") shall be held at the offices of Fenwick & West LLP, 801 California Street, Mountain View, California, or such other place as the parties shall agree, for the purpose of confirming the satisfaction or waiver, as the case may be, of the conditions set forth in Article VII.
Exhibit B
Certificate of Merger
Effective Time
Closing
 
SECTION 2.03 .
Effect of the Merger
 
At the Effective Time, the separate corporate existence of Merger Sub shall cease and the Company shall continue as the surviving corporation of the Merger (the ""). At the Effective Time, the effect of the Merger shall be as provided in the applicable provisions of the DGCL. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, and subject thereto, at the Effective Time, all the property, rights, privileges, powers and franchises of the Company and Merger Sub shall vest in the Surviving Corporation, and all debts, liabilities, obligations, restrictions, disabilities and duties of the Company and Merger Sub shall become the debts, liabilities, obligations, restrictions, disabilities and duties of the Surviving Corporation.
Surviving Corporation
 
SECTION 2.04 .
Certificate of Incorporation; By-laws
 
(a) At the Effective Time, the Certificate of Incorporation of Merger Sub shall be amended and restated in its entirety to be identical to the Certificate of Incorporation attached hereto as Schedule 2.04(a) until thereafter amended as provided by law and such Certificate of Incorporation.
 
(b) Unless otherwise determined by Parent prior to the Effective Time, at the Effective Time, the By-laws of Merger Sub, as in effect immediately prior to the Effective Time, shall be the By-laws of the Surviving Corporation until thereafter amended as provided by law, the Certificate of Incorporation of the Surviving Corporation and such By-laws.
 
SECTION 2.05 .
Directors and Officers
 
The directors of Merger Sub immediately prior to the Effective Time shall be the initial directors of the Surviving Corporation, each to hold office in accordance with the Certificate of Incorporation and By-laws of the Surviving Corporation, and the officers of Merger Sub immediately prior to the Effective Time shall be the initial officers of the Surviving Corporation, in each case until their respective successors are duly elected or appointed and qualified or until their earlier death, resignation or removal.
 
SECTION 2.06 .
Conversion of Securities
 
At the Effective Time, by virtue of the Merger and without any action on the part of Merger Sub, the Company or the holders of any of the following securities:
 
(a) Each share of the Company's common stock, par value $0.01 per share, (a ""), issued and outstanding immediately prior to the Effective Time(and including, without limitation, each share of "restricted stock" issued under the Company's 2004 Stock Incentive Plan)(other than any Shares to be canceled pursuant to Section 2.06(b) and any Dissenting Shares (as hereinafter defined)) shall be canceled and shall be converted automatically into the right to receive an amount equal to the Per Share Amount (the "") payable in cash, without interest, to the holder of such Share, upon surrender, in the manner provided in Section 2.09, of the certificate that formerly evidenced such Share (or in the case of a lost, stolen or destroyed certificate, upon delivery of an affidavit and bond, if required, in the manner provided in Section 2.09(d));
Share
Merger Consideration
 
(b) Each Share held in the treasury of the Company and each Share owned by Merger Sub, Parent or any direct or indirect wholly owned subsidiary of Parent or of the Company immediately prior to the Effective Time shall be canceled without any conversion thereof and no payment or distribution shall be made with respect thereto; and
 
(c) Each share of common stock of Merger Sub issued and outstanding immediately prior to the Effective Time shall be converted into and exchanged for one validly issued, fully paid and nonassessable share of common stock of the Surviving Corporation.
 
SECTION 2.07 .
Employee Stock Options
 
Effective as of the Effective Time, each option to purchase shares of Company common stock (each such option, a "Option") under the Company's 1994 Stock Option Plan, as amended, or the Company's 2004 Stock Incentive Plan (together, the ""), that is outstanding and unexercised as of such date shall terminate and be cancelled. In consideration for the cancellation thereof, each holder of a Company Stock Option that is outstanding and unexercised immediately prior to the Effective Time shall be entitled (subject to the provisions of this Section 2.07) to be paid by Parent, with respect to each share of Company common stock subject to the Company Stock Option, an amount in cash (subject to any applicable withholding taxes) equal to the excess, if any, of the Per Share Amount over the applicable per share exercise price of such Company Stock Option (the ""). Any such payment shall be subject to all applicable federal, state and local tax withholding requirements. The Company shall take all necessary action to approve the disposition of the Company Stock Options held by directors and "officers" (as defined in Rule 16a-1(f) under the Exchange Act for purposes of this Section) in connection with the transactions contemplated by this Agreement to the extent necessary to exempt such dispositions and acquisitions under Rule 16b-3 of the Exchange Act.
Company Stock
Company Stock Option Plans
Option Payment
 
SECTION 2.08 .
Dissenting Shares
 
(a) Notwithstanding any provision of this Agreement to the contrary, Shares that are issued and outstanding immediately prior to the Effective Time and that are held by stockholders
 
who shall have neither voted in favor of the Merger nor consented thereto in writing and who shall have demanded properly in writing appraisal for such Shares in accordance with Section 262 of the DGCL (collectively, the "") shall not be converted into, or represent the right to receive, the Merger Consideration as provided in Section 2.06(a). Such stockholders shall be entitled to receive payment of the appraised value of such Shares held by them in accordance with the provisions of such Section 262, except that all Dissenting Shares held by stockholders who shall have failed to perfect or who effectively shall have withdrawn or lost their rights to appraisal of such Shares under such Section 262 shall thereupon be deemed to have been converted into, and to have become exchangeable for, as of the Effective Time, the right to receive the Merger Consideration, without any interest thereon, upon surrender, in the manner provided in Section 2.09, of the certificate or certificates that formerly evidenced such Shares (or in the case of a lost, stolen or destroyed certificate, upon delivery of an affidavit and bond, if required, in the manner provided in Section 2.09(d)).
Dissenting Shares
 
(b) The Company shall give Parent (i) prompt notice of any demands for appraisal received by the Company, withdrawals of such demands, and any other instruments served pursuant to the DGCL and received by the Company and (ii) the opportunity to direct all negotiations and proceedings with respect to demands for appraisal under the DGCL. The Company shall not, except with the prior written consent of Parent, make any payment with respect to any demands for appraisal or offer to settle or settle any such demands.
 
SECTION 2.09 .
Surrender of Shares; Stock Transfer Books
 
(a) Prior to the Effective Time, Parent shall designate a bank or trust company reasonably satisfactory to the Company to act as agent (the "") for the holders of Shares to receive the funds to which holders of Shares shall become entitled pursuant to Section 2.06(a), and as promptly as practicable after the Effective Time, Parent shall deposit with the Paying Agent all the cash necessary to pay for the Shares of Company common stock converted into the right to receive Merger Consideration pursuant to 2.06(a) and the aggregate amount of the Options Payments payable to holders of Company Stock Options pursuant to Section 2.07. Such funds shall be invested by the Paying Agent as directed by the Surviving Corporation.
Paying Agent
 
(b) (i) As promptly as practicable after the Effective Time, Parent shall cause to be mailed to each person who was, at the Effective Time, a holder of record of Shares entitled to receive the Merger Consideration pursuant to Section 2.06(a) a form of letter of transmittal (which shall specify that delivery shall be effected, and risk of loss and title to the certificates evidencing such Shares (the "") shall pass, only upon proper delivery of the Certificates to the Paying Agent (or in the case of a lost, stolen or destroyed Certificate, upon delivery of an affidavit and bond, if required, in the manner provided in Section 2.09(d))) and instructions for use in effecting the surrender of the Certificates pursuant to such letter of transmittal. Upon surrender to the Paying Agent of a Certificate (or in the case of a lost, stolen or destroyed Certificate, upon delivery of an affidavit and bond, if required, in the manner provided in Section 2.09(d)), together with such letter of transmittal, duly completed and validly executed in accordance with the instructions thereto, and such other documents as may be required pursuant to such instructions, the holder of such Certificate shall be entitled to receive in exchange therefor, as promptly as practicable, the Merger Consideration for each Share formerly evidenced by such Certificate, and, upon payment of such Merger Consideration, such
Certificates
 
Certificate shall be canceled. No interest shall accrue or be paid on the Merger Consideration payable upon the surrender of any Certificate for the benefit of the holder of such Certificate. If the payment equal to the Merger Consideration is to be made to a person other than the person in whose name the surrendered certificate formerly evidencing Shares is registered on the stock transfer books of the Company, it shall be a condition of payment that the certificate so surrendered shall be endorsed properly or otherwise be in proper form for transfer and that the person requesting such payment shall have paid all transfer and other taxes required by reason of the payment of the Merger Consideration to a person other than the registered holder of the certificate surrendered, or shall have established to the satisfaction of Merger Sub that such taxes either have been paid or are not applicable.
 
(ii) Upon the Effective Time, the Company shall deliver to the Paying Agent an electronic listing, suitable for the Paying Agent's use, of each holder of Company Stock Options as of the Effective Time, provided that such listing shall be in form and content reasonably satisfactory to Parent. Parent shall instruct the Paying Agent to deliver the Option Payment due each such holder in accordance with Section 2.07 as promptly as practicable following the Effective Time.
 
(c) At any time following the sixth month after the Effective Time, Parent shall be entitled to require the Paying Agent to deliver to it any funds which had been made available to the Paying Agent and not disbursed to holders of Shares or Company Stock Options (including, without limitation, all interest and other income received by the Paying Agent in respect of all funds made available to it), and, thereafter, such holders shall be entitled to look to Parent (subject to abandoned property, escheat and other similar laws) only as general creditors thereof with respect to any Merger Consideration or Option Payment that may be payable upon due surrender of the Certificates held by them. Notwithstanding the foregoing, none of Parent, the Surviving Corporation and the Paying Agent shall be liable to any holder of a Share for any Merger Consideration delivered in respect of such Share to a public official pursuant to any abandoned property, escheat or other similar law.
 
(d) In the event any Certificates shall have been lost, stolen or destroyed, Parent shall cause the Paying Agent to deliver in exchange for such lost, stolen or destroyed Certificates, upon the making of an affidavit of that fact by the holder thereof, such Merger Consideration as may be required pursuant to Section 2.06(a); provided, however, that Parent may, in its reasonable discretion and as a condition precedent to the issuance thereof, require the owner of such lost, stolen or destroyed Certificates to indemnify Parent, the Surviving Corporation, the Paying Agent or any of their respective representatives or agents against any claim that may be made against such party with respect to the Certificates alleged to have been lost, stolen or destroyed; and provided, further, that Parent may, in its reasonable discretion, and as a condition precedent to the issuance thereof, require the owner of such lost, stolen or destroyed Certificate to deliver a bond in such sum as it may reasonably direct as indemnity against such claim.
 
(e) At the close of business on the day of the Effective Time, the stock transfer books of the Company shall be closed and thereafter there shall be no further registration of transfers of Shares on the records of the Company. From and after the Effective Time, the holders of Shares outstanding immediately prior to the Effective Time shall cease to have any rights with respect to such Shares except the right to receive the Merger Consideration and as otherwise provided herein or by applicable law.
 
SECTION 2.10 .
Withholding Rights
 
Each of Parent, Merger Sub, the Surviving Corporation and the Paying Agent shall be entitled to deduct and withhold from any amounts otherwise payable pursuant to this Agreement in respect of Shares or Company Stock Options such amount as it is required to deduct and withhold with respect to the making of such payment under the Code or any Law. To the extent that amounts are so withheld, (i) they shall be timely paid to all appropriate Governmental Authorities and (ii) such withheld amounts shall be treated for purposes of this Agreement as having been paid to the holder of the Shares in respect of which such deduction and withholding was made.
 
 
As an inducement to Parent and Merger Sub to enter into this Agreement, and except as disclosed in the disclosure schedule prepared by the Company and delivered by the Company to Parent and Merger Sub prior to the execution and delivery of this Agreement (the ""), the Company hereby represents and warrants to Parent and Merger Sub that:
Disclosure Schedule
 
SECTION 3.01 .
Organization and Qualification; Subsidiaries
 
(a) Each of the Company and each subsidiary of the Company (each a "") is a corporation duly organized, validly existing and in good standing (with respect to any Subsidiary organized under the laws of any foreign jurisdiction, to the extent applicable to such jurisdiction) under the laws of the jurisdiction of its incorporation and has the requisite corporate power and authority and all necessary governmental approvals to own, lease and operate its properties and to carry on its business as it is now being conducted, except where the failure to be so organized, existing or in good standing or to have such power, authority and governmental approvals would not prevent or materially delay consummation of the Merger and would not have a Material Adverse Effect on the Company. The Company and each Subsidiary is duly qualified or licensed as a foreign corporation to do business, and is in good standing, in each jurisdiction where the character of the properties owned, leased or operated by it or the nature of its business makes such qualification or licensing necessary, except for such failures to be so qualified or licensed and in good standing that would not prevent or materially delay consummation of the Merger and would not have a Material Adverse Effect on the Company.
Subsidiary
 
(b) A true and complete list of all the Subsidiaries, together with the jurisdiction of incorporation of each Subsidiary, the percentage of the outstanding capital stock of each Subsidiary owned by the Company and each other Subsidiary, and the names of the directors and officers of each Subsidiary, is set forth in Section 3.01(b) of the Disclosure Schedule. Except as disclosed in Section 3.01(b) of the Disclosure Schedule, the Company does not directly or indirectly own any equity or similar interest in, or any interest convertible into or exchangeable or exercisable for any equity or similar interest in, any corporation, partnership, joint venture or other business association or entity.
 
SECTION 3.02 .
Certificate of Incorporation and By-laws
 
The Company has heretofore made available to Parent a complete and correct copy of the Certificate of Incorporation and the By-laws or equivalent organizational documents, each as amended to date, of the Company and each Subsidiary. Such Certificates of Incorporation, By-laws or equivalent organizational documents are in full force and effect. Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary is in violation of any of the provisions of its Certificate of Incorporation, By-laws or equivalent organizational documents.
 
SECTION 3.03 .
Capitalization
 
(a) The authorized capital stock of the Company consists of 40,000,000 Shares. As of the date of this Agreement, (i) 6,733,245 Shares are issued and outstanding, all of which are validly issued, fully paid and nonassessable, (ii) zero Shares are held in the treasury of the Company, (iii) zero Shares are held by the Subsidiaries, and (iv) 1,303,814 Shares are reserved for future issuance pursuant to outstanding Company Stock Options and other purchase rights (the "") granted pursuant to the Company Stock Option Plans. Except as set forth in this Section 3.03, there are no options, warrants or other rights, agreements, arrangements or commitments of any character relating to the issued or unissued capital stock of the Company or any Subsidiary or obligating the Company or any Subsidiary to issue or sell any shares of capital stock of, or other equity interests in, the Company or any Subsidiary. Section 3.03 of the Disclosure Schedule sets forth the following information with respect to each Company Stock Award outstanding on the date of this Agreement: (i) the name and address of the Company Stock Award recipient; (ii) the particular plan pursuant to which such Company Stock Award was granted; (iii) the number of shares of Company common stock subject to such Company Stock Award; (iv) the exercise or purchase price of such Company Stock Award; (v) the date on which such Company Stock Award was granted; (vi) the applicable vesting schedule; (vi) the date on which such Company Stock Award expires; (vii) the tax status (i.e., incentive stock options or non-qualified stock options) and (viii) whether the exercisability of or right to repurchase of such Company Stock Award will be accelerated in any way by the transactions contemplated by this Agreement. No options to purchase Company common stock from the Company are outstanding other than options granted pursuant to the Company Stock Option Plans. The Company has made available to Parent accurate and complete copies of all Company Stock Option Plans. All Shares subject to issuance as aforesaid, upon issuance on the terms and conditions specified in the instruments pursuant to which they are issuable, will be duly authorized, validly issued, fully paid and nonassessable. There are no outstanding contractual obligations of the Company or any Subsidiary to repurchase, redeem or otherwise acquire any Shares or any capital stock of any Subsidiary or to provide funds to, or make any investment (in the form of a loan, capital contribution or otherwise) in, any Subsidiary or any other person. There are no commitments or agreements of any character to which the Company is bound obligating the Company to accelerate the vesting of any Company Stock Option as a result of the Merger. All outstanding shares of Company common stock, all outstanding Company Stock Options and all outstanding shares of capital stock of each Subsidiary have been issued and granted in compliance in all material respects with (i) all applicable securities laws and other applicable Laws and (ii) all requirements set forth in applicable contracts.
Company Stock Awards
 
(b) Each outstanding share of capital stock of each Subsidiary is duly authorized, validly issued, fully paid and nonassessable, and each such share is owned by the Company or another Subsidiary free and clear of all security interests, liens, claims, pledges, options, rights of first refusal, agreements, limitations on the Company's or any Subsidiary's voting rights, charges and other encumbrances of any nature whatsoever.
 
SECTION 3.04 .
Authority Relative to This Agreement
 
The Company has all necessary corporate power and authority to execute and deliver this Agreement, to perform its obligations hereunder and to consummate the Merger. The execution and delivery of this Agreement by the Company and the consummation by the Company of the Merger have been duly and validly authorized by all necessary corporate action on the part of the Company, and no other corporate proceedings on the part of the Company are necessary to authorize this Agreement or to consummate the Merger (other than, with respect to the Merger, the approval of this Agreement and the Merger by the holders of a majority of the then-outstanding Shares, (""), and the filing and recordation of appropriate merger documents as required by the DGCL). This Agreement has been duly and validly executed and delivered by the Company and, assuming the due authorization, execution and delivery by Parent and Merger Sub, constitutes the legal, valid and binding obligation of the Company, enforceable against the Company in accordance with its terms. The Board has unanimously approved this Agreement and the Merger and such approvals are sufficient so that the restrictions on business combinations set forth in Section 203(a) of the DGCL shall not apply to the Merger. To the knowledge of the Company, no other state takeover statute is applicable to the Merger.
Company Stockholder Approval
 
SECTION 3.05 .
No Conflict; Required Filings and Consents
 
(a) The execution and delivery of this Agreement by the Company do not, and the performance of this Agreement by the Company will not, and the consummation of the Merger by the Company will not, (i) conflict with or violate the Certificate of Incorporation, By-laws or any resolution, currently in effect, adopted by the Board or the stockholders of the Company or any equivalent organizational documents of the Company or any Subsidiary, (ii) assuming that all consents, approvals and other authorizations described in Section 3.05(b) have been obtained and that all filings and other actions described in Section 3.05(b) have been made or taken, conflict with or violate any United States or non-United States national, state, provincial, municipal or local statute, law, ordinance, regulation, rule, code, executive order, injunction, judgment, decree or other order ("") applicable to the Company or any Subsidiary or by which any property or asset of the Company or any Subsidiary is bound or affected, or (iii) result in any material breach of or constitute a material default (or an event which, with notice or lapse of time or both, would become a material default) under, or give to others any right of termination, amendment, acceleration or cancellation of, or result in the creation of a lien or other encumbrance on any property or asset of the Company or any Subsidiary pursuant to, any Material Contract (as defined in Section 3.18).
Law
 
(b) The execution and delivery of this Agreement by the Company do not, and the performance of this Agreement by the Company will not, require any consent, approval, authorization or permit of, or filing with or notification to, any United States or non-United
 
States national, state, provincial, municipal or local government, governmental, regulatory or administrative authority, agency, instrumentality or commission or any court, tribunal, or judicial or arbitral body (a ""), except for (i) the filing of the Certificate of Merger with the Secretary of State of the State of Delaware and appropriate documents with the relevant authorities of other states in which the Company and/or Parent are qualified to do business, (ii) the filing with, and clearance by, the SEC of the Proxy Statement (as defined in Section 3.12) and such reports under the Exchange Act as may be required in connection with this Agreement, the Merger and the other transactions contemplated by this Agreement, in accordance with the Exchange Act, (iii) such consents, approvals, orders, authorizations, registrations, declarations and filings as may be required under those merger control laws or regulations of any jurisdictions set forth on Section 3.05(b) of the Disclosure Schedule and (iv) such consents approvals, orders and authorizations as may be required by "blue sky" laws and the securities laws of any foreign country.
Governmental Authority
 
SECTION 3.06 .
Permits; Compliance
 
(a) Section 3.06 of the Disclosure Schedule contains a complete and accurate list of all material franchises, grants, authorizations, licenses, permits, easements, variances, exceptions, consents, certificates, approvals and orders of any Governmental Authority necessary for each of the Company or the Subsidiaries to own, lease and operate its properties or to carry on its business as it is now being conducted (the ""). Each of the Company and the Subsidiaries is in possession of all Permits. No suspension or cancellation of any of the Permits is pending or, to the knowledge of the Company, threatened. Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary is, in any material respect, in default, breach or violation of, (a) any Law applicable to the Company or any Subsidiary or by which any property or asset of the Company or any Subsidiary is bound or affected, including, without limitation, with respect to design, labeling, testing and inspection of the Company's or any Subsidiaries' products, and any Law of the United States Food and Drug Administration, or (b) any Material Contract (as defined in Section 3.18) or Permit.
Permits
 
(b) (i) the Company has not received, at any time since January 1, 1999, any formal notice or other formal communication from any Governmental Authority or any other person regarding (A) any actual, alleged, possible, or potential violation of or failure to comply with any term or requirement of any Permit, or (B) any actual, proposed, possible, or potential revocation, withdrawal, suspension, cancellation, termination of, or modification to any Permit, and (ii) all applications required to have been filed for the renewal of any Permit have been duly filed on a timely basis with the appropriate Governmental Authority, and all other filings required to have been made with respect to any such Permit have been duly made on a timely basis with the appropriate Governmental Authority.
 
SECTION 3.07 .
SEC Filings; Financial Statements
 
(a) The Company has filed all forms, reports and documents required to be filed by it with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the "") since February 29, 2004, including (i) its Annual Reports on Form 10-K for the fiscal years ended on the last day of February of each of the years 2004 and 2005, respectively (ii) its Quarterly Reports on Form 10-Q for the periods ended May 31, 2005 and August 31, 2005, (iii) all proxy statements relating to the
SEC
 
Company's meetings of stockholders (whether annual or special) held since February 29, 2004 and (iv) all other forms, reports and other registration statements required to be filed by the Company with the SEC since February 29, 2004 (the forms, reports and other documents referred to in clauses (i), (ii), (iii) and (iv) above being, collectively, the ""). The SEC Reports (i) were prepared in accordance with either the requirements of the Securities Act of 1933, as amended (the ""), or the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (the ""), as the case may be, and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder, and (ii) did not, at the time they were filed, or, if amended, as of the date of such amendment, contain any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary in order to make the statements made therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading. No Subsidiary is required to file any form, report or other document with the SEC.
SEC Reports
Securities Act
Exchange Act
 
(b) Each of the consolidated financial statements (including, in each case, any notes thereto) contained in the SEC Reports was prepared in accordance with United States generally accepted accounting principles ("") applied on a consistent basis throughout the periods indicated (except as may be indicated in the notes thereto) and each fairly presents, in all material respects, the consolidated financial position, results of operations and cash flows of the Company and its consolidated Subsidiaries as at the respective dates thereof and for the respective periods indicated therein (except that the unaudited interim consolidated financial statements do not reflect normal year-end adjustments and other adjustments described therein and do not contain footnote disclosure of the type associated with audited financial statements).
GAAP
 
(c) Except as and to the extent set forth on the consolidated balance sheet of the Company and the consolidated Subsidiaries at August 31, 2005, including the notes thereto (the ""), neither the Company nor any Subsidiary has incurred any material liability or obligation of any nature (whether accrued, absolute, contingent or otherwise), except for (i) any liabilities and obligations incurred in the ordinary course of business consistent with past practice since August 31, 2005 and (ii) any liabilities and obligations (A) for financial and legal advisors and other out of pocket costs incurred in connection with the transactions contemplated hereby or (B) otherwise incurred as required or expressly permitted by this Agreement.
2005 Balance Sheet
 
(d) The Company has heretofore made available to Parent complete and correct copies of all amendments and modifications that have not been filed by the Company with the SEC to all agreements, documents and other instruments that previously had been filed by the Company with the SEC and are currently in effect.
 
(e) To the knowledge of the Company, each director and executive officer of the Company has filed with the SEC on a timely basis all statements required by Section 16(a) of the Exchange Act and the rules and regulations thereunder since February 29, 2004.
 
(f) The Company maintains disclosure controls and procedures required by Rule 13a-15; such controls and procedures are effective to provide reasonable assurance that all material information concerning the Company and the Subsidiaries is made known on a timely basis to the individuals responsible for the preparation of the Company's SEC filings and other public disclosure documents. As used in this Section 3.07, the term "file" shall be broadly construed to include any manner in which a document or information is furnished, supplied or otherwise made available to the SEC.
 
(g) The Company and the Subsidiaries maintain a system of internal accounting controls sufficient to provide reasonable assurance that (i) transactions are executed in accordance with management's general or specific authorizations, (ii) transactions are recorded as necessary to permit preparation of financial statements in conformity with GAAP and to maintain asset accountability, (iii) access to assets is permitted only in accordance with management's general or specific authorization, and (iv) the recorded accountability for assets is compared with the existing assets at reasonable intervals and appropriate action is taken with respect to any differences. The Company has made available to Parent complete and correct copies of all written policies, manuals and other documents promulgating such internal accounting controls.
 
(h) Since February 28, 2003, neither the Company nor any Subsidiary nor, to the knowledge of the Company, any director, officer, employee, auditor, accountant or representative of the Company or any Subsidiary, has received or otherwise had or obtained knowledge of any material complaint, allegation, assertion or claim, whether written or oral, regarding the accounting or auditing practices, procedures, methodologies or methods of the Company or any Subsidiary or their respective internal accounting controls, including any complaint, allegation, assertion or claim that the Company or any Subsidiary has engaged in questionable accounting or auditing practices. No attorney representing the Company or any Subsidiary, whether or not employed by the Company or any Subsidiary, has reported evidence of a material violation of securities laws, breach of fiduciary duty or similar violation by the Company or any of its officers, directors, employees or agents to the Company Board or any committee thereof or to any director or officer of the Company pursuant to Section 307 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002, and the SEC's rules and regulations promulgated thereunder. Since February 28, 2003, there have been no internal investigations regarding accounting or revenue recognition discussed with, reviewed by or initiated at the direction of the chief executive officer, principal financial officer, the Board or any committee thereof.
 
(i) All accounts receivable of the Company and its Subsidiaries reflected on the 2005 Balance Sheet or arising thereafter have arisen from bona fide transactions in the ordinary course of business, have been recorded in accordance with SEC regulations and GAAP applied on a consistent basis and, to the knowledge of the Company, are not subject to valid defenses, setoffs or counterclaims, except to the extent the subject of a reserve made in accordance with GAAP. The Company's reserve for contractual allowances and doubtful accounts is, to the knowledge of the Company, adequate and has been calculated in a manner consistent with past practices. Since the date of the 2005 Balance Sheet, neither the Company nor any of the Subsidiaries has modified or changed in any material respect the practices or methods in accordance with which the Company or any of its Subsidiaries sell goods, fill orders or record sales.
 
(j) All accounts payable of the Company and the Subsidiaries reflected on the 2005 Balance Sheet or arising thereafter are the result of bona fide transactions in the ordinary course of business and have been paid or are not yet due or payable. Since the date of the 2005 Balance Sheet, the Company and the Subsidiaries have not altered in any material respects their practices for the payment of such accounts payable, including the timing of such payment.
 
SECTION 3.08 .
Absence of Certain Changes or Events
 
Since February 28, 2005, except as expressly contemplated by this Agreement, (a) the Company and the Subsidiaries have conducted their businesses in the ordinary course and in a manner substantially consistent with past practice, (b) there has not been any Material Adverse Effect on the Company, provided that the Company's financial condition, results of operations and cash flows as set forth in the Company's financial statements as of, and for the three months ended, May 31, 2005 or in the Company's financial statements as of, and for the three and six months ended, August 31, 2005 shall not be regarded for this purpose as a Material Adverse Effect occurring subsequent to February 28, 2005, and (c) none of the Company or any Subsidiary has taken any action that, if taken after the date of this Agreement, would constitute a breach, in any material respect, of any of the covenants set forth in Section 5.01.
 
SECTION 3.09 .
Absence of Litigation
 
There is no litigation, suit, claim, action, proceeding or investigation (an "") pending or, to the knowledge of the Company, threatened against the Company or any Subsidiary, or any property or asset of the Company or any Subsidiary, before any Governmental Authority, nor is there any Action that seeks to materially delay or prevent the consummation of the Merger (other than, in each case, any litigation, suit, claim action or proceeding originating after the date of this Agreement with the purpose of or with the probable effect of making illegal or enjoining the consummation of the Merger or other transactions contemplated by this Agreement or seeking any action or result as set forth in Section 7.01(a)(ii)). Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary nor any property or asset of the Company or any Subsidiary is subject to any continuing order of, consent decree, settlement agreement or similar written agreement with, or, to the knowledge of the Company, continuing investigation by, any Governmental Authority, or any order, writ, judgment, injunction, decree, determination or award of any Governmental Authority.
Action
 
SECTION 3.10 .
Employee Benefit Plans
 
(a) Section 3.10(a) of the Disclosure Schedule lists (i) all employee benefit plans (as defined in Section 3(3) of the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, as amended ("")) and all bonus, stock option, stock purchase, restricted stock, incentive, deferred compensation, retiree medical or life insurance, supplemental retirement, severance or other benefit plans, programs or arrangements, and all employment, termination, severance or other contracts or agreements to which the Company or any Subsidiary is a party, with respect to which the Company or any Subsidiary has any obligation or which are maintained, contributed to or sponsored by the Company or any Subsidiary for the benefit of any current or former employee, officer or director of, or any current or former consultant to, the Company or any Subsidiary, but excluding any Foreign Plans (as such term is defined in Section 3.10(i)) (collectively, the ""). Each Plan is in writing, and the Company has furnished to Parent or its counsel a true and complete copy of each Plan and has delivered to Parent or its counsel a true and complete copy of,each of the following documents, to the extent applicable, in their currently effective form, relating to such Plan, (i) a copy of each trust or other funding arrangement, (ii) each summary plan description and summary of material modifications, (iii) the three most recently filed Internal Revenue Service (the "") Form 5500s, (iv) the most
ERISA
Plans
IRS
 
recently received determination letter from the IRS for each such Plan, and (v) the most recently prepared actuarial report and financial statement in connection with each such Plan. Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary has any express or implied commitment, whether legally enforceable or not, (i) to create, incur liability with respect to or cause to exist any other employee benefit plan, program or arrangement, (ii) to enter into any contract or agreement to provide compensation or benefits to any individual, or (iii) to modify, change or terminate any Plan, other than with respect to a modification, change or termination required by ERISA or the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended (the "").
Code
 
(b) Except as described in Section 3.10(b) of the Disclosure Schedule, none of the Plans (i) provides for the payment of separation, severance, termination or similar-type benefits to any person, (ii) obligates the Company or any Subsidiary to pay separation, severance, termination or similar-type benefits solely or partially as a result of any transaction contemplated by this Agreement, or (iii) obligates the Company or any Subsidiary to make any payment or provide any benefit as a result of a "change in control", within the meaning of such term under Section 280G of the Code. None of the Plans provides for or promises retiree medical, disability or life insurance benefits to any current or former employee, officer or director of the Company or any Subsidiary. None of the Plans provides for the lending of money to any director or officer of the Company or any Subsidiary or otherwise violates, or could reasonably be expected to violate, Section 402 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002. Each of the Plans is subject only to the Laws of the United States or a political subdivision thereof.
 
(c) Each Plan is now and always has been operated in all material respects in accordance with its terms and the requirements of all applicable Laws including, without limitation, ERISA and the Code; the Company and the Subsidiaries have performed, in all material respects, all obligations required to be performed by them under, are not in any respect in default under or in violation of, and have no knowledge of any default or violation by any party to, any Plan; no Action is pending or, to the knowledge of the Company, threatened with respect to any Plan (other than claims for benefits in the ordinary course) and, to the knowledge of the Company, no fact or event exists that could reasonably be expected to give rise to any such Action.
 
(d) Each Plan that is intended to be qualified under Section 401(a) of the Code or Section 401(k) of the Code has timely received a favorable determination letter from the IRS covering all of the provisions applicable to the Plan for which determination letters are currently available that the Plan is so qualified and each trust established in connection with any Plan which is intended to be exempt from federal income taxation under Section 501(a) of the Code has received a determination letter from the IRS that it is so exempt, and no fact or event has occurred since the date of such determination letter or letters from the IRS which could reasonably be expected to adversely affect the qualified status of any such Plan or the exempt status of any such trust.
 
(e) There has not been any prohibited transaction (within the meaning of Section 406 of ERISA or Section 4975 of the Code) with respect to any Plan. None of the Plans is subject to Title IV of ERISA and neither the Company nor any Subsidiary has incurred, or could reasonably be expected to incur, any liability under, arising out of or by operation of Title IV of ERISA.
 
(f) All contributions, premiums or payments required to be made with respect to any Plan have been made on or before their due dates. All such contributions have been fully deducted for income tax purposes and no such deduction has been challenged or disallowed by any Governmental Authority and no fact or event exists which could reasonably be expected to give rise to any such challenge or disallowance.
 
(g) No benefit payable or that may become payable by the Company or any Subsidiary pursuant to any agreement or arrangement as a result of, in connection with or arising under this Agreement shall constitute an "excess parachute payment" (as defined in Section 280G(b)(1) of the Code) that is subject to the imposition of an excise tax under Section 4999 of the Code or that would not be deductible by reason of Section 280G of the Code and the regulations issued thereunder. Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary is a party to any: (i) contract agreement or arrangement with any person (A) the benefits of which are contingent, or the terms of which are materially altered, upon the occurrence of a transaction involving the Company in the nature of the Merger or any of the other transactions contemplated by this Agreement, (B) providing any term of employment or compensation guarantee, or (C) providing severance benefits or other benefits after the termination of employment of such employee regardless of the reason for such termination of employment; or (ii) benefit plan or arrangement, any of the benefits of which shall be increased, or the vesting of benefits of which shall be accelerated, by the occurrence of the Merger or any of the other transactions contemplated by this Agreement, or any event subsequent to the Merger such as the termination of employment of any person, or the value of any of the benefits of which shall be calculated on the basis of any of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement. Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary has any obligation to pay any material amount or provide any material benefit to any former employee or officer.
 
(h) The Company has no benefit plan which constitutes, or has since the enactment of ERISA, constituted, (i) a "multiemployer plan" as defined in Section 3(37) of ERISA, (ii) a "multiple employer plan" as defined in ERISA or Code Section 413(c), or (iii) a "funded welfare plan" within the meaning of Code Section 419.
 
(i) Each benefit plan or arrangement that has been established or maintained by the Company or any Subsidiary, or that is required to be maintained or contributed to by the law or applicable custom or rule of the relevant jurisdiction, outside of the United States (each such benefit plan or arrangement, a "") is listed in Section 3.10(i) of the Disclosure Schedule. With respect to each Foreign Plan, (i) to the knowledge of the Company, such Foreign Plan has been administered in all material respects at all times in accordance with its terms and applicable law and regulations, (ii) to the knowledge of the Company, there are no pending investigations by any governmental body involving such Foreign Plan, and no pending claims (except for claims for benefits payable in the normal operation of such Foreign Plan), suits or proceedings against such Foreign Plan or asserting any rights or claims to benefits under such Foreign Plan, (iii) to the knowledge of the Company, the consummation of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement will not by itself create or otherwise result in any liability with respect to such Foreign Plan other than the triggering of payment to participants, and (iv) except as required by applicable law, no condition exists that would prevent the Company or any Subsidiary from terminating or amending any Foreign Plan at any time for any reason in accordance with the terms of each such Foreign Plan (other than normal and reasonable expenses typically incurred in a termination event).
Foreign Plan
 
(j) The Company has delivered to Parent true and complete copies of all election statements under Section 83(b) of the Code that are in the Company's possession or subject to its control with respect to any unvested securities or other property issued by the Company or any ERISA Affiliate to any of their respective employees, non-employee directors, consultants and other service providers.
 
(k) Section 3.10(k) of the Disclosure Schedule lists all "nonqualified deferred compensation plans" (within the meaning of Section 409A of the Code) to which the Company or any Subsidiary is a party. Each such nonqualified deferred compensation plan to which the Company or any Subsidiary is a party has been operated in good faith in accordance with Section 409A of the Code and the guidelines released thereunder. The exercise price of all Company Stock Options is at least equal to the fair market value of the Company common stock on the date such Company Stock Options were granted and, as a result, no recipient of a Company Stock Option has incurred or will incur any liability under Section 409A of the Code upon the vesting of any such Company Stock Options.
 
SECTION 3.11 .
Labor and Employment Matters
 
(a) (i) There are no claims, charges or litigation pending or, to the knowledge of the Company, threatened between the Company or any Subsidiary and any of their respective employees, and (ii) neither the Company nor any Subsidiary is a party to any collective bargaining agreement or other labor union contract applicable to persons employed by the Company or any Subsidiary, nor, to the knowledge of the Company, are there any activities or proceedings of any labor union to organize any such employees.
 
(b) The Company and the Subsidiaries are in material compliance with all applicable laws relating to the employment of labor, including those related to wages, hours, immigration and naturalization, collective bargaining and the payment and withholding of taxes and other sums as required by the appropriate Governmental Authority. The Company and the Subsidiaries have withheld and paid to the appropriate Governmental Authority, or are holding for payment not yet due to such Governmental Authority, all amounts required to be withheld from employees of the Company or any Subsidiary and are not liable for any arrears of wages, taxes, penalties or other sums for failure to comply with any of the foregoing. The Company and the Subsidiaries have paid in full to all employees or adequately accrued for in accordance with GAAP consistently applied all wages, salaries, commissions, bonuses, benefits and other compensation due to or on behalf of such employees. There is no claim with respect to payment of wages, salary or overtime pay that has been asserted or is now pending or, to the knowledge of the Company, threatened against the Company or any Subsidiary before any Governmental Authority with respect to any persons currently or formerly employed by the Company or any Subsidiary.
 
(c) Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary is a party to, or otherwise bound by, any consent decree with, or citation by, any Governmental Authority relating to employees or employment practices. There is no charge or proceeding with respect to a violation of any
 
occupational safety or health standards that has been asserted or is now pending or, to the knowledge of the Company, threatened with respect to the Company. There is no charge of discrimination in employment or employment practices, for any reason, including, without limitation, age, gender, race, religion or other legally protected category, which has been asserted or is now, to the knowledge of the Company, threatened or pending before the United States Equal Employment Opportunity Commission, or any other Governmental Authority in any jurisdiction in which the Company or any Subsidiary has employed, employs or has been alleged to employ any person that, if adversely determined, would individually or in the aggregate, result in any material liability to the Company.
 
(d) To the knowledge of the Company no employee or consultant of the Company or any Subsidiary is in material violation of (i) any contract or agreement with the Company or any Subsidiary or (ii) any restrictive covenant that purports to limit any employee's or consultant's ability to be employed by, or fully perform the assigned duties for, the Company or any Subsidiary, or to refrain from using trade secrets or proprietary information of others.
 
(e) In the past two years, there has been no "mass layoff" or "plant closing" as defined by the Workers Adjustment and Retraining Notification ("WARN") Act, nor has there been any "employment loss" sufficient to require notice under the WARN Act, in respect of the Company.
 
(f) Section 3.11(f) of the Disclosure Schedule lists as of the date of this Agreement each employee of the Company and any Subsidiary who is on leave and also lists, with respect to each such employee, the anticipated date of return to full service, if applicable.
 
SECTION 3.12 .
Proxy Statement
 
The proxy statement to be sent to the stockholders of the Company in connection with the Stockholders' Meeting (as defined in Section 6.01) (such proxy statement, as amended or supplemented, being referred to herein as the ""), shall not, at the date the Proxy Statement (or any amendment or supplement thereto) is first mailed to stockholders of the Company or at the time of the Stockholders' Meeting, contain any untrue statement of material fact, or omit to state any material fact required to be stated therein or necessary in order to make the statements therein, in light of the circumstances under which they were made, not false or misleading or necessary to correct any statement in any earlier communication with respect to the solicitation of proxies for the Stockholders' Meeting which shall have become false or misleading. Notwithstanding the foregoing, the Company makes no representation or warranty with respect to any information supplied in writing by Parent, Merger Sub or any of Parent's or Merger Sub's representatives expressly for inclusion in the foregoing documents. The Proxy Statement shall comply in all material respects as to form with the requirements of the Exchange Act and the rules and regulations thereunder.
Proxy Statement
 
SECTION 3.13 .
Real Property; Title to Assets
 
(a) Section 3.13(a) of the Disclosure Schedule lists each parcel of real property currently owned by the Company or any Subsidiary. Each parcel of real property owned by the Company or any Subsidiary (i) is owned free and clear of all mortgages, pledges, liens, security
 
interests, conditional and installment sale agreements, encumbrances, charges or other claims of third parties of any kind, including, without limitation, any easement, right of way or other encumbrance to title, or any option, right of first refusal, or right of first offer (collectively, ""), other than (A) Liens for Taxes not yet due and payable, or, if due, (1) not delinquent or (2) being contested in good faith by appropriate proceedings during which collection or enforcement against the property is stayed; (B) inchoate mechanics' and materialmen's Liens for construction in progress; (C) workmen's, repairmen's, warehousemen's and carriers' Liens arising in the ordinary course of business of the Company or such Subsidiary; (D) title retention or security interests under conditional sales contracts and equipment leases with third parties entered into in the ordinary course of business; (E) Liens related to purchase money obligations; (F) all matters of record; and (G) Liens and other imperfections of title and encumbrances that would not, individually or in the aggregate, have a material adverse effect on the Company's or any Subsidiary's, as the case may be, ability to occupy and utilize such property as currently occupied or utilized(collectively, ""), and (ii) is neither subject to any governmental decree or order to be sold nor is being condemned, expropriated or otherwise taken by any public authority with or without payment of compensation therefor, nor, to the knowledge of the Company, has any such condemnation, expropriation or taking been proposed.
Liens
Permitted Liens
 
(b) Section 3.13(b) of the Disclosure Schedule lists each parcel of real property currently leased or subleased by the Company or any Subsidiary, with the name of the lessor and the date of the lease, sublease, assignment of the lease, any guaranty given or leasing commissions payable by the Company or any Subsidiary in connection therewith and each amendment to any of the foregoing (collectively, the ""). True, correct and complete copies of all Lease Documents have been delivered to Parent or its counsel. All such current leases and subleases are in full force and effect, are valid and effective in accordance with their respective terms, and there is not, under any of such leases, any existing material default or event of default by the Company or any Subsidiary or, to the knowledge of the Company, by the other party to such lease or sublease.
Lease Documents
 
(c) There are no contractual or legal restrictions that preclude or restrict the ability to use any real property owned or leased by the Company or any Subsidiary for the purposes for which it is currently being used. To the knowledge of the Company, there are no material adverse physical conditions affecting the real property, and improvements thereon, owned or leased by the Company or any Subsidiary.
 
(d) Each of the Company and the Subsidiaries has good and valid title to, or, in the case of leased properties and assets, valid leasehold or subleasehold interests in, all of its material personal properties and assets, tangible and intangible, necessary for the operation of its business, free and clear of any Liens, except for Permitted Liens and such imperfections of title, if any, that do not materially interfere with the present value of the subject property.
 
SECTION 3.14 .
Intellectual Property
 
(a) Section 3.14(a) of the Disclosure Schedule sets forth a true and complete list of (i) all patents and patent applications, trademark and copyright registrations and applications, common law trademarks, and domain names and URLs included in the Owned Intellectual Property, (ii) all Licenses (other than licenses of commercially available off-the-shelf Software
 
licensed pursuant to shrink-wrap or click-wrap licenses that is not material to the business of the Company or any Subsidiary), and (iii) Company IT Systems and other Owned Intellectual Property that are material to the business of the Company or any Subsidiary (excluding for this purpose any Intellectual Property included within clause (iv) of the definition of "Intellectual Property" contained herein). Section 3.14(a) of the Disclosure Schedule further sets forth a description of all proceedings or actions before any governmental body (including the United States Patent and Trademark Office or equivalent authority anywhere else in the world) related to any of the Intellectual Property owned by the Company including without limitation any (x) interference, reissue, reexamination or similar proceedings pertaining to the scope, validity and/or ownership of any of the patents of the Company and the Subsidiaries, (y) trademark opposition proceedings, or (z) proceedings relating to Internet domain names.
 
(b) The conduct of the business of the Company and the Subsidiaries as currently conducted and as currently contemplated to be conducted, the Company's and the Subsidiaries' use of the Owned Intellectual Property and, to the knowledge of the Company, Licensed Intellectual Property (other than commercially available software licensed pursuant to shrink-wrap or click-wrap licenses) and Company IT Systems in connection therewith and the publication, use, linking and other practices of the Company and the Subsidiaries related to their web sites, the content thereof and the advertisements contained therein, do not infringe upon, misappropriate or otherwise violate the Intellectual Property rights of any third party, and no Actions are pending or, to the knowledge of the Company, threatened against the Company or any Subsidiary alleging any of the foregoing. To the knowledge of the Company, no person is engaging in any activity that infringes upon, misappropriates or otherwise violates the Owned Intellectual Property or Licensed Intellectual Property (other than commercially available software licensed pursuant to shrink-wrap or click-wrap licenses).
 
(c) The Company or a Subsidiary is the exclusive owner of the entire and unencumbered right, title and interest in and to the Owned Intellectual Property. The Company and the Subsidiaries have the right to use the Owned Intellectual Property and Licensed Intellectual Property, and access and use the Company IT Systems, in the continued operation of their respective businesses as presently conducted. All necessary registration, maintenance and renewal fees currently due in connection with the Owned Intellectual Property have been made and all necessary documents, recordations and certificates in connection with such Owned Intellectual Property have been filed with the relevant governmental bodies in the United States or those foreign jurisdictions in which applications for such Intellectual Property have been filed, as the case may be, for the purposes of prosecuting, maintaining or perfecting such Owned Intellectual Property.
 
(d) No Owned Intellectual Property or, to the knowledge of the Company, any Licensed Intellectual Property (other than commercially available software licensed pursuant to shrink-wrap or click-wrap licenses) is subject to any outstanding decree, order, injunction, judgment or ruling restricting the use of such Intellectual Property or that would impair the validity or enforceability of such Intellectual Property. The Owned Intellectual Property and, to the knowledge of the Company, the Licensed Intellectual Property (other than commercially available software licensed pursuant to shrink-wrap or click-wrap licenses) are subsisting, valid and enforceable, and have not been adjudged invalid or unenforceable in whole or part.
 
(e) The Owned Intellectual Property and the Licensed Intellectual Property include all of the Intellectual Property used in the operation of the business of the Company and the Subsidiaries, and there are no other items of Intellectual Property that are material to the operation of the business of the Company or any Subsidiary. There are no IT Systems, other than the Company IT Systems, that are material to the operation of the business of the Company or any Subsidiary.
 
(f) To the knowledge of the Company, (i) each License is valid and enforceable, is binding on all parties thereto, and is in full force and effect; (ii) no party to any License is in material breach thereof or default thereunder; and (iii) neither the execution of this Agreement nor the consummation of any Transaction shall (x) adversely affect any of the rights of the Company or any Subsidiary with respect to the Owned Intellectual Property or Licensed Intellectual Property, or (y) impair or interrupt the Company's or any Subsidiary's access and use of, or their right to access and use, the Company IT Systems or, to the extent applicable, their customers' access and use of, or their right to access and use, the Company IT Systems.
 
(g) The Company and the Subsidiaries have undertaken measures in accordance with normal industry practice to maintain the confidentiality of the trade secrets and other confidential Intellectual Property used in connection with the business of the Company or any Subsidiary. To the knowledge of the Company, (i) there has been no misappropriation by any person of any material trade secrets or other material confidential Intellectual Property used in connection with the business of the Company or any Subsidiary; (ii) no employee, former employee, independent contractor or agent of the Company or any Subsidiary has misappropriated any trade secrets of any other person in the course of performance as an employee, independent contractor or agent of the Company or any Subsidiary; and (iii) no employee, former employee, independent contractor or agent of the Company or any Subsidiary is in default or breach of any term of any employment agreement, nondisclosure agreement, assignment of invention agreement or similar agreement or contract relating in any way to the protection, ownership, development, use or transfer of Intellectual Property. Without limiting the foregoing, the Company and each of its Subsidiaries has and enforces policies requiring each employee and contractor involved in proprietary aspects of the business or with Intellectual Property to execute nondisclosure and proprietary information agreements. All current employees who have contributed to the creation, invention, modification or improvement of any Intellectual Property owned by the Company or any Subsidiary, in whole or in part, have signed written agreements providing that all such Intellectual Property is owned exclusively by the Company and the Subsidiaries.
 
(h) To the knowledge of the Company, the Company IT Systems are free of all viruses, worms, and other known contaminants, and do not contain any errors or problems, that would (i) materially disrupt the ordinary operation of such IT Systems in the conduct of the business of the Company or any Subsidiary as presently conducted, or (ii) have a material adverse impact on the operation of other Software or operating systems. To the knowledge of the Company, the Company IT Systems do not incorporate any GNU or "open" source code or object code under which the Company IT Systems are subject to the GNU general public license, GNU lesser general public license and other "copyleft" license. The Company and the Subsidiaries have taken undertaken measures in accordance with normal industry practice to secure the Company IT Systems from unauthorized access or use by any person, and to enable the continued and uninterrupted operation of the Company IT Systems. The access and use of
 
the Company IT Systems by the Company, the Subsidiaries and any customer thereof (to the extent applicable) in connection with the operation of the business of the Company and the Subsidiaries as currently conducted and as currently contemplated to be conducted do not violate any applicable Laws in any material respect.
 
SECTION 3.15 .
Taxes
 
(a) The Company and the Subsidiaries (i) have filed all Tax Returns required to be filed by them; (ii) have timely paid all Taxes required to be paid, other than such payments as are being contested in good faith by appropriate proceedings; (iii) have established accruals and reserves for Taxes reflected in the financial statements in the Company SEC Reports that are adequate to cover all Taxes accruable through the date thereof (including interest and penalties, if any, thereon) in accordance with GAAP; (iv) have made all estimated Tax payments required to be made; and (v) have no liability for Taxes in excess of the amount so paid or accruals or reserves so established except for Taxes subsequent to the dates covered by financial statements in the Company SEC Reports incurred in the ordinary course of business. All such Tax Returns are true, accurate and complete. Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary is delinquent in the payment of any Tax or in the filing of any Returns, and no deficiencies for any Tax have been claimed, proposed, assessed or, to the knowledge of the Company, threatened against the Company or any Subsidiary. Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary has received any notification from the IRS or any other taxing authority regarding any material issues that (i) are currently pending before the IRS or any other taxing agency or authority (including any sales or use taxing authority) regarding the Company, or (ii) have been raised by the IRS or other taxing agency or authority and not yet finally resolved. No Return of the Company or any Subsidiary is under audit by the IRS or any other taxing agency or authority and any such past audits (if any) have been completed and fully resolved to the satisfaction of the applicable taxing agency or authority conducting such audit and all taxes determined by such audit to be due from the Company or any Subsidiary have been paid in full to the applicable taxing agencies or authorities. Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary has granted any waiver of any statute of limitations with respect to, or any extension of a period for the assessment of, any Tax, which waiver or extension is still in effect. There are no Tax liens upon any property or assets of the Company or the Subsidiaries except liens for current Taxes not yet due or, if due, (A) not delinquent, or (B) being contested in good faith by appropriate proceedings during which collection or enforcement against the property is stayed.
 
(b) The Company and each Subsidiary have withheld and paid (and until the Effective Time will withhold and pay) all Taxes required to have been withheld and paid (including withholding of taxes pursuant to Sections 1441, 1442, 1445 and 1446 of the Code or similar provisions under any foreign law) in connection with any amounts paid or owing to any employee, independent contractor, creditor, stockholder or other third party, and have timely filed all withholding Tax Returns. Neither the Company nor any of the Subsidiaries (i) has liability for the Taxes of any other person (other than the Company and its Subsidiaries) by reason of having joined in the filing of a consolidated, combined or unitary Tax Return, by contract, by transferee liability or otherwise; (ii) is a party to or bound by any Tax sharing, tax indemnity, or Tax allocation agreement; (iii) has filed any disclosures under Section 6662 of the Code or comparable provisions of state, local or foreign law to prevent the imposition of penalties with respect to any Tax reporting position taken on any Return; (iv) has consummated,
 
has participated in, or is currently participating in any transaction which was or is a "tax shelter" transaction as defined in Sections 6662, 6011, 6012 or 6111 of the Code or the Treasury Regulations promulgated thereunder; (v) has ever been a member of a consolidated, combined, unitary or aggregate group of which the Company was not the ultimate parent corporation; (vi) has been a "distributing corporation" or a "controlled corporation" in a distribution intended to qualify under Section 355(e) of the Code within the past five years; (vii) has received a written notice from a taxing authority for a jurisdiction in which a Tax Return has not been filed asserting that, or inquiring as to whether, the filing of such a Tax Return may be required; (viii) has been at any time a member of any partnership or joint venture or the holder of a beneficial interest in any trust for any period for which the statute of limitations for any Tax has not expired.
 
(c) Neither the Company, any Subsidiary, nor any "dual resident corporation" (within the meaning of Section 1503(d) of the Code) in which either the Company or any Subsidiary is considered to hold an interest, has incurred a dual consolidated loss within the meaning of Section 1503 of the Code. Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary has been or will be required to include any item of income in, or exclude any item of deduction from, taxable income for any taxable period (or portion thereof) ending after the Merger as a result of any: (i) change in method of accounting for a taxable period ending on or prior to the Merger; (ii) "closing agreement" as described in Section 7121 of the Code (or any corresponding or similar provision of state, local or foreign income tax law) executed on or prior to the Merger; (iii) intercompany transaction or any excess loss account described in Treasury Regulation under Section 1502 of the Code (or any corresponding or similar provision of state, local or foreign income tax law); (iv) installment sale or open transaction disposition made on or prior to the Merger; or (v) prepaid amount received on or prior to the Merger. There is currently no limitation on the utilization of net operating losses, capital losses, built-in losses, tax credits or similar items of the Company under Section 269, 382, 383, 384 or 1502 of the Code (or any comparable provision of foreign, state, local or municipal law). The Company is not, and has not been at any time during the past five years, a United States real property holding corporation within the meaning of Section 897 of the Code.
 
SECTION 3.16 .
Environmental Matters
 
(a) none of the Company nor any of the Subsidiaries has committed any material violation of, or has liability under, any Environmental Law; (b) none of the properties (including associated soils and surface and ground waters and building materials) currently or formerly owned, leased, used, occupied or operated by the Company or any Subsidiary are contaminated in any material respect with any Hazardous Substance; (c) none of the Company or any of the Subsidiaries is liable for any material off-site contamination by Hazardous Substances; (d) none of the Company or any of the Subsidiaries is liable under any Environmental Law, or under any contract that allocates or assigns liability or responsibility with respect to Environmental Laws or Hazardous Substances (including with respect to pending or threatened liens or claims for damages, penalties, fines or contribution) and none of the Company or any of the Subsidiaries has received any written notice of such liability, except in the case of any of the foregoing (in any of clauses (a), (b), (c) and (d)) that would not have a material effect on the Company; (e) each of the Company and each Subsidiary has all permits, licenses and other authorizations required under any Environmental Law (""); (f) each of the Company and
Environmental Permits
 
each Subsidiary is in compliance with its Environmental Permits; and (g) neither the execution of this Agreement nor the consummation of the Merger will require any investigation, remediation or other action with respect to Hazardous Substances, or any notice to or consent of Governmental Authorities or third parties, pursuant to any applicable Environmental Law or Environmental Permit, including, without limitation, the Connecticut Transfer Act or the New Jersey Industrial Site Recovery Act.
 
SECTION 3.17 .
No Rights Agreement
 
The Company has not adopted any stockholders' rights plan or comparable arrangement.
 
SECTION 3.18 .
Material Contracts
 
(a) Subsections (i) through (xvii) of Section 3.18(a) of the Disclosure Schedule lists the following types of contracts and agreements to which the Company or any Subsidiary is a party, excluding in any case any contract that has expired or terminated in accordance with its terms or otherwise under which no party has any continuing rights or obligations (such contracts and agreements as are required to be set forth in Section 3.18(a) of the Disclosure Schedule being the ""):
Material Contracts
 
(i) each "material contract" (as such term is defined in Item 610(b)(10) of Regulation S-K of the SEC) with respect to the Company and the Subsidiaries;
 
(ii) each contract and agreement, whether or not made in the ordinary course of business, that contemplates an exchange of consideration with a value of more than $100,000, in the aggregate, over the term of such contract or agreement;
 
(iii) all contracts and agreements evidencing indebtedness for borrowed money;
 
(iv) all joint venture, partnership, strategic alliance and business acquisition or divestiture agreements (and all letters of intent and term sheets relating to any such pending transactions);
 
(v) all agreements relating to issuances of securities of the Company or any Subsidiary (and all letters of intent and term sheets relating to any such pending transactions);
 
(vi) all agreements between the Company, any Subsidiary or any affiliate of the Company or any Subsidiary, on the one hand, and the Company, any Subsidiary or any affiliate of the Company or any Subsidiary, on the other hand;
 
 
(viii) all broker, distributor, dealer, manufacturer's representative, franchise, agency, sales promotion, market research, marketing consulting and advertising contracts and agreements to which the Company or any Subsidiary is a party and any other contract that compensates any person based on any sales by the Company or a Subsidiary under which, in the
 
case of a broker, dealer, distributor, or manufacturer's representative contracts and agreements, the Company and the Subsidiaries made aggregate sales in excess of $50,000 in fiscal 2005 or under which such sales are expected to exceed $50,000 in fiscal 2006;
 
(ix) all management contracts (excluding contracts for employment) and contracts with other consultants, including any contracts involving the payment of royalties or other amounts calculated based upon the revenues or income of the Company or any Subsidiary or income or revenues related to any product of the Company or any Subsidiary to which the Company or any Subsidiary is a party;
 
(x) all contracts and agreements with any Governmental Authority to which the Company or any Subsidiary is a party;
 
(xi) all Licenses (other than licenses of commercially available software licensed pursuant to shrink-wrap or click-wrap licenses);
 
(xii) all contracts and agreements that limit, or purport to limit, the ability of the Company or any Subsidiary to compete in any line of business or with any person or entity or in any geographic area or during any period of time;
 
(xiii) all material contracts or arrangements that result in any person or entity holding a power of attorney from the Company or any Subsidiary that relates to the Company, any Subsidiary or their respective businesses;
 
(xiv) all agreements related to professional services rendered to the Company or any Subsidiary in connection with the Merger and this Agreement;
 
(xv) each warranty, guaranty or other similar undertaking with respect to any contractual performance extended by the Company or any Subsidiary (other than warranties, guarantees and other similar undertakings extended in the ordinary course of business pursuant to the Company's standard arrangements with customers, a form of which has been provided to Parent or its counsel);
 
(xvi) all contracts containing a provision of the type commonly referred to as a "most favored nation" provision; and
 
(xvii) all other contracts and agreements, whether or not made in the ordinary course of business, the termination or breach of which would reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect on the Company.
 
(b) (i) All Material Contracts are valid and binding obligations of the Company except to the extent the enforcement thereof may be limited by applicable bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, moratorium or similar laws generally affecting the rights of creditors and the application of general principles of equity or public policy (regardless of whether such enforceability is considered in a proceeding in equity or at law); none of the Company or any Subsidiary has received any claim of material default under or cancellation of any Material Contract and none of the Company or any Subsidiary is, in any material respect, in breach or violation of, or default under, any Material Contract; (ii) to the knowledge of the Company, no
 
other party is, in any material respect, in breach or violation of, or default under, any Material Contract; and (iii) neither the execution of this Agreement nor the consummation of the Merger shall constitute a material default under, give rise to cancellation rights under, or otherwise adversely affect any of the material rights of the Company or any Subsidiary under any Material Contract. The Company has furnished or made available to Parent or its counsel true and complete copies of all Material Contracts, including any material amendments thereto.
 
SECTION 3.19 .
Customers and Suppliers
 
Section 3.19 of the Disclosure Schedule sets forth a true and complete list of the Company's top ten customers (based on the revenue from each such customer during the 12-month period ended August 31, 2005). As of the date of this Agreement, none of the Company's customers listed in Section 3.19 of the Disclosure Schedule and no material supplier of the Company and the Subsidiaries, (i) has cancelled or otherwise terminated any contract with the Company or any Subsidiary prior to the expiration of the contract term, or (ii) to the knowledge of the Company, has threatened, or indicated its intention, to cancel or otherwise terminate its relationship with the Company or the Subsidiaries or to reduce substantially its purchase from or sale to the Company or any Subsidiary of any products, equipment, goods or services.
 
SECTION 3.20 .
Inventory
 
Substantially all inventory of the Company and any Subsidiary, including consigned inventory, whether or not reflected in the 2005 Balance Sheet, consists of a quality and quantity usable and salable in the ordinary course of business and is sufficient for the operation of the business of the Company and each Subsidiary in the ordinary course and consistent with past practice, except for obsolete items and items of below-standard quality that have been written off or written down to net realizable value on the 2005 Balance Sheet or on the accounting records of the Company as of the date of this Agreement or the Effective Time, as the case may be. All inventories not written off have been priced at the lower of cost or net realizable value on a first in, first out basis. To the knowledge of the Company, the quantities of each item of inventory (whether raw materials, work-in-process, or finished goods) are reasonable in the present circumstances of the Company and each Subsidiary. Schedule 3.20 sets forth the location of all items of the Company's and each Subsidiary's inventory, including consigned inventory, as of August 31, 2005. The Company believes that its procedures for tracking and controlling consigned inventory are adequate for such purposes.
 
SECTION 3.21 .
Company Products and Services
 
(a) Each product manufactured, sold, leased or delivered by the Company or any Subsidiary has been in conformity in all material respects with any applicable Law. Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary has any material liabilities or obligations for replacement or repair thereof or other damages in connection therewith. Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary has been required to file any notice or other report with, or provide information to, any product safety agency, commission, board or other Governmental Authority concerning actual or potential hazards with respect to any product manufactured by the Company or any Subsidiary
 
other than routine filings required of all manufacturers similarly situated. Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary has any material liabilities or obligations arising out of any injury to persons or property as a result of the ownership, possession or use of any product manufactured, sold, leased or delivered by the Company or any Subsidiary.
 
(b) Since February 28, 2003 there have been no (i) recalls related to any product manufactured sold, leased or delivered by the Company or any Subsidiary, or (ii) withdrawals of any product manufactured sold, leased or delivered by the Company or any Subsidiary due to quality or safety issues.
 
SECTION 3.22 .
Insurance
 
The Company and the Subsidiaries maintain insurance policies that the Company believes are of the types and in the amounts of coverage as are usual and customary in the context of the businesses and operations in which the Company and the Subsidiaries are engaged.
 
SECTION 3.23 .
Certain Business Practices
 
Since February 28, 2003, none of the Company, any Subsidiary or, to the knowledge of the Company, any directors or officers, agents or employees of the Company or any Subsidiary, has (i) used any funds for unlawful contributions, gifts, entertainment or other unlawful expenses related to political activity; (ii) made any unlawful payment to foreign or domestic government officials or employees or to foreign or domestic political parties or campaigns or violated any provision of the Foreign Corrupt Practices Act of 1977, as amended; or (iii) made any payment in the nature of criminal bribery.
 
SECTION 3.24 .
Government Regulation
 
(a) To the knowledge of the Company, none of the Company, the Subsidiaries, or any of their "managing employees" (as defined at 42 C.F.R. 420.201) has been, or is being investigated with respect to, any activity that constitutes or could constitute, a material violation of any Healthcare Law.
 
(b) The Company and the Subsidiaries have not, and, to the knowledge of the Company, none of their managing employees (as defined at 42 C.F.R. 420.201) during his or her employment or association with the Company or the Subsidiaries has, engaged in any activity that constitutes a material violation of any Healthcare Law.
 
(c) Neither the Company nor any of the Subsidiaries have: (i) had a material civil monetary penalty assessed against it under Section 1128A of the SSA or any regulations promulgated thereunder; or (ii) been convicted (as that term is defined in 42 C.F.R. Section 1001.2) of any of the following categories of offenses as described in SSA Section 1128(a) and (b)(1), (2), (3), or any regulations promulgated thereunder: (A) criminal offenses relating to the delivery of an item or service under any state or federal healthcare program; (B) criminal offenses under federal or state law for misconduct in connection with the delivery of a healthcare item or service or with respect to any act or omission in a program operated by or financed in whole or in part by any federal, state or local government agency; or (C) violations of federal or state laws relating to the interference with or obstruction of any investigation into any criminal offense described in this paragraph (c).
 
(d) Since January 1, 2002, neither the Company nor any of the Subsidiaries have received or been subject to: (i) any United States Food and Drug Administration ("") Form 483's relating to any product manufactured, sold, leased or delivered by the Company or any Subsidiary; (ii) any FDA Notices of Adverse Findings relating to any product manufactured, sold, leased or delivered by the Company or any Subsidiary; or (iii) any warning letters or other written correspondence from the FDA or any other Governmental Authority concerning any product manufactured, sold, leased or delivered by the Company or any Subsidiary in which the FDA or such other Governmental Authority asserted that the operations of the Company or any Subsidiary were not in compliance with applicable Law, regulations, rules or guidelines with respect to any product manufactured, sold, leased or delivered by the Company or any Subsidiary.
FDA
 
SECTION 3.25 .
Brokers
 
No broker, finder or investment banker (other than Dresner Securities, Inc.) is entitled to any brokerage, finder's or other fee or commission in connection with this Agreement or the Merger based upon arrangements made by or on behalf of the Company. The Company has heretofore furnished to Parent a complete and correct copy of all agreements between the Company and Dresner Securities, Inc. pursuant to which such firm would be entitled to any payment relating to this Agreement or the Merger.
 
 
As an inducement to the Company to enter into this Agreement, Parent and Merger Sub hereby, jointly and severally, represent and warrant to the Company that:
 
SECTION 4.01 .
Corporate Organization; Certificate of Incorporation and By-laws
 
Each of Parent and Merger Sub is a corporation duly organized, validly existing and in good standing under the laws of the jurisdiction of its incorporation and has the requisite corporate power and authority and all necessary governmental approvals to own, lease and operate its properties and to carry on its business as it is now being conducted, except where the failure have such power, authority and governmental approvals would not, individually or in the aggregate, prevent or delay consummation of the Merger or any of the transactions contemplated hereby. Parent has heretofore made available to the Company a complete and correct copy of the Certificate of Incorporation and the By-laws, each as amended to date, of Parent and Merger Sub. Such Certificates of Incorporation and By-laws are in full force and effect.
 
SECTION 4.02 .
Authority Relative to This Agreement
 
Each of Parent and Merger Sub has all necessary corporate power and authority to execute and deliver this Agreement, to perform its obligations hereunder and to consummate the
 
Merger. The execution and delivery of this Agreement by Parent and Merger Sub and the consummation by Parent and Merger Sub of the Merger have been duly and validly authorized by all necessary corporate action on the part of Parent and Merger Sub, and no other corporate proceedings on the part of Parent or Merger Sub are necessary to authorize this Agreement or to consummate the Merger or any of the other transactions contemplated hereby (other than the filing and recordation of appropriate merger documents as required by the DGCL). This Agreement has been duly and validly executed and delivered by Parent and Merger Sub and, assuming due authorization, execution and delivery by the Company, constitutes the legal, valid and binding obligation of each of Parent and Merger Sub enforceable against each of Parent and Merger Sub in accordance with its terms.
 
SECTION 4.03 .
No Conflict; Required Filings and Consents
 
(a) The execution and delivery of this Agreement by Parent and Merger Sub do not, and the performance of this Agreement by Parent and Merger Sub will not, and the consummation of the Merger and the other transactions contemplated hereby by Parent and Merger Sub will not, (i) conflict with or violate the Certificate of Incorporation or By-laws of either Parent or Merger Sub, (ii) assuming that all consents, approvals and other authorizations described in Section 4.03(b) have been obtained and that all filings and other actions described in Section 4.03(b) have been made or taken, conflict with or violate any Law applicable to Parent or Merger Sub or by which any property or asset of either of them is bound or affected, or (iii) result in any breach of, or constitute a default (or an event which, with notice or lapse of time or both, would become a default) under, or give to others any rights of termination, amendment, acceleration or cancellation of, or result in the creation of a lien or other encumbrance on any property or asset of Parent or Merger Sub pursuant to, any note, bond, mortgage, indenture, contract, agreement, lease, license, permit, franchise or other instrument or obligation to which Parent or Merger Sub is a party or by which Parent or Merger Sub or any property or asset of either of them is bound or affected, except, with respect to clauses (ii) and (iii), for any such conflicts, violations, breaches, defaults or other occurrences which would not, individually or in the aggregate, prevent or materially delay consummation of the Merger.
 
(b) The execution and delivery of this Agreement by Parent and Merger Sub do not, and the performance of this Agreement by Parent and Merger Sub will not, require any consent, approval, authorization or permit of, or filing with or notification to, any Governmental Authority, except for (i) the filing of the Certificate of Merger with the Secretary of the State of Delaware and appropriate documents with the relevant authorities of other states in which the Company and/or Parent are qualified to do business, (ii) such consents, approvals, orders, authorizations, registrations, declarations and filings as may be required under those merger control laws or regulations of any jurisdictions set forth on Schedule 3.05(b) and (iii) such consents, approvals, orders and authorizations as may be required under "blue sky" laws and the securities laws of any foreign country.
 
SECTION 4.04 .
Litigation
 
As of the date of this Agreement, there are no claims, actions, suits, proceedings or investigations of any nature pending or, to the knowledge of Parent, threatened against Parent or Merger Sub, or any properties or assets of Parent or Merger Sub, before any Governmental
 
Authority that, if adversely determined, individually or in the aggregate, would prevent or delay consummation of the Merger or any of the other transactions contemplated hereby. As of the date of this Agreement, neither Parent nor Merger Sub nor any property or asset of Parent or Merger Sub is subject to any court order, writ, determination, judgment, decree, injunction determination or award of any Governmental Authority which, individually or in the aggregate, would prevent or delay consummation of the Merger or any of the other transactions contemplated hereby.
 
SECTION 4.05 .
Financing
 
As of the date of this Agreement, Parent has received, and has provided to the Company, copies of, written commitments (which, as of the date of this Agreement, have not expired or been cancelled, terminated, rescinded, amended or otherwise modified) from Wells Fargo Bank, N.A. to provide, in the aggregate, monies sufficient, together with the Company's existing available cash, for the acquisition of the shares of Company common stock pursuant to Section 2.06(a) of this Agreement and the cancellation of Company Stock Options pursuant to Section 2.07 of this Agreement, and all expenses associated with any of the foregoing (including, but not limited to, applicable broker fees and expenses), and Parent will have sufficient funds to consummate the Merger and the other transactions contemplated by this Agreement.
 
SECTION 4.06 .
Proxy Statement
 
The information supplied by Parent for inclusion in the Proxy Statement shall not, at the date the Proxy Statement (or any amendment or supplement thereto) is first mailed to stockholders of the Company or at the time of the Stockholders' Meeting, contain any untrue statement of a material fact, or omit to state any material fact required to be stated therein or necessary in order to make the statements therein, in light of the circumstances under which they were made, not false or misleading, or necessary to correct any statement in any earlier communication with respect to the solicitation of proxies for the Stockholders' Meeting which shall have become false or misleading.
 
SECTION 4.07 .
Brokers
 
No broker, finder or investment banker is entitled to any brokerage, finder's or other fee or commission in connection with the Merger based upon arrangements made by or on behalf of Parent or Merger Sub, other than any broker, finder or investment banker the fees of which will be payable solely by Parent or Merger Sub.
 
 
SECTION 5.01 .
Conduct of Business by the Company Pending the Merger
 
The Company agrees that during the period from the date of this Agreement and the Effective Time, unless Parent shall otherwise agree in writing, the businesses of the Company and the Subsidiaries shall be conducted only in, and the Company and the Subsidiaries shall not take any action except in, the ordinary course of business and in a manner substantially consistent with past practice or as expressly contemplated by this Agreement or Section 5.01 of
 
the Disclosure Schedule, and the Company shall use its reasonable best efforts to preserve substantially intact the business organization of the Company and the Subsidiaries, to keep available the services of the current officers, employees and consultants of the Company and the Subsidiaries and to preserve the current relationships of the Company and the Subsidiaries with material customers, material suppliers and other persons with which the Company or any Subsidiary has significant business relations. By way of amplification and not limitation, except as expressly contemplated by this Agreement or Section 5.01 of the Disclosure Schedule, neither the Company nor any Subsidiary shall, between the date of this Agreement and the Effective Time, directly or indirectly, do, or propose to do, any of the following without the prior written consent of Parent:
 
(a) amend or otherwise change its Certificate of Incorporation or By-laws;
 
(b) issue, sell, pledge, dispose of, grant, encumber, or authorize the issuance, sale, pledge, disposition, grant or encumbrance of, (i) any shares of any class of capital stock of the Company or any Subsidiary, or any options, warrants, convertible securities or other rights of any kind to acquire any shares of such capital stock, or any other ownership interest (including, without limitation, any phantom interest), of the Company or any Subsidiary (except for the issuance of a maximum of 1,303,814 Shares issuable pursuant to employee stock options outstanding on the date hereof) or (ii) any assets of the Company or any Subsidiary, except in the ordinary course of business and in a manner consistent with past practice;
 
(c) declare, set aside, make or pay any dividend or other distribution, payable in cash, stock, property or otherwise, with respect to any of its capital stock, except for dividends by any direct or indirect wholly owned Subsidiary to the Company or any other Subsidiary;
 
(d) reclassify, combine, split, subdivide or redeem, or purchase or otherwise acquire, directly or indirectly, any of its capital stock (provided that the Company may acquire "restricted stock" that is forfeited in accordance with its terms);
 
(e) (i) acquire (including, without limitation, by merger, consolidation, or acquisition of stock or assets or any other business combination) any corporation, partnership, other business organization or any division thereof or any amount of assets other than the acquisition of supplies or inventory in the ordinary course of business and consistent with past practice; (ii) incur any indebtedness for borrowed money or issue any debt securities or assume, guarantee or endorse, or otherwise become responsible for, the obligations of any person, or make any loans or advances, or grant any security interest in any of its assets except in each case in the ordinary course of business and consistent with past practice; (iii) authorize, or make any commitment with respect to, any single capital expenditure which is in excess of $25,000 or capital expenditures which are, in the aggregate, in excess of $100,000 for the Company and the Subsidiaries taken as a whole; or (iv) enter into or amend any contract, agreement, commitment or arrangement with respect to any matter set forth in this Section 5.01(e);
 
(f) except as provided in Section 6.13, (i) increase the compensation payable or to become payable or the benefits provided to its directors, officers or employees, except for increases in the ordinary course of business and consistent with past practice in salaries, wages, bonuses, incentives or benefits of employees of the Company or any Subsidiary who are not
 
directors or officers of the Company or any Subsidiary; (ii) enter into any severance or termination agreements with any director, officer or other employee of the Company or any Subsidiary; (iii) establish, adopt, enter into or amend any collective bargaining, bonus, profit-sharing, thrift, compensation, stock option, restricted stock, pension, retirement, deferred compensation, employment, termination, severance or other plan, agreement, trust, fund, policy or arrangement for the benefit of any director, officer or employee;
 
(g) except as required by GAAP or the SEC, make any material change in accounting methods, principles or practices;
 
(h) make, revoke or change any election, change annual accounting Tax period, adopt or change any Tax accounting method, file any material federal income Tax Return or material amendment to any federal income Tax Return unless of copies of such federal income Tax Return or material amendment have first been delivered to Parent for its review and comment at a reasonable time prior to filing (provided, however, that notwithstanding the provisions of this Section 5.01(h), the Company shall not be required to delay any required filing with the IRS or other applicable tax authority beyond such filing's due date),enter in any closing agreement, settle any Tax claim or assessment relating to the Company or any of its Subsidiaries, surrender any right to claim or assessment of Taxes, consent to any extension or waiver of the limitation period applicable to any Tax claim or assessment relating to the Company or any Subsidiary, or take any other similar action relating to the filing of any Tax Return or the payment of any Tax, if such election, adoption or other action would have the effect of increasing the Tax liability of Company or any of the Subsidiaries for any period ending after the Effective Time or decreasing any Tax attribute of Company or any of the Subsidiaries existing on the Effective Time;
 
(i) pay, discharge or satisfy any claim, liability or obligation (absolute, accrued, asserted or unasserted, contingent or otherwise), other than (A) the payment, discharge or satisfaction in the ordinary course of business and consistent with past practice, of claims, liabilities or obligations reflected or reserved against in the 2005 Balance Sheet or subsequently incurred in the ordinary course of business, or (B) the payment, discharge or satisfaction of claims, liabilities or obligations not in excess of $25,000 individually or $50,000 in the aggregate;
 
(j) amend, modify or consent to the termination of any Material Contract, or amend, waive, modify or consent to the termination of any material rights of the Company or any Subsidiary thereunder, in a manner adverse in any material respect to the Company or any Subsidiary, other than in the ordinary course of business and consistent with past practice;
 
(k) commence or settle any Action, other than the settlement of Actions for an aggregate amount not in excess of $50,000;
 
(l) engage in any line of business not consistent with any of the Company's current lines of business or abandon any existing line of business;
 
(m) (i) permit any material Owned Intellectual Property to lapse or to be abandoned, dedicated, or disclaimed, fail to perform or make any applicable filings, recordings or other similar actions or filings, or fail to pay all commercially reasonable or required fees and taxes to
 
maintain and protect its interest in any material Owned Intellectual Property, Licensed Intellectual Property, License or Company IT Systems, (ii) sell, assign or grant any security interest in or to any material Owned Intellectual Property, Licensed Intellectual Property, License or Company IT Systems, other than sales of non exclusive licenses therein in the ordinary course of business, (iii) grant to any third party any license with respect to any material Owned Intellectual Property, Licensed Intellectual Property or Company IT Systems, other than in the ordinary course of business or (iv) disclose, or authorize to be disclosed, any confidential Intellectual Property, unless such Intellectual Property is subject to a confidentiality or non-disclosure covenant protecting against disclosure thereof;
 
(n) fail to file with the SEC in a timely manner as required under the Exchange Act and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder (provided that any filing that is deemed timely filed pursuant Rule 12b-25 under the Exchange Act shall be deemed timely filed for this purpose) annual reports on Form 10-K, quarterly reports on Form 10-Q or Current Reports on Form 8-K required to be filed to report matters prescribed by Sections 1.03, 2.01, 2.02, 3.01, 3.02, 3.03, 4.01, 4.02(b), 5.01, 5.02, 5.03, 5.04 or 5.05 of Form 8-K; or
 
(o) announce an intention, enter into any formal or informal agreement or otherwise make a commitment, to do any of the foregoing.
 
 
SECTION 6.01 .
Stockholders' Meeting
 
The Company, acting through the Board, shall, in accordance with applicable law and the Company's Certificate of Incorporation and By-laws, (i) duly call, give notice of, convene and hold an annual or special meeting of its stockholders as promptly as reasonably practicable following the date hereof for the purpose of considering and taking action on this Agreement and the Merger (the "") (provided, however, that in no event shall the Company hold the Stockholders' Meeting prior to January 4, 2006 or be required to hold the Stockholders' Meeting earlier than the thirtieth (30
Stockholders' Meeting
th
) day following the mailing of the Proxy Statement to the holders of Shares entitled to vote at the Stockholders' Meeting); and (ii) (A) subject to Section 6.04, include in the Proxy Statement, and not subsequently withdraw or modify in any manner adverse to Merger Sub or Parent, the unanimous recommendation of the Board that the stockholders of the Company adopt this Agreement and (B) use its reasonable best efforts to obtain such adoption. At the Stockholders' Meeting, Parent and Merger Sub shall cause all Shares then owned by them and their subsidiaries to be voted in favor of the adoption of this Agreement.
 
SECTION 6.02 .
Proxy Statement
 
Promptly following the date hereof, the Company shall file the preliminary Proxy Statement with the SEC under the Exchange Act, and shall use its reasonable best efforts to have the preliminary Proxy Statement cleared by the SEC as promptly as practicable. Each of the Company, Parent and Merger Sub agrees to use its reasonable best efforts, after consultation with the other parties hereto, to respond promptly to all such comments of and requests by the SEC
 
and to cause the Proxy Statement and all required amendments and supplements thereto to be mailed to the holders of Shares entitled to vote at the Stockholders' Meeting as promptly as reasonably practicable after the later of (a) the tenth (10
th
) day after the filing of the preliminary Proxy Statement with the SEC or (b) the day the Company is notified by the SEC that (i) it will not be reviewing the Proxy Statement or (ii) that it has no further comments on the preliminary Proxy Statement.
 
SECTION 6.03 .
Access to Information; Confidentiality
 
(a) Upon reasonable prior notice, the Company and each Subsidiary shall furnish Parent and Merger Sub and the financing sources of Parent or Merger Sub with such financial, operating and other data and information as Parent or Merger Sub, through its officers, employees or agents, may reasonably request and afford the officers, employees, agents and financing sources of Parent and Merger Sub access on a reasonable basis at reasonable times to the officers, employees, properties and other facilities of the Company and the Subsidiaries, for the purposes of securing financing, consummating the transactions contemplated by this Agreement and engaging in integration-planning activities, in each case to the extent permitted by applicable Law.
 
(b) All information obtained by Parent or Merger Sub pursuant to this Section 6.03 shall be kept confidential in accordance with the Mutual Non-Disclosure Agreement, dated July 11, 2005 (the ""), by and between Parent and the Company.
Confidentiality Agreement
 
(c) No investigation pursuant to this Section 6.03 shall affect any representation or warranty in this Agreement of any party hereto or any condition to the obligations of the parties hereto.
 
SECTION 6.04 .
No Solicitation of Transactions
 
(a) The Company agrees that (i) the Company and each of the Subsidiaries, and the officers and directors of the Company and each of the Subsidiaries, and any investment banker, attorney or accountant retained by the Company or any of the Subsidiaries will not, directly or indirectly, and (ii) the Company will not authorize or knowingly permit, and will use its reasonable best efforts to cause, any other agents, employees, advisors and representatives of the Company and the Subsidiaries not to, directly or indirectly: (x) solicit, initiate or knowingly encourage (including by way of furnishing nonpublic information) any inquiries or the making of any proposal of offer (including, without limitation, any proposal or offer to its stockholders) that constitutes, or may reasonably be expected to lead to, any Competing Transaction, or (y) enter into or maintain or continue discussions or negotiations with any person or entity in furtherance of such inquiries or to obtain a proposal or offer for a Competing Transaction, or (z) agree to, approve, endorse or recommend any Competing Transaction or enter into any letter of intent or other contract, agreement or commitment contemplating or otherwise relating to any Competing Transaction. The Company shall notify Parent as promptly as reasonably practicable (and in any event within one (1) business day after the Company attains knowledge thereof), orally and in writing, if any proposal or offer, or any inquiry or contact with any person with respect thereto, regarding a Competing Transaction is made, specifying the material terms and conditions thereof and the identity of the party making such proposal or offer or inquiry or contact (including
 
material amendments or proposed material amendments). As of the date of this Agreement, the Company shall, and shall direct or cause its and the Subsidiaries' directors, officers, employees, representatives and agents to, immediately cease any discussions or negotiations with any parties that may have been conducted heretofore with respect to a Competing Transaction. The Company shall not release any third party from, or waive any provision of, any confidentiality or standstill agreement to which it is a party; that the Company may waive the confidentiality provisions of any such agreement to the extent such a waiver is in the ordinary course of its business consistent with past practice.
provided
 
(b) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this Section 6.04, the Board may furnish information to, and enter into discussions with, a person who has made an unsolicited, written, bona fide proposal or offer regarding a Competing Transaction, if the Board has (i) determined, in its good faith judgment (after having consulted with its financial advisor), that such proposal or offer is, or could reasonably be expected to result in, a Superior Proposal, (ii) determined, in its good faith judgment after consultation with independent legal counsel (who may be the Company's regularly engaged independent legal counsel), that, in light of such proposal or offer, the furnishing of such information or entering into discussions is required to comply with its fiduciary obligations to the Company and its stockholders under applicable Law, (iii) provided written notice to Parent of its intent to furnish information or enter into discussions with such person at least two (2) business days prior to taking any such action, and (iv) obtained from such person an executed confidentiality agreement on terms no less favorable to the Company than those contained in the Confidentiality Agreement (it being understood that such confidentiality agreement and any related agreements shall not include any provision calling for any exclusive right to negotiate with such party or having the effect of prohibiting the Company from satisfying its obligations under this Agreement).
 
(c) Except as set forth in this Section 6.04(c), neither the Board nor any committee thereof shall withdraw or modify, or propose to withdraw or modify, in a manner adverse to Parent or Merger Sub, the approval or recommendation by the Board or any such committee of this Agreement, the Merger or any other Transaction (a "") or approve or recommend, or cause or permit the Company to enter into any letter of intent, agreement or obligation with respect to, any Competing Transaction. Notwithstanding the foregoing, or anything else to the contrary contained herein, if the Board determines, in its good faith judgment prior to the time of the Stockholders Meeting and after consultation with independent legal counsel (who may be the Company's regularly engaged independent legal counsel), that it is required to make a Change in the Company Recommendation to comply with its fiduciary obligations to the Company and its stockholders under applicable Law, the Board may make a Change in the Company Recommendation; provided, however, that the Board may make a Change in the Company Recommendation as a result of a Superior Proposal only (i) after providing written notice to Parent (a "") advising Parent that the Board has received a Superior Proposal, specifying the material terms and conditions of such Superior Proposal and identifying the person making such Superior Proposal and indicating that the Board intends to effect a Change in the Company Recommendation and the manner in which it intends (or may intend) to do so, (ii) if Parent does not, within four (4) business days of Parent's receipt of the Notice of Superior Proposal, make an offer that the Board determines, in its good faith judgment (after having consulted with its financial advisor) to be at least as favorable to the Company's stockholders as such Superior Proposal.
Change in the Company Recommendation
Notice of Superior Proposal
 
SECTION 6.05 .
Directors' and Officers' Indemnification and Insurance
 
(a) If the Merger is consummated, for six years after the Effective Time, Parent shall, and shall cause the Surviving Corporation to, indemnify, defend and hold harmless, the present and former officers and directors of the Company (the "") in respect of acts or omissions occurring prior to the Effective Time to the fullest extent permitted or provided under (i) the Company's Certificate of Incorporation and By-laws as in effect on the date of this Agreement and (ii) any indemnification agreements between the Company and such Company Indemnified Persons in effect on the date of this Agreement ((i) and (ii) collectively, the ""). In connection therewith Parent shall advance expenses to the Company Indemnified Persons as incurred to the fullest extent provided for under the Company Indemnification Provisions, provided the person to whom expenses are advanced provides an undertaking to repay such advances if it is ultimately determined that such person is not entitled to indemnification under the DGCL. Any claims for indemnification made under this Section 6.05(a) on or prior to the sixth (6
Company Indemnified Persons
Company Indemnification Provisions
th
) anniversary of the Effective Time shall survive such anniversary until the final resolution thereof.
 
(b) For a period of six years from and after the Effective Time (the ""), Parent shall cause to be maintained in effect the current policies of directors' and officers' and fiduciary liability insurance maintained by the Company, including with respect to claims arising from facts or events which occurred on or before the Effective Time (including those related to this Agreement and the transactions contemplated hereby); , however, that Parent may substitute therefor policies of at least the same coverage and amounts containing terms and conditions which are no less advantageous to former officers and directors of the Company; and provided, further, that if the aggregate annual premium for such policies at any time during the Indemnification Period will exceed 175% of the per annum rate paid by the Company and its Subsidiaries as of the date of this Agreement for such policies, then Parent shall only be required to provide the maximum coverage on substantially equivalent terms as is then available at an aggregate annual premium equal to 175% of such rate. The provisions of the immediately preceding sentence shall be deemed to have been satisfied if, prior to the Closing, the Company shall have purchased (and the Company is hereby expressly authorized to purchase) fully prepaid "tail" policies under the Company's existing directors' and officers' liability insurance policies, such "tail" policies to (i) provide for aggregate coverage and amounts equal to the aggregate coverage provided under the Company's current directors' and officers' liability insurance policies, (ii) be effective for the Indemnification Period, and (iii) otherwise be on terms and conditions reasonably acceptable to the Board of Directors of the Company, provided that the aggregate premium therefor may not exceed $200,000 (and if the aggregate premium for such policies for the Indemnification Period would exceed $200,000, then the Company may purchase such coverage as is available for an aggregate premium of $200,000). During the Indemnification Period, the Surviving Corporation shall (x) maintain such policies in full force and effect, (y) not amend or otherwise modify any of such policies or take any action that would result in the cancellation, termination, amendment or modification of any of such policies, and (z) continue to honor its obligations under such policies.
Indemnification Period
provided
 
(c) The provisions of this Section 6.05 are (i) intended to be for the benefit of, and shall be enforceable by, each Company Indemnified Person (it being expressly agreed that the Company Indemnified Persons to whom this Section 6.05 applies shall be third party beneficiaries of this Section 6.05), and (ii) in addition to, and not in substitution for, any other rights to indemnification or contribution that any such Person may have pursuant to Law, by contract or otherwise. The obligations of Parent under this Section 6.05 shall not be terminated or modified in such a manner as to adversely affect the rights of any Company Indemnified Person under this Section 6.05 without the consent of such affected Company Indemnified Person.
 
(d) This Section 6.05 shall be binding on all successors and assigns of the Surviving Corporation and Parent, and shall be enforceable by the Company Indemnified Persons. Without limiting the foregoing, if the Surviving Corporation or any of its successors or assigns (i) consolidates with or merges into any other person and shall not be the continuing or surviving corporation or entity of such consolidation or merger, or (ii) transfers all or substantially all of its assets to any person, then and in each such case, proper provision shall be made so that the successors and assigns of the Surviving Corporation or its assets assume the obligations set forth in this Section 6.05.
 
(e) This Section 6.05 is intended to be for the benefit of and to grant third party rights to the Company Indemnified Persons, whether or not parties to this Agreement, and each of the Company Indemnified Persons shall be entitled to enforce the covenants contained herein. The parties hereto agree that irreparable damage would occur to the Company Indemnified Persons in the event that any of the provisions of Section 6.05(b) were not performed in accordance with their specific terms or were otherwise breached. It is accordingly agreed that each of the Company Indemnified Persons shall be entitled to an injunction or injunctions (without the necessity of posting any bond or other security) to prevent breaches of Section 6.05(b), this being in addition to any other remedy to which they are entitled at law or in equity.
 
SECTION 6.06 .
Notification of Certain Matters
 
The Company shall give prompt notice to Parent, and Parent shall give prompt notice to the Company, of (a) the occurrence, or non-occurrence, of any event the occurrence, or non-occurrence, of which reasonably could be expected to cause any representation or warranty contained in this Agreement and made by such person to be untrue or inaccurate in any material respect, (b) any failure of the Company, Parent or Merger Sub, as the case may be, to comply in all material respects with or satisfy any covenant or agreement to be complied with or satisfied by it hereunder and (c) any other material development relating to the business, prospects, financial condition or results of operations of the Company and the Subsidiaries; , , that the delivery of any notice pursuant to this Section 6.06 shall not limit or otherwise affect the remedies available hereunder to the party receiving such notice.
provided
however
 
SECTION 6.07 .
Further Action; Reasonable Best Efforts
 
(a) Upon the terms and subject to the conditions of this Agreement, each of the parties hereto shall (i) use its reasonable best efforts to take, or cause to be taken, all appropriate action, and to do, or cause to be done, all things necessary, proper or advisable under applicable Laws to
 
consummate and make effective the Merger, including, without limitation, using its reasonable best efforts to obtain all permits, consents, approvals, authorizations, qualifications and orders of Governmental Authorities and parties to contracts with the Company and the Subsidiaries as are necessary for the consummation of the Merger; that neither Merger Sub nor Parent will be required by this Section 6.07 to take any action, including entering into any consent decree, hold separate orders or other arrangements, that (A) requires the divestiture of any assets of any of Merger Sub, Parent, the Company or any of their respective subsidiaries or (B) limits Parent's freedom of action with respect to, or its ability to retain, the Company and the Subsidiaries or any portion thereof or any of Parent's or its affiliates' other assets or businesses. In case, at any time after the Effective Time, any further action is necessary or desirable to carry out the purposes of this Agreement, the proper officers and directors of each party to this Agreement shall use their reasonable best efforts to take all such action.
provided
 
(b) Each of the parties hereto agrees to cooperate and use its reasonable best efforts (i) to vigorously contest and resist (including without limitation, defense through litigation on the merits) any Action, including administrative or judicial Action, challenging this Agreement, the Merger or any of the transactions contemplated hereby, or otherwise seeking to make illegal or to restrict, prevent, prohibit or delay the consummation of the Merger or any of the other transactions contemplated hereby and (ii) to have vacated, lifted, reversed or overturned any decree, judgment, injunction or other order (whether temporary, preliminary or permanent) that is in effect and that restricts, prevents or prohibits consummation of the Merger or any of the other transaction contemplated hereby, including, without limitation, by vigorously pursuing all available avenues of administrative and judicial appeal.
 
SECTION 6.08 .
Subsequent Financial Statements
 
The Company shall, if reasonably practicable, consult with Parent prior to making publicly available its financial results for any period after the date of this Agreement and prior to filing any report or document with the SEC after the date of this Agreement, it being understood that Parent shall have no liability by reason of such consultation; provided that, notwithstanding the provisions of this Section, the Company shall not be required to delay any required filing with the SEC beyond such filing's due date.
 
SECTION 6.09 .
Public Announcements
 
Parent and the Company shall consult with each other before issuing any press release or otherwise making any public statements with respect to this Agreement or the Merger and shall not issue any such press release or make any such public statement prior to such consultation, except as may be required by Law or the rules or regulations of any United States or non-United States securities exchange or NASDAQ. The parties have agreed upon the form of a joint press release announcing the execution of this Agreement.
 
SECTION 6.10 .
Tax Certificate
 
The Company shall provide the Parent and Merger Sub, on or not more than 30 days prior to the Effective Time, a certificate (in a form reasonably satisfactory to Parent and Merger Sub) meeting the requirements of Treasury regulation sections 1.897 2(h) and 1.1445.5(b)(4)(iii).
 
SECTION 6.11 .
Employee Benefits
 
As promptly as reasonably practicable after the Effective Time, Parent shall enroll those persons who were employees of the Company or the Subsidiaries immediately prior to the Effective Time and who remain employees of the Surviving Corporation or the Subsidiaries or become employees of Parent following the Effective Time ("") in Parent's employee benefit plans for which such employees are eligible (the ""), including its medical plan, dental plan, life insurance plan and disability plan, to the extent permitted by the terms of the applicable Parent Plans on substantially similar terms applicable to employees of Parent who are similarly situated based on levels of responsibility. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, Parent shall recognize the prior service with the Company of each of the Continuing Employees in connection with Parent's PTO policy, and in connection with Parent's qualified retirement plan for purposes of eligibility and vesting, to the extent permitted by such policy and Parent Plans. Notwithstanding anything in this Section 6.11 to the contrary, this Section 6.11 shall not operate to (a) duplicate any benefit provided to any Continuing Employee or to fund any such benefit not previously funded, (b) except as provided for in Section 6.13, require Parent to continue in effect any Plans or any severance plan or other employee benefit plan of Parent (or prevent the amendment, modification or termination thereof) following the Effective Time for Parent's employees, including the Continuing Employees, or (c) be construed to mean the employment of the Continuing Employees is not terminable by Parent at will at any time, with or without cause, for any reason or no reason.
Continuing Employees
Parent Plans
 
SECTION 6.12 .
Termination of Certain Benefit Plans
 
To the extent requested in writing by Parent no later than ten business days prior to the Closing, the Company shall take (or cause to be taken) all actions necessary or appropriate to terminate, effective no later than the date immediately preceding the Closing, any Plan that contains a cash or deferred arrangement intended to qualify under Section 401(k) of the Code (each, a "") in accordance with the provisions of such Company 401(k) Plan and applicable Law. If Parent requests that any such Company 401(k) Plan be terminated, the Board shall adopt resolutions authorizing the termination of such Company 401(k) Plan effective no later than the day immediately preceding the Closing, such resolutions to be subject to review and approval by Parent's counsel.
Company 401(k) Plan
 
SECTION 6.13 .
Severance; Retention Bonuses
 
Parent, Merger Sub and the Company agree that each of the employees of the Company listed on Section 6.13 of the Disclosure Schedule shall be entitled to receive a "retention bonus" or similar compensation and/or severance or termination benefits in the amounts and otherwise on such terms and conditions set forth in Section 6.13 of the Disclosure Schedule. At or prior to the Effective Time, the Company and the Subsidiaries may enter into agreements and/or Plans with such employees with respect to such compensation and/or benefits, and from and after the Effective Time, the Surviving Corporation or Parent shall, and shall cause its affiliates to, honor and assume, in accordance with their terms, all such agreements and/or Plans.
 
SECTION 6.14 .
401(k) Matching Contributions
 
The Company, Parent and Merger Sub agree that, promptly after December 31, 2005 and prior to any termination required under Section 6.12, the Company or the Surviving Corporation, as applicable, shall make the "Matching Contributions" (as defined in such Company 401(k) Plan) to the accounts of all employees of the Company that are participants in any Company 401(k) Plan as of December 31, 2005, and that such Matching Contributions shall be the maximum amounts permitted under such Company 401(k) Plan, whether or not the Effective Time has occurred on or prior to the date of payment of such Matching Contributions.
 
 
SECTION 7.01 .
Conditions to the Merger
 
(a) The obligations of each party to effect the Merger shall be subject to the satisfaction, at or prior to the Effective Time, of the following conditions:
 
(i) . This Agreement shall have been approved and adopted, and the Merger shall have been duly approved, by the requisite vote under applicable law, by the stockholders of the Company.
Stockholder Approval
 
(ii) . No Governmental Authority of competent jurisdiction shall have enacted, issued, promulgated, enforced or entered any Law (whether temporary, preliminary or permanent) which is then in effect and has the effect of making the acquisition of Shares by Parent or Merger Sub or any affiliate of either of them illegal or otherwise restricting, preventing or prohibiting consummation of the Merger.
No Order
 
(b) The obligation of the Company to effect the Merger shall be subject to the satisfaction at or prior to the Closing of the following additional conditions, any of which may be waived in writing by the Company:
 
(i) The representations and warranties of Parent set forth herein (other than in Section 4.02) (A) that are qualified as to Material Adverse Effect shall be true an correct and (B) that are not so qualified as to Material Adverse Effect shall be true and correct, in each case both when made and at and as of the Closing, as if made at and as of such time (except to the extent expressly made as of a particular date, in which case as of such date), except to the extent such that the failure of such representations and warranties referred to in clause (B) to be so true and correct does not have, and would not reasonably be expected to have, individually or in the aggregate, a Material Adverse Effect on Parent and at the Closing the Company shall have received a certificate to such effect executed by an executive officer of Parent.
 
(ii) The representations and warranties of Parent set forth in Section 4.02 shall be true and correct both when made and at and as of the Closing, as if made at and as of such time and at the Closing the Company shall have received a certificate to such effect executed by an executive officer of Parent.
 
(iii) Parent shall have performed and complied in all material respects with all of its covenants contained in Article VI on or before the Closing (to the extent that such covenants require performance by Parent on or before the Closing).
 
(c) The respective obligations of Parent and Merger Sub to effect the Merger shall be subject to the satisfaction at or prior to the Closing of the following additional conditions, any of which may be waived in writing by Parent and Merger Sub:
 
(i) The representations and warranties of the Company set forth herein (other than in Section 3.03 (excluding the last sentence of Section 3.03(a)) and Section 3.04) (A) that are qualified as to Material Adverse Effect shall be true and correct and (B) that are not so qualified as to Material Adverse Effect shall be true and correct, in each case both when made and at and as of the Closing, as if made at and as of such time (except to the extent expressly made as of a particular date, in which case as of such date), except to the extent such that the failure of such representations and warranties referred to in clause (B) to be so true and correct does not have, and would not reasonably be expected to have, individually or in the aggregate, a Material Adverse Effect on the Company and at the Closing Parent shall have received a certificate to such effect executed by the chief executive officer and the principal financial officer of the Company.
 
(ii) The representations and warranties of the Company set forth in Section 3.03 (excluding the last sentence of Section 3.03(a)) and Section 3.04 shall be true and correct (other than in the case of Section 3.03, any de minimus failure not to exceed 0.3% of the outstanding Company Common Stock to be true and correct) both when made and at and as of the Closing Date, as if made at and as of such time, and at the Closing Parent shall have received a certificate to such effect executed by the chief executive officer and the principal financial officer of the Company.
 
(iii) The Company shall have performed and complied in all material respects with all of its covenants contained in Article V at or before the Closing (to the extent that such covenants require performance by the Company at or before the Closing), and at the Closing Parent shall have received a certificate to such effect executed by the chief executive officer and the principal financial officer of the Company.
 
(iv) No litigation or proceeding shall be threatened in writing or pending (i) for the purpose or with the probable effect of making illegal or enjoining the consummation of the Merger or other transactions contemplated by this Agreement, (ii) seeking any action or result as set forth in Section 7.01(a)(ii).
 
(v) The Company and the Subsidiaries shall have cash and cash equivalents in an aggregate amount in excess of $10,500,000.
 
(vi) The Company shall have received written resignations from all of the incumbent members of the Board, such resignations to take effect upon the Effective Time.
 
 
SECTION 8.01 .
Termination
 
This Agreement may be terminated at any time prior to the Effective Time by action taken or authorized by the Board of Directors of the terminating party or parties, which action (A) in the case of Section 8.01(a), Section 8.01(b)(i), Section 8.01(b)(ii), Section 8.01(c) and Section 8.01(d), may be taken or authorized before or after the Stockholders' Meeting, (B) in the case of Section 8.01(e) and Section 8.01(f), may be taken or authorized only before the Stockholders' Meeting, and (C) in the case of Section 8.01(b)(iii), may be taken or authorized only after the Stockholders' Meeting where a vote was taken:
 
(a) by mutual written consent of the Company and Parent, if the Board of Directors of each so determines;
 
(b) by written notice of either the Company or Parent (as authorized by the Board of Directors of the Company or Parent, as applicable):
 
(i) if the Merger shall not have been consummated by March 31, 2006, ,, that the right to terminate this Agreement under this Section 8.01(b)(i) shall not be available to any party whose failure to comply with any provision of this Agreement has been the cause of, or resulted in, the failure of the Merger to be consummated by such date;
provided
however
 
(ii) if a Governmental Authority of competent jurisdiction shall have issued an order, decree or ruling or taken any other action (including the failure to have taken an action), in any case having the effect of permanently restraining, enjoining or otherwise prohibiting the Merger or the other transactions contemplated by this Agreement, which order, decree, ruling or other action is final and nonappealable, ,, that the right to terminate this Agreement under this Section 8.01(b)(ii) shall not be available to any party whose failure to comply with any provision of this Agreement has been the cause of, or resulted in, such action;
provided
however
 
(iii) if the Company Stockholder Approval shall not have been obtained at the Stockholders' Meeting, or at any adjournment or postponement thereof, at which the vote thereon was taken; provided, however, that the right to terminate this Agreement under this Section 8.01(b)(iii) shall not be available to the Company where the failure to obtain the Company Stockholder Approval shall have been caused by the failure of the Company to comply with any provision of this Agreement or a breach of any Voting Agreement by any party thereto other than Parent or Merger Sub;
 
(c) by the Company (as authorized by the Board) upon a breach of any representation, warranty, covenant or agreement on the part of Parent set forth in this Agreement, or if any representation or warranty of Parent shall have become untrue, in either case such that the conditions set forth in Section 7.01(b)(i) or Section 7.01(b)(ii) would not be satisfied as of the time of such breach or as of the time such representation or warranty shall have become untrue and in any such case such breach shall be incapable of being cured or shall not have been cured in all material respects within thirty (30) days after written notice thereof shall have been received by Parent;
 
(d) by Parent (as authorized by its Board of Directors) upon a breach of any representation, warranty, covenant or agreement on the part of the Company set forth in this Agreement, or if any representation or warranty of the Company shall have become untrue, in either case such that the conditions set forth in Section 7.01(c)(i) or Section 7.01(c)(ii) would not be satisfied as of the time of such breach or as of the time such representation or warranty shall have become untrue and in any such case such breach shall be incapable of being cured or shall not have been cured in all material respects within thirty (30) days after written notice thereof shall have been received by the Company;
 
(e) by Parent (as authorized by its Board of Directors), at any time prior to Company Stockholder Approval, if the Company, the Board or any committee thereof, for any reason, shall have (i) failed to call or hold the Company Stockholders' Meeting in accordance with Section 6.01, (ii) failed to include in the Proxy Statement the unanimous recommendation of the Board that the stockholders of the Company approve this Agreement and the Merger, (iii) effected a Change in the Company Recommendation, (iv) approved or recommended any Competing Transaction, (v) failed to reconfirm the unanimous recommendation of the Board that the stockholders of the Company approve this Agreement and the Merger within ten (10) business days of receipt of a written request from Parent to do so after the public disclosure of a Competing Transaction or (vi) failed, within ten (10) business days after any tender or exchange offer relating to Company Common Stock commenced by any third Person shall have been first published, sent or given, to have sent to its security holders pursuant to Rule 14e-2 promulgated under the Exchange Act a statement disclosing that the Board of Directors of the Company recommends rejection of such tender offer or exchange offer; or
 
(f) by the Company (as authorized by the Board), in order to enter a definitive acquisition agreement providing for a Superior Proposal immediately after the termination of this Agreement, if the Board (or any special committee thereof) in response to such Superior Proposal that did not follow a breach of Section 6.04 has effected a Change in the Company Recommendation in accordance with Section 6.04, provided that simultaneously with such termination the Company pays the Termination Fee in accordance with Section 8.03.
 
SECTION 8.02 .
Effect of Termination
 
In the event of termination of this Agreement as provided in Section 8.01 hereof and any payment of a Termination Fee to the extent required by Section 8.03, this Agreement shall forthwith become void and there shall be no liability on the part of any of the parties, except (a) as set forth in Section 6.03(b) (Confidentiality), this Section 8.02 (Effect of Termination) and Section 8.03 (Payments), as well as Article IX (General Provisions) to the extent applicable to such surviving sections, each of which shall survive termination of this Agreement, and (b) that nothing herein shall relieve any party from any further liability for any breach of this Agreement. No termination of this Agreement shall affect the obligations of the parties contained in the Confidentiality Agreement, all of which obligations shall survive termination of this Agreement in accordance with their terms.
 
SECTION 8.03 .
Payments
 
(a) . In the event that this Agreement is terminated by the Company pursuant to Section 8.01(b)(iii) or by Parent pursuant to any of Section 8.01(b)(iii), Section 8.01(d) (but, in the case of Section 8.01(d), only if such termination is due to an intentional breach of any representation, warranty or covenant by the Company), or Section 8.01(e), the Company shall promptly, but in no event later than two business days after the date of such termination (subject to the further provisions of this Section 8.03(a)), pay Parent a fee equal to $2,000,000 (the ""); provided, that in the case of a termination pursuant to Section 8.01(b)(iii), Section 8.01(d) (but, in the case of Section 8.01(d), only if such termination is due to a willful or intentional breach of any representation, warranty or covenant by the Company), Section 8.01(e)(v) or Section 8.01(e)(vi), the Termination Fee shall be payable only if following the date of this Agreement and prior to such termination, (A) any Person shall have proposed to the Company or its stockholders, or publicly announced, a Competing Transaction with respect to the Company and (B) within nine (9) months following termination of this Agreement, (i) any Competing Transaction with respect to the Company is consummated or (ii) the Company enters into a contract providing for any Competing Transaction, then such fee payment is to be made concurrently with the earlier of the consummation of such Competing Transaction or the execution of such contract, as applicable. In the event that this Agreement is terminated by the Company pursuant to Section 8.01(f), the Company shall, in order to effect such termination, pay Parent the Termination Fee concurrently with the termination of this Agreement.
Payments by the Company
Termination Fee
 
(b) . In the event that this Agreement is terminated by the Company or Parent pursuant to Section 8.01(b)(i) or Section 8.01(b)(ii) (but in the case of either Section 8.01(b)(i) or 8.01(b)(ii), only if (A) the Company Stockholder Approval has occurred and (B) the condition to closing set forth in Section 7.01(c)(v) shall be satisfied as of the date of such termination) or by the Company pursuant to Section 8.01(c) (but in the case of Section 8.01(c), only if such termination is due to a willful or intentional breach of any representation, warranty or covenant by Parent), Parent shall promptly, but in no event later than two business days after the date of such termination, pay the Company a fee equal to the Termination Fee.
Payments by Parent
 
(c) . All payments under this Section 8.03 shall be made by wire transfer of immediately available funds to an account designated by Parent or the Company, as applicable. The Company and Parent acknowledge that the agreements contained in this Section 8.03 are an integral part of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement and that, without these agreements, neither the Company nor Parent would enter into this Agreement. Accordingly, if the Company or Parent fails to pay in a timely manner the amounts due pursuant to this Section 8.03 and, in order to obtain such payment, Parent, or the Company, as applicable, makes a claim that results in a judgment against the Company or Parent, as applicable, the Company or Parent, as applicable, shall pay to Parent or Company, as applicable, its reasonable costs and expenses (including reasonable attorneys' fees and expenses) in connection with such suit, together with interest on the amounts set forth in this Section 8.03 at the rate of interest per annum publicly announced by Bank of America as its prime rate, as in effect on the date such payment was required to be made. Payment of the fees described in this Section 8.03 shall not be in lieu of damages incurred in the event of breach of this Agreement.
Interest and Costs
 
(d) . Except as set forth in this Section 8.03, all fees and expenses incurred in connection with this Agreement and the transactions contemplated hereby shall be paid by the party incurring such expenses whether or not the Merger is consummated; , , that Parent shall pay any necessary filing fees, and expenses (other than legal and accounting expenses) for any reports and forms to be submitted to any Governmental Authority under any merger control laws or regulations pursuant to Section 6.07(a), and the Company shall pay the filing, printing and mailing fees and expenses payable on account of the Proxy Statement.
Fees and Expenses
provided
however
 
SECTION 8.04 .
Amendment
 
Subject to applicable Law, this Agreement may be amended by the parties hereto by action taken by or on behalf of their respective Boards of Directors at any time prior to the Effective Time; ,, that, after the adoption of this Agreement and the Merger by the stockholders of the Company, no amendment may be made that would reduce the amount or change the type of consideration into which each Share shall be converted upon consummation of the Merger. This Agreement may not be amended except by an instrument in writing signed by each of the parties hereto.
provided
however
 
SECTION 8.05 .
Waiver
 
Subject to applicable Law, at any time prior to the Effective Time, any party hereto may (a) extend the time for the performance of any obligation or other act of any other party hereto, (b) waive any inaccuracy in the representations and warranties of any other party contained herein or in any document delivered pursuant hereto and (c) waive compliance with any agreement of any other party or any condition to its own obligations contained herein. Any such extension or waiver shall be valid if set forth in an instrument in writing signed by the party or parties to be bound thereby.
 
 
SECTION 9.01 .
Notices
 
All notices, requests, claims, demands and other communications hereunder shall be in writing and shall be given (and shall be deemed to have been duly given upon receipt) by delivery in person, by overnight courier, by facsimile or by registered or certified mail (postage prepaid, return receipt requested) to the respective parties at the following addresses (or at such other address for a party as shall be specified in a notice given in accordance with this Section 9.01):
 
if to Parent or Merger Sub:
 
Natus Medical Incorporated
1501 Industrial Road
San Carlos, CA 94070
Telecopier No.: (650) 802-6630
Attention: James B. Hawkins, President and Chief Executive Officer
 
with a copy to:
 
Fenwick & West LLP
801 California Street
Mountain View, CA 94041
Telecopier No. (650) 938-5200
Attention: Daniel J. Winnike
 
if to the Company:
 
Bio-logic Systems Corp.
One Bio-logic Plaza
Mundelein, IL 60060
Telecopier No.: (847) 949-8615
Attention: Gabreiel Raviv, Ph.D., Chariman and Chief Executive Officer
                  Roderick G. Johnson, President and Chief Operating Officer
 
with a copy to:
 
Katten Muchin Rosenman LLP
525 W. Monroe Street
Chicago, IL 60661
Telecopier No. (312) 577-8858
Attention: Mark D. Wood
 
SECTION 9.02 .
Severability
 
If any term or other provision of this Agreement is determined by a court of competent jurisdiction to be invalid, illegal or incapable of being enforced by any rule of law, or public policy, all other conditions and provisions of this Agreement shall nevertheless remain in full force and effect so long as the economic or legal substance of the Merger is not affected in any manner materially adverse to any party. Upon such determination that any term or other provision is invalid, illegal or incapable of being enforced, the parties hereto shall negotiate in good faith to modify this Agreement so as to effect the original intent of the parties as closely as possible in a mutually acceptable manner in order that the Merger and the other transactions contemplated hereby be consummated as originally contemplated to the fullest extent possible.
 
SECTION 9.03 .
Entire Agreement; Assignment
 
This Agreement and the documents and instruments and other agreements among the parties hereto as contemplated by or referred to herein, including the Disclosure Schedule, constitute the entire agreement among the parties with respect to the subject matter hereof and supersede all prior agreements, understandings, representations, conditions, covenants and undertakings, both written and oral, among the parties, or any of them, with respect to the subject matter hereof, it being understood that the Confidentiality Agreement shall survive any termination of this Agreement. This Agreement shall not be assigned (whether pursuant to a merger, by operation of law or otherwise).
 
SECTION 9.04 .
Parties in Interest
 
This Agreement shall be binding upon and inure solely to the benefit of each party hereto, and nothing in this Agreement, express or implied, is intended to or shall confer upon any other person any right, benefit or remedy of any nature whatsoever under or by reason of this Agreement, except as set forth in Section 6.05 (which is intended to be for the benefit of the persons covered thereby and may be enforced by such persons).
 
SECTION 9.05 .
Specific Performance
 
The parties hereto agree that irreparable damage would occur in the event any provision of this Agreement were not performed in accordance with the terms hereof and that the parties shall be entitled to specific performance of the terms hereof, without the necessity of posting bond or other security and without the necessity of showing actual damages, in addition to any other remedy at law or equity.
 
SECTION 9.06 .
Governing Law
 
This Agreement shall be governed by, and construed in accordance with, the laws of the State of Delaware applicable to contracts executed in and to be performed in that State.
 
SECTION 9.07 .
Waiver of Jury Trial
 
Each of the parties hereto hereby waives to the fullest extent permitted by applicable law any right it may have to a trial by jury with respect to any litigation directly or indirectly arising out of, under or in connection with this Agreement or the Merger. Each of the parties hereto (a) certifies that no representative, agent or attorney of any other party has represented, expressly or otherwise, that such other party would not, in the event of litigation, seek to enforce that foregoing waiver and (b) acknowledges that it and the other parties hereto have been induced to enter into this Agreement and the Merger, as applicable, by, among other things, the mutual waivers and certifications in this Section 9.07.
 
SECTION 9.08 .
Headings
 
The descriptive headings contained in this Agreement are included for convenience of reference only and shall not affect in any way the meaning or interpretation of this Agreement.
 
SECTION 9.09 .
Counterparts
 
This Agreement may be executed and delivered (including by facsimile transmission) in one or more counterparts, and by the different parties hereto in separate counterparts, each of which when executed shall be deemed to be an original but all of which taken together shall constitute one and the same agreement.
 
SECTION 9.10 .
Non-Survival of Representations and Warranties
 
The representations and warranties of the Company, Parent and Merger Sub contained in this Agreement, or any instrument delivered pursuant to this Agreement, shall terminate at the
 
Effective Time, and only the covenants that by their terms survive the Effective Time and the provisions of this Article IX shall survive the Effective Time.
 
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, Parent, Merger Sub and the Company have caused this Agreement to be executed as of the date first written above by their respective officers thereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 
This VOTING AGREEMENT (this "") is entered into as of October 16, 2005, by and between Natus Medical Incorporated, a Delaware corporation (""), and the undersigned stockholder ("") of Bio-logic Systems Corp., a Delaware corporation (the ""). Terms not otherwise defined herein shall have the respective meanings ascribed to them in the Merger Agreement (as defined below).
Agreement
Acquiror
Stockholder
Company
 
 
 
 
NOW, THEREFORE, in consideration of the premises and the covenants and agreements set forth in the Merger Agreement and in this Agreement, and other good and valuable consideration, the receipt and sufficiency of which are hereby acknowledged, the parties hereto hereby agree as follows:
 
1. . Until the Expiration Date (as defined below), subject to the terms and conditions herein and in the Merger Agreement,
Restrictions on Shares
 
(a) Stockholder shall not, directly or indirectly, transfer (except as may be specifically required by court order or by operation of law), grant an option with respect to, sell, exchange, pledge or otherwise dispose of or encumber the Shares (as such term is defined in Section 4 below) or any New Shares (as such term is defined in Section 1(d) below), or make any offer or enter into any agreement providing for any of the foregoing, at any time prior to the Expiration Date (as defined below); , , that nothing contained herein will be deemed to restrict the ability of Stockholder to exercise, prior to the Expiration Date, any Company Stock Options (as such term is defined in Section 2.07 of the Merger Agreement) held by Stockholder. Notwithstanding the foregoing or anything else contrary herein, (a) Stockholder may sell New Shares (as defined below) acquired
provided
however
 
upon exercise of Company Stock Options, provided that the number of New Shares sold does not exceed , and (b) Stockholder may transfer any or all of the Shares or New Shares during Stockholder's lifetime by gift to, or on Stockholder's death by will or intestacy to, Stockholder's Immediate Family (as defined below) or to a trust for the benefit of Stockholder or Stockholder's Immediate Family or to a charitable organization (the ""), provided that each transferee or other recipient of Permitted Transfer Shares expressly agrees in a writing satisfactory to Parent that the provisions of this Agreement will continue to apply to the Permitted Transfer Shares in the hands of such transferee or other recipient and such transferee or other recipient executes and delivers to Parent an irrevocable proxy in a form substantially identical to the Proxy (as such term is defined in Section 3 below). As used herein, the term "" shall mean Stockholder's spouse, lineal descendant or antecedent, brother or sister, adopted child or grandchild or the spouse of any child, adopted child, grandchild or adopted grandchild of Stockholder. As used herein, the term "" shall mean the earlier of (i) the Effective Time and (ii) the date and time of the valid termination of the Merger Agreement in accordance with its terms.
            
Permitted Transfer Shares
Immediate Family
Expiration Date
 
(b) Except pursuant to the terms of this Agreement, Stockholder shall not, directly or indirectly, grant any proxies or powers of attorney with respect to any of the Shares, deposit any of the Shares into a voting trust, or enter into a voting agreement (other than this Agreement) or similar arrangement or commitment with respect to any of the Shares.
 
(c) Stockholder shall not, directly or indirectly, take any action that would make any representation or warranty contained herein untrue or incorrect or have the effect of impairing the ability of Stockholder to perform its obligations under this Agreement or preventing or delaying the consummation of any of the transactions contemplated hereby.
 
(d) Any shares of the common stock of the Company (the "") or other securities of the Company that Stockholder purchases or with respect to which Stockholder otherwise acquires voting rights after the date of this Agreement and prior to the Expiration Date, including pursuant to the exercise of Company Stock Options, options or warrants to purchase shares of Common Stock (collectively, the "") shall be subject to the terms and conditions of this Agreement to the same extent as if they constituted Shares.
Common Stock
New Shares
 
2. . Prior to the Expiration Date, at every meeting of the stockholders of the Company called with respect to any of the following matters, and at every adjournment or postponement thereof, and on every action or approval by written consent or resolution of the stockholders of the Company with respect to any of the following matters, Stockholder shall vote, to the extent not voted by the person(s) appointed under the Proxy (as defined in Section 3 below), the Shares and any New Shares in favor of the approval of the Merger Agreement and any matter that could reasonably be expected to facilitate the Merger, and against any Competing Transaction (as such term is defined in Article I of the Merger Agreement) and any other matter that might reasonably be expected to impede, interfere with, delay, postpone or adversely affect the Merger or any of the transactions contemplated by the Merger Agreement. Stockholder may vote the Shares and any New Shares, in Stockholder's discretion, on all other matters.
Agreement to Vote Shares
 
3. . Concurrently with the execution and delivery of this Agreement, Stockholder shall deliver to Acquiror a duly executed proxy in the form attached hereto as (the ""), which proxy is coupled with an interest, and, until the Expiration Date, shall be irrevocable to the fullest extent permitted by law, with respect to each and every meeting of stockholders of the Company or action or approval by written resolution or consent of stockholders of the Company with respect to the matters contemplated by Section 2 covering the total number of Shares and New Shares in respect of which Stockholder is entitled to vote at any such meeting or in connection with any such written consent. Upon the execution of this Agreement by Stockholder, (i) Stockholder hereby revokes any and all prior proxies (other than the Proxy) given by Stockholder with respect to the subject matter contemplated by Section 2, and (ii) Stockholder shall not grant any subsequent proxies with respect to such subject matter, or enter into any agreement or understanding with any Person to vote or give instructions voting with respect to the Shares and New Shares in any manner inconsistent with the terms of Section 2, until after the Expiration Date.
Irrevocable Proxy
Exhibit A
Proxy
 
4. . Stockholder hereby represents, warrants and covenants to Acquiror as follows:
Representations, Warranties and Covenants of Stockholder
 
(a) Stockholder is the beneficial owner (as determined pursuant to Rule 13d-3 under the Exchange Act) of, and exercises voting power over, that number of shares of Company Common Stock set forth on the signature page hereto (all such shares owned beneficially by Stockholder, and over which Stockholder exercises voting power, on the date hereof, collectively, the ""). The Shares, together with the other shares of Common Stock set forth on the signature page hereto, constitute all of the shares of Common Stock owned of record or beneficially by Stockholder. No person not a signatory to this Agreement has a right to acquire or vote any of the Shares (other than, (i) if Stockholder is a partnership, the rights and interest of persons and entities that own partnership interests in Stockholder under the partnership agreement governing Stockholder and applicable partnership law or (ii) if Stockholder is a married individual and resides in a State with community property laws, the community property interest of his or her spouse to the extent applicable under such community property laws). Except as set forth on the signature pages hereto, the Shares are and will be at all times up until the Expiration Date free and clear of any security interests, liens, claims, pledges, options, rights of first refusal, co-sale rights, agreements, limitations on Stockholder's voting rights, charges and other encumbrances of any nature that would adversely affect the Merger or the exercise or fulfillment of the rights and obligations of the Company under the Merger Agreement or of the parties to this Agreement. Stockholder's principal residence or place of business is set forth on the signature page hereto.
Shares
 
(b) Stockholder has all requisite power, capacity and authority to enter into this Agreement and to consummate the transactions contemplated hereby. The execution and delivery of this Agreement by Stockholder and the consummation by Stockholder of the transactions contemplated hereby have been duly authorized by all necessary action, if any, on the part of Stockholder. This
 
Agreement has been duly executed and delivered by Stockholder and, assuming the due authorization, execution and delivery of this Agreement by Acquiror, constitutes a valid and binding obligation of Stockholder, enforceable against Stockholder in accordance with its terms, subject to applicable bankruptcy, insolvency, fraudulent conveyance, reorganization, moratorium and similar laws affecting creditors' rights and remedies generally and to general principles of equity.
 
(c) The execution and delivery of this Agreement does not, and the consummation of the transactions contemplated hereby and compliance with the provisions hereof will not, conflict with, result in a breach or violation of or default (with or without notice or lapse of time or both) under, or require notice to or the consent of any person under, any agreement, law, rule, regulation, judgment, order or decree by which Stockholder is bound, except for such conflicts, breaches, violations or defaults that would not, individually or in the aggregate, prevent or delay consummation of the Merger and the other transactions contemplated by the Merger Agreement or prevent or delay Stockholder from performing his, her or its obligations under this Agreement.
 
(d) Until the Expiration Date, Stockholder, in his, her or its capacity as a stockholder of the Company, shall not, and shall not authorize, knowingly encourage or direct any person or entity on Stockholder's behalf to, directly or indirectly, take any action that would, or could reasonably be expected to, result in the violation by the Company of Section 5 of the Merger Agreement; provided that if Stockholder is a director of the Company or has employees who are directors of the Company, nothing herein shall prevent Stockholder (or such employees) from taking any action solely in such Stockholder's (or employee's) capacity as a director of the Company in the exercise of such director's fiduciary duties with respect to a Competing Transaction or Superior Proposal (as such term is defined in Article I of the Merger Agreement) in compliance with the terms of the Merger Agreement.
 
5. . Stockholder hereby gives any consents or waivers that are reasonably required for the consummation of the Merger under the terms of any agreement or instrument to which Stockholder is a party or subject or in respect of any rights Stockholder may have in connection with the Merger or the other transactions provided for in the Merger Agreement (whether such rights exist under the certificate of incorporation or bylaws of the Company, any contract to which the Company is a party or by which it is, or any of its assets are, bound under statutory or common law or otherwise). Without limiting the generality or effect of the foregoing, Stockholder hereby waives any and all rights to contest or object to the execution and delivery of the Merger Agreement, the Company Board of Directors' actions in approving and recommending the Merger, the consummation of the Merger and the other transactions provided for in the Merger Agreement, or to seek damages or other legal or equitable relief in connection therewith. From and after the Effective Time, Stockholder's right to receive cash on the terms and subject to the conditions set forth in the Merger Agreement shall constitute Stockholder's sole and exclusive right against the Company and/or Acquiror in respect of Stockholder's ownership of the Shares or status as a stockholder of the Company or any agreement or instrument with the Company pertaining to the Shares or Stockholder's status as a stockholder of the Company.
Consent and Waiver; Termination of Existing Agreements
 
6. . Stockholder shall hold any information regarding this Agreement and the Merger in strict confidence and shall not divulge any such information to any third person until the Acquiror has publicly disclosed the Merger.
Confidentiality
 
7. . Stockholder agrees not to exercise any rights of appraisal or any dissenters' rights that Stockholder may have (whether under applicable law or otherwise) or could potentially have or acquire in connection with the Merger.
Appraisal Rights
 
8. . Notwithstanding anything to the contrary herein, Stockholder is only executing this Agreement in his capacity as the beneficial owner of the Shares and any New Shares and is not making any agreement hereunder in his capacity as a director of the Company, and the agreements herein shall in no way restrict Stockholder in his exercise of his fiduciary duties as a director of the Company.
Stockholder Capacity
 
9. .
Miscellaneous
 
 
 
Natus Medical Incorporated
1501 Industrial Road
San Carlos, CA 94070
Attention: James B. Hawkins, President and Chief Executive Officer
Facsimile No.: (650) 802-6630
Telephone No.: (650) 802-0400
 
with a copy (which shall not constitute notice) to:
 
Fenwick & West LLP
801 California Street
Mountain View, CA 94041
Attention: Daniel J. Winnike
Facsimile No.: (650) 938-5200
Telephone No.: (650) 988-8500
 
 
Katten Muchin Rosenman LLP
525 West Monroe Street
Chicago, Illinois 60661
Attention: Mark D. Wood
Facsimile No.: (312) 902-8858
Telephone No.: (312) 902-5493
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have caused this Agreement to be executed as of the date first above written.
 
 
Shares (as defined) beneficially owned on the date hereof:
 
 
Other shares of Common Stock owned of record or beneficially by Stockholder, over which he does not currently exercise voting power:
 
 
*[FOOTNOTE TO BE INSERTED DESCRIBING NON-VOTING BENEFICIAL OWNERSHIP]If any Company Stock Options held by the undersigned are exercised, then such resulting shares of Common Stock will be subject to this Agreement, as will any additional shares of Common Stock acquired subsequent to date of this Agreement.
 
 
 
The undersigned stockholder of Bio-logic Systems Corp., a Delaware corporation (the "), hereby irrevocably (to the fullest extent permitted by applicable law) appoints Steven J. Murphy and James B. Hawkins of Natus Medical Incorporated, a Delaware corporation (""), and each of them, as the sole and exclusive attorneys and proxies of the undersigned, with full power of substitution and resubstitution, to vote and exercise all voting rights (to the fullest extent that the undersigned is entitled to do so) with respect to all of the outstanding shares of capital stock of the Company that now are or hereafter may be beneficially owned (as determined pursuant to Rule 13d-3 under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended) by the undersigned, and over which the undersigned exercises voting power, and any and all other shares or securities of the Company issued in respect thereof on or after the date hereof (collectively, the ") in accordance with the terms of this Irrevocable Proxy, until the Expiration Date (as defined below). The Shares beneficially owned by the undersigned stockholder of the Company as of the date of this Irrevocable Proxy are listed on the final page of this Irrevocable Proxy. Upon the undersigned's execution of this Irrevocable Proxy, any and all prior proxies given by the undersigned with respect to any Shares are hereby revoked and the undersigned agrees not to grant any subsequent proxies or enter into any agreement or understanding with any Person (as defined in the Merger Agreement (as defined below)) to vote or give voting instructions with respect to the Shares and New Shares in any manner inconsistent with the terms of this Irrevocable Proxy until after the Expiration Date (as defined below).
"Company
Acquiror
"Shares
 
Until the Expiration Date (as defined below), this Irrevocable Proxy is irrevocable (to the fullest extent permitted by applicable law), is coupled with an interest, is granted pursuant to that certain Voting Agreement dated as of even date herewith by and between Acquiror and the undersigned, and is granted in consideration of Acquiror entering into that certain Agreement and Plan of Merger, dated as of October 16, 2005, by and among Acquiror, Summer Acquisition Corporation, a Delaware corporation and wholly owned subsidiary of Acquiror ("") and the Company (the ""), pursuant to which Merger Sub will merge with and into the Company (the ""), and the Company will survive the Merger and become a wholly owned subsidiary of Acquiror (subject to the terms and conditions contained in the Merger Agreement). As used herein, the term "" shall mean the earlier to occur of (i) such date and time as the Merger shall become effective in accordance with the terms and provisions of the Merger Agreement, and (ii) the date and time of the valid termination of the Merger Agreement in accordance with its terms.
Merger Sub
Merger Agreement
Merger
Expiration Date
 
The attorneys and proxies named above, and each of them, are hereby authorized and empowered by the undersigned, at any time prior to the Expiration Date, to act as the
 
undersigned's attorney and proxy to vote the Shares, and to exercise all voting and other rights of the undersigned with respect to the Shares (including, without limitation, the power to execute and deliver written consents pursuant to the Delaware General Corporation Law), at every annual, special or adjourned meeting of the stockholders of the Company and in every written consent in lieu of such meeting as follows: (i) in favor of approval of the Merger, the adoption of the Merger Agreement and the Certificate of Merger and any matter that could reasonably be expected to facilitate the Merger and (ii) against any Competing Transaction (as such term is defined in Article I of the Merger Agreement) and any other matter that might reasonably be expected to impede, interfere with, delay, postpone or adversely affect the Merger or any of the transactions contemplated by the Merger Agreement.
 
The attorneys and proxies named above may not exercise this Irrevocable Proxy on any other matter except as provided above. The undersigned stockholder may vote the Shares on all other matters.
 
All authority herein conferred shall survive the death or incapacity of the undersigned and any obligation of the undersigned hereunder shall be binding upon the heirs, personal representatives, successors and assigns of the undersigned.
 
 
Until the Expiration Date, this Irrevocable Proxy is coupled with an interest as aforesaid and is irrevocable (to the fullest extent permitted by applicable Law). This Irrevocable Proxy may not be amended or otherwise modified without the prior written consent of Acquiror. This Irrevocable Proxy shall terminate, and be of no further force and effect, automatically upon the Expiration Date.
 
Dated: October 16, 2005
 
 
Other shares of Common Stock owned or record or beneficially by Stockholder, over which he does not exercise voting power as of the date of this Irrevocable Proxy:
 
 
*[FOOTNOTE TO BE INSERTED DESCRIBING NON-VOTING BENEFICIAL OWNERSHIP]If any Company Stock Options held by the undersigned are exercised, then such resulting shares of Common Stock will be subject to this Irrevocable Proxy, as will any additional shares of Common Stock acquired subsequent to date of this Irrevocable Proxy.
 
 
 
 
Bio-logic Systems Corp., a Delaware corporation ("")does hereby certify to the following facts relating to the merger (the "") of Summer Acquisition Corporation, a Delaware corporation (""), with and into Bio-logic, with Bio-logic remaining as the surviving corporation of the Merger (the ""):
Bio-logic
,
Merger
Summer
Surviving Corporation
 
 
This Certificate of Merger shall become effective on .
                        
, Bio-logic has caused this Certificate of Merger to be executed by its duly authorized officers as of .
IN WITNESS WHEREOF
                    
 
 
 
 
 
The name of the corporation is Bio-Logic Systems Corp.
 
 
The address of the registered office of the corporation in the State of Delaware is 3500 South Dupont Highway, City of Dover, County of Kent, DE 19901. The name of its registered agent at that address is Incorporating Services, Ltd.
 
 
The purpose of the corporation is to engage in any lawful act or activity for which corporations may be organized under the General Corporation Law of the State of Delaware.
 
 
The total number of shares of stock which the corporation has authority to issue is One Thousand (1,000) shares, all of which shall be Common Stock, $0.001 par value per share.
 
 
The Board of Directors of the corporation shall have the power to adopt, amend or repeal the Bylaws of the corporation.
 
 
Election of directors need not be by written ballot unless the Bylaws of the corporation shall so provide.
 

Exhibit 10.2
 
 
This C S P A (this "") is made and entered into as of October 16, 2005 by and among Natus Medical Incorporated, a Delaware corporation (the ""), and the parties listed on the Schedule of Investors attached to this Agreement as (each hereinafter individually referred to as an "" and collectively referred to as the "").
OMMON
TOCK
URCHASE
GREEMENT
Agreement
Company
Exhibit A
Investor
Investors
 
 
WHEREAS, the Company desires to sell to the Investors, and the Investors desire to purchase from the Company, shares of the Company's common stock, par value $0.001 per share (the ""), on the terms and conditions set forth in this Agreement;
Common Stock
 
NOW, THEREFORE, in consideration of the foregoing and the representations, warranties, covenants and agreements set forth in this Agreement, the parties agree as follows:
 
 
1.1 . As of the Closing (as defined below), the Company will have authorized the issuance, pursuant to the terms and conditions of this Agreement, of 600,000 shares of the Company's Common Stock (the "").
Authorization
Shares
 
1.2 . The Company agrees to sell to each Investor at the Closing, and each Investor agrees, severally and not jointly, to purchase from the Company at the Closing, the number of Shares set forth beside such Investor's name on , at a price of $11.88 per share.
Agreement to Purchase and Sell
Exhibit A
 
 
2.1 . The purchase and sale of the Shares will take place at the offices of Fenwick & West LLP, Silicon Valley Center, 801 California Street, Mountain View, California, at 10:00 a.m. Pacific Time, on October 18, 2005 or at such other time and place as the Company and Investors who have agreed to purchase a majority of the Shares listed on mutually agree upon (which time and place are referred to in this Agreement as the ""). At the Closing, the Company will deliver to each Investor a certificate representing the number of Shares that such Investor has agreed to purchase hereunder as shown on against delivery to the Company by such Investor of the full purchase price of such Shares, paid by (i) a check payable to the Company's order, (ii) wire transfer of funds to the Company, or (iii) any combination of the foregoing.
Closing
Exhibit A
Closing
Exhibit A
 
The Company represents and warrants to, and covenants with, the Investors that as of the date of this Agreement:
 
3.1 The Company has filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the "") all documents required to be filed pursuant to the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (the "") during the 12 months preceding the date of this Agreement. The following documents (collectively, the "") complied when filed in all material respects with the Exchange Act and the applicable rules and regulations of the Commission thereunder:
Commission
Exchange Act
Exchange Act Documents
 
(i) Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the Quarters ended March 31, 2005 and June 30, 2005;
 
(ii) Annual Report on Form 10-K for the Year ended December 31, 2004, as amended;
 
(iii) Definitive Proxy Statement filed with the Commission on April 29, 2005; and
 
(iv) All other documents required to be filed pursuant to the Exchange Act, if any, filed by the Company with the Commission since December 31, 2004.
 
The Exchange Act Documents did not, when so filed, contain any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact necessary to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading. All financial statements contained in the Exchange Act Documents have been prepared in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles, consistently applied, during the periods involved (except in the case of unaudited interim statements, to the extent they may exclude footnotes or may be condensed or summary statements) and fairly present in all material respects the financial position of the Company as of the dates thereof and the results of its operations and cash flows for the periods then ended (subject, in the case of unaudited statements, to normal year-end audit adjustments). Since the Company's most recently filed Form 10-Q, there has been no material adverse change and no development that would result in a material adverse effect. Neither the Company nor any of its subsidiaries has taken any steps, and does not currently expect to take any steps, to seek protection pursuant to any bankruptcy or similar law nor does the Company or any of its subsidiaries have any knowledge or reason to believe that its creditors intend to initiate involuntary bankruptcy proceedings.
 
3.2 The Company has been duly incorporated, is validly existing as a corporation in good standing under the laws of the jurisdiction of its incorporation, has the corporate power and authority to own or lease its properties and to conduct its business as currently conducted and as described in the Exchange Act Documents and is duly qualified to transact business and is in good standing in each jurisdiction which requires such qualification, except as would not have a material adverse effect. Neither the Company nor any subsidiary is in violation or default in any respect (i) of any provision of its Certificate (or Articles) of Incorporation, or Bylaws, or (ii) of any judgment, order, writ, decree to which it is a party or by
 
which it is bound, or of any provision of any federal or state statute, rule or regulation applicable to it, or (iii) of any agreement, indenture or instrument to which it is a party (except for violations or defaults with respect to clauses (ii) and (iii) that would not have a material adverse effect).
 
3.3 The execution and delivery by the Company of, and the performance by the Company of its obligations under, this Agreement has been duly authorized, and this Agreement has been duly executed and delivered by, and is a valid and binding agreement of, the Company, enforceable in accordance with its terms, subject to applicable bankruptcy, insolvency or similar laws affecting creditors' rights generally and general principles of equity and except as rights to indemnification and contribution in Section 7.5 hereof may be limited under applicable law.
 
3.4 The authorized capital stock of the Company conforms to the description thereof contained in the Exchange Act Documents. To the Company's knowledge, since the initial public offering of Common Stock, the Company has granted no registration rights, including piggy back rights, to any persion.
 
3.5 The shares of common stock outstanding prior to the issuance of the Shares have been duly authorized and are validly issued, fully paid and non-assessable.
 
3.6 The Shares have been duly authorized and, when issued and delivered in accordance with the terms of this Agreement, will be validly issued, fully paid and non-assessable. The shares will be free and clear of all liens other than restrictions on transfer as described herein or as created by the Investors. The issuance of the Shares is not subject to any preemptive rights or similar rights.
 
3.7 The execution and delivery by the Company of, and the performance by the Company of its obligations under, this Agreement will not contravene any provision of applicable law or the certificate of incorporation or by-laws of the Company or any agreement or other instrument binding upon the Company or any of its subsidiaries that is material to the Company and its subsidiaries, taken as a whole, or any judgment, order or decree of any governmental body, agency or court having jurisdiction over the Company or any subsidiary, and no consent, approval, authorization or order of, or qualification with, any governmental body or agency is required for the performance by the Company of its obligations under this Agreement, except such as may be required by the securities or blue sky laws of the various states or foreign jurisdictions in connection with the offer and sale of the Shares and by Federal and state securities laws with respect to the Company's obligations under Article VII of this Agreement.
 
3.8 There are no legal or governmental proceedings pending or, to the Company's knowledge, threatened to which the Company or any of its subsidiaries is a party or to which any of the properties of the Company or any of its subsidiaries is subject other than proceedings accurately described in all material respects in the Exchange Act Documents and proceedings that would not reasonably be expected to be material to the Company and its subsidiaries, taken as a whole, or on the power or ability of the Company to perform its obligations under this Agreement to consummate the transactions contemplated by this Agreement.
 
3.9 Assuming the accuracy of the Investors' representations herein, it is not necessary in connection with the offer, sale and delivery of the Shares to the Investors in the
 
manner contemplated by this Agreement to register the Shares under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended (the "") or register or qualify such Shares under any state securities laws, and neither the Company nor any authorized agent acting on its behalf will take any action hereafter that would cause the loss of such exemption.
Securities Act
 
3.10 The Company shall comply with all requirements of the National Association of Securities Dealers, Inc. with respect to the issuance of the Shares and the listing thereof on The Nasdaq National Market.
 
3.11 The Company owns, or has a valid license to use, all trademarks, service marks, trade names, copyrights, trade secrets, domain names, software, technology, know-how, other intellectual property and, to the Compan's knowledge, patents (the "Intellectual Property") necessary to or used in the conduct of the business of the Company and its subsidiaries as now conducted (except where such failure to own or have a valid license would not have a material adverse effect).
 
3.12 The Company represents and warrants that based on its corporate records, and the representations made in Section 4.10, that after giving effect to the transactions contemplated herein, (a) the Investors taken together will not be an "Acquiring Person" as defined in that certain Preferred Stock Rights Agreement by and between the Company and EquiServe Trust Company, N.A., dated as of Spetember 4, 2002, as amended by that certain Amendment No. 1 to Preferred Stock Rights Agreement dated as of February 14, 2003 and that certain Amendment No. 2 to Preferred Stock Rights Agreement dated as of March 15, 2005, and (b) no applicable state control share act, significant business transaction act, or other similar state law regarding the acquisition of shares of a publicly traded company, will be triggered by the transactions contemplated hereby or will apply to the Shares.
 
 
Each Investor, severally and not jointly, represents and warrants to, and covenants with, the Company that as of the date of this Agreement the following.
 
4.1 Each Investor represents that it is an entity duly organized, validly existing and in good standing under the laws of the state of its formation.
 
4.2 Each Investor is an "accredited investor" within the meaning of Regulation D promulgated under the Securities Act and has requested, received, reviewed and considered all information it deems relevant in making an informed decision to purchase the Shares. Each Investor is experienced in evaluating companies such as the Company. At no time was any Investor presented with or solicited by any publicly issued or circulated newspaper, mail, radio, television or, to the Investors's knowledge, any other form of general advertising or solicitation in connection with the offer, sale and purchase of the Shares.
 
4.3 Each Investor is acquiring the number of Shares set forth on the signature page hereto in the ordinary course of its business and for its own account for investment only and with no present intention of distributing any of such Shares or any arrangement or understanding with any other persons regarding the distribution of such Shares, other than as contemplated in Article VII of this Agreement. Each Investor represents that it has not been formed for the specific purpose of acquiring the Shares.
 
4.4 Each Investor will not, directly or indirectly, offer, sell, pledge, transfer or otherwise dispose of (or solicit offers to buy, purchase or otherwise acquire or take a pledge of) any of the Shares, except in compliance with the Securities Act and the applicable rules and regulations of the Commission thereunder.
 
4.5 No Investor will make any sale of the Shares without complying with applicable federal and state securities laws, and each Investor acknowledges that the certificates evidencing the Shares will be imprinted with a legend in substantially the following form (and a stop-transfer order may be placed against transfer of the certificates for the Shares):
 
"THE SECURITIES REPRESENTED BY THIS CERTIFICATE HAVE NOT BEEN REGISTERED UNDER THE SECURITIES ACT OF 1933, AS AMENDED (THE "ACT"), OR UNDER THE SECURITIES LAWS OF ANY OTHER JURISDICTIONS. THESE SECURITIES ARE SUBJECT TO RESTRICTIONS ON TRANSFERABILITY AND RESALE AND MAY NOT BE TRANSFERRED OR RESOLD EXCEPT AS PERMITTED UNDER THE ACT AND THE APPLICABLE STATE SECURITIES LAWS, PURSUANT TO REGISTRATION OR EXEMPTION THEREFROM. INVESTORS SHOULD BE AWARE THAT THEY MAY BE REQUIRED TO BEAR THE FINANCIAL RISKS OF THIS INVESTMENT FOR AN INDEFINITE PERIOD OF TIME. THE ISSUER OF THESE SECURITIES MAY REQUIRE AN OPINION OF COUNSEL IN FORM AND SUBSTANCE SATISFACTORY TO THE ISSUER TO THE EFFECT THAT ANY PROPOSED TRANSFER OR RESALE IS IN COMPLIANCE WITH THE ACT AND ANY APPLICABLE STATE SECURITIES LAWS."
 
The legend set forth above shall be removed by the Company from any certificate evidencing Shares upon delivery to the Company of an opinion by counsel, reasonably satisfactory to the Company, to the effect that a registration statement under the Securities Act is at that time in effect with respect to the legended security or to the effect that such security can be freely transferred in a public sale without such a registration statement being in effect and that such transfer will not jeopardize the exemption or exemptions from registration pursuant to which the Company issued the Shares; provided, however, that no such opinion shall be required in connection with sales of Shares pursuant to any Piggyback Registration Statement or requests for legend removal where the Shares can be sold by an Investor pursuant to the provisions of Rule 144(k). In connection with any such opinion, the Investor shall provide such certifications as may be reasonably be deemed necessary for the delivery of such opinion.
 
4.6 This Agreement has been duly authorized, executed and delivered by, and is a valid and binding agreement of, each Investor, enforceable in accordance with its terms, subject to applicable bankruptcy, insolvency or similar laws affecting creditors' rights generally and general principles of equity and except as rights to indemnification and contribution in Section 7.5 hereof may be limited under applicable law.
 
4.7 No Investor will, except with respect to Registrable Securities covered by an effective Piggyback Registration Statement, if then prohibited by law or regulation, (i) sell, offer to sell, solicit offers to buy, dispose of, loan, pledge or grant any right with respect to (collectively, a ""), the Shares, or (ii) engage in any hedging or other transaction
Disposition
 
which is designed or could reasonably be expected to lead to or result in a Disposition of Common Stock by an Investor or any person. Such prohibited hedging or other transaction would include, without limitation, effecting any short sale or having in effect a short position (whether such short sale or position is against the box and regardless of when such position was entered into) or any purchase, sale or grant of any right (including, without limitation, any put or call option) with respect to the Common Stock or with respect to any security (other than a broad-based market basket or index) that includes or derives any significant part of its value from the Common Stock.
 
4.8 Each Investor will hold in confidence all information concerning this Agreement and the placement of Shares hereunder until the earlier of such time as the Company has made a public announcement concerning this Agreement and the placement of Shares hereunder, or this Agreement is terminated. Each Investor acknowledges that for purposes of the foregoing, "hold in confidence" shall include not trading securities of the Company.
 
4.9 The Investors represent that, when taken together with their affiliates and associates (as such terms are defined in Rule 12b-2 of the General Rules and Regulations under the Exchange Act), they will beneficially own (as defined in Rule 13d-3 under the Exchange Act) in the aggregate 3,508,914 shares of Common Stock as a result of the sale and purchase of Shares pursuant to this Agreement.
 
4.10 Each Investor represents that it and its affiliates do not hold, hold any derivatives securities related to, or have any other interest in any securities of Bio-Logic Systems Corp., a Delaware corporation.
 
 
The obligations of the Investors under Articles I and II of this Agreement are subject to the fulfillment or waiver, on or before Closing, of each of the following conditions:
 
5.1 . The representations and warranties of the Company contained in this Agreement shall be true and correct in all material respects on the date of the Closing (other than representations and warranties that address matters only as of a particular date, which shall be true and correct as of such date).
Representations and Warranties
 
5.2 . The Company shall have performed and complied in all material respects with all agreements, obligations and conditions contained in this Agreement that are required to be performed or complied with by it on or before each Closing.
Performance
 
5.3 . The offer and sale of the Shares to the Investors pursuant to this Agreement shall be exempt from the registration requirements of the Securities Act, the registration and/or qualification requirements of all other applicable state securities laws.
Securities Exemptions
 
 
The obligations of the Company under this Agreement are subject to the fulfillment or waiver on or before the Closing of each of the following conditions:
 
6.1 . The representations and warranties of each Investor contained in Article IV shall be true and correct in all material respects on the date of each Closing with the same effect as though such representations and warranties had been made on and as of such Closing.
Representations and Warranties
 
6.2 . Each Investor shall have performed and complied in all material respects with all agreements, obligations and conditions contained in this Agreement that are required to be performed or complied with by it on or before each Closing, including the delivery to the Company of the purchase price for the Shares specified for such Investor on in accordance with the provisions of Article II.
Performance
Exhibit A
 
6.3 . The issuance of the Shares to the Investors pursuant to this Agreement shall be exempt from the registration requirements of the Securities Act, and the registration and/or qualification requirements of all other applicable state securities laws.
Securities Exemptions
 
 
7.1 . For purposes of this Agreement:
Definitions
 
(a) . The term "" means such form under the Securities Act as is in effect on the date hereof or any successor registration form under the Securities Act subsequently adopted by the Commission that permits inclusion or incorporation of substantial information by reference to other documents filed by the Company with the Commission.
Form S-3
Form S-3
 
(b) . The term "" shall mean holders of Registrable Securities that have registration rights pursuant to this Agreement.
Holder
Holders
 
(c) . The terms "," "" and "" refer to a registration effected by preparing and filing a registration statement in compliance with the Securities Act, and the declaration or ordering of effectiveness of such registration statement.
Registration
register
registered
registration
 
(d) . The term "" means: (1) all of the Shares and (2) any shares of Common Stock issued as a dividend or other distribution with respect to, or in exchange for or in replacement of, any of the Shares; provided, however, that the term "Registrable Securities" shall exclude in all events (and such securities shall not constitute "Registrable Securities") (i) any Registrable Securities sold or transferred in violation of state or federal securities laws, (ii) any Registrable Securities sold in a public offering pursuant to a registration statement filed with the Commission or sold pursuant to Rule 144 or (iii) as to any Holder, the Registrable Securities held by such Holder if all of such Registrable Securities can be publicly sold without volume restriction within a three-month period pursuant to Rule 144.
Registrable Securities
Registrable Securities
 
(e) . The term "" shall mean the prospectus included in any Piggyback Registration Statement (including, without limitation, a prospectus that discloses information previously omitted from a prospectus filed as part of an effective registration statement in reliance upon Rule 430A promulgated under the Securities Act), as amended or supplemented by any prospectus supplement (including, without limitation, any prospectus supplement with respect to the terms of the offering of any portion of the Registrable Securities covered by such Piggyback Registration Statement), and all other amendments and supplements to the Prospectus, including post-effective amendments, and all material incorporated by reference or deemed to be incorporated by reference in such Prospectus.
Prospectus
Prospectus
 
7.2 .
Piggyback Registrations
 
(a) . The Company shall notify all Holders of Registrable Securities in writing at least thirty (30) days prior to filing any registration statement under the Securities Act for purposes of effecting a public offering of securities of the Company for its own account or for the account of others (but registration statements relating solely to any employee benefit plan or a corporate reorganization or Rule 145 transaction, or a registration on any registration form which does not permit secondary sales, or a registration on any registration form which does not include substantially the same information as would be required to be included in a registration statement covering the sale of Registrable Securities) (each such registration statement, a ""), and shall afford each such Holder an opportunity to include in such registration statement all or any part of the Registrable Securities then held by such Holder. Each Holder desiring to include in any such registration statement all or any part of the Registrable Securities held by such Holder shall, within twenty (20) days after receipt of the above-described notice from the Company, so notify the Company in writing, and in such notice shall inform the Company of the number of Registrable Securities such Holder wishes to include in such registration statement, and the Company shall include, subject to the provisions of 7.2(b), all of the Registrable Securities that each such Holder has requested to be registered. If a Holder decides not to include all of its Registrable Securities in any registration statement thereafter filed by the Company, such Holder shall nevertheless continue to have the right to include any Registrable Securities in any subsequent registration statement or registration statements as may be filed by the Company with respect to offerings of its securities, all upon the terms and conditions set forth hereunder.
Piggyback Registration Statements
excluding
Piggyback Registration Statement
 
(b) . If a Piggyback Registration Statement in connection with which the Company gives notice under this Section 7.2 is for an underwritten offering, then the Company shall so advise the Holders of Registrable Securities. In such event, the right of any such Holder's Registrable Securities to be included in a registration pursuant to this Section 7.2 shall be conditioned upon such Holder's participation in such underwriting and the inclusion of such Holder's Registrable Securities in the underwriting to the extent provided herein. All Holders proposing to distribute their Registrable Securities through such underwriting shall enter into an underwriting agreement in customary form with the managing underwriter or underwriter(s) selected for such underwriting. Notwithstanding any other provision of this Agreement, if the managing underwriter determine(s) in good faith that marketing factors require a limitation of the number of shares to be underwritten, then the
Underwriting
 
managing underwriter(s) may exclude shares (including Registrable Securities) from the registration and the underwriting, and the number of shares that may be included in the registration and the underwriting shall be allocated, , to the Company and to Holders requesting inclusion of their Registrable Securities in such registration statement on a pro rata basis based on the number of Registrable Securities each such Holder has requested to be included in the registration. If any Holder disapproves of the terms of any such underwriting, such Holder may elect to withdraw therefrom by written notice, given in accordance with Section 8.6 hereof, to the Company and the managing underwriter, delivered at least twenty (20) days prior to the effective date of the registration statement. Any Registrable Securities excluded or withdrawn from such underwriting shall be excluded and withdrawn from the registration. For any Holder that is a partnership or corporation, the partners, retired partners and shareholders of such Holder, or the estates and family members of any such partners and retired partners and any trusts for the benefit of any of the foregoing persons shall be deemed to be a single "Holder," and any pro rata reduction with respect to such "Holder" shall be based upon the aggregate amount of shares carrying registration rights owned by all entities and individuals included in such "Holder," as defined in this sentence.
first
second
 
(c) . "" means, with respect to a registration, a period in each case commencing on the day immediately after the Company notifies the Purchasers that they are required, pursuant to Section 7.3(f), to suspend offers and sales of Registrable Securities during which the Company, in the good faith judgment of its Board of Directors, determines (because of the existence of, or in anticipation of, any acquisition, financing activity, or other transaction involving the Company, or the unavailability of any required financial statements, disclosure of information which is in its best interest not to publicly disclose, or any other event or condition of similar significance to the Company) that the registration and distribution of the Registrable Securities to be covered by such registration statement, if any, would be seriously detrimental to the Company and its shareholders and ending on the earlier of (1) the date upon which the material non-public information commencing the S-3 Blackout Period is disclosed to the public or ceases to be material and (2) such time as the Company notifies the selling Holders that the Company will no longer delay such filing of the Registration Statement, will recommence taking steps to make such Registration Statement effective, or will allow sales pursuant to such Registration Statement to resume; that (a) the Company shall limit its use of S-3 Blackout Periods, in the aggregate, to 60 trading days in any 12-month period and (b) no S-3 Blackout Period may commence sooner than 60 days after the end of a prior S-3 Blackout Period. Each Holder of Registrable Securities agrees that, upon receipt of any notice of an S-3 Blackout Period, such Holder shall discontinue disposition of Registrable Securities pursuant to the registration statement covering such Registrable Securities until such Holder's receipt of the copies of the supplemented or amended prospectus contemplated by Section 7.3(c) hereof or notice of the end of the S-3 Blackout Period, and, if so directed by the Company, such Holder shall deliver to the Company (at the Company's expense) all copies (including, without limitation, any and all drafts), other than permanent file copies, then in such Holder's possession, of the prospectus covering such Registrable Securities current at the time of receipt of such notice.
Blackout Notice
S-3 Blackout Period
provided, however,
 
(d) . The registration fees and expenses incurred by the Company in connection with any Piggyback Registration Statement and actions taken by the Company in connection with any blackout notice provided under Section 7.2(c), including,
Expenses
 
without limitation, all registration, qualification and filing fees, printing expenses, escrow fees, fees and disbursements of counsel for the Company, blue sky fees and expenses, and the expense of any special audits incident to or required by any such registration, but excluding underwriters' discounts and commissions, and the reasonable fees and disbursements of one counsel for the selling Holders; provided, however, that such counsel shall submit reasonably detailed invoices for review by the Company prior to payment. Except as set forth in this Section, Holder shall be responsible for any fees and expenses of its counsel or other advisers. Each Holder participating in a registration pursuant to this Article VII shall bear such Holder's proportionate share (based on the number of shares sold by such Holder over the total number of shares included in such registration at the time it goes effective) of all discounts, commissions or other amounts payable to underwriters or brokers in connection with such offering.
 
7.3 . The Company shall furnish to the Holder such number of copies of a Prospectus, including a preliminary Prospectus, in conformity with the requirements of the Securities Act, and such other documents (including supplements or prospectus amendments) as the Holder may reasonably request in order to facilitate the public sale or other disposition of the Registrable Securities owned by it that are included in such registration. In addition, whenever required to effect the registration of any Registrable Securities under this Agreement, the Company shall, as expeditiously as reasonably possible:
Obligations of the Company
 
(a) Prepare and file with the Commission such amendments and supplements to such registration statement and the prospectus used in connection with such registration statement as may be necessary to comply with the provisions of the Act with respect to the disposition of all securities covered by such registration statement.
 
(b) Use its best efforts to (i) register and qualify the securities covered by such registration statement under such other securities or blue sky laws of such jurisdictions as shall be reasonably requested by the Holder, provided that the Company shall not be required in connection therewith or as a condition thereto to qualify to do business or to file a general consent to service of process in any such states or jurisdictions, (ii) to keep such registration or qualification in effect for so long as the related Piggyback Registration Statement remains in effect and (iii) to take any other action which may be reasonably necessary or advisable to enable the Holders to consummate the disposition in such jurisdictions of the securities to be sold by the Holders, consistent with the plan of distribution described in the prospectus included in the related Piggyback Registration Statement, except that the Company shall not for any such purpose be required to qualify generally to do business as a foreign corporation in any jurisdiction where it is not so qualified, or to subject itself to taxation in any such jurisdiction, or to execute a general consent to service of process in effecting such registration, qualification or compliance, unless the Company is already subject to service in such jurisdiction and except as may be required by the Securities Act or applicable rules or regulations thereunder.
 
(c) Notify the Holder promptly (i) of any request by the Commission or any other federal or state governmental authority during the period of effectiveness of a registration statement for amendments or supplements to such registration statement or related prospectus or for additional information, (ii) of the issuance by the Commission or any other federal or state governmental authority of any stop order suspending the effectiveness of a registration statement or the initiation of any proceedings for that purpose and (iii) of the receipt by the Company of any notification with respect to the suspension of the qualification or exemption from qualification of any of the Registrable Securities for sale in any jurisdiction or the initiation or threatening of any proceeding for such purpose.
 
(d) Make all commercially reasonable efforts to obtain the withdrawal of any order suspending the effectiveness of any Piggyback Registration Statement at the earliest possible time.
 
(e) Cause all Registrable Securities to be listed on each securities exchange or market, if any, on which equity securities issued by the company are then listed.
 
(f) As promptly as practicable after becoming aware of such event, notify each Holder of such Registrable Securities at any time when a prospectus relating thereto is required to be delivered under the Securities Act of the happening of any event which comes to the Company's attention if as a result of such event the prospectus included in such Registration Statement contains an untrue statement of a material fact or omits to state any material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading, and the Company shall promptly prepare and furnish to such Holder a supplement or amendment to such prospectus (or prepare and file appropriate reports under the Exchange Act) so that, as thereafter delivered to the purchasers of such Registrable Securities, such prospectus shall not contain an untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state any material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading, unless suspension of the use of such prospectus otherwise is authorized herein or in the event of an S-3 Blackout Period, in which case no supplement or amendment need be furnished (or Exchange Act filing made) until the termination of such suspension or S-3 Blackout Period.
 
(g) From the date of this Agreement until the termination of the Company's obligations with regards to the registration rights of the Shares pursuant to Section 7.7, if the Company grants registration rights to holders of any security of the Company which are more favorable to such holders than the registration rights granted hereunder without the prior written consent of the Holders of a majority of the outstanding Registrable Securities, then such more favorable registration rights shall also be deemed to be granted to the Holders of Registrable Securities hereunder, and the Company covenants and agrees to take any and all steps necessary to modify the terms of this Agreement to so provide.
 
7.4 . It shall be a condition precedent to the obligations of the Company to take any action pursuant to Section 7.2 that the Holder shall furnish to the Company such information regarding it and the Registrable Securities held by it as shall be required to timely effect the registration of its Registrable Securities.
Furnish Information
 
7.5 . For the purposes of this Section 7.5, the term "registration statement" shall include any final Prospectus, exhibit, supplement, amendment or other document included in, filed as part of, deemed to be a part of, or otherwise relating to any Piggyback Registration Statement referred to in this Article VII. In the event any Registrable Securities are included in a registration statement under this Agreement:
Indemnification
 
(a) . To the extent permitted by law, the Company will indemnify and hold harmless each Holder, its officers and directors, trustees, and each person, if any, who controls the Holder and any underwriter for each (as defined in the Securities Act) (such persons and entities referred to as ""), against any losses,
By the Company
Holder Indemnified Parties
 
claims, expenses (including reasonable attorneys' fees), damages or liabilities (including in settlement of any claim) to which they may become subject under the Securities Act, the Exchange Act, or other federal or state law (a ""), insofar as such Losses (or actions in respect thereof) arise out of any claim, action or proceeding brought by a third party arising out of or based upon any of the following statements, omissions or violations (collectively a ""):
Loss
Violation
 
(i) any untrue statement or alleged untrue statement of a material fact contained in a registration statement, filed pursuant to this Article VII;
 
(ii) the omission or alleged omission to state in a registration statement filed pursuant to this Article VII a material fact required to be stated therein, or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading; or
 
(iii) any violation or alleged violation by the Company of the Securities Act, the Exchange Act, any federal or state securities law or any rule or regulation promulgated under the Securities Act, the Exchange Act or any federal or state securities law, in each case in connection with the offering covered by such registration statement;
 
(iv) any failure by the Company to fulfill any undertaking included in a registration statement;
 
(v) any material breach of any representation, warranty or covenant made by the Company in this Agreement;
 
and the Company will pay to each Holder Indemnified Party for any legal or other expenses, as incurred, reasonably incurred by them, as incurred, in connection with investigating or defending or settling, compromising or paying an award granted in any proceeding relating to any such Violation; , that the indemnity agreement contained in this subsection shall not apply to amounts paid in settlement of any such Loss, if such settlement is effected without the consent of the Company (which consent shall not be unreasonably withheld or delayed), nor shall the Company be liable in any such case for any such Loss to the extent that it arises out of or is based upon a Violation which occurs in reliance upon and in conformity with written information furnished expressly for use in connection with such registration statement by the Holder Indemnified Party; and provided further, that the Company will not be liable for the reasonable legal fees and expenses of more than one counsel to the Holder Indemnified Parties.
provided, however
 
(b) . To the extent permitted by law, each Holder (severally and not jointly with any other Holder) will indemnify and hold harmless the Company, each of its directors, each of its officers who have signed the registration statement, and each person, if any, who controls the Company within the meaning of the Securities Act (such persons and entities referred to as "") against any Losses to which such Company Indemnified Parties may become subject under the Securities Act, the Exchange Act or other federal or state law, insofar as such Losses (or actions in respect thereto) arise out of or are based upon any Violation, in each case to the extent (and only to the extent) that such Violation occurs in reliance upon and in conformity with written information furnished by the Holder expressly for use in connection with such registration statement; and the Holder will pay, as
By the Holder
Company Indemnified Parties
 
incurred, any legal or other expenses reasonably incurred by such Company Indemnified Parties in connection with investigating or defending any such Violation; , that the indemnity agreement contained in this subsection shall not apply to amounts paid in settlement of any such Loss if such settlement is effected without the consent of the Holder (which consent shall not be unreasonably withheld or delayed); , that the Holder shall not be liable for the reasonable legal fees and expenses of more than one counsel to the Company Indemnified Parties; and , that the total amounts payable in indemnity by the Holder under this subsection in respect of any Violation shall not exceed the net proceeds received by each Holder in the registered offering out of which such Violation arises.
provided, however
provided further
provided further
 
(c) . Promptly after receipt by an indemnified party under this Section of notice of the commencement of any action (including any governmental action), such indemnified party will, if a claim for indemnification in respect thereof is to be made against any indemnifying party under this Section, deliver to the indemnifying party a written notice of the commencement of such an action and the indemnifying party shall have the right to participate in, and, to the extent the indemnifying party so desires, jointly with any other indemnifying party similarly noticed, to assume the defense thereof with counsel selected by the indemnifying party and reasonably acceptable to a majority in interest of the indemnified parties; , that an indemnified party shall have the right to retain its own counsel, with the reasonable fees and expenses to be paid by the indemnifying party, if the indemnified party has been advised in writing by counsel that representation of such indemnified party by the counsel retained by the indemnifying party would be inappropriate due to actual conflict of interests between such indemnified party and any other party represented by such counsel in such proceeding. The failure to deliver written notice to the indemnifying party within a reasonable time of the commencement of any such action shall relieve such indemnifying party of liability to the indemnified party under this Section to the extent such delay caused material prejudice to the indemnified party, but the omission so to deliver written notice to the indemnifying party will not relieve it of any liability that it may have to any indemnified party otherwise than under this Section.
Notice
provided, however
 
(d) . The foregoing indemnity agreements of the Company and the Holder are subject to the condition that, insofar as they relate to any Violation made in a preliminary prospectus but eliminated or remedied in the amended prospectus on file with the Commission at the time the registration statement in question becomes effective or in the amended prospectus filed with the Commission pursuant to Rule 424(b) of the Securities Act (the ""), such indemnity agreements shall not inure to the benefit of any person if a copy of the Final Prospectus was furnished in a timely manner to the indemnified party and was not furnished to the person asserting the loss, liability, claim or damage at or prior to the time such action is required by the Securities Act.
Defect Eliminated in Final Prospectus
Final Prospectus
 
(e) If the indemnification provided for in this Section 7.5 is held by a court of competent jurisdiction to be unavailable to or insufficient to hold harmless an indemnified party in respect of Losses, then each indemnifying party shall contribute to the amount paid or payable by such indemnified party as a result of such Losses, in such proportion as is appropriate to reflect the relative fault of the Company on the one hand and the Holder on the other in connection with the statements or omissions or other matters which resulted in such losses, claims, damages, liabilities or expenses (or actions in respect thereof), as well as any other relevant equitable considerations. The relative fault shall be determined by reference to, among other things, in the case of an untrue statement, whether the untrue statement relates to
 
information supplied by the Company on the one hand or a Holder on the other and the parties' relative intent, knowledge, access to information and opportunity to correct or prevent such untrue statement. The Company and the Investors agree that it would not be just and equitable if contribution pursuant to this subsection (e) were determined by pro rata allocation (even if all Holders were treated as one entity for such purpose) or by any other method of allocation which does not take into account the equitable considerations referred to above in this subsection (e). The amount paid or payable by an indemnified party as a result of the losses, claims, damages or liabilities (or actions in respect thereof) referred to above in this subsection (e) shall be deemed to include any legal or other expenses reasonably incurred by such indemnified party in connection with investigating or defending any such action or claim. No person guilty of fraudulent misrepresentation (within the meaning of Section 11(f) of the Securities Act) shall be entitled to contribution from any person who was not guilty of such fraudulent misrepresentation. Notwithstanding any provision of this Agreement apparently to the contrary, any contribution (together with any indemnification or other obligations under this Agreement) by any Holder (including any indemnified person associated with such Holder) shall in no event exceed the net amount of proceeds received by such Holder from the sale of the Registrable Securities.
 
(f) . The obligations of the Company and the Holder under this Article VII shall survive the completion of any offering of Registrable Securities in a registration statement, and otherwise.
Survival
 
7.6 . With a view to making available the benefits of certain rules and regulations of the Commission, which may at any time permit the sale of the Registrable Securities to the public without registration, for a period of two years following the date of the Closing, the Company agrees to:
Rule 144 Reporting
 
(a) Make and keep adequate, current public information available, as those terms are understood and defined in Rule 144, at all times;
 
(b) File with the Commission in a timely manner all reports and other documents required of the Company under the Exchange Act; and
 
(c) So long as the Holder owns any Registrable Securities, to furnish to the Holder forthwith upon request a written statement by the Company as to its compliance with the reporting requirements of Rule 144 and the Exchange Act, or that it qualifies as a registrant whose securities may be resold pursuant to Form S-3 (at any time after it so qualifies) a copy of the most recent annual or quarterly report of the Company and such other reports and documents so filed by the Company, and such other reports and documents of the Company as the Holder may reasonably request in availing itself of any rule or regulation of the Commission allowing a Holder to sell any such securities without registration.
 
7.7 . The Company shall have no obligation to register, or maintain, a registration statement governing Registrable Securities and, as to any Holder who is not an affiliate of the Company, the restrictive legends described in Section 4.6 will be removed from any certificate representing the Shares, after the earliest to occur of the following: (i) the second anniversary of the date of the Closing, (ii) with respect to any particular Holder, the date on which all Registrable Securities held by such Holder may be sold without any volume restrictions within a three month period under Rule 144, as it may be amended from time to time, including but not limited to amendments that reduce that period of time that securities must be held before such securities may be sold pursuant to such rule, or (iii) if all Registrable Securities have been registered and sold (A) pursuant to registrations effected pursuant to this Agreement, (B) to or through a broker or dealer or underwriter in a public distribution or a public securities transaction, and/or (C) in a transaction exempt from the registration and prospectus delivery requirements of the 1933 Act under Section 4(1) thereof which results in the removal of all transfer restrictions and restrictive legends with respect thereto.
Termination of Company's Obligations
 
 
8.1 . The representations, warranties and covenants of the Company and the Investors contained in or made pursuant to this Agreement shall survive the execution and delivery of this Agreement and the Closing and shall in no way be affected by any investigation of the subject matter thereof made by or on behalf of any of the Investors, their counsel or the Company, as the case may be.
Survival of Warranties
 
8.2 . No party may assign either this Agreement or any of its rights, interests, or obligations hereunder without the prior written consent of the other party; provided that an Investor, without the prior written consent of the Company, may transfer all rights herein, including registration rights, to another Investor, to any affiliate of such Investor without such consent, or to any other person to whom an Investor transfers the Shares in compliance with applicable federal and state securities laws so long as such other person agrees to be bound by all the terms and conditions of this Agreement. Subject to the preceding sentence, this Agreement shall be binding upon and shall inure to the benefit of the parties hereto and their respective successors and permitted assigns. Any purported assignment in violation of this Section 8.2 shall be void.
Assignment
 
8.3 . This Agreement shall be governed by and construed under the internal laws of the State of California as applied to agreements among California residents entered into and to be performed entirely within California, without reference to principles of conflict of laws or choice of laws.
Governing Law
 
8.4 . This Agreement may be executed in two or more counterparts, each of which shall be deemed an original, but all of which together shall constitute one and the same agreement.
Counterparts
 
8.5 .
Interpretation; Certain Defined Terms
 
(a) When a reference is made in this Agreement to Exhibits, such reference shall be to an Exhibit to this Agreement unless otherwise indicated. When a reference is made in
 
this Agreement to Articles or Sections, such reference shall be to an Article or a Section of this Agreement unless otherwise indicated. The words "," "" and "" when used herein shall be deemed in each case to be followed by the words "." The headings contained in this Agreement are for reference purposes only and shall not affect in any way the meaning or interpretation of this Agreement. Reference to the subsidiaries of an entity shall be deemed to include all direct and indirect subsidiaries of such entity.
include
includes
including
without limitation
 
(b) For purposes of this Agreement, the term "" shall mean any individual, corporation (including any non-profit corporation), general partnership, limited partnership, limited liability partnership, joint venture, estate, trust, company (including any limited liability company or joint stock company), firm or other enterprise, association, organization, entity or governmental entity.
person
 
8.6 . Any and all notices required or permitted to be given to a party pursuant to the provisions of this Agreement will be in writing and will be effective and deemed to provide such party sufficient notice under this Agreement on the earliest of the following: (i) at the time of personal delivery, if delivery is in person; (ii) at the time of transmission by facsimile, addressed to the other party at its facsimile number specified herein (or hereafter modified by subsequent notice to the parties hereto), with confirmation of receipt made by both telephone and printed confirmation sheet verifying successful transmission of the facsimile; (iii) one (1) business day after deposit with an express overnight courier for United States deliveries, or two (2) business days after such deposit for deliveries outside of the United States, with proof of delivery from the courier requested; or (iv) three (3) business days after deposit in the United States mail by certified mail (return receipt requested) for United States deliveries.
Notices
 
All notices for delivery outside the United States will be sent by facsimile or by express courier. Notices by facsimile shall be machine verified as received. All notices not delivered personally or by facsimile will be sent with postage and/or other charges prepaid and properly addressed to the party to be notified at the address or facsimile number as follows, or at such other address or facsimile number as such other party may designate by one of the indicated means of notice herein to the other parties hereto as follows:
 
 
c/o Nierenberg Investment Management Company
Mr. David Nierenberg
19605 NE Eighth Street
Camas, WA 98607
 
With a copy to:
 
Stoel Rives LLP
900 SW 5th Avenue, Suite 2600
Portland, OR 97204
Facsimile: (503) 220-2480
Attn: Brendan N. O'Scannlain
 
 
Natus Medical Incorporated
1501 Industrial Road
San Carlos, CA 94070
Facsimile: (650) 802-6630
Attn: President
 
With a copy to:
 
Fenwick & West LLP
801 California Street
Mountain View, California 94041
Facsimile: 650-938-5200
Attn: Daniel J. Winnike
 
8.7 . All fees and expenses incurred in connection with this Agreement and the transactions contemplated hereby shall be paid by the party incurring such expenses whether or not the Closing occurs.
Expenses; Finder's Fees
 
8.8 . If one or more provisions of this Agreement are held to be unenforceable under applicable law, such provision(s) shall be excluded from this Agreement and the balance of the Agreement shall be interpreted as if such provision(s) were so excluded and shall be enforceable in accordance with its terms.
Severability
 
8.9 . This Agreement, together with all exhibits and schedules hereto, constitutes the entire agreement and understanding of the parties with respect to the subject matter hereof and supersedes any and all prior negotiations, correspondence, agreements, understandings duties or obligations between the parties with respect to the subject matter hereof.
Entire Agreement
 
8.10 . From and after the date of this Agreement, upon the request of an Investor or the Company, the Company and the Investors shall execute and deliver such instruments, documents or other writings as may be reasonably necessary or desirable to confirm and carry out and to effectuate fully the intent and purposes of this Agreement.
Further Assurances
 
8.11 . Subject to applicable law, this Agreement may be amended by the parties hereto at any time by execution of an instrument in writing signed on behalf of the Company and Investors holding a majority of the then-outstanding Shares purchased hereunder. At any time prior to any Closing any party hereto may, to the extent legally allowed, (i) extend the time for the performance of any of the obligations or other acts of the other party hereto, (ii) waive any inaccuracies in the representations and warranties made to such party contained herein or in any document delivered pursuant hereto and (iii) waive compliance with any of the agreements or conditions for the benefit of such party contained herein. Any agreement on the part of a party hereto to any such extension or waiver shall be valid only if set forth in an instrument in writing signed on behalf of such party. Delay in exercising any right under this Agreement shall not constitute a waiver of such right.
Amendment; Extension; Waiver
 
8.12 . Except as otherwise provided herein, any and all remedies herein expressly conferred upon a party will be deemed cumulative with and not exclusive of any other remedy conferred hereby, or by law or equity upon such party, and the exercise by a party of any one remedy will not preclude the exercise of any other
Other Remedies; Specific Performance
 
remedy. The parties hereto agree that irreparable damage would occur in the event that any of the provisions of this Agreement were not performed in accordance with their specific terms or were otherwise breached. It is accordingly agreed that the parties shall be entitled to seek an injunction or injunctions to prevent breaches of this Agreement and to enforce specifically the terms and provisions hereof in any court of the United States or any state having jurisdiction, this being in addition to any other remedy to which they are entitled at law or in equity.
 
8.13 . The parties hereto agree that they have been represented by counsel during the negotiation and execution of this Agreement and, therefore, waive the application of any law, regulation, holding or rule of construction providing that ambiguities in an agreement or other document will be construed against the party drafting such agreement or document.
Rules of Construction
 
8.14 . EACH OF THE COMPANY AND THE INVESTORS HEREBY IRREVOCABLY WAIVES ALL RIGHT TO TRIAL BY JURY IN ANY ACTION, PROCEEDING OR COUNTERCLAIM (WHETHER BASED ON CONTRACT, TORT OR OTHERWISE) ARISING OUT OF OR RELATING TO THIS AGREEMENT OR THE ACTIONS THE COMPANY OR THE INVESTORS IN THE NEGOTIATION, ADMINISTRATION, PERFORMANCE AND ENFORCEMENT HEREOF.
Waiver Of Jury Trial
 
 
I W W, the parties hereto have caused this Agreement to be executed by their duly authorized respective officers as of the date first written above.
N
ITNESS
HEREOF
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
 
 
(Nasdaq: BABY) and (Nasdaq: BLSC) today announced that the companies have entered into a definitive agreement for Natus to acquire Bio-logic in a cash merger. Mundelein, Illinois based Bio-logic develops and markets computer-based electro diagnostic systems and disposable supplies used by medical practitioners to aid in the detection, diagnosis and monitoring of certain hearing, neurological and sleep disorders.
SAN CARLOS, CA; MUNDELEIN, IL (October 17, 2005)  Natus Medical Incorporated
Bio-logic
Systems Corporation
 
Natus has agreed to acquire all outstanding shares of Bio-logic common stock for $8.77 per share. In addition, each share subject to a Bio-logic stock option will convert into an amount equal to the excess of $8.77 over the exercise price of the option. Based on the number of Bio-logic shares and options outstanding at October 1, 2005, the total consideration would amount to approximately $66 million. In Bio-logic's most recent quarterly report for the quarter ended August 31, 2005, it reported $15.3 million dollars of cash on its balance sheet.
 
The agreement has received the approval of the Boards of Directors of both companies and is subject to the approval of Bio-logic stockholders and customary closing conditions. The members of the Board of Directors of Bio-logic have entered into voting agreements by which they have agreed to vote approximately 16% of the outstanding Bio-logic common stock in favor of the merger agreement. The Board of Directors of Bio-logic has received an opinion from its financial advisor, Dresner Securities, Inc., that the merger consideration to be received by the holders of Bio-logic common stock is fair, from a financial point of view, to those holders. The parties expect the acquisition to be completed in early January 2006.
 
Jim Hawkins, President and Chief Executive Officer of Natus commented, "This acquisition will further strengthen our position as a market leader in the development of products for the detection, treatment, monitoring, and tracking of common disorders in newborns and children. We will be supplementing our hearing business with the addition of Bio-logic's leading diagnostic hearing products and expanding our presence in the Audiology market through their established distribution channels, both in the U.S. and internationally."
 
"At the same time, this will open up new market opportunities for Natus in the areas of EEG monitoring for neurology and in the growing diagnostic sleep market," added Hawkins. "Bio-logic's neurology products, which were developed in collaboration with leading U.S. children's and adult epilepsy hospitals, are used for epilepsy and seizure monitoring. The Sleepscan(TM) product line is one of only a few product offerings in the sleep monitoring market with the capability to monitor young children along with the traditional adult segment. This acquisition will also bring together our engineering teams who will now be able provide world-class solutions for our growing customer base. "
 
"Finally, this acquisition is consistent with our previously communicated goals to grow the business through internal product development, increased penetration into expanding international markets, and through
strategic acquisitions that will be accretive to our earnings. Bio-logic has consistently maintained a gross profit percentage of approximately 65% and we fully expect this acquisition to be accretive in 2006," stated Hawkins.
 
Gabriel Raviv, Chairman and Chief Executive Officer of Bio-logic said, "I believe the expanded opportunities provided through this acquisition will accelerate sales of our technologies into the marketplace and will benefit both our employees and customers."
 
Natus will finance a portion of the purchase price through its existing cash, including $7,128,000 that the Company will receive this week from the D3 Family Funds through a private placement of 600,000 shares of the Company's stock. In addition, Natus has secured from Wells Fargo Bank N.A. a loan commitment, subject to customary closing conditions, to provide $10 million in a senior secured credit facility. Natus will also use cash on the Bio-logic balance sheet for a portion of the acquisition cost.
 
Conference Call
 
Natus has scheduled an investor conference call to discuss this announcement beginning at 11:00 a.m. Eastern Time today. Individuals interested in listening to the conference call may do so by dialing (800) 901-5218 for domestic callers, or (617) 786-4511 for international callers, and entering reservation code 73305685.
 
About Bio-logic Systems
 
Bio-logic Systems Corp., headquartered in Mundelein, Illinois, designs, develops, assembles and markets computer-based electrodiagnostic systems and related disposables for use by hospitals, clinics, school districts, universities and physicians. The systems conduct tests that are typically used by medical practitioners to aid in the diagnosis of certain neurological disorders, brain disorders and tumors, and sensory disorders, including audiological and hearing screening and diagnosis.
 
About Natus Medical
 
Natus develops, manufactures, and markets products for the detection, treatment, monitoring, and tracking of common disorders in newborns and children. Natus products are marketed under well-recognized brand names such as ALGO(R), Neometrics(TM), Echo-Screen(R), and neoBLUE(R). Headquartered in San Carlos, California, Natus markets and sells its products worldwide through a direct sales force in the U.S. and the U.K., and through distributors in over 80 other countries. Additional information about Natus Medical can be found at .
www.natus.com
 
This press release contains forward-looking statements as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, particularly statements regarding the expectations, beliefs, plans, intentions and strategies of Natus. These forward-looking statements include, but are not limited to, statements regarding the expanding presence in the Audiology market, new market opportunities in the areas of EEG monitoring, the accretive nature of the acquisition in 2006, and accelerated sales of Bio-logic's technologies. These statements relate to future events or Natus' future financial performance or results, and involve known and unknown risks, uncertainties and other factors that may cause actual results, levels of activity, performance, or achievements to differ materially from those expressed or implied by the forward-looking statements. Forward-looking statements are only predictions and the actual events or results may differ materially. Neither Natus nor Bio-logic can provide any assurance that the future results or the results implied by the forward-looking statements will meet expectations. The results could differ materially due to a number of factors, including the risk that the merger is not consummated, the effects of competition, the demand for Natus products and services, Natus' ability to expand sales in international markets and to maintain current sales levels in a mature domestic market, Natus' ability to control costs, and risks associated with bringing new products to market and integrating acquired businesses. Natus and Bio-logic disclaim any obligation to update information contained in any forward-looking statement.
More information about potential risk factors that could affect the business and financial results of Natus is included in Natus' annual report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2004, and its quarterly reports on Form 10-Q, and in other reports filed from time to time by Natus with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission.
 
More information about potential risk factors that could affect the business and financial results of Bio-logic is included in Bio-logic's quarterly report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended August 31, 2005 and in other reports filed from time to time by Bio-logic with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission.
 
Bio-logic Systems investors and security holders are urged to read the proxy statement regarding the business combination transaction referenced in this press release when it becomes available and as it may be amended from time to time. The proxy statement that will be filed with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission by Bio-logic Systems will contain important information regarding the proposed transaction. Bio-logic Systems' investors and security holders may obtain a free copy of the proxy statement, when available, and other documents filed by Bio-logic Systems with the Commission at the Commission's web site at http://www.sec.gov. In addition, copies of the proxy statement, when available, will be provided free of charge from Bio-logic Systems to all security holders. Additional requests for proxy statements should be directed to Bio-logic Systems Corp., One Bio-logic Plaza, Mundelein, Illinois 60060.
 
Bio-logic and its executive officers and directors may be deemed to be participants in the solicitation of proxies from Bio-logic's stockholders with respect to the acquisition. A description of any interests that Bio-logic's officers and directors have in the acquisition will be available in the proxy statement. In addition, Natus and its executive officers and directors may be deemed to be participating in the solicitation of proxies from Bio-logic's stockholders in favor of the approval of the acquisition. Information concerning Natus' directors and executive officers is set forth in Natus' proxy statements for its 2005 annual meeting of stockholders, which was filed with the SEC on April 15, 2005, and annual report on Form 10-K filed with the SEC for its fiscal year ended December 31, 2004. These documents are available free of charge at the SEC's web site at www.sec.gov or by going to Natus' Investors page on its corporate website at .
www.natus.com
COMPANY CONTACTS:
 
Natus Medical Incorporated
James B. Hawkins
President and Chief Executive Officer
or
Steven J. Murphy
Vice President Finance
(650) 802-0400
InvestorRelations@Natus.com
 
Bio-logic Systems Corp.
Gabriel Raviv,
Chairman and Chief Executive Officer
or
Roderick G. Johnson,
President and Chief Operating Officer
(847) 949-5200
or
Dresner Corporate Services
Investor and Media Inquiries
Steve Carr
(312) 726-3600
scarr@dresnerco.com


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BABY/BABY-8K-20051026070521.txt.gz
TIME:20051026070521
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION Washington, D.C. 20549 FORM 8-K CURRENT REPORT Pursuant to Section 13 OR 15(d) of The Securities Exchange Act of 1934 Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported) October 26, 2005 Natus Medical Incorporated - -------------------------------------------------------------------------------- (Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter) Delaware 000-33001 77-0154833 - ---------------------------- -------------------- ---------------------------- (State or other jurisdiction (Commission (IRS Employer of incorporation) File Number) Identification No.) 1501 Industrial Road, San Carlos, California 94070 - -------------------------------------------------------------------------------- (Address of principal executive offices) (Zip Code) Registrant's telephone number, including area code: (650) 802-0400 --------------------------- Not applicable - -------------------------------------------------------------------------------- (Former name or former address, if changed since last report) Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below): [ ] Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [ ] Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [ ] Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [ ] Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
ITEM 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition. On October 26, 2005, Natus Medical Incorporated (the "Company") is issuing a press release and holding a conference call regarding its financial results for the third quarter of fiscal 2005 ended September 30, 2005 and other financial information. A copy of the press release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 to this Form 8-K. The information in this Form 8-K and the exhibit attached hereto shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act") or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that Section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing. ITEM 9.01. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS, PRO FORMA FINANCIAL INFORMATION AND EXHIBITS. (c) Exhibits. Exhibit No. Description ----------- ----------- 99.1 Press release of Natus Medical Incorporated dated October 26, 2005 describing the Company's results for its third fiscal quarter ended September 30, 2005 and other financial information.
SIGNATURES Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized. NATUS MEDICAL INCORPORATED Date: October 26, 2005 By: /s/ Steven J. Murphy --------------------------------- Steven J. Murphy Vice President Finance
Index to Exhibits Exhibit No. Description ----------- ----------- 99.1 Press release of Natus Medical Incorporated dated October 26, 2005 describing the Company's results for its third fiscal quarter ended September 30, 2005 and other financial information.

Exhibit 99.1 Natus Medical Reports Record Third Quarter Revenue and Earnings; Company Provides 2006 Earnings Guidance SAN CARLOS, Calif.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--Oct. 26, 2005--Natus Medical Incorporated (Nasdaq:BABY) today announced financial results for the three and nine months ended September 30, 2005. The Company reported record third-quarter revenue of $10.6 million for the three months ended September 30, 2005, an increase of $1.6 million or 17% from $9.0 million reported in the comparable period of the previous year. The Company reported record third-quarter net income of $1.5 million or $0.08 per diluted share for the 2005 period, compared with net income of $147,000 or $0.01 per share for the comparable period in 2004. For the first nine months of 2005, revenue increased 17% to $30.4 million, from $26.0 million reported in the comparable period in 2004. Net income for the nine months ended September 30, 2005 was $3.7 million or $0.20 per diluted share, compared to a loss of $3.9 million, or ($0.23) loss per share reported in 2004. Gross margin improved to 65.4% for the three months ended September 30, 2005, compared with 57.1% for the third quarter of 2004. The gross margin for the 2005 period was favorably impacted by reductions in materials costs and by a higher margin contributed by the Company's Fischer-Zoth subsidiary that was acquired on September 28, 2004. For the three months ended September 30, 2005 operating expenses increased approximately 19% to $5.6 million, compared with $4.7 million for the third quarter of 2004. Costs associated with the operations of the Company's Fischer-Zoth subsidiary and ongoing costs of complying with the Sarbanes-Oxley Act contributed to an approximate $1.4 million increase in operating costs. The increase was partially offset by $550,000 for acquired in-process research and development recorded in the third quarter of 2004 that did not recur in 2005. Taken together, these factors led to an approximate $880,000 increase in operating expenses in the 2005 period. As of September 30, 2005, the Company reported cash, cash equivalents and short-term investments of $41.8 million, representing an increase of approximately $6.1 million from the corresponding amount at December 31, 2004. Additionally, the Company reported stockholders' equity of $56.8 million and working capital of $45.6 million as of September 30, 2005. "We are extremely pleased with our results for the third quarter," said Jim Hawkins, President and Chief Executive Officer of Natus Medical. "The acquisition of Fischer-Zoth contributed to our improved gross profit on a quarter-over-quarter basis, and much of the increase in our operating expenses was related to their operations. We are also pleased that our operating margin was consistent with our plan." "2005 continues to be a great year for Natus as we have shown consistent growth, improving gross profits, and increased profitability. Even with these excellent results, we can't help but look ahead to 2006 anticipating the acquisition of Bio-logic Systems. We believe this acquisition will allow Natus to expand into new markets and strengthen our presence in existing markets, while achieving synergies that should result in increased earnings," Hawkins added. Financial Guidance The Company updated financial guidance for 2005. The Company expects to report earnings per diluted share of $0.31 to $0.32 on revenue of $42.2 to $42.5 million in 2005. This compares to a loss per share of $0.17 on revenue of $36.5 million reported last year. Natus had previously said it expected to earn $0.30 to $0.33 per diluted share in 2005 on revenue of $41.6 to $43.0 million. For 2006, the Company expects to report diluted earnings per share of $0.48 to $0.50 on revenue of $78 to $80 million. These expected results assume the Company completes its acquisition of Bio-logic Systems in early January 2006. Additionally, the Company expects that its effective tax rate will rise to 15% in 2006. The estimates of earnings per share do not include any one-time charges associated with the acquisition of Bio-logic Systems or the impact of expensing employee stock options. The Company is continuing to evaluate the impact of expensing employee stock options, which it will be required to do under Financial Accounting Standards Board Statement No. 123R, "Share-Based Payment" beginning with its first quarterly period in 2006. Conference Call Natus has scheduled an investor conference call to discuss this announcement beginning at 11:00 a.m. Eastern Time today. Individuals interested in listening to the conference call may do so by dialing (800) 638-5439 for domestic callers, or (617) 614-3945 for international callers, and entering reservation code 43201867. A telephone replay will be available for 48 hours following the conclusion of the call by dialing (888) 286-8010 for domestic callers, or (617) 801-6888 for international callers, and entering reservation code 94594612. The conference call also will be available real-time via the Internet at http://investor.natus.com, and a recording of the call will be available on the Company's Web site for 90 days following the completion of the call. About Natus Medical Natus develops, manufactures, and markets products for the detection, treatment, monitoring, and tracking of common disorders in newborns and children. Natus products are marketed under well-recognized brand names such as ALGO(R), Neometrics(TM), Echo-Screen(R), and neoBLUE(R). Headquartered in San Carlos, California, Natus markets and sells its products worldwide through a direct sales force in the U.S. and the U.K., and through distributors in over 80 other countries. Additional information about Natus Medical can be found at www.natus.com. This press release contains forward-looking statements as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, particularly statements regarding the expectations, beliefs, plans, intentions and strategies of Natus. These forward-looking statements include, but are not limited to, statements regarding anticipated revenue and profitability for the full-year 2005 as well as for the fourth quarter of 2005, anticipated revenue and profitability for the full-year 2006, and expectations regarding future expansion into new markets and increased earnings resulting from the acquisition of Bio-logic Systems. These statements relate to future events or Natus' future financial performance or results, and involve known and unknown risks, uncertainties and other factors that may cause actual results, levels of activity, performance, or achievements to differ materially from those expressed or implied by the forward-looking statements. Forward-looking statements are only predictions and the actual events or results may differ materially. Natus cannot provide any assurance that its future results or the results implied by the forward-looking statements will meet expectations. Our future results could differ materially due to a number of factors, including the effects of competition, the demand for our products and services, our ability to expand our sales in international markets, our ability to maintain current sales levels in a mature domestic market, our ability to control costs, and risks associated with bringing new products to market and integrating acquired businesses. Natus disclaims any obligation to update information contained in any forward-looking statement. More information about potential risk factors that could affect the business and financial results of Natus is included in Natus' annual report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2004, and its quarterly reports on Form 10-Q, and in other reports filed from time to time by Natus with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission. NATUS MEDICAL INCORPORATED AND SUBSIDIARIES UNAUDITED CONDENSED CONSOLIDATED BALANCE SHEETS (in thousands, except share amounts) September 30, December 31, 2005 2004 ASSETS Current assets: Cash and equivalents $ 28,167 $ 16,239 Short-term investments 13,647 19,504 Accounts receivable, net of allowance for doubtful accounts of $ 449 in 2005 and $472 in 2004 5,879 6,640 Inventories 3,888 4,347 Prepaid expenses and other current assets 465 625 Total current assets 52,046 47,355 Property and equipment, net 2,293 2,503 Goodwill, intangibles, and other assets 8,868 9,399 Total assets $ 63,207 $ 59,257 LIABILITIES AND STOCKHOLDERS' EQUITY Liabilities: Accounts payable $ 1,676 $ 1,947 Accrued liabilities 4,415 4,303 Deferred revenues 317 279 Total liabilities 6,408 6,529 Commitments and contingencies Stockholders' equity: Common stock, $0.001 par value, 120,000,000 shares authorized; shares issued and outstanding: 17,309,099 in 2005 and 17,140,339 in 2004 90,133 89,373 Accumulated deficit (33,213) (36,902) Accumulated other comprehensive income (121) 257 Total stockholders' equity 56,799 52,728 Total liabilities and stockholders' equity $ 63,207 $ 59,257 NATUS MEDICAL INCORPORATED AND SUBSIDIARIES UNAUDITED CONDENSED CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF OPERATIONS (in thousands, except per share amounts) Three Months Ended Nine Months Ended September September September September 2005 2004 2005 2004 Revenue $ 10,551 $ 9,011 $ 30,422 $ 25,980 Cost of revenue 3,645 3,864 11,435 11,370 Gross profit 6,906 5,147 18,987 14,610 Operating expenses: Marketing and selling 2,916 2,318 8,355 8,399 Research and development 1,162 670 3,233 2,648 General and administrative 1,521 1,180 4,071 5,204 Restructuring cost - - - 776 Acquired IPR&D - 550 - 550 Total operating expenses 5,599 4,718 15,659 17,577 Income (loss) from operations 1,307 429 3,328 (2,967) Other income/(expense): Interest income 314 117 750 313 Interest expense - - - (3) Other income, net 5 (29) 37 (130) Total other income/(expense) 319 88 787 180 Income (loss) before provision for income tax 1,626 517 4,115 (2,787) Provision for income tax 111 65 426 66 Income (loss) from continuing operations 1,515 452 3,689 (2,853) Discontinued operations - (305) - (1,072) Net income (loss) $ 1,515 $ 147 $ 3,689 $ (3,925) Earnings (loss) per share: Basic: Continuing operations $ 0.09 $ 0.03 $ 0.21 $ (0.17) Discontinued operations $ - $ (0.02) $ - $ (0.06) Net income (loss) $ 0.09 $ 0.01 $ 0.21 $ (0.23) Diluted: Continuing operations $ 0.08 $ 0.03 $ 0.20 $ (0.17) Discontinued operations $ - $ (0.02) $ - $ (0.06) Net income (loss) $ 0.08 $ 0.01 $ 0.20 $ (0.23) Weighted-average shares used to compute Basic earnings per share 17,292 17,011 17,224 16,740 Diluted earnings per share 18,877 17,899 18,574 16,740 NATUS MEDICAL INCORPORATED AND SUBSIDIARIES RECONCILIATION OF TOTAL OPERATING EXPENSE CALCULATION EXCLUDING IPR&D (in thousands) Three Months Ended Nine Months Ended Sept 30, Sept 30, Sept 30, Sept 30, 2005 2004 2005 2004 Total operating expenses $ 5,599 $ 4,718 $ 15,659 $17,577 NON-GAAP ADJUSTMENT: Exclude acquired in-process research and development - 550 - 550 Pro-forma operating expenses excluding acquired in- process research and development $ 5,599 $ 4,168 $ 15,659 $17,027 CONTACT: Natus Medical Incorporated Steven J. Murphy, 650-802-0400 InvestorRelations@Natus.com


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BABY/BABY-8K-20051216153623.txt.gz
TIME:20051216153623
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
Item 1.01. Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement.
 
At its December 13, 2005 meeting, the Compensation Committee of the Board of Directors of Natus Medical Incorporated (the "Company") approved the base salaries and bonus program for the Company's executive officers for the period beginning January 1, 2006 and ending December 31, 2006.
 
The Compensation Committee approved the base salary amounts set forth on the table below based on a review of the Company's performance and competitive market data:
 
 
The Compensation Committee approved a cash bonus plan for executive officers of the Company based on the Company achieving its budgeted pre-tax profit for 2006. The cash bonuses may range from 50% to a maximum of 150% of the target amount (based on the amount of actual pre-tax profit relative to the budgeted amount). The target bonus for each of Messrs. Mince, Murphy and Dr. Chung is 30% of 2006 base salary, and for Mr. Hawkins is 50% of 2006 base salary. Mr. Traverso's bonus is comprised of payments made pursuant to a sales compensation plan that is paid on a regular basis throughout the year. The payment of bonuses pursuant to this plan is at the discretion of the Board of Directors.
 
The Compensation Committee also approved an increase in vacation time for Mr. Hawkins from three weeks to four weeks per calendar year.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BABY/BABY-8K-20060104164230.txt.gz
TIME:20060104164230
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
Item 1.01. Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement.
 
Amended and Restated 2000 Stock Awards Plan
 
On December 29, 2005, the Board of Directors of the Company approved certain amendments to the Amended and Restated 2000 Stock Awards Plan (the "Restated Plan") to provide in Section 4 of the Plan for automatic adjustment, when possible, of any provision of an award that would bring that award under Section 409A of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended. If modification is not possible, the amendment to the Plan then permits rescinding the award or striking the offending provision. The amendment to the Plan takes effect upon approval by the Board and does not require stockholder approval. The Restated Plan is attached as Exhibit 10.1 to this Report and is incorporated by reference herein.
 
2000 Employee Stock Purchase Plan
 
On December 29, 2005, the Board of Directors of the Company approved certain amendments to the 2000 Employee Stock Purchase Plan to (i) terminate ongoing Offerings as of December 31, 2005, (ii) provide for future Offerings to commence on January 1, 2006 (ending on April 30, 2006), and each November 1 and May 1 (respectively ending on each April 30 and October 31) thereafter until further amended, and (iii) further provide that the purchase price for Offerings commencing after December 31, 2005, shall be 85% of fair market value on the date of purchase rather than 85% of the lower of fair market value on the first date of the Offering and the last date of the Offering. These amendments take effect upon approval by the Board and do not require stockholder approval. The Purchase Plan is attached as Exhibit 10.2 to this Report and is incorporated by reference herein.
 
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
The following exhibits are filed herewith:
(c) Exhibits.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 

Exhibit 10.1
 
 
The purposes of this Stock Awards Plan are to attract and retain the best available personnel for positions of substantial responsibility, to provide additional incentive to Employees, Directors and Consultants and to promote the success of the Company's business. Awards granted under the Plan may be Incentive Stock Options or Nonstatutory Stock Options, Restricted Stock, Stock Bonuses, Stock Appreciation Rights or Restricted Stock Units, in each instance as determined by the Administrator at the time of grant.
1. .
Purposes of the Plan
 
As used herein, the following definitions shall apply:
2. .
Definitions
 
(a) "Administrator" means the Board or any of its Committees appointed in accordance with Section 4 hereof.
 
(b) "Applicable Laws" means the requirements relating to the administration of stock award plans under U.S. state corporate laws, U.S. federal and state securities laws, the Code, any stock exchange or quotation system on which the Common Stock is listed or quoted and the applicable laws of any foreign country where Awards are, or will be, granted.
 
(c) "Award" means any award under the Plan, including any Option, Restricted Stock, Stock Bonus, Stock Appreciation Right or Restricted Stock Unit.
 
(d) "Award Agreement" means, with respect to each Award, the written agreement between the Company and the Participant setting forth the terms and conditions of the Award.
 
(e) "Board" means the Board of Directors of the Company.
 
(f) "Code" means the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.
 
(g) "Committee" means a committee of Directors appointed by the Board in accordance with Section 4 hereof.
 
(h) "Common Stock" means the Common Stock of the Company.
 
(i) "Company" means Natus Medical Incorporated, a Delaware corporation.
 
(j) "Consultant" means any person who is engaged by the Company or any Parent or Subsidiary to render consulting or advisory services to such entity and who is compensated for such services, including a Director.
 
(k) "Director" means a member of the Board of Directors of the Company.
 
(l) "Employee" means any person, including Officers and Directors, employed by the Company or any Parent or Subsidiary of the Company. A Service Provider shall not cease to be an Employee in the case of (i) any leave of absence approved by the company or (ii) transfers between locations of the Company or between the Company, its Parent, any Subsidiary, or any successor.
For purposes of Incentive Stock Options, no such leave may exceed ninety days, unless reemployment upon expiration of such leave is guaranteed by statute or contract. If reemployment upon expiration of a leave of absence approved by the Company is not so guaranteed, on the 181
st
day of such leave any Incentive Stock Option held by the Optionee shall cease to be treated as an Incentive Stock Option and shall be treated for tax purposes as a Nonstatutory Stock Option. Neither service as a Director nor payment of a director's fee by the Company shall be sufficient to constitute "employment" by the Company.
 
(m) "Exchange Act" means the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended.
 
(n) "Fair Market Value" means, as of any date, the value of Common Stock determined as follows:
 
(i) If the Common Stock is listed on any established stock exchange or a national market system including, without limitation, the Nasdaq National Market or The Nasdaq SmallCap Market of The Nasdaq Stock Market, its Fair Market Value shall be the closing sales price for such stock (or the closing bid, if no sales were reported) as quoted on such exchange or system for the last market trading day prior to the time of determination, as reported in The Wall Street Journal or such other source as the Administrator deems reliable;
 
(ii) If the Common Stock is regularly quoted by a recognized securities dealer but selling prices are not reported, its Fair Market Value shall be the mean between the high bid and low asked prices for the Common Stock on the last market trading day prior to the day of determination; or
 
(iii) In the absence of an established market for the Common Stock, the Fair Market Value thereof shall be determined in good faith by the Administrator.
 
(o) "Incentive Stock Option" means an Option intended to qualify as an incentive stock option within the meaning of Section 422 of the Code.
 
(p) "Nonstatutory Stock Option" means an Option not intended to qualify as an Incentive Stock Option.
 
(q) "Officer" means a person who is an officer of the Company within the meaning of Section 16 of the Exchange Act and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder.
 
(r) "Option" means a stock option granted pursuant to the Plan.
 
(s) "Option Agreement" means a written or electronic agreement between the Company and an Optionee evidencing the terms and conditions of an individual Option grant. The Option Agreement is subject to the terms and conditions of the Plan.
 
(t) "Option Exchange Program" means a program whereby outstanding Options are exchanged for Options with a lower exercise price.
 
(u) "Optioned Stock" means the Common Stock subject to an Option.
 
(v) "Optionee" means the holder of an outstanding Option granted under the Plan.
 
(w) "Parent" means a "parent corporation," whether now or hereafter existing, as defined in Section 424(e) of the Code.
 
(x) "Participant" means a person who receives an Award under the Plan.
 
(y) "Performance Factors" means the factors selected by the Administrator from among the following measures to determine whether the performance goals established by the Administrator and applicable to Awards have been satisfied:
 
(i) Net revenue and/or net revenue growth;
 
(ii) Earnings before income taxes and amortization and/or earnings before income taxes and amortization growth;
 
(iii) Operating income and/or operating income growth;
 
(iv) Net income and/or net income growth;
 
(v) Earnings per share and/or earnings per share growth;
 
(vi) Total stockholder return and/or total stockholder return growth;
 
(vii) Return on equity;
 
(viii) Operating cash flow return on income;
 
(ix) Adjusted operating cash flow return on income;
 
(x) Economic value added; and
 
(xi) Individual business objectives.
 
(z) "Performance Period" means the period of service determined by the Administrator, not to exceed five years, during which years of service or performance is to be measured for the Award.
 
(aa) "Plan" means this 2000 Stock Awards Plan.
 
(bb) "Restricted Stock" means an offer under the Plan to sell (or issue through a SAR or Stock Bonus) Shares that are subject to restrictions.
 
(cc) "Restricted Stock Unit" or "RSU" means an Award covering a number of Shares that may be settled in cash, or by issuance of those Shares (which may consist of Restricted Stock) for services to be rendered or for past services already rendered to the Company or any Parent or Subsidiary.
 
(dd) "Service Provider" means an Employee, Director or Consultant.
 
(ee) "Share" means a share of the Common Stock, as adjusted in accordance with Section 14 below.
 
(ff) "Stock Appreciation Right" or "SAR" means an Award that may be settled in cash, or Shares (which may consist of Restricted Stock), having a value equal to the value determined by multiplying the difference between the Fair Market Value on the date of exercise over the Fair Market Value on the date of grant and the number of Shares with respect to which the SAR is being settled.
 
(gg) "Stock Bonus" means an Award of Shares (which may consist of Restricted Stock or Restricted Stock Units) for services to be rendered or for past services already rendered to the Company or any Parent or Subsidiary.
 
(hh) "Subsidiary means a "subsidiary corporation," whether now or hereafter existing, as defined in Section 424(f) of the Code.
 
Subject to the provisions of Section 14 of the Plan, the maximum aggregate number of Shares (as adjusted for the July 2000 two-for-five reverse split) which may be subject to Awards is 1,500,000 Shares (post-split), together with an annual increase in the number of shares of Common Stock reserved for issuance hereunder on the first day of the Company's fiscal year, beginning with January 1, 2002, equal to the lesser of (i) 1,500,000 Shares (post-split), (ii) seven percent (7%) of the outstanding Shares of the Company as of the last day of the prior fiscal year or (iii) such amount as determined by the Board of Directors. No more than the maximum number of shares that may be reserved under the Plan pursuant to the preceding sentence may be issued pursuant to the exercise of Incentive Stock Options. The Shares may be authorized but unissued, or reacquired Common Stock.
3. .
Stock Subject to the Plan
 
For each Share underlying an Award the number of Shares available for grant and issuance under the Plan shall be decreased by one. Shares that are subject to: (a) issuance upon exercise of an Option or SAR granted under this Plan but which cease to be subject to the Option or SAR for any reason other than exercise of the Option or SAR; (b) Awards granted under this Plan but such Shares are forfeited or are repurchased by the Company at the original issue price; or (c) Awards granted under this Plan that otherwise terminate without Shares being issued, will return to the pool of Shares available for grant and issuance under this Plan.
 
4. .
Administration of the Plan
 
(a) .
Procedure
 
(i) Multiple Administrative Bodies. The Plan may be administered by different Committees with respect to different groups of Employees and Consultants.
 
(ii) . To the extent that the Administrator determines it to be desirable to qualify Awards granted hereunder as "performance-based compensation" within the meaning of Section 162(m) of the Code, then approval and administration of such Awards shall comply with the requirements of Section 162(m) of the Code.
Section 162(m)
 
(iii) . To the extent desirable to qualify transactions hereunder as exempt under Rule 16b-3, the transactions contemplated hereunder shall be structured to satisfy the requirements for exemption under Rule 16b-3.
Rule 16b-3
 
(iv) . Unless the Administrator determines in writing that Section 409A of the Code is to apply with respect to a particular Award granted to a Participant, the terms of each Award granted hereunder shall be such as shall not cause such Award to be subject to Section 409A of the Code. Any term in any such Award in conflict with this provision shall automatically be modified to not be in conflict with this provision and if such modification is not possible then the Administrator shall determine whether such provision shall be void and without effect or the entire Award shall be rescinded.
Section 409A
 
(v) . Other than as provided above, the Plan shall be administered by (A) the Board or (B) a Committee, which Committee shall be constituted to satisfy Applicable Laws.
Other Administration
 
(b) . Subject to the provisions of the Plan and, in the case of a Committee, the specific duties delegated by the Board to such Committee, and subject to the approval of any relevant authorities, the Administrator shall have the authority in its discretion:
Powers of the Administrator
 
(i) to determine the Fair Market Value;
 
(ii) to select the Service Providers to whom Awards may from time to time be granted hereunder;
 
(iii) to determine the number of Shares to be covered by each such award granted hereunder;
 
(iv) to approve forms of agreements for use under the Plan;
 
(v) to determine the terms and conditions, of any Awards granted hereunder. Such terms and conditions include, but are not limited to, the exercise price, the time or times when Awards may be exercised (which may be based on performance criteria), any vesting acceleration or waiver of forfeiture restrictions, and any restriction or limitation regarding any Award or the Common Stock relating thereto, based in each case on such factors as the Administrator, in its sole discretion, shall determine;
 
(vi) to determine whether and under what circumstances an Option any be settled in cash under subsection 12(e) instead of Common Stock;
 
(vii) to reduce the exercise price of any Option to the then current Fair Market Value if the Fair Market Value of the Common Stock covered by such Option has declined since the date the Option was granted;
 
(viii) to initiate an Option Exchange Program;
 
(ix) to prescribe, amend and rescind rules and regulations relating to the Plan, including rules and regulations relating to sub-plans established for the purpose of qualifying for preferred tax treatment under foreign tax laws;
 
(x) to allow Optionees to satisfy withholding tax obligations by electing to have the Company withhold from the Shares to be issued upon exercise of an Option that number of Shares having a Fair Market Value equal to the amount required to be withheld. The Fair Market Value of the Shares to be withheld shall be determined on the date that the amount of tax to be withheld is to be determined. All elections by Optionees to have Shares withheld for this purpose shall be made in such form and under such conditions as the Administrator may deem necessary or advisable; and
 
(xi) to construe and interpret the terms of the Plan and awards granted pursuant to the Plan.
 
(xii) to make all other determinations deemed necessary or advisable for administering the Plan.
 
(c) . All decisions, determinations and interpretations of the Administrator shall be final and binding on all optionees.
Effect of Administrator's Decision
 
5. .
Eligibility
 
(a) Awards may be granted only to Service Providers and provided further that Incentive Stock Options may be granted only to Employees.
 
(b) Neither the Plan nor any Award shall confer upon any Participant any right with respect to continuing the Participant's relationship as a Service Provider with the Company, nor shall it interfere in any way with his or her right or the Company's right to terminate such relationship at any time, with or without cause.
 
(c) Upon the Company, or a successor corporation, issuing any class of common equity securities required to be registered under Section 12 of the Exchange Act, or upon the Plan being assumed by a corporation having a class of common equity securities required to be registered under Section 12 of the Exchange Act, the following limitations shall apply to Awards granted to Employees:
 
(i) No Employee shall be granted in any fiscal year Awards covering more than 1,000,000 Shares (post-split).
 
(ii) In connection with his or her initial employment, an Employee may be granted Awards covering an additional 500,000 Shares (post-split) which shall not count against the amount set forth in subsection (i) above.
 
(iii) The foregoing limitations shall be adjusted appropriately in connection with any change in the Company's capitalization as described in Section 14.
 
(iv) If any Award is cancelled in the same fiscal year of the Company in which it was granted (other than in connection with a transaction described in Section 14), the Shares covered by such cancelled Award will be counted against the limits set forth in subsections (i) and (ii) above. For this purpose, if the exercise price of an Option is reduced, the transaction will be treated as a cancellation of the Option and the grant of a new Option.
 
The Plan shall become effective upon its adoption by the Board; provided, however, the Plan shall not become effective until the effective date of the Company's initial public offering pursuant to a registration statement filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission. It shall continue in effect for a term of ten (10) years unless sooner terminated under Section 15 of the Plan.
6. .
Term of Plan
 
7. .
Options
 
(a) Each Option shall be designated in the Option Agreement as either an Incentive Stock Option or a Nonstatutory Stock Option. However, notwithstanding such designation, to the extent that the aggregate Fair Market Value of the Shares with respect to which Incentive Stock Options are exercisable for the first time by the Optionee during any calendar year (under all plans of the Company and any Parent or Subsidiary) exceeds $100,000, such Options shall be treated as Nonstatutory Stock Options. For purposes of this subsection 7(a), Incentive Stock Options shall be taken into account in the order provided for in the Code and regulations promulgated thereunder. The Fair Market Value of the Shares shall be determined as of the time the Option with respect to such Shares is granted.
 
(b) The date of grant of an Option shall, for all purposes, be at the date on which the Administrator makes the determination granting such Option, or such other date as is determined by the Administrator. Notice of the determination shall be given to each Service Provider to whom an Option is so granted within a reasonable time after the date of such grant.
 
(c) The term of each Option shall be stated in the Option Agreement for such Option; provided, however, that the term shall be no more than ten (10) years from the date of grant thereof. In the case of an Incentive Stock Option granted to an Optionee who, at the time of the Option is granted, owns stock representing more than ten percent (10%) of the voting power of all classes of stock of the Company or any Parent or Subsidiary, the term of the Option shall be five (5) years from the date of grant or such shorter term as may be provided in the Option Agreement.
 
(d) The per share exercise price for the Shares to be issued upon exercise of an Option shall be such price as is determined by the Administrator, but shall be subject to the following:
 
(i) In the case of an Incentive Stock Option,
 
(A) granted to an Employee who, at the time of grant of such Option, owns stock representing more than ten percent (10%) of the voting power of all classes of stock of the Company or any Parent or Subsidiary, the exercise price shall be no less than 110% of the Fair Market Value per Share on the date of grant.
 
(B) granted to any other Employee, the Per Share exercise price shall be no less than 100% of the Fair Market Value per Share on the date of grant.
 
(ii) Notwithstanding the foregoing, Options may be granted with a per Share exercise price other than as required above pursuant to a merger or other corporate transaction.
 
(e) An Option shall be deemed exercised when the Company receives: (i) written or electronic notice of exercise (in accordance with the Option Agreement) from the person entitled to exercise the Option, and (ii) full payment for the Shares with respect to which the Option is exercised. Full payment may consist of any consideration and method of payment authorized by the Administrator and permitted by the Option Agreement and the Plan. Shares issued upon exercise of an Option shall be issued in the name of the Optionee or, if requested by the Optionee, in the name of the Optionee and his or her spouse. No adjustment will be made for a dividend or other right for which the record date is prior to the date the Shares are issued, except as provided in Section 14 of the Plan.
 
(f) . If termination of an Optionee's relationship as a Service Provider is for disability, but such disability is not a "permanent and total disability" as defined in Section 22(e)(3) of the Code, then in the case of an Incentive Stock Option, such Incentive Stock Option shall automatically cease to be treated as an Incentive Stock Option and shall be treated for tax purposes as a Nonstatutory Stock Option on the day three months and one day following the date of such termination.
Disability and Incentive Stock Options
 
8. .
Restricted Stock Awards
 
(a) The Administrator will determine to whom an offer will be made, the number of Shares the person may purchase, the purchase price, the restrictions placed on the Shares and all other terms and conditions of the Restricted Stock Award.
 
(b) All purchases under a Restricted Stock Award will be evidenced by an Award Agreement, which will be in substantially a form (which need not be the same for each Participant) that the Administrator has from time to time approved, and will comply with and be subject to the terms and conditions of the Plan. A Participant accepts a Restricted Stock Award by signing and delivering to the Company (manually or through electronic means as permitted by applicable law) an Award Agreement with full payment of the purchase price within the time allotted by the Administrator (thirty (30) days when no time is stated) from the date the Award Agreement was delivered to the Participant. If the Participant does not accept the Restricted Stock Award within the allotted time, then the offer of the Restricted Stock Award will terminate, unless the Administrator determines otherwise. The Award Agreement, Plan and other documents may be delivered in any manner (including electronic distribution or posting) that meets applicable legal requirements.
 
(c) The purchase price for a Restricted Stock Award will be determined by the Administrator and, may be less than Fair Market Value (but not less than the par value of the Shares) on the date the Restricted Stock Award is granted. Payment of the purchase price must be made in accordance with the Award Agreement, Section 12 of the Plan and any additional procedures established by the Company.
 
(d) Restrictions may be based on completion of a specified period of service with the Company or upon completion of the performance goals based on Performance Factors during any Performance Period as set out in advance in the Award Agreement. Prior to the grant of a Restricted Stock Award, the Administrator shall: (i) determine the nature, length and starting date of any Performance Period for the Restricted Stock Award; (ii) select from among the Performance Factors to be used to measure performance goals, if any; and (iii) determine the number of Shares that may be awarded. Performance Periods under different Restricted Stock Awards held by the same Participant may overlap and may have different Performance Factors and other criteria. Except as may be set forth in the Award Agreement, or otherwise determined by the Administrator, all Restricted Stock Awards held by a Participant will cease to vest upon such Participant ceasing to be a Service Provider.
 
9. .
Stock Bonus Awards
 
(a) All Stock Bonus Awards shall be made pursuant to an Award Agreement, which shall be in substantially a form (which need not be the same for each Participant) that the Administrator has from time to time approved, and will comply with and be subject to the terms and conditions of the Plan. No payment will be required for Shares awarded pursuant to a Stock Bonus Award.
 
(b) The Administrator will determine the number of Shares to be awarded under a Stock Bonus Award and any restrictions thereon. These restrictions may be based upon completion of a specified period of service with the Company or upon satisfaction of performance goals based on Performance Factors during any Performance Period as set out in advance in the Award Agreement. If the Stock Bonus Award is to be earned upon the satisfaction of performance goals, the Administrator shall: (i) determine the nature, length and starting date of any Performance Period for the Stock Bonus Award; (ii) select from among the Performance Factors to be used to measure performance goals; and (iii) determine the number of Shares that may be awarded. Prior to the issuance of any Shares or other payment pursuant to a Stock Bonus Award, the Administrator will determine the extent to which the Stock Bonus Award has been earned. Performance Periods of different Stock Bonus Awards held by the same Participant may overlap and be subject to different Performance Factors and other criteria. The number of Shares may be fixed or may vary in accordance with such performance goals and criteria as may be determined by the Administrator. The Administrator may adjust the performance goals applicable to a Stock Bonus Award to take into account changes in law and accounting or tax rules and to make such adjustments as the Administrator deems necessary or appropriate to reflect the impact of extraordinary or unusual items, events or circumstances to avoid windfalls or hardships.
 
(c) The Stock Bonus Award shall be paid currently. Payment may be made in the form of cash, whole Shares, or a combination thereof, based on the Fair Market Value of the Shares earned under a Stock Bonus Award on the date of payment, and in either a lump sum payment or in installments, all as the Administrator determines. Except as set forth in the Award Agreement, or otherwise determined by the Administrator, all Stock Bonus Awards held by a Participant will cease to vest upon such Participant ceasing to be a Service Provider.
 
10. .
Stock Appreciation Rights
 
(a) Each SAR may be granted for services to be rendered or for past services already rendered to the Company, or any Parent or Subsidiary of the Company. All SARs shall be made pursuant to an Award Agreement, which shall be in substantially a form (which need not be the same for each Participant) that the Administrator has from time to time approved, and will comply with and be subject to the terms and conditions of this Plan.
 
(b) The Administrator will determine the terms of a SAR including, without limitation: (i) the number of Shares deemed subject to the SAR; (ii) the exercise price (which may not be less than the Fair Market Value on the date of grant); (iii) the time or times during which the SAR may be settled (which may not extend more than ten (10) years from the date of grant); (iv) the consideration to be distributed on settlement of the SAR; and (v) the effect on each SAR of termination as a Service Provider. A SAR may be awarded upon satisfaction of such performance goals based on Performance Factors during any Performance Period as are set out in advance in the Award Agreement. If the SAR is being earned upon the satisfaction of performance goals, then the Administrator will: (a) determine the nature, length and starting date of any Performance Period for each SAR; and (b) select from among the Performance Factors to be used to measure the performance, if any. Prior to settlement of any SAR earned upon the satisfaction of performance goals pursuant to an Award Agreement, the Administrator shall determine the extent to which such SAR has been earned. Performance Periods may overlap and different SARs held by the same Participant may be subject to different performance goals and other criteria. The Award Agreement, Plan and other documents may be delivered in any manner (including electronic distribution or posting) that meets applicable legal requirements.
 
(c) Except as may be set forth in the Award Agreement, or otherwise determined by the Administrator, each SAR held by a Participant will cease to vest upon such Participant ceasing to be a Service Provider. To the extent a SAR is not exercised within the time specified by the Administrator, or as set forth in the Award Agreement, such SAR shall terminate at the end of such time.
 
(d) The portion of a SAR being settled shall be paid currently. Payment may be made in the form of cash or whole Shares or a combination thereof, either in a lump sum payment or in installments, all as the Administrator determines.
 
11. .
Restricted Stock Units
 
(a) All RSUs shall be evidenced by an Award Agreement, which shall be in substantially a form (which need not be the same for each Participant) that the Administrator has from time to time approved, and will comply with and be subject to the terms and conditions of the Plan.
 
(b) The Administrator will determine the terms of each RSU including, without limitation: (i) the number of Shares deemed subject to the RSU; (ii) the time or times during which the RSU may be exercised; (iii) the consideration to be distributed on settlement, and the effect on each RSU of the Participant's Termination. A RSU may be awarded upon satisfaction of such performance goals based on Performance Factors during any Performance Period as are set out in advance in the Participant's individual Award Agreement. If the RSU is being earned upon satisfaction of performance goals, then the Administrator will: (a) determine the nature, length and starting date of any Performance Period for the RSU; (b) select from among the Performance Factors to be used to measure the performance, if any; and (c) determine the number of Shares deemed subject to the RSU. Performance Periods may overlap and each Participant may simultaneously hold RSUs that are subject to different Performance Periods and different Performance Factors and other criteria. The number of Shares may be fixed or may vary in accordance with such performance goals and criteria as may be determined by the Administrator. The Administrator may adjust the performance goals applicable to the RSUs to take into account changes in law and accounting and to make such adjustments as the Administrator deems necessary or appropriate to reflect the impact of extraordinary or unusual items, events or circumstances to avoid windfalls or hardships.
 
(c) Except as may be set forth in the Award Agreement, or otherwise determined by the Administrator, all RSUs held by a Participant will cease to vest upon such Participant ceasing to be a Service Provider.
 
(d) The portion of a RSU being settled shall be paid currently. To the extent permissible under law, the Administrator may also permit a Participant to defer payment under a RSU to a date or dates after the RSU is earned, provided that the terms of the RSU and any deferral satisfy the requirements of Section 409A of the Code (or any successor) and any regulations or rulings promulgated thereunder. Payment may be made in the form of cash or whole Shares or a combination thereof, either in a lump sum payment or in installments, all as the Administrator determines.
 
12. .
Consideration and Issuance of Shares
 
(a) . The consideration to be paid for the Shares to be issued under an Award, including the method of payment, shall be determined by the Administrator (and, in the case of an Incentive Stock Option, shall be determined at the time of grant). In making its determination as to the type of consideration to accept, the Administrator shall consider if acceptance of such consideration may be reasonably expected to benefit the Company. Such consideration may consist of:
Permitted Consideration
 
(i) cash,
 
(ii) check,
 
(iii) promissory note,
 
(iv) consideration received by the Company under a cashless exercise program implemented by the Company in connection with the Plan,
 
(v) prior services provided to the Company or any Parent or Subsidiary of the Company as determined by the Administrator (provided the par value of the Shares shall always be paid in cash),
 
(vi) any combination of the foregoing methods of payment, or
 
(vii) such other consideration and method of payment for the issuance of Shares to the extent permitted by Applicable Laws.
 
(b) . Shares subject to any Award granted hereunder shall be issuable according to the terms hereof at such times and under such conditions as determined by the Administrator set forth in the Award Agreement. No fraction of a Share shall be issued under any Award. Until the Shares are issued (as evidenced by the appropriate entry on the books of the Company or of a duly authorized transfer agent of the Company), no right to vote or receive dividends or any other rights as a stockholder of the Company shall exist and after Shares are issued any rights to dividends are subject to the same restrictions applicable to the Shares to which such dividend rights relate.
Procedure; Rights as a Stockholder
 
(c) . Unless the Administrator determines otherwise, vesting of Awards granted hereunder shall be tolled during any unpaid leave of absence.
Leave of Absence
 
(d) . Generally upon a Participant ceasing to be a Service Provider, the remaining period during which Shares may be issued under any Award shall be as specified in the applicable Award Agreement, or as otherwise determined by the Administrator, and such Award shall cover only Shares that are vested on the date of termination. In the absence of a specified time in the applicable Award Agreement, vested Shares may be issued under such Award during the three (3) months following termination (except that this period shall be twelve (12) months if termination is due to disability or death), but in no event later than the expiration of the term of such Award. Upon expiration of the specified time, then the Award shall terminate in full. With respect to unvested Shares issued under an Award (such as a Stock Bonus), on the Participant ceasing to be a Service Provider such unvested Shares shall return to the Company and the par value or other amount paid for such unvested Shares (other than the value of services rendered) shall be refunded to such Participant. If termination as a Service Provider is due to death, exercise may be by the executor of the estate or by a person entitled to exercise the Award under the will or the laws of descent or distribution.
Termination of Relationship as a Service Provider
 
(e) . The Administrator may at any time offer to buy out for a payment in cash or Shares, an Award previously granted, based on such terms and conditions as the Administrator shall establish and communicate to the holder of such Award at the time that such offer is made.
Buyout Provisions
 
. Awards may not be sold, pledged, assigned, hypothecated, transferred, or disposed of in any manner other than by will or by the laws of descent or distribution and may be exercised, during the lifetime of the Service Provider to whom they are granted, only by such Service Provider.
13.
Non-Transferability of Awards
 
14. .
Adjustments Upon Changes in Capitalization, Merger or Asset Sale
 
(a) . Subject to any required action by the Stockholders of the Company, the number of shares of Common Stock covered by each outstanding Award (but not yet issued under such Award), and the number of shares of Common Stock which have been authorized for issuance under the Plan but as to which no Awards have yet been granted, as well as the price per share of Common Stock covered by each such outstanding Award (except for the par value per Share if that is not required to be adjusted by Applicable Law), shall be proportionately adjusted for any increase or decrease in the number of issued shares of Common Stock resulting from a stock split, reverse stock split, stock dividend, combination or reclassification of the Common Stock, or any other increase or decrease in the number of issued shares of Common Stock effected without receipt of consideration by the Company. The conversion of any convertible securities of the Company shall not be deemed to have been "effected without receipt of consideration." Such adjustment shall be made by the Board, whose determination in that respect shall be final, binding and conclusive. Except as expressly provided herein, no issuance by the Company of shares of stock of any class, or securities convertible into shares of stock of any class, shall affect, and no adjustment by reason thereof shall be made with respect to, the number or price of shares of Common Stock subject to an Award.
Changes in Capitalization
 
(b) . In the event of the proposed dissolution or liquidation of the Company, the Administrator shall notify each holder of an Award as soon as practicable prior to the effective date of such proposed transaction. The Administrator in its discretion may provide for any holder of an Award to have the right to exercise his or her Award until fifteen (15) days prior to such transaction as to all of the Shares covered thereby, including Shares as to which the Award would not otherwise be exercisable. In addition, the Administrator may provide that any Company repurchase right applicable to any Shares purchased upon exercise of an Award shall lapse as to all such Shares, provided the proposed dissolution or liquidation takes place at the time and in the manner contemplated. To the extent it has not been previously exercised, an Award will terminate immediately prior to the consummation of such proposed action.
Dissolution or Liquidation
 
(c) .
Merger or Asset Sale
 
(i) In the event of a merger of the Company with or into another corporation or the sale of all or substantially all of the assets of the Company pursuant to which the shareholders of the Company prior to such transaction hold less than 50% of the outstanding capital stock of the surviving corporation immediately after the closing of such transaction a "Change in Control Transaction") within four years after the date the Securities and Exchange Commission declares effective a registration statement filed by the Company for the initial public offering of the Company's Common Stock pursuant to the Securities Act (the "IPO Effective Time"), outstanding Awards may be assumed or equivalent awards may be substituted by the successor corporation or a Parent or Subsidiary thereof (the "Successor Corporation"). Following such assumption or substitution, if a Participant's service as an Employee or employee
 
of the Successor Corporation, as applicable, is terminated within 12 months of the Change in Control Transaction other than upon a voluntary resignation by such Participant or the termination of employment of such Participant for cause, all Awards and/or awards, as applicable shall become fully vested (and exercisable, if applicable). Thereafter, each Award (or equivalent award) held by such Participant shall remain exercisable in accordance with subsection 12(d) above. If the Successor Corporation does not assume an outstanding Award or substitute for it an equivalent award, the Award shall become fully vested (and exercisable, if applicable). In such event the Board shall notify such Participant that Shares subject to such Award have fully vested and that such Award shall be fully exercisable for a period of fifteen (15) days from the date of such notice, and that upon the expiration of such period, such Award shall terminate.
 
(ii) In the event of a Change in Control Transaction after four years after the IPO Effective Time, at the Administrator's discretion, outstanding Awards may be assumed or equivalent awards may be substituted by the Successor Corporation. If the Successor Corporation does not assume an outstanding Award or substitute for it an equivalent award, the Award shall become fully vested (and exercisable, if applicable). In such event the Board shall notify such Participant that Shares subject to such Award have fully vested and, if applicable, shall be fully exercisable for a period of time specified by the Administrator, not to be less than fifteen (15) days from the date of such notice, and upon the expiration of such period, such Award shall terminate. At the Administrator's discretion, the Administrator may provide that following an assumption or substitution of equivalent awards, if a Participant's service as an Employee, or employee of the Successor Corporation, as applicable, is terminated within 12 months of the Change in Control Transaction other than upon a voluntary resignation by such Participant or the termination of such Participant for cause, the Awards (or equivalent awards) held by such Participant shall become fully vested (and exercisable, if applicable) and shall remain exercisable in accordance with subsection 12(d) above. Even when assumed or substituted, the Administrator has the discretion to terminate the Plan and permit Participants to exercise Awards to the extent already vested and the discretion to accelerate vesting (and exercisability if applicable) of any portion of, or all of, the then outstanding Options or other Awards.
 
(iii) In the event of the merger of the Company with or into another corporation or the sale of substantially all of the assets of the Company in a transaction that is not a Change in Control Transaction, each outstanding Award shall be assumed or an equivalent award shall be substituted by the Successor Corporation. In the event the Successor Corporation refuses to assume or substitute for an Award, such Award shall terminate upon the closing of such merger or sale of assets.
 
For the purposes of this Section 14(c), an Award shall be considered assumed if, following the merger or sale of assets, the Award confers the right to purchase or receive, for each Share subject to the Award immediately prior to the merger or sale of assets, the consideration (whether stock, cash, or other securities or property) received in the merger or sale of assets by holders of Common Stock for each Share held on the effective date of the transaction (and if holders were offered a choice of consideration, the type of consideration chosen by the holders of a majority of the outstanding Shares). If such consideration received in the merger or sale of assets is not solely common stock of the successor corporation or its Parent, the Administrator
 
may, with the consent of the successor corporation, provide for the consideration to be received upon the exercise of the Award, for each Share subject to the Award, to be solely common stock of the successor corporation or its Parent equal in fair market value to the per share consideration received by holders of Common Stock in the merger or sale of assets.
 
15. .
Amendment and Termination of the Plan
 
(a) . The Board may at any time amend, alter, suspend or terminate the Plan.
Amendment and Termination
 
(b) . The Board shall obtain stockholder approval of any Plan amendment to the extent necessary and desirable to comply with Applicable Laws.
Stockholder Approval
 
(c) . No amendment, alteration, suspension or termination of the Plan shall impair the rights of any Optionee or other holder of an Award, unless mutually agreed otherwise between such person and the Administrator, which agreement must be in writing and signed by such person and the Company. Termination of the Plan shall not affect the Administrator's ability to exercise the powers granted to it hereunder with respect to Options granted under the Plan prior to the date of such termination.
Effect of Amendment or Termination
 
16. .
Conditions Upon Issuance of Shares
 
(a) . Shares shall not be issued pursuant to an Award unless in compliance with Applicable Laws and shall be further subject to the approval of counsel for the Company with respect to such compliance.
Legal Compliance
 
(b) . As a condition to the exercise of an Award, the Administrator may require the person exercising such Award to represent and warrant at the time of any such exercise that the Shares are being purchased only for investment and without any present intention to sell or distribute such Shares if, in the opinion of counsel for the Company, such a representation is required.
Investment Representations
 
The inability of the Company to obtain authority from any regulatory body having jurisdiction, which authority is deemed by the Company's counsel to be necessary to the lawful issuance and sale of any Shares hereunder, shall relieve the Company of any liability in respect of the failure to issue or sell Shares as to which such requisite authority shall not have been obtained.
17. .
Inability to Obtain Authority
 
The Company, during the term of this Plan, shall at all times reserve and keep available such number of Shares as shall be sufficient to satisfy the requirements of the Plan.
18. .
Reservation of Shares
 
The Plan shall be subject to approval by the stockholders of the Company within twelve (12) months after the date the Plan is adopted. Such stockholder approval shall be obtained in the degree and manner required under Applicable Laws.
19. .
Stockholder Approval
 

Exhibit 10.2
 
 
 
 
The following constitute the provisions of the 2000 Employee Stock Purchase Plan of Natus Medical Incorporated.
 
1. . The purpose of the Plan is to provide employees of the Company and its Designated Subsidiaries with an opportunity to purchase Common Stock of the Company through accumulated payroll deductions. It is the intention of the Company to have the Plan qualify as an "Employee Stock Purchase Plan" under Section 423 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended. The provisions of the Plan, accordingly, shall be construed so as to extend and limit participation in a manner consistent with the requirements of that section of the Code.
Purpose
 
2. .
Definitions
 
(a) "" shall mean the Board of Directors of the Company or any committee thereof designated by the Board of Directors of the Company in accordance with Section 14 of the Plan.
Board
 
(b) "" shall mean the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.
Code
 
(c) "" shall mean the common stock of the Company.
Common Stock
 
(d) "" shall mean Natus Medical Incorporated and any Designated Subsidiary of the Company.
Company
 
(e) "" shall mean all cash compensation reportable on Form W-2, including, without limitation, base straight time gross earnings, sales commissions, payments for overtime, shift premiums, incentive compensation, incentive payments and bonuses, plus any amounts contributed by the Employee to the Company's 401(k) Plan from compensation paid to the Employee by the Company.
Compensation
 
(f) "" shall mean any Subsidiary that has been designated by the Board from time to time in its sole discretion as eligible to participate in the Plan.
Designated Subsidiary
 
(g) "" shall mean any individual who is an Employee of the Company for tax purposes whose customary employment with the Company is at least thirty (30) hours per week and more than five (5) months in any calendar year. For purposes of the Plan, the employment relationship shall be treated as continuing intact while the individual is on sick leave or other leave of absence approved by the Company. Where the period of leave exceeds 90 days and the individual's right to reemployment is not guaranteed either by statute or by contract, the employment relationship shall be deemed to have terminated on the 91st day of such leave.
Employee
(h) "" shall mean the first Trading Day of each Offering Period.
Enrollment Date
 
(i) "" shall mean the last Trading Day of each Purchase Period.
Exercise Date
 
(j) "" shall mean, as of any date, the value of Common Stock determined as follows:
Fair Market Value
 
(i) If the Common Stock is listed on any established stock exchange or a national market system, including, without limitation, the Nasdaq National Market or The Nasdaq SmallCap Market of The Nasdaq Stock Market, its Fair Market Value shall be the closing sales price for such stock (or the closing bid, if no sales were reported) as quoted on such exchange or system for the last market trading day prior to the date of determination, as reported in or such other source as the Board deems reliable;
The Wall Street Journal
 
(ii) If the Common Stock is regularly quoted by a recognized securities dealer but selling prices are not reported, its Fair Market Value shall be the mean of the closing bid and asked prices for the Common Stock prior to the date of determination, as reported in or such other source as the Board deems reliable; or
The Wall Street Journal
 
(iii) In the absence of an established market for the Common Stock, the Fair Market Value thereof shall be determined in good faith by the Board.
 
(k) "" shall mean with respect to Offering Periods that commence after December 31, 2005, the period of approximately six (6) months during which an option granted pursuant to the Plan may be exercised, commencing on the Enrollment Date on or after May 1 and November 1 of each year and terminating on the last Trading Day in the Purchase Period ending approximately six (6) months later from such Enrollment Date; provided however, that the first Offering Period to commence after December 31, 2005, shall commence on January 1, 2006 and shall end on April 30, 2006; and generally meant with respect to Offering Periods that commenced prior to December 1, 2005, the periods of approximately twenty-four (24) months during which an option granted pursuant to the Plan may be exercised, generally commencing on the first Trading Day on or after May 1 and November 1 of each year and terminating on the last Trading Day in the periods ending twenty-four months later. The duration and timing of Offering Periods may be changed as provided in this Plan. All Offering Periods that commenced prior to December 1, 2005, shall terminate on December 31, 2005, unless already terminated prior to December 31, 2005.
Offering Periods
 
(l) "" shall mean this 2000 Employee Stock Purchase Plan.
Plan
 
(m) "" shall mean with respect to Offering Periods that commence after December 31, 2005, the period commencing on the Enrollment Date and ending with the next June 30 or December 31 after the Exercise Date; and generally meant with respect to Offering Periods that commenced prior to December 1, 2005, the approximately six month period commencing after one Exercise Date and ending with the next Exercise Date, except that the first Purchase Period of any Offering Period shall commence on the Enrollment Date and end with the next Exercise Date. For all Offering Periods that commenced prior to December 1, 2005, the last Purchase Period shall end on December 31, 2005, if such Offering Period has not already terminated prior to December 31, 2005.
Purchase Period
 
(n) "" with respect to Offering Periods that commence after December 31, 2005, shall mean 85% of the Fair Market Value of a share of Common Stock on the Exercise Date; and for Offering Periods that commenced prior to December 1, 2005, meant 85% of the Fair Market Value of a share of Common Stock on the Enrollment Date or on the Exercise Date, whichever is lower; , , that the Purchase Price may be adjusted by the Board pursuant to Section 20.
Purchase Price
provided
however in either event
 
(o) "" shall mean the number of shares of Common Stock covered by each option under the Plan which have not yet been exercised and the number of shares of Common Stock which have been authorized for issuance under the Plan but not yet placed under option.
Reserves
 
(p) "" shall mean a corporation, domestic or foreign, of which not less than 50% of the voting shares are held by the Company or a Subsidiary, whether or not such corporation now exists or is hereafter organized or acquired by the Company or a Subsidiary.
Subsidiary
 
(q) "" shall mean a day on which national stock exchanges and the Nasdaq System are open for trading.
Trading Day
 
3. .
Eligibility
 
(a) Any Employee (as defined in Section 2(g)) who shall be employed by the Company on a given Enrollment Date shall be eligible to participate in the Plan.
 
(b) Any provisions of the Plan to the contrary notwithstanding, no Employee shall be granted an option under the Plan (i) to the extent that, immediately after the grant, such Employee (or any other person whose stock would be attributed to such Employee pursuant to Section 424(d) of the Code) would own capital stock of the Company and/or hold outstanding options to purchase such stock possessing five percent (5%) or more of the total combined voting power or value of all classes of the capital stock of the Company or of any Subsidiary or (ii) to the extent that his or her rights to purchase stock under all employee stock purchase plans of the Company and its subsidiaries accrues at a rate which exceeds Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($25,000) worth of stock (determined at the fair market value of the shares at the time such option is granted) for each calendar year in which such option is outstanding at any time.
 
4. . After December 1, 2005, the Plan shall be implemented by consecutive Offering Periods with a new Offering Period commencing on the first Trading Day on or after January 1, 2006, and then on or after May 1 and November 1 each year, or on such other date as the Board shall determine, and continuing thereafter until terminated in accordance with Section 20 hereof. The Board shall have the power to change the duration of Offering Periods (including the commencement dates thereof) with respect to future offerings without stockholder approval if such change is announced at least five (5) days prior to the scheduled beginning of the first Offering Period to be affected thereafter.
Offering Periods
 
5. .
Participation
 
(a) An eligible Employee may become a participant in the Plan by completing a subscription agreement authorizing payroll deductions in the form of to this Plan and filing it with the Company's payroll office prior to the applicable Enrollment Date.
Exhibit A
 
(b) Payroll deductions for a participant shall commence on the first payroll following the Enrollment Date and shall end on the last payroll in the Offering Period to which such authorization is applicable, unless sooner terminated by the participant as provided in Section 10 hereof.
 
6. .
Payroll Deductions
 
(a) At the time a participant files his or her subscription agreement, he or she shall elect to have payroll deductions made on each pay day during the Offering Period in an amount not exceeding fifteen percent (15%) of the Compensation which he or she receives on each pay day during the Offering Period.
 
(b) All payroll deductions made for a participant shall be credited to his or her account under the Plan and shall be withheld in whole percentages only. A participant may not make any additional payments into such account.
 
(c) A participant may discontinue his or her participation in the Plan as provided in Section 10 hereof, or may increase or decrease the rate of his or her payroll deductions during the Offering Period by completing or filing with the Company a new subscription agreement authorizing a change in payroll deduction rate. The Board may, in its discretion, limit the number of participation rate changes during any Offering Period, including allowing such changes only at the beginning of each Purchase Period. The change in rate shall be effective with the first full payroll period following five (5) business days after the Company's receipt of the new subscription agreement unless the Company elects to process a given change in participation more quickly. A participant's subscription agreement shall remain in effect for successive Offering Periods unless terminated as provided in Section 10 hereof.
 
(d) Notwithstanding the foregoing, to the extent necessary to comply with Section 423(b)(8) of the Code and Section 3(b) hereof, a participant's payroll deductions may be decreased to zero percent (0%) at any time during a Purchase Period. Payroll deductions shall recommence at the rate provided in such participant's subscription agreement at the beginning of the next Offering Period for which participation would be permissible under Section 423(b)(8) of the Code and Section 3(b) hereof, unless terminated by the participant as provided in Section 10 hereof.
 
(e) At the time the option is exercised, in whole or in part, or at the time some or all of the Company's Common Stock issued under the Plan is disposed of, the participant must make adequate provision for the Company's federal, state, or other tax withholding obligations, if any, which arise upon the exercise of the option or the disposition of the Common Stock. At any time, the Company may, but shall not be obligated to, withhold from the participant's compensation the amount necessary for the Company to meet applicable withholding obligations, including any withholding required to make available to the Company any tax deductions or benefits attributable to sale or early disposition of Common Stock by the Employee.
 
7. . On the Enrollment Date of each Offering Period, each eligible Employee participating in such Offering Period shall be granted an option to purchase on each Exercise Date during such Offering Period (at the applicable Purchase Price) up to a number of shares of the Company's Common Stock determined by dividing such Employee's payroll
Grant of Option
 
deductions accumulated prior to such Exercise Date and retained in the Participant's account as of the Exercise Date by the applicable Purchase Price; provided that in no event shall an Employee be permitted to purchase during each Purchase Period more than a number of shares determined by dividing $12,500 by the Fair Market Value of a share of the Company's Common Stock (subject to any adjustment pursuant to Section 19) on the Enrollment Date, and provided further that such purchase shall be subject to the limitations set forth in Sections 3(b) and 11 hereof. The Board may, for future Offering Periods, increase or decrease, in its absolute discretion, the maximum number of shares of the Company's Common Stock an Employee may purchase during each Purchase Period of such Offering Period. Exercise of the option shall occur as provided in Section 8 hereof, unless the participant has withdrawn pursuant to Section 10 hereof. The option shall expire on the last day of the Offering Period.
 
8. .
Exercise of Option
 
(a) Unless a participant withdraws from the Plan as provided in Section 10 hereof, his or her option for the purchase of shares shall be exercised automatically on the Exercise Date, and the maximum number of full shares subject to such option shall be purchased for such participant at the applicable Purchase Price with the accumulated payroll deductions in his or her account. No fractional shares shall be purchased; any payroll deductions accumulated in a participant's account which are not sufficient to purchase a full share shall be retained in the participant's account for the subsequent Purchase Period or Offering Period, subject to earlier withdrawal by the participant as provided in Section 10 hereof. Any other monies left over in a participant's account after the Exercise Date shall be returned to the participant. During a participant's lifetime, a participant's option to purchase shares hereunder is exercisable only by him or her.
 
(b) If the Board determines that, on a given Exercise Date, the number of shares with respect to which options are to be exercised may exceed (i) the number of shares of Common Stock that were available for sale under the Plan on the Enrollment Date of the applicable Offering Period, or (ii) the number of shares available for sale under the Plan on such Exercise Date, the Board may in its sole discretion (x) provide that the Company shall make a pro rata allocation of the shares of Common Stock available for purchase on such Enrollment Date or Exercise Date, as applicable, in as uniform a manner as shall be practicable and as it shall determine in its sole discretion to be equitable among all participants exercising options to purchase Common Stock on such Exercise Date, and continue all Offering Periods then in effect, or (y) provide that the Company shall make a pro rata allocation of the shares available for purchase on such Enrollment Date or Exercise Date, as applicable, in as uniform a manner as shall be practicable and as it shall determine in its sole discretion to be equitable among all participants exercising options to purchase Common Stock on such Exercise Date, and terminate any or all Offering Periods then in effect pursuant to Section 20 hereof. The Company may make pro rata allocation of the shares available on the Enrollment Date of any applicable Offering Period pursuant to the preceding sentence, notwithstanding any authorization of additional shares for issuance under the Plan by the Company's stockholders subsequent to such Enrollment Date.
 
9. . As promptly as practicable after each Exercise Date on which a purchase of shares occurs, the Company shall arrange the delivery to each participant, as appropriate, of a certificate representing the shares purchased upon exercise of his or her option.
Delivery
 
10. .
Withdrawal
 
(a) A participant may withdraw all but not less than all the payroll deductions credited to his or her account and not yet used to exercise his or her option under the Plan at any time by giving written notice to the Company in the form of to this Plan. All of the participant's payroll deductions credited to his or her account shall be paid to such participant promptly after receipt of notice of withdrawal and such participant's option for the Offering Period shall be automatically terminated, and no further payroll deductions for the purchase of shares shall be made for such Offering Period. If a participant withdraws from an Offering Period, payroll deductions shall not resume at the beginning of the succeeding Offering Period unless the participant delivers to the Company a new subscription agreement.
Exhibit B
 
(b) A participant's withdrawal from an Offering Period shall not have any effect upon his or her eligibility to participate in any similar plan which may hereafter be adopted by the Company or in succeeding Offering Periods which commence after the termination of the Offering Period from which the participant withdraws.
 
11. . Upon a participant's ceasing to be an Employee, for any reason, he or she shall be deemed to have elected to withdraw from the Plan and the payroll deductions credited to such participant's account during the Offering Period but not yet used to exercise the option shall be returned to such participant or, in the case of his or her death, to the person or persons entitled thereto under Section 15 hereof, and such participant's option shall be automatically terminated. The preceding sentence notwithstanding, a participant who receives payment in lieu of notice of termination of employment shall be treated as continuing to be an Employee for the participant's customary number of hours per week of employment during the period in which the participant is subject to such payment in lieu of notice.
Termination of Employment
 
12. . No interest shall accrue on the payroll deductions of a participant in the Plan.
Interest
 
13. .
Stock
 
(a) Subject to adjustment upon changes in capitalization of the Company as provided in Section 19 hereof and as adjusted for the July 2000 two-for-five reverse split, the maximum number of shares of the Company's Common Stock which shall be made available for sale under the Plan shall be 1,000,000 shares (post-split) together with an annual increase to the number of shares reserved for issuance thereunder on the first day of the Company's fiscal year beginning in January 1, 2002, equal to the lesser of (i) 650,000 shares (post-split), (ii) four percent (4%) of the outstanding shares of the Company on the last day of the prior fiscal year or (iii) such amount as determined by the Board.
 
(b) The participant shall have no interest or voting right in shares covered by his option until such option has been exercised.
 
(c) Shares to be delivered to a participant under the Plan shall be registered in the name of the participant or in the name of the participant and his or her spouse.
 
14. . The Plan shall be administered by the Board or a committee of members of the Board appointed by the Board. The Board or its committee shall have full and exclusive discretionary authority to construe, interpret and apply the terms of the Plan, to determine eligibility and to adjudicate all disputed claims filed under the Plan. Every finding, decision and determination made by the Board or its committee shall, to the full extent permitted by law, be final and binding upon all parties.
Administration
 
15. .
Designation of Beneficiary
 
(a) A participant may file a written designation of a beneficiary who is to receive any shares and cash, if any, from the participant's account under the Plan in the event of such participant's death subsequent to an Exercise Date on which the option is exercised but prior to delivery to such participant of such shares and cash. In addition, a participant may file a written designation of a beneficiary who is to receive any cash from the participant's account under the Plan in the event of such participant's death prior to exercise of the option. If a participant is married and the designated beneficiary is not the spouse, spousal consent shall be required for such designation to be effective.
 
(b) Such designation of beneficiary may be changed by the participant at any time by written notice. In the event of the death of a participant and in the absence of a beneficiary validly designated under the Plan who is living at the time of such participant's death, the Company shall deliver such shares and/or cash to the executor or administrator of the estate of the participant, or if no such executor or administrator has been appointed (to the knowledge of the Company), the Company, in its discretion, may deliver such shares and/or cash to the spouse or to any one or more dependents or relatives of the participant, or if no spouse, dependent or relative is known to the Company, then to such other person as the Company may designate.
 
16. . Neither payroll deductions credited to a participant's account nor any rights with regard to the exercise of an option or to receive shares under the Plan may be assigned, transferred, pledged or otherwise disposed of in any way (other than by will, the laws of descent and distribution or as provided in Section 15 hereof) by the participant. Any such attempt at assignment, transfer, pledge or other disposition shall be without effect, except that the Company may treat such act as an election to withdraw funds from an Offering Period in accordance with Section 10 hereof.
Transferability
 
17. . All payroll deductions received or held by the Company under the Plan may be used by the Company for any corporate purpose, and the Company shall not be obligated to segregate such payroll deductions.
Use of Funds
 
18. . Individual accounts shall be maintained for each participant in the Plan. Statements of account shall be given to participating Employees at least annually, which statements shall set forth the amounts of payroll deductions, the Purchase Price, the number of shares purchased and the remaining cash balance, if any.
Reports
 
19. .
Adjustments Upon Changes in Capitalization, Dissolution, Liquidation, Merger or Asset Sale
 
(a) . Subject to any required action by the stockholders of the Company, the Reserves, the maximum number of shares each participant may purchase each Purchase Period (pursuant to Section 7), as well as the price per share and the number of shares of Common Stock covered by each option under the Plan which has not yet been exercised shall be proportionately adjusted for any increase or decrease in the number of issued shares of Common Stock resulting from a stock split, reverse stock split, stock dividend, combination or reclassification of the Common Stock, or any other increase or decrease in the number of shares of Common Stock effected without receipt of consideration by the Company; , , that conversion of any convertible securities of the Company shall not be deemed to have been "effected without receipt of consideration." Such adjustment shall be made by the Board, whose determination in that respect shall be final, binding and conclusive. Except as expressly provided herein, no issuance by the Company of shares of stock of any class, or securities convertible into shares of stock of any class, shall affect, and no adjustment by reason thereof shall be made with respect to, the number or price of shares of Common Stock subject to an option.
Changes in Capitalization
provided
however
 
(b) . In the event of the proposed dissolution or liquidation of the Company, the Offering Period then in progress shall be shortened by setting a new Exercise Date (the "New Exercise Date"), and shall terminate immediately prior to the consummation of such proposed dissolution or liquidation, unless provided otherwise by the Board. The New Exercise Date shall be before the date of the Company's proposed dissolution or liquidation. The Board shall notify each participant in writing, at least ten (10) business days prior to the New Exercise Date, that the Exercise Date for the participant's option has been changed to the New Exercise Date and that the participant's option shall be exercised automatically on the New Exercise Date, unless prior to such date the participant has withdrawn from the Offering Period as provided in Section 10 hereof.
Dissolution or Liquidation
 
(c) . In the event of a proposed sale of all or substantially all of the assets of the Company, or the merger of the Company with or into another corporation, each outstanding option shall be assumed or an equivalent option substituted by the successor corporation or a Parent or Subsidiary of the successor corporation. In the event that the successor corporation refuses to assume or substitute for the option, any Purchase Periods then in progress shall be shortened by setting a new Exercise Date (the "New Exercise Date") and any Offering Periods then in progress shall end on the New Exercise Date. The New Exercise Date shall be before the date of the Company's proposed sale or merger. The Board shall notify each participant in writing, at least ten (10) business days prior to the New Exercise Date, that the Exercise Date for the participant's option has been changed to the New Exercise Date and that the participant's option shall be exercised automatically on the New Exercise Date, unless prior to such date the participant has withdrawn from the Offering Period as provided in Section 10 hereof.
Merger or Asset Sale
 
20. .
Amendment or Termination
 
(a) The Board of Directors of the Company may at any time and for any reason terminate or amend the Plan. Except as provided in Section 19 hereof, no such termination can affect options previously granted, provided that an Offering Period may be terminated by the Board
 
of Directors on any Exercise Date if the Board determines that the termination of the Offering Period or the Plan is in the best interests of the Company and its stockholders. Except as provided in Section 19 and this Section 20 hereof, no amendment may make any change in any option theretofore granted which adversely affects the rights of any participant. To the extent necessary to comply with Section 423 of the Code (or any successor rule or provision or any other applicable law, regulation or stock exchange rule), the Company shall obtain stockholder approval in such a manner and to such a degree as required.
 
(b) Without stockholder consent and without regard to whether any participant rights may be considered to have been "adversely affected," the Board (or its committee) shall be entitled to change the Offering Periods, limit the frequency and/or number of changes in the amount withheld during an Offering Period, establish the exchange ratio applicable to amounts withheld in a currency other than U.S. dollars, permit payroll withholding in excess of the amount designated by a participant in order to adjust for delays or mistakes in the Company's processing of properly completed withholding elections, establish reasonable waiting and adjustment periods and/or accounting and crediting procedures to ensure that amounts applied toward the purchase of Common Stock for each participant properly correspond with amounts withheld from the participant's Compensation, and establish such other limitations or procedures as the Board (or its committee) determines in its sole discretion advisable which are consistent with the Plan.
 
(c) In the event the Board determines that the ongoing operation of the Plan may result in unfavorable financial accounting consequences, the Board may, in its discretion and, to the extent necessary or desirable, modify or amend the Plan to reduce or eliminate such accounting consequence including, but not limited to:
 
(i) altering the Purchase Price for any Offering Period including an Offering Period underway at the time of the change in Purchase Price;
 
(ii) shortening any Offering Period so that Offering Period ends on a new Exercise Date, including an Offering Period underway at the time of the Board action; and
 
(iii) allocating shares.
 
Such modifications or amendments shall not require stockholder approval or the consent of any Plan participants.
 
21. . All notices or other communications by a participant to the Company under or in connection with the Plan shall be deemed to have been duly given when received in the form specified by the Company at the location, or by the person, designated by the Company for the receipt thereof.
Notices
 
22. . Shares shall not be issued with respect to an option unless the exercise of such option and the issuance and delivery of such shares pursuant thereto shall comply with all applicable provisions of law, domestic or foreign, including, without limitation, the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder, and the requirements of any stock exchange upon which the shares may then be listed, and shall be further subject to the approval of counsel for the Company with respect to such compliance.
Conditions Upon Issuance of Shares
 
As a condition to the exercise of an option, the Company may require the person exercising such option to represent and warrant at the time of any such exercise that the shares are being purchased only for investment and without any present intention to sell or distribute such shares if, in the opinion of counsel for the Company, such a representation is required by any of the aforementioned applicable provisions of law.
 
23. . The Plan shall become effective upon the earlier to occur of its adoption by the Board of Directors or its approval by the stockholders of the Company; , , the Plan shall not become effective until the effective date of the Company's initial public offering pursuant to a registration statement filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission. It shall continue in effect for a term of ten (10) years unless sooner terminated under Section 20 hereof.
Term of Plan
provided
however
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
. The Company may, but will not be obligated to, withhold from my compensation the amount necessary to meet any applicable withholding obligation including any withholding necessary to make available to the Company any tax deductions or benefits attributable to sale or early disposition of Common Stock by me. If I dispose of such shares at any time after the expiration of the 2-year and 1-year holding periods, I understand that I will be treated for federal income tax purposes as having received income only at the time of such disposition, and that such income will be taxed as ordinary income only to the extent of an amount equal to the lesser of (1) the excess of the fair market value of the shares at the time of such disposition over the purchase price which I paid for the shares, or (2) 15% of the fair market value of the shares on the first day of the Offering Period. The remainder of the gain, if any, recognized on such disposition will be taxed as capital gain.
disposition of the Common Stock
 
 
 
 
 
I UNDERSTAND THAT THIS SUBSCRIPTION AGREEMENT SHALL REMAIN IN EFFECT THROUGHOUT SUCCESSIVE OFFERING PERIODS UNLESS TERMINATED BY ME.
 
 
 
 
 
 
The undersigned participant in the Offering Period of the Natus Medical Incorporated Employee Stock Purchase Plan which began on , (the "Enrollment Date") hereby notifies the Company that he or she hereby withdraws from the Offering Period. He or she hereby directs the Company to pay to the undersigned as promptly as practicable all the payroll deductions credited to his or her account with respect to such Offering Period. The undersigned understands and agrees that his or her option for such Offering Period will be automatically terminated. The undersigned understands further that no further payroll deductions will be made for the purchase of shares in the current Offering Period and the undersigned shall be eligible to participate in succeeding Offering Periods only by delivering to the Company a new Subscription Agreement.
            
            
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BABY/BABY-8K-20060109143602.txt.gz
TIME:20060109143602
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Completion of Acquisition or Disposition of Assets	Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Completion of Acquisition or Disposition of Assets
ITEM: Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
Item 1.01. Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement.
 
Credit Agreement with Wells Fargo Bank.
 
On January 4, 2006, Natus Medical Incorporated (the "Company") entered into (i) a Credit Agreement dated as of January 4, 2006 (the "Credit Agreement") by and between the Company and Wells Fargo Bank, National Association ("Wells Fargo"), (ii) a Term Commitment Note dated January 4, 2006 (the "Note") in favor of Wells Fargo and (iii) a Security Agreement dated as of January 4, 2006 in favor of Wells Fargo (the "Security Agreement", and together with the Credit Agreement and the Note, the "Credit Facility Documents").
 
Pursuant to the terms of the Credit Facility Documents, on January 5, 2006, Wells Fargo made an advance to the Company of $10 million secured by a security interest in the assets of the Company. The proceeds of such advance were used solely to assist in financing the acquisition of Bio-logic Systems Corp. ("Bio-logic"). The outstanding principal balance under the Note as of the close of business on January 30, 2006 is payable in installments over forty-eight (48) months, with a final installment consisting of all remaining unpaid principal due and payable in full on December 31, 2009. The outstanding principal balance under the Note will bear interest, at either a floating rate or a fixed rate at the election of the Company as follows (i) a fluctuating rate per annum one-quarter percent (0.25%) above the Prime Rate (as defined in the Note) in effect from time to time, or (ii) at a fixed rate per annum determined by Wells Fargo to be two and one-half percent (2.50%) above LIBOR (as defined in the Note) in effect on the first day of applicable one-, two- or three-month Fixed Rate Terms (as defined in the Note). The Note can be prepaid without penalty, (i) at any time if the Company elects to have interest determined under a fluctuating rate, or (ii) at the completion of any one-, two-, or three-month Fixed Rate Term, if the Company elects a fixed-rate option.
 
The Credit Agreement contains covenants, including covenants relating to financial reporting and notification, compliance with laws, maintenance of books and records, maintenance of properties and insurance, and limitations on guaranties, investments, issuance of debt, lease obligations and capital expenditures.
 
The Credit Agreement provides for events of default, including failure to pay any principal or interest when due, failure to perform or observe covenants, bankruptcy or insolvency events and the occurrence of a material adverse effect.
 
The foregoing description of the Credit Agreement, the Note and the Security Agreement does not purport to be complete and is qualified in its entirety by reference to the copies of the Credit Agreement, the Note and the Security Agreement, attached hereto as Exhibit 10.1, Exhibit 10.2 and Exhibit 10.3, respectively, and incorporated herein by reference.
 
Item 2.01 Completion of Acquisition or Disposition of Assets.
 
Acquisition of Bio-logic Systems Corp.
 
On January 5, 2006, the Company completed its acquisition of Bio-logic pursuant to an Agreement and Plan of Merger dated as of October 16, 2005 (the "Merger Agreement") by and among the Company, Bio-logic and Summer Acquisition Corporation, a wholly owned subsidiary of the Company ("Merger Sub"). This description of the Merger Agreement does not purport to be complete and is qualified in its entirety by reference to the Merger Agreement, a copy of which was attached as Exhibit 10.1 to the Company's Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on October 19, 2005.
Pursuant to the terms of the Merger Agreement, each outstanding share of Bio-logic common stock was converted into the right to receive $8.77 in cash. Each outstanding option to acquire Bio-logic common stock was cancelled, with the holder of the option receiving, for each share covered by the option, an amount equal to the excess (if any) of $8.77 over the exercise price per share of the option. The total aggregate payment by the Company to the former stockholders and optionholders of Bio-logic is approximately $68.8 million ("Preliminary Purchase Cost"), exclusive of direct costs associated with the acquisition, which cannot be reasonably determined at this time. The Preliminary Purchase Cost exceeds the Company's original estimate of the purchase cost by $2.8 million because the exercise of options to acquire Bio-logic stock during the period October 19, 2005 through the date of the acquisition increased the number of shares of common stock of Bio-logic outstanding on the date of the acquisition. However, the $2.8 million increase in the purchase cost was offset by the receipt by Bio-logic of $2.8 million in proceeds from the exercise of those options.
 
Item 2.03 Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation.
 
The information disclosed in Item 1.01 of this Current Report on Form 8-K is incorporated by reference into this Item 2.03.
 
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 10.1
 
E C
XECUTION
OPY
 
 
THIS CREDIT AGREEMENT (this ) is entered into as of January 4, 2006, by and between NATUS MEDICAL INCORPORATED, a Delaware corporation (), and WELLS FARGO BANK, NATIONAL ASSOCIATION ().
"Agreement"
"Borrower"
"Bank"
 
 
WHEREAS, pursuant to the Agreement and Plan of Merger, dated as of October 16, 2005 (the ), among Borrower, Summer Acquisition Corporation, a Delaware corporation, and Bio-logic Systems Corp., a Delaware corporation (), Borrower has agreed to acquire all of the outstanding stock of Bio-logic, subject to the terms and conditions contained therein.
"Merger Agreement"
"Bio-logic"
 
WHEREAS, Borrower has requested that Bank extend or continue credit to Borrower to, among other things, provide financing to Borrower for the purpose of financing Borrower's acquisition of Bio-logic, as more fully described below, and Bank has agreed to provide such credit to Borrower on the terms and conditions contained herein.
 
NOW, THEREFORE, for valuable consideration, the receipt and sufficiency of which are hereby acknowledged, Bank and Borrower hereby agree as follows:
 
 
As used in this Agreement, the following terms shall have the meaning set forth below (such meanings to be equally applicable to both the singular and plural forms of the terms defined):
 
means that certain unimproved parcel of land which encompasses approximately 14 acres, is contiguous to the Real Property Collateral and which Borrower is attempting to sell to a developer, as more particularly described on hereto, which is incorporated herein by this reference.
"14 Acre Parcel"
Schedule 1
 
has the meaning ascribed to such term in Section 8.12(b) hereof.
"AAA"
 
has the meaning ascribed to such term in the introductory paragraph hereof.
"Agreement"
 
has the meaning ascribed to such term in the introductory paragraph hereof.
"Bank"
 
means the Bankruptcy Reform Act, Title 11 of the United States Code, as amended or recodified from time to time.
"Bankruptcy Code"
 
has the meaning ascribed to such term in the Recitals hereof.
"Bio-logic"
has the meaning ascribed to such term in the introductory paragraph hereof.
"Borrower"
 
means January 4, 2006.
"Closing Date"
 
means all non-public, confidential and/or proprietary information of Borrower, now or at any time hereafter provided to Bank by Borrower, or any of Borrower's officers, employees, agents or representatives, in connection with Bank's evaluation of Borrower's credit request and/or Bank's ongoing credit accommodations to Borrower, and shall include, without limitation, any and all financial, technical and/or business information relating to Borrower, including trade secrets, research and development test results, marketing or business plans and strategies, forecasts, budgets, projections, customer and supplier information, and any other analyses, computations or studies prepared by or for Borrower.
"Confidential Information"
 
means each of Natus Acquisition Corporation, a Delaware corporation, and Summer Acquisition Corporation, a Delaware corporation.
"Domestic Subsidary"
 
has the meaning ascribed to such term in Section 5.9(c) hereof.
"EBITDA"
 
means the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, as amended or recodified from time to time.
"ERISA"
 
has the meaning ascribed to such term in Article VII hereof.
"Event of Default"
 
"" has the meaning ascribed to such term in Section 5.9(c) hereof.
Fixed Charge Coverage Ratio
 
means each of Natus Neonatal, a company organized under the laws of the United Kingdom, Fischer-Zoth Diagnosesysteme GmbH, a company organized under the laws of Germany, and Fischer-Zoth, a company organized under the laws of Austria.
"Foreign Subsidiary"
 
or have the meanings ascribed to such terms in Section 2.5 hereof.
"Guarantor"
"Guarantors"
 
or have the meanings ascribed to such terms in Section 2.5 hereof.
"Guaranty"
"Guaranties"
 
"" means this Agreement, the Term Commitment Note, the Security Agreement, the Guaranties, and each other contract, instrument and document required by or delivered to Bank in connection with this Agreement.
Loan Documents
 
"" has the meaning ascribed to such term in Section 5.9(d) hereof.
Liquidity
 
means a material adverse effect on (i) the business operations or financial condition of Borrower and its Subsidiaries taken as a whole, (ii) the ability of Borrower to repay all debt, principal, interest, expenses and other amounts owed to Bank by Borrower pursuant to this Agreement, the Term Commitment Note or any other Loan Document,
"Material Adverse Effect"
 
or to otherwise perform its material obligations under the Loan Documents, or (iii) Borrower's interest in, or the value, perfection or priority of Bank's security interest or lien, as applicable, in the collateral described in Section 2.4 hereof or in the Real Property Collateral.
 
has the meaning ascribed to such term in the Recitals hereof.
"Merger Agreement"
 
means:
"Permitted Indebtedness"
 
(a) the liabilities of Borrower to Bank;
 
(b) any other liabilities of Borrower existing as of, and disclosed to Bank prior to, the Closing Date;
 
(c) unsecured indebtedness to trade creditors incurred in the ordinary course of business;
 
(d) indebtedness secured by Permitted Liens;
 
(e) guaranty obligations of Borrower with respect to indebtedness of Subsidiaries of Borrower permitted under Section 6.6;
 
(f) other indebtedness not otherwise described in paragraphs (a) through (e) of this definition not exceeding in the aggregate $100,000.00 outstanding at any time; and
 
(g) extensions, refinancings, modifications, amendments and restatements of any items of Permitted Indebtedness identified in (a) through (g) above, that the principal amount is not increased or the terms modified to impose more burdensome terms upon Borrower or its Subsidiaries, as the case may be.
provided
 
"" means:
Permitted Investments
 
(a) investments by Borrower existing as of, and disclosed to Bank prior to, the Closing Date;
 
(b) investments by Borrower in (i) marketable direct obligations issued or unconditionally guaranteed by the United States of America or any agency or any state thereof maturing within one year from the date of acquisition thereof, (ii) commercial paper maturing no more than one year from the date of creation thereof and currently having rating of at least A-2 or P-2 from either Standard & Poor's Corporation or Moody's Investors Service, (iii) Bank's certificates of deposit maturing no more than one year from the date of investment therein, and (iv) Bank's money market accounts;
 
(c) investments by Borrower consisting of the endorsement of negotiable instruments for deposit or collection or similar transactions in the ordinary course of business of Borrower;
 
(d) investments by Borrower consisting of deposit accounts in which Bank has a first priority perfected security interest;
 
(e) investments by Borrower in Foreign Subsidiaries not to exceed $250,000.00 in the aggregate in any fiscal year;
 
(f) investments by Borrower in Domestic Subsidiaries;
 
(g) investments by Borrower not to exceed $100,000.00 in the aggregate in any fiscal year consisting of (i) travel advances and employee relocation loans and other employee loans and advances in the ordinary course of business, and (ii) loans to employees, officers or directors relating to the purchase of equity securities of Borrower pursuant to employee stock purchase plans or agreements approved by Borrower's board of directors;
 
(h) investments (including debt obligations) by Borrower not to exceed $50,000.00 in the aggregate outstanding at any time received in connection with the bankruptcy or reorganization of customers or suppliers and in settlement of delinquent obligations of, and other disputes with, customers or suppliers arising in the ordinary course of business;
 
(i) investments by Borrower not to exceed $50,000.00 in the aggregate outstanding at any time consisting of notes receivable of, or prepaid royalties and other credit extensions, to customers and suppliers who are not affiliates, in the ordinary course of business; that this paragraph (i) shall not apply to investments of Borrower in any Subsidiary; and
provided
 
(j) other investments by Borrower not otherwise described in paragraphs (a) through (i) above not exceeding $100,000.00 in the aggregate outstanding at any time.
 
"" means:
Permitted Liens
 
(a) liens and security interests in favor of Bank;
 
(b) liens and security interests existing as of, and disclosed to Bank in writing prior to, the Closing Date;
 
(c) liens for taxes, fees, assessments or other government charges or levies, either not delinquent or being contested in good faith and for which Borrower maintains adequate reserves on Borrower's books;
 
(d) purchase money liens not to exceed $100,000.00 in the aggregate (i) on equipment acquired or held by Borrower incurred for financing the acquisition of such equipment, or (ii) existing on equipment when acquired, if the lien is confined to the property so acquired and improvements thereon, and the proceeds of such equipment;
 
(e) statutory liens, not to exceed $100,000.00 in the aggregate, securing claims or demands of materialmen, mechanics, carriers, warehousemen, landlords and other persons imposed without action of such parties;
 
(f) liens to secure payment of workers' compensation, employment insurance, old-age pensions, social security and other like obligations incurred in the ordinary course of business;
 
(g) liens incurred in the extension, renewal or refinancing of the indebtedness secured by liens identified in paragraphs (c) and (d) of this definition, that any extension, renewal or replacement lien shall be limited to the property encumbered by the existing lien and the principal amount of the indebtedness being extended, renewed or refinanced does not increase;
provided
 
(h) leases or subleases of real property granted in the ordinary course of business, and leases, subleases, non-exclusive licenses or sublicenses of property (other than real property or intellectual property) granted in the ordinary course of Borrower's business;
 
(i) non-exclusive licenses of intellectual property granted to third parties in the ordinary course of business; and
 
(j) liens in favor of financial institutions other than Bank arising in connection with Borrower's deposit and/or securities accounts held at such institutions, provided that (i) Bank has a first priority perfected security interest in the amounts held in such deposit and/or securities accounts and (ii) such liens secure Borrower's payment of normal fees and charges related to the maintenance of such deposit and/or securities accounts and not indebtedness related to credit extended by such financial institutions to Borrower.
 
"" has the meaning ascribed to such term in Section 3.9 hereof.
Plan
 
"" has the meaning ascribed to such term in Section 5.12 hereof.
Real Property Collateral
 
means the chief executive officer, the president, the chief financial officer, any vice president (including, without limitation, the vice president, finance), the general counsel and/or secretary, or the controller of Borrower, or any other officer of Borrower having substantially the same authority and responsibility as any of the foregoing.
"Responsible Officer"
 
has the meaning ascribed to such term in Section 8.12(b) hereof.
"Rules"
 
means that certain Security Agreement, dated as of January 4, 2006, executed by Borrower in favor of Bank.
"Security Agreement"
 
means means payments made by Borrower as follows: (i) payments made by Borrower pursuant to its July 2003 purchase of substantially all of the assets of Neometrics, Inc., in an aggregate amount not to exceed Eight Hundred Thousand United States Dollars (U.S. $800,000.00), and payable on the anniversary of such purchase
"Specified Earn-out Payments"
 
occurring in July 2006, and (ii) payments made by Borrower pursuant to its September 2004 purchase of all the common stock of privately held Fischer-Zoth Diagnosesysteme GmbH and affiliated entities (Fischer-Zoth), as well as intangible assets held individually by the owners of Fischer-Zoth, related to (A) the annual results of sales of Fischer-Zoth during the three twelve-month periods ending September 30, 2007, in an aggregate amount not to exceed 1.5 million Euro in total (approximately $2.0 million based on the USD/EUR exchange rate at December 31, 2004), and (B) in-process research and development technology, in an aggregate amount not to exceed U.S. $750,000.
 
means any Domestic Subsidiary or Foreign Subsidiary.
"Subsidiary"
 
has the meaning ascribed to such term in Section 5.9(b) hereof.
"Tangible Net Worth"
 
"Term Commitment" has the meaning ascribed to such term in Section 2.1(a) hereof.
 
means a promissory note executed by Borrower in favor of Bank to evidence Borrower's obligation to repay advances under the Term Commitment, substantially in the form of attached hereto.
"Term Commitment Note"
Exhibit A
 
has the meaning ascribed to such term in Section 5.9(b) hereof.
"Total Liabilities"
 
has the meaning ascribed to such term in Section 7.1(d) hereof.
"Third Party Obligor"
 
has the meaning ascribed to such term in Section 2.2(c) hereof.
"Unpaid Commitment Fee"
 
 
SECTION 2.1. TERM COMMITMENT.
 
(a) . Subject to the terms and conditions of this Agreement, Bank hereby agrees to make a one-time advance to Borrower up to and including February 28, 2006, in an amount not to exceed Ten Million Dollars ($10,000,000.00), the proceeds of which shall solely be used to finance some or all of the cost of Borrower's acquisition of Bio-logic pursuant to the terms and provisions of the Merger Agreement (the ). Borrower's obligation to repay advances under the Term Commitment shall be evidenced by the Term Commitment Note, all terms of which are incorporated herein by this reference. In the event Borrower does not make the one-time advance allowed pursuant to this paragraph and the Term Commitment Note on or before February 28, 2006, Bank's agreement to extend credit to Borrower hereunder and under the other Loan Documents shall terminate and be of no further force and effect.
Term Commitment
"Term Commitment"
 
(b) . Notwithstanding any other provision of this Agreement, the aggregate amount of all outstanding borrowings under the Term Commitment shall not at any time exceed a maximum of Ten Million Dollars ($10,000,000.00).
Limitation on Borrowings
 
(c) . The principal amount of the Term Commitment shall be amortized over forty-eight months and shall be repaid on the last day of each month in equal installments, as set forth in the Term Commitment Note.
Repayment
 
(d) . Borrower may prepay principal on the Term Commitment solely in accordance with the provisions of the Term Commitment Note.
Prepayment
 
SECTION 2.2. INTEREST/FEES.
 
(a) . The outstanding principal balance of the Term Commitment shall bear interest at the rate of interest set forth in the Term Commitment Note.
Interest
 
(b) . Interest shall be computed on the basis of a 360-day year, actual days elapsed. Interest shall be payable at the times and place set forth in each promissory note or other instrument or document required hereby.
Computation and Payment
 
(c) . Borrower shall pay to Bank a non-refundable commitment fee for the Term Commitment equal to One-Hundred Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00), Twenty-Five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00) of which has been paid prior to the date hereof (and which amount is non-refundable, notwithstanding the effectiveness of this Agreement), and Seventy-Five Thousand Dollars ($75,000.00) of which (the ) shall be due and payable in full on the Closing Date.
Commitment Fee
"Unpaid Commitment Fee"
 
SECTION 2.3. COLLECTION OF PAYMENTS. Borrower authorizes Bank to collect all principal, interest and fees due under each credit created by the Loan Documents by charging Borrower's deposit account number 4121261853 with Bank, or any other deposit account maintained by Borrower with Bank, for the full amount thereof. Should there be insufficient funds in any such deposit account to pay all such sums when due, the full amount of such deficiency shall be immediately due and payable by Borrower.
 
SECTION 2.4. COLLATERAL.
 
As security for all indebtedness of Borrower to Bank created by the Loan Documents, Borrower hereby grants to Bank security interests of first priority (except for Permitted Liens that are senior to Bank's security interests), in all Borrower's personal property (including, without limitation, all Borrower's accounts receivable, inventory, equipment and intellectual property now owned or hereafter acquired), but excluding interests as a lessee under real property and personal property leases and shares of voting stock of each Foreign Subsidiary that represent more than 65% of the voting stock of such Foreign Subsidiary.
 
All of the foregoing shall be evidenced by and subject to the terms of such security agreements, financing statements, deeds or mortgages, and other documents as Bank shall
 
reasonably require, all in form and substance satisfactory to Bank. Borrower shall reimburse Bank immediately upon demand for all costs and expenses incurred by Bank in connection with any of the foregoing security, including without limitation, filing and recording fees and costs of appraisals, audits and title insurance.
 
SECTION 2.5. GUARANTIES. All indebtedness of Borrower to Bank shall be guaranteed jointly and severally by each Domestic Subsidiary (each a and, collectively, the ) in the principal amount of Ten Million United States Dollars (U.S. $10,000,000.00) each, as evidenced by and subject to the terms of guaranties (each a and, collectively, the ) in form and substance satisfactory to Bank.
"Guarantor"
"Guarantors"
"Guaranty"
"Guaranties"
 
 
Borrower makes the following representations and warranties to Bank, which representations and warranties shall survive the execution of this Agreement and shall continue in full force and effect until the full and final payment, and satisfaction and discharge, of all obligations of Borrower to Bank created by the Loan Documents.
 
SECTION 3.1. LEGAL STATUS. Borrower is a corporation, duly organized and existing and in good standing under the laws of the State of Delaware, and is qualified or licensed to do business (and is in good standing as a foreign corporation, if applicable) in all jurisdictions in which such qualification or licensing is required or in which the failure to so qualify or to be so licensed could have a Material Adverse Effect.
 
SECTION 3.2. AUTHORIZATION AND VALIDITY. This Agreement and each of the Loan Documents have been duly authorized, and upon their execution and delivery in accordance with the provisions hereof will constitute legal, valid and binding agreements and obligations of Borrower or the party which executes the same, enforceable in accordance with their respective terms.
 
SECTION 3.3. NO VIOLATION. The execution, delivery and performance by Borrower of each of the Loan Documents do not violate any provision of any law or regulation, or contravene any provision of the Certificate of Incorporation or By-Laws of Borrower, or result in any breach of or default under any contract, obligation, indenture or other instrument to which Borrower is a party or by which Borrower may be bound which violation contravention, breach or default could individually or in the aggregate reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect.
 
SECTION 3.4. LITIGATION. There are no pending, or to the best of Borrower's knowledge threatened, actions, claims, investigations, suits or proceedings by or before any governmental authority, arbitrator, court or administrative agency which could reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect, other than those disclosed by Borrower to Bank in writing prior to the date hereof.
 
SECTION 3.5. CORRECTNESS OF FINANCIAL STATEMENT. The financial statement of Borrower dated September 30, 2005, a true copy of which has been delivered by Borrower to Bank prior to the date hereof, (a) is complete and correct and presents fairly the financial condition of Borrower, (b) discloses all liabilities of Borrower that are required to be reflected or reserved against under generally accepted accounting principles, whether liquidated or unliquidated, fixed or contingent, and (c) has been prepared in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles consistently applied. Since the date of such financial statement there has been no material adverse change in the financial condition of Borrower, nor (exclusive of Permitted Liens) has Borrower mortgaged, pledged, granted a security interest in or otherwise encumbered any of its assets or properties except in favor of Bank or as otherwise permitted by Bank in writing.
 
SECTION 3.6. INCOME TAX RETURNS. Borrower has no knowledge of any pending assessments or adjustments of its income tax payable with respect to any year.
 
SECTION 3.7. NO SUBORDINATION. There is no agreement, indenture, contract or instrument to which Borrower is a party or by which Borrower may be bound that requires the subordination in right of payment of any of Borrower's obligations created by the Loan Documents to any other obligation of Borrower.
 
SECTION 3.8. PERMITS, FRANCHISES. Borrower possesses, and will hereafter possess, all permits, consents, approvals, franchises and licenses required and rights to all trademarks, trade names, patents, and fictitious names, if any, necessary to enable it to conduct the business in which it is now engaged in compliance with applicable law.
 
SECTION 3.9. ERISA. Borrower is in compliance in all material respects with all applicable provisions of ERISA; Borrower has not violated any provision of any defined employee pension benefit plan (as defined in ERISA) maintained or contributed to by Borrower (each, a ); no Reportable Event as defined in ERISA has occurred and is continuing with respect to any Plan initiated by Borrower; Borrower has met its minimum funding requirements under ERISA with respect to each Plan; and each Plan will be able to fulfill its benefit obligations as they come due in accordance with the Plan documents and under generally accepted accounting principles.
"Plan"
 
SECTION 3.10. OTHER OBLIGATIONS. Borrower is not in default on any obligation for borrowed money, any purchase money obligation or any other material lease, commitment, contract, instrument or obligation.
 
SECTION 3.11. ENVIRONMENTAL MATTERS. Except as disclosed by Borrower to Bank in writing prior to the date hereof, Borrower is in compliance in all material respects with all applicable federal or state environmental, hazardous waste, health and safety statutes, and any rules or regulations adopted pursuant thereto, which govern or affect any of Borrower's operations and/or properties, including without limitation, the Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation and Liability Act of 1980, the Superfund Amendments and Reauthorization Act of 1986, the Federal Resource Conservation and Recovery Act of 1976, and the Federal Toxic Substances Control Act, as any of the same may be amended, modified or
 
supplemented from time to time. None of the operations of Borrower is the subject of any federal or state investigation evaluating whether any remedial action involving a material expenditure is needed to respond to a release of any toxic or hazardous waste or substance into the environment. Borrower has no material contingent liability in connection with any release of any toxic or hazardous waste or substance into the environment.
 
SECTION 3.12. REAL PROPERTY COLLATERAL. Except as disclosed by Borrower to Bank in writing prior to the date hereof, with respect to any real property collateral required hereby, including, without limitation, the Real Property Collateral:
 
(a) All taxes, governmental assessments, insurance premiums, and water, sewer and municipal charges, and rents (if any) which previously became due and owing in respect thereof have been paid as of the date hereof.
 
(b) There are no mechanics' or similar liens or claims which have been filed for work, labor or material (and no rights are outstanding that under law could give rise to any such lien) which affect all or any interest in any such real property and which are or may be prior to or equal to the lien thereon in favor of Bank.
 
(c) None of the improvements which were included for purpose of determining the appraised value of any such real property lies outside of the boundaries and/or building restriction lines thereof, and no improvements on adjoining properties materially encroach upon any such real property.
 
(d) There is no pending, or to the best of Borrower's knowledge threatened, proceeding for the total or partial condemnation of all or any portion of any such real property, and all such real property is in good repair and free and clear of any damage that would materially and adversely affect the value thereof as security and/or the intended use thereof.
 
SECTION 3.13. CIT FINANCIAL LOAN. There is no outstanding balance under that certain Loan Agreement #007473897-001, dated June 2, 2005 (the ), and referenced in the UCC Financing Statement filed with the Delaware Secretary of State on June 7, 2005 and bearing initial filing number 51736173 (as amended by the UCC Financing Statement Amendment filed with the Delaware Secretary of State on November 9, 2005 and bearing amendment number 53487031, the ).
"CIT Loan Agreement"
"CIT Financing Statement"
 
 
SECTION 4.1. CONDITIONS OF INITIAL EXTENSION OF CREDIT. The obligation of Bank to extend any credit contemplated by this Agreement is subject to the fulfillment to Bank's satisfaction of all of the following conditions:
 
(a) . All legal matters incidental to the extension of credit by Bank shall be satisfactory to Bank's counsel.
Approval of Bank Counsel
 
(b) . Bank shall have received, in form and substance satisfactory to Bank, each of the following, duly executed:
Documentation
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
(c) . There shall have been no material adverse change, as determined by Bank, in the financial condition or business of Borrower, nor any material decline, as determined by Bank, in the market value of any collateral required hereunder or a substantial or material portion of the assets of Borrower.
Financial Condition
 
(d) . Borrower shall have delivered to Bank evidence of insurance coverage on all Borrower's property, in form, substance, amounts, covering risks and issued by companies satisfactory to Bank, and where required by Bank, with loss payable endorsements in favor of Bank, including without limitation, policies of fire and extended coverage insurance covering all real property collateral required hereby, with replacement cost and mortgagee loss payable endorsements, and such policies of insurance against specific hazards affecting any such real property as may be required by governmental regulation or Bank.
Insurance
 
(e) . Bank shall have obtained, at Borrower's cost, an appraisal of all real property collateral required hereby, and all improvements thereon, issued by an appraiser acceptable to Bank and in form, substance and reflecting values satisfactory to Bank, in its discretion.
Appraisals
 
(f) . The Unpaid Commitment Fee shall have been paid in full to Bank in immediately available funds.
Unpaid Commitment Fee
 
SECTION 4.2. CONDITIONS OF EACH EXTENSION OF CREDIT. The obligation of Bank to make each extension of credit requested by Borrower hereunder shall be subject to the fulfillment to Bank's satisfaction of each of the following conditions:
 
(a) . The representations and warranties contained herein and in each of the other Loan Documents shall be true on and as of the date of the signing of this Agreement and on the date of each extension of credit by Bank pursuant hereto, with the same effect as though such representations and warranties had been made on and as of each such date, and on each such date, no Event of Default as defined herein, and no condition, event or act which with the giving of notice or the passage of time or both would constitute such an Event of Default, shall have occurred and be continuing or shall exist.
Compliance
 
(b) . Bank shall have received all additional documents which may be required in connection with such extension of credit.
Documentation
 
 
Borrower covenants that so long as Bank remains committed to extend credit to Borrower pursuant hereto, or any liabilities (whether direct or contingent, liquidated or unliquidated) of Borrower to Bank under any of the Loan Documents remain outstanding, and until payment in full of all obligations of Borrower created by the Loan Documents, Borrower shall, unless Bank otherwise consents in writing:
 
SECTION 5.1. PUNCTUAL PAYMENTS. Punctually pay all principal, interest, fees or other liabilities due under any of the Loan Documents at the times and place and in the manner specified therein.
 
SECTION 5.2. ACCOUNTING RECORDS. Maintain adequate books and records in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles consistently applied, and permit any representative of Bank, at any reasonable time, to inspect, audit and examine such books and records, to make copies of the same, and to inspect the properties of Borrower.
 
SECTION 5.3. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS. Provide to Bank all of the following, in form and detail satisfactory to Bank:
 
(a) not later than 90 days after and as of the end of each fiscal year, audited financial statements with the unqualified opinion of independent certified public accountants selected by Borrower and acceptable to Bank, which annual financial statements shall include Borrower's balance sheet as at the end of such fiscal year and the related statements of Borrower's income, reconciliation of retained earnings and cash flows for the fiscal year then ended, all in reasonable detail and prepared in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles;
 
(b) not later than 45 days after and as of the end of each fiscal quarter, a financial statement of Borrower, prepared by Borrower, to include balance sheet, income statement and statement of cash flows;
 
(c) not later than 10 days prior to the beginning of each fiscal year, projected balance sheets and income statements for each month of such year for Borrower, each in reasonable detail, representing Borrower's good faith projections and certified by the chief financial officer (or, if Borrower does not have a chief financial officer, the vice president, finance) of Borrower as being Borrower's good faith projections and identical to the projections to be used by Borrower for internal planning purposes, together with a statement of underlying assumptions and such supporting schedules and information as Bank may in its discretion require;
 
(d) not later than 30 days after and as of each of June 30 and December 31 of each fiscal year of Borrower, a list of the names and addresses of all Borrower's account debtors; and
 
(e) from time to time such other information as Bank may reasonably request, including without limitation, copies of rent rolls and other information with respect to any real property collateral required hereby.
 
SECTION 5.4. COMPLIANCE. Preserve and maintain all licenses, permits, governmental approvals, rights, privileges and franchises necessary for the conduct of its business; and comply with the provisions of all documents pursuant to which Borrower is organized and/or which govern Borrower's continued existence and with the requirements of all laws, rules, regulations and orders of any governmental authority applicable to Borrower and/or its business.
 
SECTION 5.5. INSURANCE. Maintain and keep in force insurance of the types and in amounts customarily carried in lines of business similar to that of Borrower, including but not limited to fire, extended coverage, public liability, flood, property damage and workers' compensation, with all such insurance carried with companies and in amounts satisfactory to Bank, and deliver to Bank from time to time at Bank's request schedules setting forth all insurance then in effect.
 
SECTION 5.6. FACILITIES. Keep all properties useful or necessary to Borrower's business in good repair and condition, and from time to time make necessary repairs, renewals and replacements thereto so that such properties shall be fully and efficiently preserved and maintained.
 
SECTION 5.7. TAXES AND OTHER LIABILITIES. Pay and discharge when due any and all indebtedness, obligations, assessments and taxes, both real or personal, including without limitation federal and state income taxes and state and local property taxes and assessments, except such (a) as Borrower may in good faith contest or as to which a bona fide dispute may arise, and (b) for which Borrower has made provision, to Bank's satisfaction, for eventual payment thereof in the event Borrower is obligated to make such payment.
 
SECTION 5.8. LITIGATION. Promptly give notice in writing to Bank of any litigation pending or threatened against Borrower with a claim in excess of $250,000.00.
 
SECTION 5.9. FINANCIAL CONDITION. Maintain Borrower's financial condition as follows using generally accepted accounting principles consistently applied and used consistently with prior practices (except to the extent modified by the definitions herein):
 
(a) Tangible Net Worth not less than, (i) on the Closing Date and as of each fiscal quarter end on or before March 31, 2006, $12,000,000.00, and (ii) as of each fiscal quarter end following March 31, 2006, $12,000,000.00 plus, on a cumulative basis, 75% of quarterly net profit (only if positive) for each fiscal quarter of Borrower commencing with the first fiscal quarter end occurring after March 31, 2006.
 
(b) Total Liabilities divided by Tangible Net Worth not greater than, (i) on or before September 30, 2006, 1.50 to 1.00, and (ii) after September 30, 2006, 1.00 to 1.00, in all cases as of each fiscal quarter end of Borrower, with "Total Liabilities" defined as the aggregate of current liabilities and non-current liabilities, and with "Tangible Net Worth" defined as the aggregate of total stockholders' equity less any intangible assets.
 
(c) Fixed Charge Coverage Ratio not less than, (i) on or before September 30, 2006, 3.00 to 1.00, and (ii) after September 30, 2006, 3.50 to 1.00, in all cases as of each fiscal quarter end of Borrower, determined on a rolling 4-quarter basis, with "EBITDA" defined as net profit after tax (excluding one-time restructuring charges related to Borrower's acquisition of Bio-logic (the aggregate of such one-time restructuring charges not to exceed $1,500,000.00) and write-offs of in-process research and development expenses of Bio-logic associated with Borrower's acquisition of Bio-logic) plus depreciation expense and amortization expense, and with "Fixed Charge Coverage Ratio" defined as EBITDA divided by the aggregate of total interest expense plus the prior period current maturity of long-term debt and capitalized lease payments.
 
(d) Liquidity not less than $8,000,000.00 as of the Closing Date and each fiscal quarter end of Borrower, with "Liquidity" defined as the sum of Borrower's unencumbered cash and short-term marketable securities.
 
SECTION 5.10. NOTICE TO BANK. Promptly (but in no event more than five (5) business days after a Responsible Officer becomes, or should become, aware of the occurrence of each such event or matter) give written notice to Bank in reasonable detail of: (a) the occurrence of any Event of Default, or any condition, event or act which with the giving of notice or the passage of time or both would constitute an Event of Default; (b) any change in the name or the organizational structure of Borrower; (c) the occurrence and nature of any Reportable Event or Prohibited Transaction, each as defined in ERISA, or any funding deficiency with respect to any Plan; or (d) any termination or cancellation of any insurance policy which Borrower is required to maintain, or any uninsured or partially uninsured loss through liability or property damage, or through fire, theft or any other cause affecting Borrower's property in excess of an aggregate of $250,000.00.
 
SECTION 5.11. MAINTENANCE OF ACCOUNTS WITH BANK. Borrower shall at all times maintain its primary depository accounts with Bank pursuant to account agreements and terms mutually acceptable to Borrower and Bank.
 
SECTION 5.12. BIO-LOGIC PLAZA PROPERTY. By not later than fourteen (14) calendar days after the Closing Date, Borrower shall (i) execute and deliver to Bank a mortgage in form and substance satisfactory to Bank, pursuant to which Borrower grants to Bank a lien on that certain real property located at One Bio-logic Plaza, Mundelein, IL 60060 (the ), as security for all indebtedness of Borrower to Bank created by the Loan Documents, (ii) have caused Bank to have received an ALTA Policy of Title Insurance, with such endorsements as Bank may require, issued by a company and in form and substance satisfactory to Bank, in such amount as Bank shall reasonably require, insuring Bank's lien on the Real Property Collateral to be of first priority, subject only to such exceptions as Bank shall approve in its discretion, with all costs thereof to be paid by Borrower, and (iii) have procured and delivered to Bank, at Borrower's cost, such tax service contract as Bank shall require for the Real Property Collateral, to remain in effect as long as such real property secures any obligations of Borrower to Bank under the Loan Documents. Bank acknowledges and agrees that the Real Property Collateral includes the 14 Acre Parcel and that, pursuant to the consummation of the sale of the 14 Acre Parcel pursuant to the terms and conditions of that certain Real Estate Purchase Agreement, dated April 15, 2005, between Avis Investments, Inc., and Bio-logic, a copy of which was provided to Bank prior to the date hereof, and payment in immediately available funds of the proceeds thereof to Borrower, Bank shall reconvey its interest in the 14 Acre Parcel arising pursuant to the mortgage executed by Borrower pursuant to the terms of this Section 5.12.
"Real Property Collateral"
 
SECTION 5.13. FOREIGN SUBSIDIARIES. By not later than forty-five (45) calendar days after the Closing Date, Borrower shall execute such further agreements, documents or instruments, or take such other actions, as Bank reasonably deems necessary in connection with the pledge by Borrower to Bank of security interests in Borrower's ownership interest in each Foreign Subsidiary (such pledge exclusive of shares of voting stock of each Foreign Subsidiary that represent more than 65% of the voting stock of such Foreign Subsidiary, as described in Section 2.4 hereof), including, without limitation, (i) executing and delivering to each Foreign Subsidiary, a notice of the pledge of Borrower's interests therein to Bank, (ii) causing such Foreign Subsidiary to execute and deliver to Bank an acknowledgment of pledge related to Borrower's pledge of its interest in such Foreign Subsidiary, and (iii) delivering to Bank stock certificates (or comparable certificates of ownership) evidencing Borrower's ownership interest in such Foreign Subsidiary, accompanied by appropriate assignments separate from stock certificates, in each case, in form in substance satisfactory to Bank.
 
SECTION 5.14. CIT LOAN AGREEMENT. Borrower will not request any advances or otherwise incur any indebtedness under the CIT Loan Agreement and agrees to execute such further agreements, documents or instruments, or take such other commercially reasonable actions, to terminate the CIT Loan Agreement and the CIT Financing Statement.
 
 
Borrower further covenants that so long as Bank remains committed to extend credit to Borrower pursuant hereto, or any liabilities (whether direct or contingent, liquidated or
 
unliquidated) of Borrower to Bank under any of the Loan Documents remain outstanding, and until payment in full of all obligations of Borrower created by the Loan Documents, Borrower will not without Bank's prior written consent:
 
SECTION 6.1. USE OF FUNDS. Use any of the proceeds of any credit extended hereunder except for the purposes stated in Article II hereof.
 
SECTION 6.2. CAPITAL EXPENDITURES. Make any additional investment in fixed assets in any fiscal year in excess of an aggregate of $3,000,000.00.
 
SECTION 6.3. LEASE EXPENDITURES. Incur operating lease expense in any fiscal year in excess of an aggregate of $2,000,000.00.
 
SECTION 6.4. OTHER INDEBTEDNESS. Create, incur, assume or permit to exist any indebtedness resulting from borrowings, loans or advances, whether secured or unsecured, matured or unmatured, liquidated or unliquidated, joint or several, other than Permitted Indebtedness.
 
SECTION 6.5. MERGER, CONSOLIDATION, TRANSFER OF ASSETS. Merge into or consolidate with any other entity; make any substantial change in the nature of Borrower's business as conducted as of the date hereof; acquire all or substantially all of the assets of any other entity; nor sell, lease, transfer or otherwise dispose of all or a substantial or material portion of Borrower's assets except in the ordinary course of its business; that, notwithstanding the foregoing, Borrower may sell the 14 Acre Parcel as described in Section 5.12 hereof.
provided
 
SECTION 6.6. GUARANTIES. Guarantee or become liable in any way as surety, endorser (other than as endorser of negotiable instruments for deposit or collection in the ordinary course of business), accommodation endorser or otherwise for, nor pledge or hypothecate any assets of Borrower as security for, any liabilities or obligations of any other person or entity, except any of the foregoing in favor of Bank and guaranties by Borrower of real property lease obligations of its Subsidiaries not exceeding in the aggregate $100,000.00 outstanding at any time.
 
SECTION 6.7. LOANS, ADVANCES, INVESTMENTS. Make any loans or advances to or investments in any person or entity, other than Permitted Investments; that Borrower shall not be prohibited from making Specified Earn-out Payments.
provided
 
SECTION 6.8. DIVIDENDS, DISTRIBUTIONS. Declare or pay any dividend or distribution either in cash, stock or any other property on Borrower's stock now or hereafter outstanding, nor redeem, retire, repurchase or otherwise acquire any shares of any class of Borrower's stock now or hereafter outstanding.
 
SECTION 6.9. PLEDGE OF ASSETS. Mortgage, pledge, grant or permit to exist a security interest in, or lien upon, all or any portion of Borrower's assets now owned or hereafter acquired, other than Permitted Liens.
 
 
SECTION 7.1. The occurrence of any of the following shall constitute an "Event of Default" under this Agreement:
 
(a) Borrower shall fail to pay when due any principal, interest, fees or other amounts payable under any of the Loan Documents.
 
(b) Any financial statement or certificate furnished to Bank in connection with, or any representation or warranty made by Borrower or any other party under this Agreement or any other Loan Document shall prove to be incorrect, false or misleading in any material respect when furnished or made.
 
(c) Any default in the performance of or compliance with any obligation, agreement or other provision contained herein or in any other Loan Document (other than those referred to in subsections (a) and (b) above), and with respect to any such default which by its nature can be cured, such default shall continue for a period of twenty (20) days from the date Borrower receives notice thereof or any Responsible Officer of Borrower becomes aware thereof; that if the default cannot by its nature be cured within the twenty (20) day period or cannot after diligent attempts by Borrower be cured within such twenty (20) day period, and such default is likely to be cured within a reasonable time, then Borrower shall have an additional reasonable period (which shall not in any case exceed twenty (20) days) to attempt to cure such default, and within such reasonable time period the failure to have cured such default shall not be deemed an Event of Default but no advances under the Term Commitment will be made;
provided
 
(d) Any default in the payment or performance of any material obligation, or any defined event of default, under the terms of any contract or instrument (other than any of the Loan Documents) pursuant to which Borrower, any guarantor hereunder or any general partner or joint venturer in any Borrower which is a partnership or joint venture (with each such guarantor, general partner and/or joint venturer referred to herein as a ) has incurred any debt or other material liability to any person or entity, including Bank, and such default or event shall continue for a period of time without cure sufficient to permit the acceleration of the maturity of any such indebtedness or the enforcement of remedies with respect to such liability.
"Third Party Obligor"
 
(e) The filing of a notice of judgment lien against Borrower or any Third Party Obligor; or the recording of any abstract of judgment against Borrower or any Third Party Obligor in any county in which Borrower or such Third Party Obligor has an interest in real property; or the service of a notice of levy and/or of a writ of attachment or execution, or other like process, against the assets of Borrower or any Third Party Obligor; or the entry of a judgment against Borrower or any Third Party Obligor; and, in any such case, the same shall remain unsatisfied, unvacated and unstayed pending appeal for a period of twenty (20) days after the entry thereof.
 
(f) Borrower or any Third Party Obligor shall become insolvent, or shall suffer or consent to or apply for the appointment of a receiver, trustee, custodian or liquidator of itself or any of its property, or shall generally fail to pay its debts as they become due, or shall make a general assignment for the benefit of creditors; Borrower or any Third Party Obligor shall file a voluntary petition in bankruptcy, or seeking reorganization, in order to effect a plan or other arrangement with creditors or any other relief under the Bankruptcy Code, or under any state or federal law granting relief to debtors, whether now or hereafter in effect; or any involuntary petition or proceeding pursuant to the Bankruptcy Code or any other applicable state or federal law relating to bankruptcy, reorganization or other relief for debtors is filed or commenced against Borrower or any Third Party Obligor and is not dismissed within 45 days after its filing, or Borrower or any Third Party Obligor shall file an answer admitting the jurisdiction of the court and the material allegations of any involuntary petition; or Borrower or any Third Party Obligor shall be adjudicated a bankrupt, or an order for relief shall be entered against Borrower or any Third Party Obligor by any court of competent jurisdiction under the Bankruptcy Code or any other applicable state or federal law relating to bankruptcy, reorganization or other relief for debtors.
 
(g) There shall exist or occur any event or condition which Bank in good faith believes could reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect.
 
(h) The dissolution or liquidation of any Borrower or Third Party Obligor which is a corporation, partnership, joint venture or other type of entity; or Borrower or any such Third Party Obligor, or any of its directors, stockholders or members, shall take action seeking to effect the dissolution or liquidation of such Borrower or Third Party Obligor.
 
(i) The sale, transfer, hypothecation, assignment or encumbrance, whether voluntary, involuntary or by operation of law, without Bank's prior written consent, of all or any part of or interest in any real property collateral required hereby.
 
(j) The failure of the Closing (as such term is defined in the Merger Agreement) to occur on or before February 28, 2006.
 
SECTION 7.2. REMEDIES. Upon the occurrence of any Event of Default: (a) all indebtedness of Borrower under each of the Loan Documents, any term thereof to the contrary notwithstanding, shall at Bank's option and without notice become immediately due and payable without presentment, demand, protest or notice of dishonor, all of which are hereby expressly waived by each Borrower; (b) the obligation, if any, of Bank to extend any further credit under any of the Loan Documents shall immediately cease and terminate; and (c) Bank shall have all rights, powers and remedies available under each of the Loan Documents, or accorded by law, including without limitation the right to resort to any or all security for any credit created by the Loan Documents and to exercise any or all of the rights of a beneficiary or secured party pursuant to applicable law. All rights, powers and remedies of Bank may be exercised at any time by Bank and from time to time after the occurrence of an Event of Default, are cumulative and not exclusive, and shall be in addition to any other rights, powers or remedies provided by law or equity.
 
 
SECTION 8.1. NO WAIVER. No delay, failure or discontinuance of Bank in exercising any right, power or remedy under any of the Loan Documents shall affect or operate as a waiver of such right, power or remedy; nor shall any single or partial exercise of any such right, power or remedy preclude, waive or otherwise affect any other or further exercise thereof or the exercise of any other right, power or remedy. Any waiver, permit, consent or approval of any kind by Bank of any breach of or default under any of the Loan Documents must be in writing and shall be effective only to the extent set forth in such writing.
 
SECTION 8.2. NOTICES. All notices, requests and demands which any party is required or may desire to give to any other party under any provision of this Agreement must be in writing delivered to each party at the following address:
 
 
or to such other address as any party may designate by written notice to all other parties. Each such notice, request and demand shall be deemed given or made as follows: (a) if sent by hand delivery, upon delivery; (b) if sent by mail, upon the earlier of the date of receipt or three (3) days after deposit in the U.S. mail, first class and postage prepaid; and (c) if sent by telecopy, upon receipt.
 
SECTION 8.3. COSTS, EXPENSES AND ATTORNEYS' FEES. Borrower shall pay to Bank immediately upon demand the full amount of all payments, advances, charges, costs and expenses, including reasonable attorneys' fees (to include outside counsel fees and all allocated costs of Bank's in-house counsel), expended or incurred by Bank in connection with (a) the negotiation and preparation of this Agreement and the other Loan Documents, Bank's continued administration hereof and thereof, and the preparation of any amendments and waivers hereto and thereto, (b) the enforcement of Bank's rights and/or the collection of any amounts which become due to Bank under any of the Loan Documents, and (c) the prosecution or defense of any action in any way related to any of the Loan Documents, including without limitation, any action for declaratory relief, whether incurred at the trial or appellate level, in an arbitration proceeding or otherwise, and including any of the foregoing incurred in connection with any bankruptcy proceeding (including without limitation, any adversary proceeding, contested matter or motion brought by Bank or any other person) relating to any Borrower or any other person or entity.
 
SECTION 8.4. SUCCESSORS, ASSIGNMENT. This Agreement shall be binding upon and inure to the benefit of the heirs, executors, administrators, legal representatives, successors and assigns of the parties; that Borrower may not assign or transfer its interest hereunder without Bank's prior written consent. Bank reserves the right to sell, assign, transfer, negotiate or grant participations in all or any part of, or any interest in, Bank's rights and benefits under each of the Loan Documents.
provided
 
SECTION 8.5. CONFIDENTIALITY. The Confidential Information will be used by Bank solely for the purpose of evaluating Borrower's credit request and/or Bank's ongoing credit accommodations to Borrower. Bank will keep all the Confidential Information confidential, and will not disclose any of the Confidential Information to any person or entity, except disclosures: (a) to federal and state bank examiners, and other regulatory officials having jurisdictions over Bank; (b) to Bank's legal counsel and auditors; (c) to other professional advisors to Bank; (d) to Bank's representatives (which shall include, without limitation, all other banks and companies affiliated with Wells Fargo & Company) who need to know the Confidential Information for the purpose of evaluating Borrower's credit request and/or Bank's ongoing credit accommodations to Borrower, it being expressly understood and agreed that such representatives shall be informed of the confidential nature of the Confidential Information, and shall be required by Bank to treat the Confidential Information as confidential in accordance with the terms and conditions hereof; (e) as otherwise required by law or legal process; or (f) as otherwise authorized by Borrower in writing. In the event that Bank or any of its representatives becomes legally compelled to disclose any of the Confidential Information pursuant to clause (e) of the preceding sentence, then Bank, except as otherwise required by law, will provide notice thereof to Borrower so that Borrower, at its sole option (but without obligation to do so), may attempt to seek a protective order or other appropriate remedy and/or waive compliance with the provisions of this Agreement. The confidentiality requirement set forth herein shall not extend to any portion of the Confidential Information that: (x) is or becomes generally available to the public other than as a result of a disclosure by Bank or its representatives; (y) is or becomes available to Bank on a non-confidential basis by Borrower or any officer, employee, agent or representative of Borrower prior to its disclosure by Bank; or (z) is or becomes available to Bank on a non-confidential basis from a source other than Borrower.
 
SECTION 8.6. ENTIRE AGREEMENT; AMENDMENT. This Agreement and the other Loan Documents constitute the entire agreement between Borrower and Bank with respect to each credit created by the Loan Documents and supersede all prior negotiations, communications, discussions and correspondence concerning the subject matter hereof. This Agreement may be amended or modified only in writing signed by each party hereto.
 
SECTION 8.7. NO THIRD PARTY BENEFICIARIES. This Agreement is made and entered into for the sole protection and benefit of the parties hereto and their respective permitted successors and assigns, and no other person or entity shall be a third party beneficiary of, or have any direct or indirect cause of action or claim in connection with, this Agreement or any other of the Loan Documents to which it is not a party.
 
SECTION 8.8. TIME. Time is of the essence of each and every provision of this Agreement and each other of the Loan Documents.
 
SECTION 8.9. SEVERABILITY OF PROVISIONS. If any provision of this Agreement shall be prohibited by or invalid under applicable law, such provision shall be ineffective only to the extent of such prohibition or invalidity without invalidating the remainder of such provision or any remaining provisions of this Agreement.
 
SECTION 8.10. COUNTERPARTS. This Agreement may be executed in any number of counterparts, each of which when executed and delivered shall be deemed to be an original, and all of which when taken together shall constitute one and the same Agreement.
 
SECTION 8.11. GOVERNING LAW. This Agreement shall be governed by and construed in accordance with the laws of the State of California.
 
SECTION 8.12. ARBITRATION.
 
(a) . The parties hereto agree, upon demand by any party, to submit to binding arbitration all claims, disputes and controversies between or among them (and their respective employees, officers, directors, attorneys, and other agents), whether in tort, contract or otherwise arising out of or relating to in any way (i) the loan and related Loan Documents which are the subject of this Agreement and its negotiation, execution, collateralization, administration, repayment, modification, extension, substitution, formation, inducement, enforcement, default or termination; or (ii) requests for additional credit.
Arbitration
 
(b) . Any arbitration proceeding will (i) proceed in a location in California selected by the American Arbitration Association (); (ii) be governed by the Federal Arbitration Act (Title 9 of the United States Code), notwithstanding any conflicting choice of law provision in any of the documents between the parties; and (iii) be conducted by the AAA, or such other administrator as the parties shall mutually agree upon, in accordance with the AAA's commercial dispute resolution procedures, unless the claim or counterclaim is at least $1,000,000.00 exclusive of claimed interest, arbitration fees and costs in which case the arbitration shall be conducted in accordance with the AAA's optional procedures for large, complex commercial disputes (the commercial dispute resolution procedures or the optional procedures for large, complex commercial disputes to be referred to, as applicable, as the ). If there is any inconsistency between the terms hereof and the Rules, the terms and procedures set forth herein shall control. Any party who fails or refuses to submit to arbitration following a demand by any other party shall bear all costs and expenses incurred by such other party in compelling arbitration of any dispute. Nothing contained herein shall be deemed to be a waiver by any party that is a bank of the protections afforded to it under 12 U.S.C. 91 or any similar applicable state law.
Governing Rules
"AAA"
"Rules"
 
(c) . The arbitration requirement does not limit the right of any party to (i) foreclose against real or personal property collateral; (ii) exercise self-help remedies relating to collateral or proceeds of collateral such as setoff or repossession; or (iii) obtain provisional or ancillary remedies such as replevin, injunctive relief, attachment or the appointment of a receiver, before during or after the pendency of any arbitration proceeding. This exclusion does not constitute a waiver of the right or
No Waiver of Provisional Remedies, Self-Help and Foreclosure
 
obligation of any party to submit any dispute to arbitration or reference hereunder, including those arising from the exercise of the actions detailed in sections (i), (ii) and (iii) of this paragraph.
 
(d) . Any arbitration proceeding in which the amount in controversy is $5,000,000.00 or less will be decided by a single arbitrator selected according to the Rules, and who shall not render an award of greater than $5,000,000.00. Any dispute in which the amount in controversy exceeds $5,000,000.00 shall be decided by majority vote of a panel of three arbitrators; that all three arbitrators must actively participate in all hearings and deliberations. The arbitrator will be a neutral attorney licensed in the State of California or a neutral retired judge of the state or federal judiciary of California, in either case with a minimum of ten years experience in the substantive law applicable to the subject matter of the dispute to be arbitrated. The arbitrator will determine whether or not an issue is arbitratable and will give effect to the statutes of limitation in determining any claim. In any arbitration proceeding the arbitrator will decide (by documents only or with a hearing at the arbitrator's discretion) any pre-hearing motions which are similar to motions to dismiss for failure to state a claim or motions for summary adjudication. The arbitrator shall resolve all disputes in accordance with the substantive law of California and may grant any remedy or relief that a court of such state could order or grant within the scope hereof and such ancillary relief as is necessary to make effective any award. The arbitrator shall also have the power to award recovery of all costs and fees, to impose sanctions and to take such other action as the arbitrator deems necessary to the same extent a judge could pursuant to the Federal Rules of Civil Procedure, the California Rules of Civil Procedure or other applicable law. Judgment upon the award rendered by the arbitrator may be entered in any court having jurisdiction. The institution and maintenance of an action for judicial relief or pursuit of a provisional or ancillary remedy shall not constitute a waiver of the right of any party, including the plaintiff, to submit the controversy or claim to arbitration if any other party contests such action for judicial relief.
Arbitrator Qualifications and Powers
provided
 
(e) . In any arbitration proceeding discovery will be permitted in accordance with the Rules. All discovery shall be expressly limited to matters directly relevant to the dispute being arbitrated and must be completed no later than 20 days before the hearing date and within 180 days of the filing of the dispute with the AAA. Any requests for an extension of the discovery periods, or any discovery disputes, will be subject to final determination by the arbitrator upon a showing that the request for discovery is essential for the party's presentation and that no alternative means for obtaining information is available.
Discovery
 
(f) . The resolution of any dispute arising pursuant to the terms of this Agreement shall be determined by a separate arbitration proceeding and such dispute shall not be consolidated with other disputes or included in any class proceeding.
Class Proceedings and Consolidations
 
(g) The arbitrator shall award all costs and expenses of the arbitration proceeding.
Payment Of Arbitration Costs And Fees.
 
(h) . Notwithstanding anything herein to the contrary, no dispute shall be submitted to arbitration if the dispute concerns indebtedness secured
Real Property Collateral; Judicial Reference
 
directly or indirectly, in whole or in part, by any real property unless (i) the holder of the mortgage, lien or security interest specifically elects in writing to proceed with the arbitration, or (ii) all parties to the arbitration waive any rights or benefits that might accrue to them by virtue of the single action rule statute of California, thereby agreeing that all indebtedness and obligations of the parties, and all mortgages, liens and security interests securing such indebtedness and obligations, shall remain fully valid and enforceable. If any such dispute is not submitted to arbitration, the dispute shall be referred to a referee in accordance with California Code of Civil Procedure Section 638 et seq., and this general reference agreement is intended to be specifically enforceable in accordance with said Section 638. A referee with the qualifications required herein for arbitrators shall be selected pursuant to the AAA's selection procedures. Judgment upon the decision rendered by a referee shall be entered in the court in which such proceeding was commenced in accordance with California Code of Civil Procedure Sections 644 and 645.
 
(i) . To the maximum extent practicable, the AAA, the arbitrators and the parties shall take all action required to conclude any arbitration proceeding within 180 days of the filing of the dispute with the AAA. No arbitrator or other party to an arbitration proceeding may disclose the existence, content or results thereof, except for disclosures of information by a party required in the ordinary course of its business or by applicable law or regulation. If more than one agreement for arbitration by or between the parties potentially applies to a dispute, the arbitration provision most directly related to the Loan Documents or the subject matter of the dispute shall control. This arbitration provision shall survive termination, amendment or expiration of any of the Loan Documents or any relationship between the parties.
Miscellaneous
 
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have caused this Agreement to be executed as of the day and year first written above.
 
 

Exhibit 10.2
 
Execution Copy
 
 
 
FOR VALUE RECEIVED, the undersigned NATUS MEDICAL INCORPORATED ("Borrower") promises to pay to the order of WELLS FARGO BANK, NATIONAL ASSOCIATION ("Bank") at its office at 400 Hamilton Avenue, Palo Alto, California, or at such other place as the holder hereof may designate, in lawful money of the United States of America and in immediately available funds, the principal sum of Ten Million Dollars ($10,000,000.00), with interest thereon as set forth herein.
 
DEFINITIONS:
 
As used herein, the following terms shall have the meanings set forth after each, and any other term defined in this Note shall have the meaning set forth at the place defined:
 
(a) "Business Day" means any day except a Saturday, Sunday or any other day on which commercial banks in California are authorized or required by law to close.
 
(b) "Fixed Rate Term" means a period commencing on a Business Day and continuing for one (1) month, two (2) months or three (3) months, as designated by Borrower, during which all or a portion of the outstanding principal balance of this Note bears interest determined in relation to LIBOR; provided however, that no Fixed Rate Term may be selected for a principal amount less than One Million Dollars ($1,000,000.00); and provided further, that no Fixed Rate Term shall extend beyond the scheduled maturity date hereof. If any Fixed Rate Term would end on a day which is not a Business Day, then such Fixed Rate Term shall be extended to the next succeeding Business Day.
 
(c) "LIBOR" means the rate per annum determined pursuant to the following formula:
 
 
(i) "Base LIBOR" means the rate per annum for United States dollar deposits quoted by Bank as the Inter-Bank Market Offered Rate, with the understanding that such rate is quoted by Bank for the purpose of calculating effective rates of interest for loans making reference thereto, on the first day of a Fixed Rate Term for delivery of funds on said date for a period of time approximately equal to the number of days in such Fixed Rate Term and in an amount approximately equal to the principal amount to which such Fixed Rate Term applies. Borrower understands and agrees that Bank may base its quotation of the Inter-Bank Market Offered Rate upon such offers or other market indicators of the Inter-Bank Market as Bank in its discretion deems appropriate including, but not limited to, the rate offered for U.S. dollar deposits on the London Inter-Bank Market.
(ii) "LIBOR Reserve Percentage" means the reserve percentage prescribed by the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System (or any successor) for "Eurocurrency Liabilities" (as defined in Regulation D of the Federal Reserve Board, as amended), adjusted by Bank for expected changes in such reserve percentage during the applicable Fixed Rate Term.
 
(d) "Prime Rate" means at any time the rate of interest most recently announced within Bank at its principal office as its Prime Rate, with the understanding that the Prime Rate is one of Bank's base rates and serves as the basis upon which effective rates of interest are calculated for those loans making reference thereto, and is evidenced by the recording thereof after its announcement in such internal publication or publications as Bank may designate.
 
INTEREST:
 
(a) . The outstanding principal balance of this Note shall bear interest (computed on the basis of a 360-day year, actual days elapsed) either (i) at a fluctuating rate per annum one-quarter percent (0.25%) above the Prime Rate in effect from time to time, or (ii) at a fixed rate per annum determined by Bank to be two and one-half percent (2.50%) above LIBOR in effect on the first day of the applicable Fixed Rate Term. When interest is determined in relation to the Prime Rate, each change in the rate of interest hereunder shall become effective on the date each Prime Rate change is announced within Bank. With respect to each LIBOR selection hereunder, Bank is hereby authorized to note the date, principal amount, interest rate and Fixed Rate Term applicable thereto and any payments made thereon on Bank's books and records (either manually or by electronic entry) and/or on any schedule attached to this Note, which notations shall be prima facie evidence of the accuracy of the information noted.
Interest
 
(b) . At any time any portion of this Note bears interest determined in relation to LIBOR, it may be continued by Borrower at the end the Fixed Rate Term applicable thereto so that all or a portion thereof bears interest determined in relation to the Prime Rate or to LIBOR for a new Fixed Rate Term designated by Borrower. At any time any portion of this Note bears interest determined in relation to the Prime Rate, Borrower may convert all or a portion thereof so that it bears interest determined in relation to LIBOR for a Fixed Rate Term designated by Borrower. At the time this Note is disbursed or Borrower wishes to select a LIBOR option for all or a portion of the outstanding principal balance hereof, and at the end of each Fixed Rate Term, Borrower shall give Bank notice specifying: (i) the interest rate option selected by Borrower; (ii) the principal amount subject thereto; and (iii) for each LIBOR selection, the length of the applicable Fixed Rate Term. Any such notice may be given by telephone (or such other electronic method as Bank may permit) so long as, with respect to each LIBOR selection, (A) if requested by Bank, Borrower provides to Bank written confirmation thereof not later than three (3) Business Days after such notice is given, and (B) such notice is given to Bank prior to 10:00 a.m. on the first day of the Fixed Rate Term, or at a later time during any Business Day if Bank, at it's sole option but without obligation to do so, accepts Borrower's notice and quotes a fixed rate to Borrower. If Borrower does not immediately accept a fixed rate when quoted by Bank, the quoted rate shall expire and any subsequent LIBOR request from Borrower shall be subject to a redetermination by Bank of the applicable fixed rate. If no specific designation of interest is made at the time this Note is disbursed or at the end of any Fixed Rate Term, Borrower shall be deemed to have made a Prime Rate interest selection for this Note or the principal amount to which such Fixed Rate Term applied.
Selection of Interest Rate Options
 
(c) . Borrower shall pay to Bank immediately upon demand, in addition to any other amounts due or to become due hereunder, any and all (i) withholdings, interest equalization taxes, stamp taxes or other taxes (except income and franchise taxes) imposed by any domestic or foreign governmental authority and related in any manner to LIBOR, and (ii) future, supplemental, emergency or other changes in the LIBOR Reserve Percentage (without duplication), assessment rates imposed by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, or similar requirements or costs imposed by any domestic or foreign governmental authority or resulting from compliance by Bank with any request or directive (whether or not having the force of law) from any central bank or other governmental authority and related in any manner to LIBOR to the extent they are not included in the calculation of LIBOR. In determining which of the foregoing are attributable to any LIBOR option available to Borrower hereunder, any reasonable allocation made by Bank among its operations shall be conclusive and binding upon Borrower.
Taxes and Regulatory Costs
 
(d) . Interest accrued on this Note shall be payable on the last day of each month, commencing January 31, 2006.
Payment of Interest
 
(e) . From and after the maturity date of this Note, or such earlier date as all principal owing hereunder becomes due and payable by acceleration or otherwise, the outstanding principal balance of this Note shall bear interest until paid in full at an increased rate per annum (computed on the basis of a 360-day year, actual days elapsed) equal to four percent (4%) above the rate of interest from time to time applicable to this Note.
Default Interest
 
BORROWING, REPAYMENT AND PREPAYMENT:
 
(a) . From the date of this Note up to and including January 30, 2006, Borrower may borrow, pursuant to a one-time advance, an amount not to exceed the principal amount stated above, subject to all of the limitations, terms and conditions of this Note and of any document executed in connection with or governing this Note. The unpaid principal balance of this obligation at any time shall be the total amounts advanced hereunder by the holder hereof less the amount of principal payments made hereon by or for Borrower, which balance may be endorsed hereon from time to time by the holder.
Borrowing
 
(b) . The outstanding principal balance of this Note as of the close of business on January 30, 2006 shall be amortized over forty-eight (48) months, and thereafter principal shall be payable on the last day of each month in equal successive installments over said amortization term, commencing January 31, 2006, and continuing up to and including November 30, 2009, with a final installment consisting of all remaining unpaid principal due and payable in full on December 31, 2009.
Required Principal Payments
 
(c) . The one-time advance allowed hereunder, which advance shall not exceed the total amount of the principal sum stated above and can be made up to and including the final advance date set forth above, may be made by the holder at the oral or written request of (i) James B. Hawkins or Steven J. Murphy, any one acting alone, who are authorized to request such advance and direct the disposition of such advance until written notice of the revocation of such authority is received by the holder at the office designated above, or (ii) any person, if such advance is deposited to the credit of any deposit account of Borrower, which
One-Time Advance
 
advance, when so deposited, shall be conclusively presumed to have been made to or for the benefit of Borrower regardless of the fact that persons other than those authorized to request an advance may have authority to draw against such account. The holder shall have no obligation to determine whether any person requesting an advance is or has been authorized by Borrower.
 
(d) . Each payment made on this Note shall be credited first, to any interest then due and second, to the outstanding principal balance hereof. All payments credited to principal shall be applied first, to the outstanding principal balance of this Note which bears interest determined in relation to the Prime Rate, if any, and second, to the outstanding principal balance of this Note which bears interest determined in relation to LIBOR, with such payments applied to the oldest Fixed Rate Term first.
Application of Payments
 
(e) .
Prepayment
 
. Borrower may prepay principal on any portion of this Note which bears interest determined in relation to the Prime Rate at any time, in any amount and without penalty.
Prime Rate
 
. Borrower may prepay principal on any portion of this Note which bears interest determined in relation to LIBOR at any time and in the minimum amount of One Hundred Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00); provided however, that if the outstanding principal balance of such portion of this Note is less than said amount, the minimum prepayment amount shall be the entire outstanding principal balance thereof. In consideration of Bank providing this prepayment option to Borrower, or if any such portion of this Note shall become due and payable at any time prior to the last day of the Fixed Rate Term applicable thereto by acceleration or otherwise, Borrower shall pay to Bank immediately upon demand a fee which is the sum of the discounted monthly differences for each month from the month of prepayment through the month in which such Fixed Rate Term matures, calculated as follows for each such month:
LIBOR
 
 
 
 
Borrower acknowledges that prepayment of such amount may result in Bank incurring additional costs, expenses and/or liabilities, and that it is difficult to ascertain the full extent of such costs, expenses and/or liabilities. Borrower, therefore, agrees to pay the above-described prepayment fee and agrees that said amount represents a reasonable estimate of the prepayment costs, expenses and/or liabilities of Bank. If Borrower fails to pay any prepayment fee when due, the amount of such prepayment fee shall thereafter bear interest until paid at a rate per annum four percent (4.00%) above the Prime Rate in effect from time to time (computed on the basis of a 360-day year, actual days elapsed).
 
All prepayments of principal shall be applied on the most remote principal installment or installments then unpaid.
 
EVENTS OF DEFAULT:
 
This Note is made pursuant to and is subject to the terms and conditions of that certain Credit Agreement between Borrower and Bank dated as of January 4, 2006, as amended from time to time (the "Credit Agreement"). Any default in the payment or performance of any obligation under this Note, or any defined event of default under the Credit Agreement, shall constitute an "Event of Default" under this Note.
 
MISCELLANEOUS:
 
(a) . Upon the sale, transfer, hypothecation, assignment or other encumbrance, whether voluntary, involuntary or by operation of law, of all or any interest in any real property securing this Note, or upon the occurrence of any Event of Default, the holder of this Note, at the holder's option, may declare all sums of principal and interest outstanding hereunder to be immediately due and payable without presentment, demand, notice of nonperformance, notice of protest, protest or notice of dishonor, all of which are expressly waived by Borrower, and the obligation, if any, of the holder to extend any further credit hereunder shall immediately cease and terminate. Borrower shall pay to the holder immediately upon demand the full amount of all payments, advances, charges, costs and expenses, including reasonable attorneys' fees (to include outside counsel fees and all allocated costs of the holder's in-house counsel), expended or incurred by the holder in connection with the enforcement of the holder's rights and/or the collection of any amounts which become due to the holder under this Note, and the prosecution or defense of any action in any way related to this Note, including without limitation, any action for declaratory relief, whether incurred at the trial or appellate level, in an arbitration proceeding or otherwise, and including any of the foregoing incurred in connection with any bankruptcy proceeding (including without limitation, any adversary proceeding, contested matter or motion brought by Bank or any other person) relating to Borrower or any other person or entity.
Remedies
 
(b) . Should more than one person or entity sign this Note as a Borrower, the obligations of each such Borrower shall be joint and several.
Obligations Joint and Several
 
(c) . This Note shall be governed by and construed in accordance with the laws of the State of California.
Governing Law
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the undersigned has executed this Note as of the date first written above.
 
NATUS MEDICAL INCORPORATED
 
 

Exhibit 10.3
 
Execution Copy
 
 
T S A (this "") is entered into as of January 4, 2006, by N M I, a Delaware corporation ("" or the ""), in favor of W F B, N A ("").
HIS
ECURITY
GREEMENT
Agreement
ATUS
EDICAL
NCORPORATED
Debtor
Company
ELLS
ARGO
ANK
ATIONAL
SSOCIATION
Secured Party
 
 
A. The Company has requested that Secured Party provide the Company with certain financial accommodations as evidenced by one or more promissory notes or other instruments executed and delivered by the Company to Secured Party and other agreements entered into from time to time between the Company and Secured Party, including, without limitation, that certain Credit Agreement, dated as of the date hereof (the ) (together with this Agreement and Term Commitment Note, in the original amount of U.S. $10,000,000.00, executed by the Company in favor of Secured Party, and any and all documents or agreements executed by Debtor in connection with any of foregoing, as any of them may be amended, modified or extended from time to time, collectively, the ".
"Loan Agreement"
Loan Documents")
 
B. In order to induce Secured Party to provide financial accommodations to the Company under the Loan Agreement and to enter into the Loan Documents to which it is a party, the Debtor wishes and has agreed to secure its obligations to Secured Party under Loan Documents by granting to Secured Party a first priority security interest in the Collateral (as defined below).
 
C. All capitalized terms used but not otherwise defined herein shall have the meanings assigned to them in the Loan Agreement.
 
NOW, THEREFORE, in consideration of the premises and the mutual covenants and conditions contained herein, and for other good and valuable consideration, the receipt and sufficiency of which are hereby specifically acknowledged, Secured Party and Debtor agree as follows:
 
1. G S I. To secure the prompt and complete payment, observance and performance of each covenant, condition or obligation of whatsoever nature to be performed or observed by the Company under the Loan Documents, including repayment of all future loans extended by and reimbursement obligations owing to Secured Party (the ""), the Company hereby grants Secured Party a first priority security interest (except for Permitted Liens that are senior to Bank's security interest) in and to all assets of the Company whether now existing or hereafter arising or acquired, including without limitation the following (collectively, the ""):
RANT
OF
ECURITY
NTEREST
Secured Obligations
Collateral
 
(a) all accounts, deposit accounts, contract rights, chattel paper, (whether electronic or tangible) instruments, promissory notes, documents, general intangibles, payment intangibles, software, letter of credit rights, health-care insurance receivables and other rights to payment of every kind now existing or at any time hereafter arising;
(b) all inventory, goods held for sale or lease or to be furnished under contracts for service, or goods so leased or furnished, raw materials, component parts, work in process and other materials used or consumed in Debtor's business, now or at any time hereafter owned or acquired by Debtor, wherever located, and all products thereof, whether in the possession of Debtor, any warehousemen, any bailee or any other person, or in process of delivery, and whether located at Debtor's places of business or elsewhere;
 
(c) all warehouse receipts, bills of sale, bills of lading and other documents of every kind (whether or not negotiable) in which Debtor now has or at any time hereafter acquires any interest, and all additions and accessions thereto, whether in the possession or custody of Debtor, any bailee or any other person for any purpose;
 
(d) all money and property heretofore, now or hereafter delivered to or deposited with Secured Party or otherwise coming into the possession, custody or control of Secured Party (or any agent or bailee of Secured Party) in any manner or for any purpose whatsoever during the existence of this Agreement and whether held in a general or special account or deposit for safekeeping or otherwise;
 
(e) all right, title and interest of Debtor under licenses, guaranties, warranties, management agreements, marketing or sales agreements, escrow contracts, indemnity agreements, insurance policies, service or maintenance agreements, supporting obligations and other similar contracts of every kind in which Debtor now has or at any time hereafter shall have an interest;
 
(f) all goods, tools, machinery, furnishings, furniture and other equipment and fixtures of every kind now existing or hereafter acquired, and all improvements, replacements, accessions and additions thereto and embedded software included therein, whether located on any property owned or leased by Debtor or elsewhere, including without limitation, any of the foregoing now or at any time hereafter located at or installed on the land or in the improvements at any of the real property owned or leased by Debtor, and all such goods after they have been severed and removed from any of said real property;
 
(g) all motor vehicles, trailers, mobile homes, manufactured homes, boats, other rolling stock and related equipment of every kind now existing or hereafter acquired and all additions and accessories thereto, whether located on any property owned or leased by Debtor or elsewhere;
 
(h) all of the following (collectively, "
Intellectual Property Collateral"):
 
(i) all patents and patent applications and all patent rights with respect thereto throughout the world, including without limitation all license royalties, foreign filing rights, and rights to extend such patents and patent rights, and all rights in all patentable inventions, and to file applications for patent under federal patent law or under the laws or regulations of any foreign country (collectively, the "");
Patents
 
(ii) all copyrights (whether or not registered with the United States Copyright Office), and all applications for copyright registration (including without limitation, applications for copyright registrations of derivative works and compilations), all license royalties, foreign filing rights, and extension rights (collectively, the "");
Copyrights
 
(iii) all trademarks and rights and interests which are capable of being protected as trademarks (including without limitation trademarks, service marks, designs, logos, indicia, tradenames, corporate names, company names, business names, fictitious business names, trade styles, and other source or business identifiers, and the goodwill related thereto and represented thereby, and applications pertaining thereto, and all rights to register trademark claims under any state or federal trademark law or regulation of any foreign country, and to apply for, renew, and extend trademark registrations and trademark rights (collectively, "");
Trademarks
 
(iv) all computer programs, software, source codes, object codes, data bases, processes and trade secrets and all other intellectual property in which Debtor now has or hereafter creates or acquires any interest; and
 
(v) all applications for any of the foregoing and all licenses with respect to any of the foregoing;
 
(i) all commercial tort claims in existence on the date of this Agreement or at any time hereafter arising and identified by the Debtor to Secured Party;
 
together with whatever is receivable or received when any of the foregoing or the proceeds thereof are sold, leased, collected, exchanged or otherwise disposed of, whether such disposition is voluntary or involuntary, including without limitation, all rights to payment, including returned premiums, with respect to any insurance relating to any of the foregoing, any infringement claims or causes of action and all rights to payment with respect to any claim or cause of action affecting or relating to any of the foregoing.
 
Notwithstanding the foregoing, the Collateral shall not include: (a) interests as a lessee under real property and personal property leases, (b) more than 65% of the voting securities of any Foreign Subsidiary of Debtor; or (c) equipment and related software encumbered by a Permitted Lien covered by paragraph (d) of the definition of Permitted Liens, and any rights of Debtor as licensee, to the extent the granting of a security interest in such equipment or license rights (A) is prohibited by the terms of or would constitute a default under any agreement or document governing such equipment or license right (but only to the extent such prohibition is enforceable under applicable law), or (B) is contrary to applicable law; that, upon the cessation of any such restriction or prohibition, such equipment and/or license rights shall
provided
 
automatically become part of the Collateral; and that the provisions of this Section 1 shall in no case exclude from the definition of Collateral any accounts receivables, other rights to payment, general intangibles or proceeds of the disposition of any property. Except as disclosed to Secured Party in writing prior to the date hereof, Debtor represents and warrants to Secured Party that it is not presently a party to, nor is it bound by, any material license, contract or agreement which prohibits Debtor from granting a security interest therein (to the extent such prohibition is enforceable under applicable law). Debtor shall not, hereafter, without Secured Party's prior written consent, enter into any material license which prohibits Debtor from granting a security interest therein to Secured Party (to the extent such prohibition is enforceable under applicable law), unless Debtor uses commercially reasonable efforts to have such prohibition removed, and in the event Debtor is not successful in having such prohibition removed, Debtor shall give prompt written notice thereof to Secured Party.
provided further
 
Debtor agrees that this Agreement shall create a continuing security interest in the Collateral which shall remain in effect until the payment and performance in full of all of the Secured Obligations.
 
2. D' R, W C. Debtor represents, warrants and covenants as follows:
EBTOR
S
EPRESENTATIONS
ARRANTIES
AND
OVENANTS
 
(a) . Debtor has rights in and good title to all of the Collateral. Other than any of the Intellectual Property Collateral for which Debtor is a licensee, Debtor is and will continue to be the sole and exclusive owner of the Collateral, free and clear of all security interests, liens or encumbrances or other rights or claims of third parties (""), other than Permitted Liens. For any of the Intellectual Property Collateral for which Debtor is a licensee, each such license or licensing agreement is in full force and effect and Debtor is not in default of any of its material obligations thereunder.
Permitted Liens
Liens
 
(b) . Debtor is a registered organization (as that term is used in Division 9 of the Uniform Commercial Code (the "")) under the laws of the State of Delaware. Debtor will notify Secured Party prior to changing either its form or jurisdiction of organization.
Organization
UCC
 
(c) . Set forth in (i)  is a true and complete list of all registered Copyrights and applications for registrations of Copyrights in which as of the date hereof Debtor holds any interest, (ii)  is a true and complete list of all existing patents and letters patent of the U.S. or any other country, all registrations and recordings thereof, and all applications for letters patent, in which as of the date hereof Debtor holds any interest, (iii)  is a true and complete list of all registered trademarks, service marks, trade names, corporate names, company names, business names, fictitious business names and domain names, in which as of the date hereof Debtor holds any interest, and (iv)  D is a is a true and complete list of all claims arising in tort in which Debtor is a claimant existing as of the date hereof.
True and Complete List
Exhibit A
Exhibit B
Exhibit C
Exhibit
 
(d) . Debtor has taken and will continue to take all reasonable steps to protect the secrecy of and preserve it rights and interests in and to all of its material trade secrets and other material proprietary rights and interests.
Trade Secrets
 
(e) . To the best of Debtor's knowledge, no material infringement or unauthorized use presently is being made of any of the Intellectual Property Collateral, by any person or entity, and, to the best of Debtor's knowledge, Debtor's use of the Intellectual Property Collateral does not and will not infringe upon the rights or interests of any other person or entity.
No Infringement
 
(f) . The person signing below on behalf of Debtor is authorized to sign this Agreement on behalf of Debtor and to bind Debtor to the terms of this Agreement, and all corporate action necessary for the execution of this Agreement has been properly taken by Debtor.
Authorization
 
(g) . Debtor appoints Secured Party, and any officer, employee or agent of Secured Party, with full power of substitution, as Debtor's true and lawful attorney-in-fact, effective as of the date hereof, with power, in its own name or in the name of Debtor, (i) during the continuance of an Event of Default (as defined below), to endorse any notes, checks, drafts, money orders, or other instruments of payment in respect of the Collateral that may come into Secured Party's possession, (ii) during the continuance of an Event of Default, to sign and endorse any drafts against debtors, assignments, verifications and notices in connection with accounts, and other documents relating to Collateral, (iii) to pay or discharge taxes or liens at any time levied or placed on or threatened against the Collateral, (iv) during the continuance of an Event of Default, to demand, collect, issue receipt for, compromise, settle and sue for monies due in respect of the Collateral, (v) during the continuance of an Event of Default, to notify parties obligated with respect to the Collateral to make payments directly to Secured Party, and (vi) generally, to do, at Secured Party's option and at Debtor's expense, at any time, or from time to time, all acts and things which Secured Party deems reasonably necessary to protect, preserve and realize upon the Collateral and Secured Party's security interest therein, all as fully and effectually as Debtor might or could do; and Debtor hereby ratifies all that said attorney shall lawfully do or cause to be done by virtue hereof. This power of attorney is coupled with an interest and shall be irrevocable as long as any of the Secured Obligations are outstanding.
Attorney-in-Fact
 
(h) . Debtor will at all times keep in a manner reasonably satisfactory to Secured Party accurate and complete records of the Collateral and will keep such Collateral insured to the extent similarly situated companies insure their assets. Secured Party shall be entitled, at reasonable times and intervals after reasonable notice to Debtor, to enter Debtor's premises for purposes of inspecting the Collateral and Debtor's books and records relating thereto.
Books and Records; Insurance
 
(i) . Debtor shall not use the Collateral in any manner that is or would result in any material violation of any applicable statute, ordinance, law or regulation or in material violation of any insurance policy maintained by Debtor with respect to the Collateral.
Compliance with Laws
 
(j) . Other than financing statements, security agreements, assignments and other agreements or instruments executed, delivered, filed or recorded for the purpose of granting or perfecting any Lien (collectively, "") existing as of the date hereof and disclosed to Secured Party on hereto or arising after the date hereof in connection with any Permitted Lien and Financing Statements in favor of Secured Party, no effective Financing Statement naming Debtor as debtor, assignor, Debtor, mortgagor, pledgor or the like and covering all or any part of the Collateral is on file in any filing or recording office in any jurisdiction.
Financing Statements
Financing Statements
Exhibit E
 
(k) . Debtor will (i) notify Secured Party of any material claim made or asserted against the Collateral by any person or entity and of any change in the composition of the Collateral or other event which could materially adversely affect the value of the Collateral or Secured Party's Lien thereon; (ii) furnish to Secured Party such statements and schedules further identifying and describing the Collateral and such other reports and other information in connection with the Collateral as Secured Party may reasonably request, all in reasonable detail; (iii) upon request of Secured Party make such demands and requests for information and reports as Debtor is entitled to make in respect of the Collateral; and (iv) at Debtor's sole expense take such action and cause to be made such filings and recordations as Secured Party may reasonably request in order to perfect and protect the security interest and the first priority of Secured Party in and to any and all of the Collateral, including such filings and recordations as may be necessary or prudent (as determined by Secured Party) in the United States Copyright Office and the United States Patent and Trademark Office..
Notices, Reports and Information
 
(l) . Debtor will not surrender or lose possession of (other than to Secured Party), sell, lease, rent, or otherwise dispose of or transfer, any of the Collateral or any right or interest therein, except to the extent permitted by the Loan Documents, or dispositions of inventory in the ordinary course of Debtor's business. Debtor will maintain the Collateral and will not incur or suffer to exist any Liens against the Collateral other than Permitted Liens.
Disposition of Collateral
 
(m) . Debtor will promptly notify the Security Party of the existence of and information regarding any commercial tort claim arising hereafter in a document authenticated by Debtor and confirming the grant of the security interest under this Agreement in such commercial tort claim.
Commercial Tort Claims
 
3. E D. The failure of Debtor to pay when due any of the Secured Obligations, or to perform any of its other obligations under any of the Loan Documents, in each case after any period of grace as provided in the Loan Documents, or any material misrepresentation by Debtor in or made in connection with any Loan Document, or the occurrence of any other "Event of Default" as defined in any of the Loan Documents, shall constitute an "Event of Default" hereunder.
VENTS
OF
EFAULT
 
4. R. Upon the occurrence of an Event of Default, Secured Party may declare all of the Secured Obligations to be immediately due and payable, and Secured Party may exercise any and all rights and remedies hereunder or under applicable law; , if any Event of Default occurs as a consequence of the commencement of a bankruptcy or other insolvency proceeding by or against Debtor, all of the Secured Obligations shall be automatically and immediately due and payable without further action or demand. Without limiting the foregoing, Secured Party shall have the right, itself or through any of its agents, with or without notice to Debtor, as to any or all of the Collateral, by any available judicial procedure, or without judicial process (, that it is in compliance with applicable law), to exercise any and all rights afforded to a secured party under the UCC or other applicable law, to sell or otherwise dispose of all or any part of the Collateral, either at public or private sale, in lots or in bulk, for cash or for credit, with or without warranties or representations, and upon such terms and conditions, all as Secured Party, in its sole discretion, may deem advisable, and it shall have the right to purchase at any such sale. Debtor agrees that a notice sent at least ten (10) days before the time of any intended public sale or of the time after which any private sale or other disposition of the Collateral is to be made shall be reasonable notice of such sale or other disposition. The proceeds of any such sale, or other Collateral disposition shall be applied first to the expenses of retaking, holding, storing, processing and preparing for sale, selling, and the like, and to attorneys' fees and legal expenses of Secured Party, and then to the Secured Obligations and to the payment of any other amounts required by applicable law, after which Secured Party shall account to Debtor for any surplus proceeds. The rights and remedies with respect to Debtor and the Collateral, whether established hereby or by any other agreements, instruments or documents or by law, shall be cumulative and may be exercised singly or concurrently, and are not exclusive of any other rights or remedies provided under any other agreement, instrument or document to which Debtor is a party or by which it or any of the Collateral is bound or by law or equity.
EMEDIES
provided, however
provided, however
 
5. L. Debtor grants to Secured Party, to the fullest extent permitted under applicable law, a fully paid and royalty free license, exercisable only upon the occurrence and during the continuance of an Event of Default, to use any and all of the Intellectual Property Collateral as may be reasonably necessary to permit the exercise of any of Secured Party's rights or remedies with respect to any of the Collateral.
ICENSE
 
6. F A. Debtor will upon request promptly execute and deliver all further instruments and documents, and take all further action that Secured Party may reasonably request in order to perfect, protect and maintain the priority of the security interest granted by this Agreement and to enable Secured Party to exercise and enforce its rights and remedies under this Agreement.
URTHER
SSURANCES
 
7. W. Debtor hereby waives (a) the right to require Secured Party to proceed against any other person or against any other collateral it may hold; (b) presentment, protest and notice of protest, demand and notice of nonpayment, demand of performance, notice of sale, and advertisement of sale, (c) following an Event of Default, any right to the benefit of or to direct the application of any of the Collateral until the obligations of Debtor shall have been paid in full, and (d) any defenses which may arise by reason of, or be based on, lack of diligence in collection.
AIVERS
 
8. A' F. Debtor agrees to pay the costs and expenses, including reasonable attorneys' fees, which may be incurred by Secured Party in connection with the negotiation, administration and enforcement of this Agreement and the protection of a Secured Party's rights hereunder, whether or not legal action is instituted or filed.
TTORNEYS
EES
 
9. No Waiver. Any acceptance of partial or delinquent payments or failure of Secured Party to exercise any right shall not waive any obligation of Debtor or right of Secured Party or modify this Agreement or waive any similar default.
 
10. A. Secured Party may assign its rights under this Agreement and in the Collateral to anyone at any time. This Agreement shall be binding on Debtor and its successors and assigns, and shall benefit Secured Party and its successors and assigns.
SSIGNABILITY
 
11. E A. This Agreement and the other agreements referenced herein and therein contain the entire security agreement between Secured Party and Debtor. This Agreement may only be amended, waived, discharged or terminated by a written instrument signed by the Company and Secured Party.
NTIRE
GREEMENT
 
12. C L. This Agreement shall be governed by and construed in accordance with the laws of the State of California, without giving effect to conflicts of law principles.
HOICE
OF
AW
 
13. N. Except as otherwise provided, all notices and other communications required or permitted hereunder shall be in writing, shall be effective when given, and shall in any event be deemed to be given upon receipt or, if earlier, (i) five (5) days after deposit with the U.S. postal service or other applicable postal service, if delivered by first class mail, postage prepaid, (ii) upon delivery, if delivered by hand, (iii) one (1) business day after the day of deposit with Federal Express or similar overnight courier, freight prepaid, if delivered by overnight courier or (iv) one (1) business day after the day of facsimile transmission, if delivered by facsimile transmission with copy by first class mail, postage prepaid, and shall be addressed, (a) if to Secured Party, at Secured Party's address set forth below its signature, or (b) if to Debtor, at its address as set forth below, or at such other address of Debtor or Secured Party as such party shall have furnished the other in writing:
OTICES
 
14. I. Debtor hereby indemnifies Secured Party, its principals and agents (the ") for, and agrees to protect and hold each of them harmless from and against, any and all liabilities, obligations, losses, damages, costs and expenses (including, without limitation, reasonable attorneys' fees), causes of action, suits, claims, demands and judgments of any nature or description whatsoever, which may at any time be imposed upon, incurred by or awarded against any Indemnified Party (other than as a result of such Indemnified Party's own gross negligence or willful misconduct) as a result of the occurrence of any one or more of the following: (a) the grant to Secured Party of any interest in or to any of the Collateral, and (b) any infringement or claim of infringement by any person or entity with respect to any of the Intellectual Property Collateral, or any claim that any of the Intellectual Property Collateral misappropriates any patent, copyright, trade secret, trademark or other intellectual property right of any third party, or breaches any agreement of Debtor with any third party.
NDEMNITY
Indemnified Parties"
 
15. S. If any provision or provisions of this Agreement shall be deemed to be contrary to public policy or shall for any reason be held to be invalid, then such provision or provisions shall be deemed to be separable from the remaining provisions of this Agreement, and shall in no way affect the validity of any of the remaining provisions of this Agreement.
EVERABILITY
 
16. H. Captions and headings in this Agreement are for convenience only and are not to be deemed part of this Agreement.
EADINGS
 
17. C. This Agreement may be executed in counterparts, which when taken together shall constitute one document.
OUNTERPARTS
 
 
I W W, Debtor has executed and delivered this Agreement in favor of Secured Party as of the day and year first above written.
N
ITNESS
HEREOF
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BABY/BABY-8K-20060112060743.txt.gz
TIME:20060112060743
EVENTS:	Cost Associated with Exit or Disposal Activities
TEXT:
ITEM: Cost Associated with Exit or Disposal Activities
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
Item 2.05 Costs Associated with Exit or Disposal Activities.
 
On January 9, 2006, Natus Medical Incorporated (the "Company") initiated an integration plan (the "Plan") related to the acquisition by the Company of Bio-logic Systems Corp. ("Bio-logic"). Under the Plan, the Company will be reducing the size of its combined workforce by approximately 23 employees, representing approximately 10% of the workforce of the Company. The objectives of the Plan are to eliminate redundant costs resulting from the merging of the Company and Bio-logic and improve efficiencies in operations. A majority of notifications to employees was completed during the week of January 9, 2006, and the Company expects that all of the staff reductions will be completed by March 31, 2006. The Company anticipates its combined workforce will be approximately 217 employees once the Plan is completed.
 
The Company expects that total employee severance costs related to the staff reductions will be approximately $3.0 million, including costs related to change of control provisions in the employment contracts of the chief executive officer, chief operating officer, and two vice-presidents of Bio-logic totaling approximately $2.7 million. The Company expects that the Plan will be accounted for in accordance with Financial Accounting Standards Board, Emerging Issues Task Force Issue 95.3, "", and that all costs associated with the Plan will be recognized as a liability assumed as of the consummation date of the merger. Substantially all of the costs associated with the Plan will result in the outlay of cash.
Recognition of Liabilities in Connection with a Purchase Business Combination
 
The Company expects that on an annual basis the Plan will result in a reduction of personnel-related costs of approximately $3.2 million. The Company also believes that it will benefit from other synergies of the acquisition that should result in an additional annual reduction of non-personnel-related operating expenses of approximately $1.0 million.
 
In addition to historical information, this Current Report on Form 8-K contains forward-looking statements as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, particularly statements regarding the expectations, beliefs, plans, intentions and strategies of Natus. These forward-looking statements include, but are not limited to, the timing of the Plan, the expectation that the Plan will result in a reduction of personnel-related costs, and the expectation that the Company will realize reductions in other non-personnel-related operating costs. These statements relate to future events or Natus' future financial performance or results, and involve known and unknown risks, uncertainties and other factors that may cause actual results, levels of activity, performance, or achievements to differ materially from those expressed or implied by the forward-looking statements. Forward-looking statements are only predictions and the actual events or results may differ materially. Natus cannot provide any assurance that the future results or the results implied by the forward-looking statements will meet expectations. The results could differ materially due to a number of factors. These risks and uncertainties include the effects of competition, the demand for our products and services, risks inherent in integrating acquired company operations, our ability to expand our sales in international markets, our ability to maintain current sales levels in a mature domestic market, our ability to control costs, and risks associated with bringing new products to market and integrating acquired businesses. Natus disclaims any obligation to update information contained in any forward-looking statement.
 
More information about potential risk factors that could affect the business and financial results of Natus is included in Natus' annual report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2004, and its quarterly reports on Form 10-Q, and in other reports filed from time to time by Natus with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BABY/BABY-8K-20060221080021.txt.gz
TIME:20060221080021
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION Washington, D.C. 20549 FORM 8-K CURRENT REPORT Pursuant to Section 13 OR 15(d) of The Securities Exchange Act of 1934 Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported) February 21, 2006 Natus Medical Incorporated - -------------------------------------------------------------------------------- (Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter) Delaware 000-33001 77-0154833 - ----------------------------- ------------ ------------------- (State or other jurisdiction (Commission (IRS Employer of incorporation) File Number) Identification No.) 1501 Industrial Road, San Carlos, California 94070 - -------------------------------------------------------------------------------- (Address of principal executive offices) (Zip Code) Registrant's telephone number, including area code: (650) 802-0400 ---------------------------- Not applicable - -------------------------------------------------------------------------------- (Former name or former address, if changed since last report) Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below): [ ] Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [ ] Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [ ] Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [ ] Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
================================================================================ ITEM 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition. On February 21, 2006, Natus Medical Incorporated (the "Company") is issuing a press release and holding a conference call regarding its financial results for the fourth quarter and year ended December 31, 2005 and other financial information. A copy of the press release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 to this Form 8-K. The information in this Form 8-K and the exhibit attached hereto shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act") or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that Section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing. ITEM 9.01. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS, PRO FORMA FINANCIAL INFORMATION AND EXHIBITS. (c) Exhibits. Exhibit No. Description ----------- ----------- 99.1 Press release of Natus Medical Incorporated dated February 21, 2006 describing the Company's results for the fourth quarter and year ended December 31, 2005 and other financial information. ================================================================================
SIGNATURES Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized. NATUS MEDICAL INCORPORATED Date: February 21, 2006 By: /s/ Steven J. Murphy ------------------------------- Steven J. Murphy Chief Financial Officer
Index to Exhibits Exhibit No. Description ----------- ----------- 99.1 Press release of Natus Medical Incorporated dated February 21, 2006 describing the Company's results for the fourth quarter and year ended December 31, 2005 and other financial information.

Exhibit 99.1 Natus Medical Reports Record Annual and Fourth Quarter Revenue and Earnings for Fiscal 2005; Company Increases 2006 Guidance SAN CARLOS, Calif.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--Feb. 21, 2006--Natus Medical Incorporated (Nasdaq:BABY) today announced financial results for the three months and year ended December 31, 2005. Natus reported revenue of $12.6 million for the fourth quarter ended December 31, 2005, representing a 20% increase, or $2.1 million, from $10.5 million in the comparable quarter of the previous year. The Company reported net income of $2.5 million, or $0.13 per diluted share for the fourth quarter of 2005, compared with net income of $1.5 million or $0.08 per share, for the comparable period in 2004. The Company reported record revenue of $43.0 million for the year ended December 31, 2005, an increase of 18%, from $36.5 million for the year ended December 31, 2004. The Company reported net income of $6.2 million, or $0.33 per share for the full-year 2005, compared with a net loss of $2.4 million, or loss of $(0.14) per share, for the year ended December 31, 2004. Gross profit for the three months ended December 31, 2005, was 63.1%, compared with 65.4% for the fourth quarter of 2004. For the three months ended December 31, 2005, total operating expenses increased by $589,000, or 11%, to $5.9 million, compared with $5.3 million for the fourth quarter of 2004. As of December 31, 2005, the Company reported cash, cash equivalents, and short-term investments of $52.3 million, representing an increase of $16.5 million from the corresponding amount at December 31, 2004. Approximately $7.1 million of the increase in cash was related to a private placement of the Company's stock in October 2005. Additionally, the Company reported stockholders' equity of $68.9 million and working capital of $57.3 million as of December 31, 2005. In January 2006, the Company completed its acquisition of Bio-logic Systems Corp. in an all-cash transaction valued at $68.8 million. Following this acquisition the Company's cash reserves are significantly reduced and its working capital has been reduced to approximately $10 million. "I am extremely pleased with our results for the fourth quarter and full-year 2005," said Jim Hawkins, President and Chief Executive Officer of Natus Medical. "In particular, our 20% revenue growth in the fourth quarter 2005 was driven by strong device sales here in the United States as well as increased international penetration. I believed Natus is well positioned for continued growth in both revenue and earnings in 2006." "We remain very excited about our recent acquisition of Bio-logic Systems. We have made great progress in the integration of Bio-logic, including the successful combining of our two sales and marketing organizations. We are also making significant operational changes to the organization that will make their operations more efficient," added Hawkins. "We remain very confident that the acquisition of Bio-logic will be accretive to our earnings in 2006 and beyond." Financial Guidance The Company updated financial guidance for 2006. For 2006, the Company expects to report diluted earnings per share of $0.49 to $0.51 on revenue of $78 to $80 million. Natus had previously said it expected to earn $0.48 to $0.50 per diluted share in 2006 on the same revenue range. These expected results include the impact of the January 5, 2006 acquisition of Bio-logic Systems Corp. The Company also provided guidance for the first and second quarters of 2006. For the first quarter of 2006, the Company expects to report diluted earnings per share of $0.07 to $0.08, on revenue of $18.1 to $18.3 million. This compares to diluted earnings per share of $0.05 and revenue of $9.7 million reported in the first quarter of 2005. For the second quarter 2006, the Company expects to report diluted earnings per share of $0.10 to $0.11, on revenue of $19.0 to $19.3 million. This compares to diluted earnings per share of $0.07 and revenue of $10.2 million reported for the second quarter of 2005. The estimates of earnings per share do not include any one-time charges associated with the acquisition of Bio-logic Systems or the impact of expensing employee stock options. The Company is continuing to evaluate the impact of expensing employee stock options, which it will be required to do in 2006 under Financial Accounting Standards Board Statement ("SFAS") No. 123R, "Share-Based Payment." Conference Call Natus has scheduled an investor conference call to discuss this announcement beginning at 11:00 a.m. Eastern Time today. Individuals interested in listening to the conference call may do so by dialing (866) 700-7101 for domestic callers, or (617) 213-8837 for international callers, and entering reservation code 78972953. A telephone replay will be available for 48 hours following the conclusion of the call by dialing (888) 286-8010 for domestic callers, or (617) 801-6888 for international callers, and entering reservation code 28002366. The domestic call-in number above is an update of the number included in the Company's press release issued on February 8, 2006 announcing the conference call. The conference call also will be available real-time via the Internet at http://investor.natus.com, and a recording of the call will be available on the Company's Web site for 90 days following the completion of the call. About Natus Medical Natus is a leading provider of healthcare products used for screening, detection, treatment, monitoring and tracking of common medical ailments such as hearing impairment, neurological dysfunction, epilepsy, sleep disorders, newborn jaundice and newborn metabolic testing. Additional information about Natus Medical can be found at www.natus.com. This press release contains forward-looking statements as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, particularly statements regarding the expectations, beliefs, plans, intentions and strategies of Natus. These forward-looking statements include, but are not limited to, statements regarding anticipated revenue and profitability for the full-year 2006 as well as for the first and second quarters of 2006, and increased earnings resulting from the acquisition of Bio-logic Systems. These statements relate to future events or Natus' future financial performance or results, and involve known and unknown risks, uncertainties and other factors that may cause actual results, levels of activity, performance, or achievements to differ materially from those expressed or implied by the forward-looking statements. Forward-looking statements are only predictions and the actual events or results may differ materially. Natus cannot provide any assurance that its future results or the results implied by the forward-looking statements will meet expectations. Our future results could differ materially due to a number of factors, including the effects of competition, the demand for our products and services, our ability to expand our sales in international markets, our ability to maintain current sales levels in a mature domestic market, our ability to control costs, and risks associated with bringing new products to market and integrating acquired businesses. Natus disclaims any obligation to update information contained in any forward-looking statement. More information about potential risk factors that could affect the business and financial results of Natus is included in Natus' annual report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2005, and its quarterly reports on Form 10-Q, and in other reports filed from time to time by Natus with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission. NATUS MEDICAL INCORPORATED AND SUBSIDIARIES UNAUDITED CONDENSED CONSOLIDATED BALANCE SHEETS (in thousands, except share amounts) December 31, December 31, 2005 2004 ASSETS Current assets: Cash and equivalents $ 40,096 $ 16,239 Short-term investments 12,163 $ 19,504 Accounts receivable, net of allowance for doubtful accounts of $173 in 2005 and $472 in 2004 8,460 6,640 Inventories 3,482 4,347 Prepaid expenses and other current assets 1,041 625 Total current assets 65,242 47,355 Property and equipment, net 2,116 2,503 Goodwill, intangibles, and other assets 9,558 9,399 Total assets $ 76,916 $ 59,257 LIABILITIES AND STOCKHOLDERS' EQUITY Liabilities: Accounts payable $ 1,289 $ 1,947 Accrued liabilities 6,359 4,303 Deferred revenues 326 279 Total liabilities 7,974 6,529 Commitments and contingencies Stockholders' equity: Common stock, $0.001 par value, 120,000,000 shares authorized; shares issued and outstanding: 17,802,053 in 2005 and 17,140,339 in 2004 99,533 89,373 Accumulated deficit (30,699) (36,902) Accumulated other comprehensive income 108 257 Total stockholders' equity 68,942 52,728 Total liabilities and stockholders' equity $ 76,916 $ 59,257 NATUS MEDICAL INCORPORATED AND SUBSIDIARIES UNAUDITED CONDENSED CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF OPERATIONS (in thousands, except per share amounts) Three Months Ended Twelve Months Ended December December December December 2005 2004 2005 2004 Revenue $ 12,624 $ 10,526 $ 43,045 $ 36,506 Cost of revenue 4,657 3,645 16,092 15,015 Gross profit 7,967 6,881 26,953 21,491 Operating expenses: Marketing and selling 3,040 2,906 11,396 11,305 Research and development 1,086 1,024 4,318 3,672 General and administrative 1,735 1,422 5,806 6,626 Restructuring cost - - - 776 Acquired IPR&D - (80) - 470 Total operating expenses 5,861 5,272 21,520 22,849 Income (loss) from operations 2,106 1,609 5,433 (1,358) Other income/(expense): Interest income 439 130 1,189 454 Interest expense - - - (3) Other income, net 2 - 39 (141) Total other income/ (expense) 441 130 1,228 310 Income (loss) before provision for income tax 2,547 1,739 6,661 (1,048) Provision for income tax 83 231 509 297 Income (loss) from continuing operations 2,464 1,508 6,152 (1,345) Discontinued operations - 10 - (1,062) Net income (loss) $ 2,464 $ 1,518 $ 6,152 $ (2,407) Earnings (loss) per share: Basic: Continuing operations $ 0.14 $ 0.09 $ 0.35 $ (0.08) Discontinued operations $ - $ 0.00 $ - $ (0.06) Net income (loss) $ 0.14 $ 0.09 $ 0.35 $ (0.14) Diluted: Continuing operations $ 0.13 $ 0.08 $ 0.33 $ (0.08) Discontinued operations $ - $ 0.00 $ - $ (0.06) Net income (loss) $ 0.13 $ 0.08 $ 0.33 $ (0.14) Weighted-average shares used to compute Basic earnings per share 18,036 17,093 17,429 16,837 Diluted earnings per share 19,331 18,218 18,693 16,837 CONTACT: Natus Medical Incorporated Steven J. Murphy, 650-802-0400 InvestorRelations@Natus.com


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BABY/BABY-8K-20060222190825.txt.gz
TIME:20060222190825
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
Item 5.02. Appointment of Principal Officers
On February 16, 2006, the Company announced the promotion of Steven J. Murphy to Chief Financial Officer. Mr. Murphy, 54, joined Natus in 2002 and has served as the Company's Vice President Finance and Principal Financial Officer since June 2003. Prior to joining Natus, Mr. Murphy was controller of AdvisorTech Corporation, an international software development company providing IT-based solutions in the field of investments, from October 1998 through January 2002. From February 2002 until September 2002, Mr. Murphy acted as interim Controller of Travel Nurse International, a temporary staffing firm that was acquired by Medical Staffing Network in December 2002. There were no changes to Mr. Murphy's compensation from that described in the Company's Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on December 16, 2005.
A copy of the press release is attached as Exhibit 99.1 hereto.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 

Exhibit 99.1
(Nasdaq: BABY) today announced that the Company has promoted Steven J. Murphy to the position of Chief Financial Officer. Mr. Murphy joined Natus in 2002 and has served as the Company's Vice President Finance and Principal Financial Officer since June 2003.
SAN CARLOS, Calif. (February 16, 2006)  Natus Medical Incorporated
During his more than three years with the Company, Mr. Murphy has invested significant efforts building a well-organized finance function that has helped to lead the enterprise through significant change, including its June 2004 restructuring and the recent $68.8 million acquisition of Bio-logic Systems Corp. More recently, Mr. Murphy has taken on increased responsibilities in investor relations and communications with the financial markets.
"This promotion recognizes Steve's many contributions to Natus since he joined the company," said Jim Hawkins, President and Chief Executive Officer of Natus. "In addition, it reflects his success in working with the other members of the management team at Natus."
Mr. Murphy said, "I am very grateful to Jim, as well as the management team and Board of Directors of Natus, for the recognition they have given me. It has been very rewarding to be involved with Natus during the last three years and to have been able to contribute to its success."
Prior to joining Natus, Mr. Murphy was controller of AdvisorTech Corporation and vice president finance at RWS Group, LLC. Mr. Murphy is a certified public account.
About Natus Medical
Natus is a leading provider of products for the detection, treatment, and monitoring of common disorders in newborns and children such as hearing impairment, newborn jaundice, and newborn metabolic testing. Through its Bio-logic Systems Corp. subsidiary, Natus develops and markets computer-based electrodiagnostic systems and related disposables that aid in the diagnosis of audiological conditions as well as certain neurological and sleep disorders.
Additional information about Natus Medical can be found at .
www.natus.com
COMPANY CONTACT:
Natus Medical Incorporated
Jim Hawkins
President and Chief Executive Officer
(650) 802-0400
InvestorRelations@Natus.com


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BABY/BABY-8K-20060301144207.txt.gz
TIME:20060301144207
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
Item 1.01. Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement.
At its June 8, 2005 meeting, the Compensation Committee of the Board of Directors of Natus Medical Incorporated (the "Company") approved a cash bonus plan (the "Plan") for the Company's executive officers based on the Company achieving its budgeted pre-tax profit for 2005. On February 23, 2006, the Committee approved a cash bonus for Mr. Hawkins, whose bonus under the formula provided by the plan would have been $240,638, of $250,000. The Committee also approved the payment to Messrs. Mince, Murphy and Dr. Chung of the respective bonuses pursuant to the formula provided by the Plan. Mr. Traverso's bonus is comprised of the cash bonus and payments made pursuant to a sales compensation plan that is paid on a regular basis throughout the year.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BABY/BABY-8K-20060323172823.txt.gz
TIME:20060323172823
EVENTS:	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
Table of Contents
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
Table of Contents
 
Table of Contents
On January 9, 2006, Natus Medical Incorporated ("Natus") filed a current report on Form 8-K to report the completion of its acquisition of Bio-logic Systems Corp. ("Bio-logic"), pursuant to an Agreement and Plan of Merger dated as of October 16, 2005 (the "Merger Agreement") by and among Natus, Bio-logic and Summer Acquisition Corporation, a wholly-owned subsidiary of Natus ("Merger Sub"). Pursuant to the Merger Agreement, Merger Sub merged with and into Bio-logic (the "Merger"), and Bio-logic became a wholly-owned subsidiary of Natus. The merger closed and became effective on January 5, 2006. This Form 8-K/A is being filed to provide the financial statements described under Item 9.01 below. These financial statements are filed as Exhibits 99.1, 99.2 and 99.3 of this Form 8-K/A.
 
 
The required financial statements of Bio-logic as of and for the years ended February 28, 2005, February 29, 2004 and February 28, 2003 are attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1 and are incorporated in there entirety herein by reference.
The required financial statements of Bio-logic as of and for the three and nine months ended November 30, 2005 and 2004 are attached hereto as Exhibit 99.2 and are incorporated in their entirety herein by reference.
 
The required pro forma financial information as of and for the year ended December 31, 2005 as attached hereto as Exhibit 99.3 and is incorporated in its entirety herein by reference.
 
 
 
Table of Contents
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
Table of Contents
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
To the Stockholders and Board of Directors of
Bio-logic Systems Corp.:
We have audited the accompanying consolidated balance sheets of Bio-logic Systems Corp. and subsidiaries as of February 28, 2005, February 29, 2004 and February 28, 2003, and the related consolidated statements of earnings, stockholders' equity and cash flows for each of the three years in the period ended February 28, 2005. These financial statements are the responsibility of the Corporation's management. Our responsibility is to express an opinion on these financial statements based on our audits.
We conducted our audits in accordance with the standards of the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board (United States). Those standards require that we plan and perform the audit to obtain reasonable assurance about whether the financial statements are free of material misstatement. The Company is not required to have, nor were we engaged to perform an audit of its internal control over financial reporting. Our audit included consideration of internal control over financial reporting as a basis for designing audit procedures that are appropriate in the circumstances, but not for the purpose of expressing an opinion on the effectiveness of the Company's internal control over financial reporting. Accordingly, we express no such opinion. An audit also includes examining, on a test basis, evidence supporting the amounts and disclosures in the financial statements, assessing the accounting principles used and significant estimates made by management, as well as evaluating the overall financial statement presentation. We believe that our audits provide a reasonable basis for our opinion.
In our opinion, the financial statements referred to above present fairly, in all material respects, the consolidated financial position of Bio-logic Systems Corp. and subsidiaries as of February 28, 2005 and February 29, 2004, and the consolidated results of their operations and their cash flows for each of the three years in the period ended February 28, 2005, in conformity with accounting principles generally accepted in the United States of America.
GRANT THORNTON LLP
Chicago, IL
April 15, 2005
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
1. Business
Bio-logic Systems Corp. (the "Company") develops and markets computer-assisted medical diagnostic equipment. The Company sells primarily to the health care industry in North America, Europe and the Far East.
2. Summary of Significant Accounting Policies
The consolidated financial statements include the Company and its wholly owned domestic subsidiary, Bio-logic Holding Inc., and its wholly owned foreign subsidiary, Bio-logic Systems Corp., Ltd. All significant intercompany balances and transactions have been eliminated in consolidation.
Consolidation
Cash equivalents include all highly liquid investments purchased with maturities of three months or less.
Cash and Cash Equivalents
The Company maintains cash balances at several financial institutions located in the United States, Israel and Poland. Accounts in the United States are insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation up to $100,000. Cash in foreign bank accounts is not insured. Uninsured balances aggregate approximately $15,174,000 and $12,895,000 at February 28, 2005 and February 29, 2004, respectively. The Company has not experienced any losses in such accounts and management believes it is not exposed to any significant credit risk on cash and cash equivalents.
Concentration of Credit Risk
The majority of the Company's accounts receivable are due from companies in the medical and health care industries. Credit is extended based on evaluation of a customer's financial condition. New non-institutional customers are generally subject to a deposit. Accounts receivable are stated at amounts due from customers net of an allowance for doubtful accounts, and are generally due within 30 days for domestic customers and 60 days for international customers. Accounts outstanding longer than the contractual payment terms are considered past due. The Company determines its allowance by considering a number of factors, including the length of time trade accounts receivable are past due and the Company's previous loss history. The Company writes off accounts receivable when they become uncollectable, and payments subsequently received on such receivables are credited to the allowance for doubtful accounts. Charges for doubtful accounts are recorded in selling, general and administrative expenses.
Accounts Receivable
Inventories, consisting principally of components, parts and supplies, are stated at the lower of cost, determined by the first-in first-out method, or market.
Inventories
Property, plant and equipment are stated at cost. The cost of maintenance and repairs is charged to income as incurred, and significant renewals and betterments are capitalized. Depreciation is provided using the straight-line method over the estimated useful lives of the assets ranging from three years to forty years.
Property, Plant and Equipment
Intangible assets consist primarily of capitalized software costs for research and development, as well as certain patent, trademark and license costs. Capitalized software development costs are recorded in accordance with Statement of Financial Accounting Standards("SFAS") No. 86, "Accounting for the Costs of Computer Software to Be Sold, Leased, or Otherwise Marketed," with costs being amortized using the straight-line method over a five-year period. Patent, trademark and license costs are amortized using the straight-line method over their estimated useful lives of five years. On an ongoing basis, management reviews the valuation of intangible assets to determine if there has been impairment by comparing the related assets' carrying value to the undiscounted estimated future cash flows and/or operating income from related operations.
Intangible Assets
 
 
The Company regularly reviews long-lived assets for impairment in accordance with SFAS No. 144, "Accounting for the Impairment of Long-Lived Assets." No impairment was realized for the fiscal years 2005, 2004 and 2003.
Long-Lived Assets
Other assets consist mainly of long-term trade receivables. Any required reserves for long-term trade receivables are recorded as part of the allowance for doubtful accounts. There are currently no reserve requirements for long-term receivables.
Other Assets
 Other receivables at February 28, 2005 consist primarily of an amount related to the partial reimbursement of expenses associated with certain corporate development activities that was subsequently received in fiscal 2006. Other receivables at February 29, 2004 consist of a medical claim that was settled with the Company's stop-loss insurance carrier during fiscal 2005.
Other Receivables
The Company derives revenue from the sales of electrodiagnostic systems, disposable supplies, extended warranty contracts, non-warranty repair, and governmental research and development contracts. With the exception of domestic customers associated with certain group purchasing contracts, the terms of sale for systems and related supplies are generally FOB shipping point.
Revenue Recognition
Domestically, the Company sells its neurology and sleep systems through a direct sales force, and uses a dealer network to sell its hearing screening and diagnostic systems. Internationally, the entire line of electrodiagnostic systems and supplies is sold through distributors located in various countries. There is no general right for a customer, dealer or distributor to return product. All sales are final, regardless of the distribution channel; returns are rare and are usually allowed due to order error or quality concerns.
The Company recognizes revenue when it is realized or realizable and earned, in accordance with Statement of Position No. 97-2, ; specifically, when there is persuasive evidence of an arrangement, delivery has occurred, the sales price is fixed or determinable, and collectability is reasonably assured. Set-up and training revenue related to system sales is not recognized until the service is completed. Revenue from the performance of non-warranty repair activities is recognized in the period in which the work is performed. Revenue from extended warranty contracts is recognized over the life of the warranty.
Software Revenue Recognition
Revenue from research and development contracts relate to governmental grants awarded by the National Institute of Health. The grant covers reimbursement of specific expenses related to the feasibility and development of projects for which the grants were given, and the Company recognizes revenue in the same period the qualifying costs are incurred. The Company's obligation is to perform these feasibility and development activities in accordance with the terms of the grant, with no obligation for the work to result in a successful outcome such as a new product or successful discovery.
The Company carries a sales reserve that reduces revenue for potential future product returns as well as unperformed set-up and training, and reviews its adequacy quarterly. To date, this reserve has been insignificant.
Advertising costs are expensed as incurred.
Advertising
Research and development (R&D) costs are expensed as incurred. Capitalized research and development costs reflect internally generated software development costs associated with bringing new products to market, or significantly adding new features and functions to existing products. Accounting for the capitalization of software development costs is in accordance with SFAS No. 86, ; specifically, (a) R&D costs incurred in determining technological feasibility are expensed; (b) all material costs from the point where
Research and Development Costs
Accounting for the Costs of Computer Software to Be Sold, Leased, Or Otherwise Marketed
 
 
technological feasibility is determined up to the point when the product is available for general release to customers are capitalized; and (c) capitalization ceases when the developed product is available for general release to customers.
Deferred tax assets and liabilities are computed annually for differences between financial statement basis and tax basis of assets and liabilities using enacted tax rates for the years in which the differences are expected to become recoverable. A valuation allowance is established where necessary to reduce deferred tax assets to the amount expected to be realized.
Income Taxes
Deferred Federal income taxes are not provided for the undistributed earnings of the Company's foreign subsidiary. Undistributed foreign earnings were $2,913,835 and $2,876,107 as of February 28, 2005 and February 29, 2004, respectively.
In preparing financial statements in conformity with accounting principles generally accepted in the United States of America, management is required to make estimates and assumptions that affect the reported amounts of assets and liabilities, the disclosure of contingent assets and liabilities at the date of the financial statements, and the reported amounts of revenues and expenses during the reporting period. Actual results could differ from those estimates.
Use of Estimates
The Company's financial instruments include cash equivalents, accounts receivable and accounts payable. The carrying value of cash equivalents, accounts receivable and accounts payable approximate their fair value because of the short-term nature of these instruments.
Fair Value of Financial Instruments
In accordance with Emerging Issues Task Force 00-10, "Accounting for Shipping and Handling Fees and Costs," the Company has reflected billings to customers for freight and handling as net sales and associated freight-out as cost of sales.
Shipping and Handling Costs
The Company maintains a stock incentive plan. See Note 10 for additional information regarding this plan. The Company accounts for this plan under the recognition and measurement principles of Accounting Board Opinion No. 25, "Accounting for Stock Issued to Employees," and related interpretations. No compensation costs are recognized for stock option grants. All options granted under the Company's plan have an exercise price equal to or greater than the market value of the underlying common stock on the date of the grant.
Stock-Based Compensation
The following table illustrates the effect on net income and earnings per share if the Company had applied the fair value recognition provisions of Financial Accounting Standards Board (FASB) SFAS No. 123, "Accounting for Stock-Based Compensation," to stock-based compensation. The following table also provides the amount of stock-based compensation cost included in net income as reported.
 
 
 
Executive Compensation
The Company has entered into an employment agreement with its CEO that will provide salary and other benefits upon his termination, currently amounting to $1,102,000 after the initial term of the agreement, subject to his performing certain non-compete and non-solicitation activities. The initial term of this agreement ends February 29, 2008.
Basic EPS is based on the weighted average number of shares outstanding during the year. Diluted EPS is based on the combination of weighted average number of shares outstanding and dilutive potential shares.
Earnings per Share (EPS)
SFAS No. 130 requires disclosure of the components of and total comprehensive income in the period in which they are recognized in the financial statements. Comprehensive income is defined as the change in equity (net assets) of a business enterprise arising from transactions and other events and circumstances from non-owner sources. It includes all changes in stockholders' equity during the reporting period, except those resulting from investments by owners and distributions to owners. The Company does not have changes in stockholders' equity other than those resulting from investments by and distributions to owners. The functional currency for the Company's international operations is the U.S. dollar.
Comprehensive Income
Recent Accounting Pronouncements
In December 2003, the FASB issued FASB Interpretation No. 46 (revised December 2003) (FIN 46R), "Consolidation of Variable Interest Entities." It is an interpretation of Accounting Research Bulletin No. 51, "Consolidated Financial Statements," which replaces FASB Interpretation No. 46, "Consolidation of Variable Interest Entities," and revises the requirements for consolidation by business enterprises of variable interest entities with specific characteristics. Our adoption of this revised interpretation did not have a material effect on our results of operations or financial position.
In December 2004, the Financial Accounting Standards Board ("FASB") issued SFAS No. 123 (revised 2004), "Share-Based Payment" ("SFAS 123R"), which is a revision of SFAS No. 123, "Accounting for Stock-Based Compensation" ("SFAS 123"). SFAS 123R supersedes Accounting Principles Board ("APB") Opinion No. 25, "Accounting for Stock Issued to Employees", and amends SFAS No. 95, "Statement of Cash Flows." Generally, the approach in SFAS 123R is similar to that described in SFAS 123. SFAS 123R requires all share-based payments to employees, including grants of employee stock options, to be recognized in the statement of operations based on their fair values. Pro forma disclosure will no longer be allowed. Public companies, other than those filing as small business issuers, will be required to apply SFAS 123R as of the first annual reporting period of the registrant's fiscal year beginning on or after June 15, 2005. We expect to adopt SFAS 123R in fiscal 2007.
SFAS 123R permits public companies to adopt its requirement using one of two methods: (1) A "modified prospective" method in which compensation cost is recognized beginning with the effective date (a) based on the requirements of SFAS 123R for all share-based payments granted after the effective date and (b) based on the requirements of SFAS 123R for all awards granted to employees prior to the effective date of SFAS 123R that remain unvested on the effective date; or (2) A "modified retrospective" method which includes the requirements of the modified prospective method described above, but also permits entities to restate based on the amounts previously recognized under SFAS 123 for purposes of pro forma disclosures either (a) all prior periods presented or (b) prior interim periods of the year of adoption.
 
 
As permitted by SFAS 123, we currently account for share-based payments to employees using the intrinsic value method under APB Opinion No. 25, and as such, we generally recognize no compensation cost for employee stock options. We intend to continue applying APB Opinion No. 25 to equity-based compensation awards until the first quarter of fiscal 2007. Upon our adoption of SFAS 123R, we expect to use the modified prospective application transition method without restatement of prior interim or annual periods. This will result in the recognition of compensation cost based on the requirements of SFAS 123R for all equity-based compensation awards issued after March 1, 2006. For all equity-based compensation awards that are unvested as of March 1, 2006, compensation cost will be recognized for the unamortized portion of compensation cost not previously included in the SFAS 123 pro forma footnote disclosure. We are currently evaluating the impact that adoption of SFAS 123R may have on our results of operations and financial position. We expect that although the adoption could have a material effect on our results of operations, depending on the level and form of future equity-based compensation awards issued, it should not have a material effect on our financial position
.
On January 7, 2005, our Board of Directors declared a 3-for-2 stock split on our Common Stock, to be effected as a 50% stock dividend. The new shares and cash payments in lieu of fractional shares were distributed on February 11, 2005 to stockholders of record on January 26, 2005. The total number of authorized Common Stock shares and associated par value were unchanged by this action. As a result of the split, stockholders received one additional share of our Common Stock for every two shares owned on January 26, 2005. Cash payments in lieu of fractional shares were based on the closing price of the Common Stock on the record date. All per-share amounts in the financial statements reflect the impact of the stock split for all periods presented.
Stock Split
Certain reclassifications were made to the Consolidated Statement of Earnings for fiscal 2004 and 2003 to conform to the statement's presentation for fiscal 2005.
Reclassifications
3. Accounts Receivable
Receivables (in thousands) consist of the following:
 
Changes (in thousands) in allowance for doubtful accounts are as follows:
 
 
 
4. Inventories
Inventories (in thousands) consist of the following:
 
Inventories for which obsolescence reserves are established are raw materials and assembled components, as well as valuation adjustments for the Company's demonstration equipment. The proprietary nature of many of the raw materials and components does not lend themselves for sale to outside parties, especially once newer technologies have been developed. It is rare that the Company would sell obsolete inventory; such sales when they do occur have a negligible impact on margins. Demonstration inventory is sold at a discount, thus generating no material impact on margins.
Changes (in thousands) in inventory reserves are as follows:
 
 
 
5. Property, Plant and Equipment
Property, plant and equipment (in thousands) is comprised of the following at February 28, 2005 and February 29, 2004:
 
Depreciation expense (in thousands) amounted to $327, $342 and $391 for 2005, 2004 and 2003, respectively.
6. Intangible Assets
The following table (in thousands) summarizes the components of gross and net intangible asset balances:
 
 
 
Expected annual amortization expense (in thousands) related to amortizable intangible assets is as follows:
 
Amortization expense (in thousands) related to amortizable intangible assets is as follows:
 
7. Operating Leases
The Company leases office and assembly facilities under long-term operating leases expiring from 2005 to 2007. Total rental expense (in thousands) amounted to $128, $120 and $113 for 2005, 2004 and 2003, respectively.
Future minimum annual rental commitments (in thousands) under these leases for the years ending after February 28, 2005 are as follows:
 
8. Line of Credit
The Company has obtained a commitment, renewed annually, for an unsecured $1.0 million bank line of credit with interest at the bank's prime rate. No borrowings were made under the line of credit as of either February 28, 2005 or February 29, 2004.
9. Income Taxes
The provision for income taxes (in thousands) is as follows:
 
 
 
The provision for income taxes differs from the U.S. Federal statutory rate as follows:
 
Deferred tax assets and liabilities (in thousands) as of February 28, 2005, February 29, 2004 and February 28, 2003 consist of the following:
 
The foreign net operating loss can be carried forward indefinitely.
 
 
The net deferred tax asset is classified in the balance sheet as follows:
 
10. Stock Options
The Company's 2004 Stock Incentive Plan (the "Plan") provides the Compensation Committee of the Company's Board of Directors broad discretion to issue awards in a variety of forms, including nonqualified and qualified stock options, stock appreciation rights, restricted stock and restricted stock units, other stock-based awards and performance awards. The Plan provides for the issuance of up to 1,200,000 shares of Common Stock. As of May 25, 2005, 241,000 shares of Common Stock underlying options granted by the Company under the Plan were outstanding. The exercise price per share of Common Stock purchasable under a stock option issued under the Plan shall not be less than the fair market value per share on the date of grant, or in the case of an incentive stock option granted to an individual who is a ten percent holder, not less than 110% of such fair market value per share. The Compensation Committee fixes the term of each stock option, but no incentive stock option shall be exercisable more than 10 years after the date of grant. Currently, outstanding options become exercisable one to five years from the grant date and expire five to ten years after the grant date.
During fiscal 2005 we accelerated the vesting period for our two retiring Board members. Any options that were unvested at the dates of their retirement became immediately vested. The expiration date on these remaining option grants was also accelerated to February 28, 2005.
As of May 25, 2005, 1,103,313 shares of Common Stock granted by the Company under its 1994 Stock Option Plan, as amended (the "1994 Plan"), remain outstanding. However, the Company does not intend to make any other grants under the 1994 Plan.
The Company has adopted the disclosure provisions only of SFAS No. 123, "Accounting for Stock-Based Compensation." It applies Accounting Principles Board Opinion No. 25, "Accounting for Stock Issued to Employees," and related interpretations in accounting for its plans and does not recognize compensation expense for its stock-based compensation plans when options are granted at fair value at the date of grant. If the Company had elected to recognize compensation expense based upon the fair value at the grant date for awards under these plans consistent with the methodology prescribed by SFAS No. 123, the Company's net income and earnings per share would be reduced to the pro forma amounts indicated below:
 
 
 
The fair values of these options were estimated at the date of grant using the Black-Scholes option pricing model with the following weighted average assumptions for the years ended February 28, 2005, February 29, 2004, and February 28, 2003:
 
The following table summarizes information about stock options, weighted average exercise price, and fair value:
 
The following tables summarize information concerning outstanding and exercisable stock options as of February 28, 2005:
 
 
 
Additional information with respect to the Company's Plan at February 28, 2005, February 29, 2004 and February 28, 2003 is as follows:
 
 
 
 
 
11. Produce Line, Customer and Geographic Information
Revenue (in thousands) by product line is as follows:
 
Revenue (in thousands) from customers by geographic area is as follows:
 
In 2005, 2004 and 2003, no sales to a single customer accounted for more than 10% of revenue.
Long-lived assets include fixed assets (property, plant and equipment) and intangible assets. The Company has fixed assets in the United States and overseas. All intangible assets are domiciled in the United States. Long-lived assets in the United States and all foreign countries, in total (in thousands) are as follows:
 
12. 401(k) Plan
The Company has a retirement plan under Section 401(k) of the Internal Revenue Code, which allows employees to defer a portion of their income on a pretax basis through contributions to the plan. The Company matches employee contributions at varying rates, and may also make discretionary contributions to the plan. Total expense (in thousands) for fiscal 2004, 2003 and 2002 was $124, $112 and $98, respectively.
13. Contingencies
From time to time third parties have made claims that Company products infringe their third-party proprietary rights. In the event of a successful claim of infringement against the Company, it may be required to pay substantial damages, stop using certain technologies and methods, develop non-infringing products or methods and/or obtain one or more licenses from third parties. As of February 28, 2005, February 29, 2004 and February 28, 2003, there were no specific unaccrued loss contingencies that the Company believes could have a material negative impact on its financial statements.
On April 22, 2004, two plaintiffs filed a product liability claim against us and certain other defendants seeking specific damages of $12,300,000, as well as unspecified damages for future loss of income earning
 
 
capacity. We intend to vigorously defend against the claims brought before us in this suit. Although the outcome of any litigation is inherently uncertain, we believe that our product liability insurance coverage is adequate to cover liabilities resulting from this litigation, and therefore the results of this litigation should not have a material adverse effect on our business, assets, financial condition, liquidity and results of operations. There are no other material liabilities or gain or loss contingencies that are required to be accrued or disclosed by FASB Statement No. 5.
14. Selected Quarterly Financial Data (Unaudited)
Set forth below is a summary of our unaudited quarterly results for each quarter during fiscal 2005 and 2004. It is our opinion that these results have been prepared on the same basis as the audited financial statements contained elsewhere herein and include all adjustments, consisting of normal recurring adjustments, necessary for a fair presentation of the information for the periods when read in conjunction with the financial statements and notes thereto.
 
15. Subsequent Event
On April 15, 2005 we entered into an agreement to sell approximately fourteen acres of vacant, unimproved land adjoining our corporate headquarters in Mundelein, Illinois to a residential developer. The purchase price for the property is approximately $2,828,500. This purchase price is based on the developer's receiving approval to build a minimum of 90 attached single-family residences on the property. The purchase price will increase if the developer receives permission to build more than 90 residences.
 

EXHIBIT 99.2
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
These unaudited interim condensed consolidated financial statements of Bio-logic Systems Corp. (the "Company") were prepared under the rules and regulations for reporting on Form 10-Q. Accordingly, the Company omitted some information and footnote disclosures normally accompanying the annual financial statements. You should read these interim financial statements and notes in conjunction with the Company's audited consolidated financial statements and their notes included in the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended February 28, 2005, as filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on May 27, 2005 (the "Annual Report"). In the opinion of management, the unaudited condensed consolidated financial statements include all adjustments necessary for a fair statement of the results of operations, financial position and cash flows for the interim periods. All adjustments were of a normal recurring nature. The results for the interim periods presented are not necessarily indicative of the results that may be expected for any future period. The following information should be read in conjunction with the consolidated financial statements and accompanying notes included in Bio-logic Systems Corp.'s Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended February 28, 2005.
The consolidated financial statements include the Company and its wholly owned domestic subsidiary, Bio-logic Holding Inc., and its wholly owned foreign subsidiary, Bio-logic Systems Corp., Ltd. All significant intercompany balances and transactions have been eliminated in consolidation.
Consolidation
Cash equivalents include all highly liquid investments purchased with maturities of three months or less.
Cash and Cash Equivalents
The Company maintains cash balances at several financial institutions located predominantly in the United States, as well as in Israel and Poland. The majority of the Company's investments is in money market accounts in the United States, and is insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation up to $100,000. Cash in foreign bank accounts is not insured. Uninsured balances in the aggregate were approximately $15,628,000 and $15,174,000 at November 30, 2005 and February 28, 2005, respectively. The Company has not experienced any losses in such accounts, and management believes it is not exposed to any significant risk of loss of cash and cash equivalents.
Concentration of Credit Risk
The majority of the Company's accounts receivable are due from companies in the medical and health care industries. Credit is extended based on an evaluation of a customer's financial condition. New customers not affiliated with governments, hospitals or universities are generally subject to a deposit. Accounts receivable are stated at amounts due from customers net of an allowance for doubtful accounts, and are generally due within 30 days for domestic customers and 60 days for international customers. Accounts outstanding longer than the contractual payment terms are considered past due. The Company determines its allowance by considering a number of factors, including the length of time trade accounts receivable are past due and the Company's previous loss history. The Company writes off accounts receivable when the Company determines that they are not collectable, and payments subsequently received on such receivables are credited to the allowance for doubtful accounts. Charges for doubtful accounts are recorded in selling, general and administrative expenses.
Accounts Receivable
Inventories consist principally of components, parts and supplies, and are stated at the lower of cost, determined by the first in, first out method, or market. Inventories (in thousands) consist of the following:
Inventories
 
 
Property, plant and equipment are stated at cost. The cost of maintenance and repairs is charged to income as incurred, and significant renewals and betterments are capitalized. Depreciation is provided using the straight-line method over the estimated useful lives of the assets, ranging from three years to forty years.
Property, Plant and Equipment
Intangible assets consist primarily of capitalized software costs for research and development, as well as certain patent, trademark and license costs. Capitalized software development costs are recorded in accordance with Statement of Financial Accounting Standards ("SFAS") No. 86, "Accounting for the Costs of Computer Software to Be Sold, Leased, or Otherwise Marketed," with costs being amortized using the straight-line method over a five-year period. Patent, trademark and license costs are amortized using the straight-line method over their estimated useful lives of five years. On a periodic basis, management reviews the valuation of intangible assets to determine if there has been impairment by comparing the related assets' carrying value to the undiscounted estimated future cash flows and/or operating income from related operations.
Intangible Assets
The following table (in thousands) summarizes the components of gross and net intangible asset balances:
 
The Company regularly reviews long-lived assets for impairment in accordance with SFAS No. 144, "Accounting for the Impairment of Long-Lived Assets." No impairment was realized for the nine-month periods ended November 30, 2005 and 2004.
Long-Lived Assets
Other assets consist mainly of long-term trade receivables. Any required reserves for long-term trade receivables are recorded as part of the allowance for doubtful accounts. There are currently no reserve requirements for long-term receivables.
Other Assets
The Company derives revenue from the sales of electrodiagnostic systems, disposable supplies, extended warranty contracts, non-warranty repair, and governmental research and development contracts. With the exception of domestic customers associated with certain group purchasing contracts, the terms of sale for systems and related supplies are generally FOB shipping point.
Revenue Recognition
Domestically, the Company sells its neurology and sleep systems through a direct sales force, and uses a dealer network to sell its hearing screening and diagnostic systems. Internationally, the entire line of electrodiagnostic systems and supplies is sold through distributors located in various countries. There is no general right for a customer, dealer or distributor to return product. All sales are final, regardless of the distribution channel; returns are rare and are usually allowed only due to order error or quality concerns.
The Company recognizes revenue when it is realized or realizable and earned, in accordance with Statement of Position No. 97-2, ; specifically, when there is persuasive evidence of an arrangement, delivery has occurred, the sales price is fixed or determinable, and collectability is reasonably assured. Set-up and training revenue related to system sales is not recognized until the service is completed. Revenue from the performance of non-warranty repair activities is recognized in the period in which the work is performed. Revenue from extended warranty contracts is recognized over the life of the warranty. The Company carries a sales reserve that reduces revenue for potential future product returns, as well as unperformed set-up and training, and reviews its adequacy quarterly. To date, this reserve has been insignificant.
Software Revenue Recognition
Revenue from research and development contracts relate to governmental grants awarded by the National Institute of Health. The grants cover reimbursement of specific expenses related to the feasibility and development
 
of projects for which the grants were given, and the Company recognizes revenue in the same period the qualifying costs are incurred. The Company's obligation is to perform these feasibility and development activities in accordance with the terms of the grants, with no obligation for the work to result in a successful outcome such as a new product or successful discovery.
Advertising costs are expensed as incurred.
Advertising
Research and development (R&D) costs are expensed as incurred. Capitalized research and development costs reflect internally generated software development costs associated with bringing new products to market, or significantly adding new features and functions to existing products. Accounting for software development costs is in accordance with SFAS No. 86, "Accounting for the Costs of Computer Software to Be Sold, Leased, Or Otherwise Marketed." Specifically, (a) R&D costs incurred in determining technological feasibility are expensed; (b) all material costs from the point where technological feasibility is determined up to the point when the product is available for general release to customers are capitalized; and (c) capitalization ceases when the developed product is available for general release to customers.
Research and Development Costs
Deferred tax assets and liabilities are computed annually for differences between the financial statement bases and tax bases of assets and liabilities using enacted tax rates for the years in which the differences are expected to become recoverable. A valuation allowance is established where necessary to reduce deferred tax assets to the amount expected to be realized.
Income Taxes
Deferred Federal income taxes are not provided for the undistributed earnings of the Company's foreign subsidiary. Undistributed foreign earnings were $2,430,000 and $2,913,835 as of November 30, 2005 and February 28, 2005, respectively.
In preparing financial statements in conformity with accounting principles generally accepted in the United States of America, management is required to make estimates and assumptions that affect the reported amounts of assets and liabilities, the disclosure of contingent assets and liabilities at the date of the financial statements, and the reported amounts of revenues and expenses during the reporting period. Actual results could differ from those estimates.
Use of Estimates
The Company's financial instruments include cash equivalents, accounts receivable and accounts payable. The carrying value of cash equivalents, accounts receivable and accounts payable approximate their fair value because of the short-term nature of these instruments.
Fair Value of Financial Instruments
In accordance with Emerging Issues Task Force 00-10, "Accounting for Shipping and Handling Fees and Costs," the Company has reflected billings to customers for freight and handling as net sales and for associated freight-out as cost of sales.
Shipping and Handling Costs
The Company maintains a stock incentive plan under which it makes stock and option grants to employees and non-employee directors. The Company accounts for the option grants under this plan under the recognition and measurement principles of Accounting Principles Board ("APB") Opinion No. 25, "Accounting for Stock Issued to Employees," and related interpretations. All options granted under the Company's plan have an exercise price equal to or greater than the market value of the underlying common stock on the date of the grant. No compensation costs are recognized for these stock option grants.
Stock-Based Compensation
In July 2005 the Company granted restricted stock to the members of its Board of Directors. In accordance with Financial Accounting Standards Board (FASB) SFAS No. 123, "Accounting for Stock-Based Compensation," the fair value on the date of the grant was used to determine the amount of associated compensation expense to be initially recorded by the Company as deferred compensation expense in the equity section of the balance sheet. This amount will be charged to operating expense over the vesting period associated with each individual grant. Recognized compensation expense associated with the vesting of restricted shares was approximately $26,000 for the quarter ended November 30, 2005.
 
The following table illustrates the effect on net income and earnings per share if the Company had applied the fair value recognition provisions of Financial Accounting Standards Board (FASB) SFAS No. 123, "Accounting for Stock-Based Compensation," to stock-based compensation.
 
 
See "Recent Accounting Pronouncements" below for a discussion of SFAS No. 123 (revised 2004), "Share-Based Payment," which is a revision of SFAS No. 123.
Basic EPS is based on the weighted average number of shares outstanding during the year. Diluted EPS is based on the combination of weighted average number of shares outstanding and dilutive potential shares.
Earnings per Share (EPS)
SFAS No. 130, "Reporting Comprehensive Income," requires disclosure of the components of and total comprehensive income in the period in which they are recognized in the financial statements. Comprehensive income is defined as the change in equity (net assets) of a business enterprise arising from transactions and other events and circumstances from non-owner sources. It includes all changes in stockholders' equity during the reporting period, except those resulting from investments by owners and distributions to owners. The Company does not have changes in stockholders' equity other than those resulting from investments by and distributions to owners. The functional currency for the Company's international operations is the U.S. dollar.
Comprehensive Income
Product Line, Customer and Geographic Information
Revenue (in thousands) by product line is as follows:
 
Revenue (in thousands) from customers by geographic area is as follows:
 
For the fiscal quarters ended November 30, 2005 and 2004, there were no sales to a single customer that accounted for greater than 10% of revenue.
Long-lived assets include fixed assets (property, plant and equipment) and intangible assets. The Company has fixed assets in the United States and overseas. All intangible assets are domiciled in the United States. Long-lived assets in the United States and all foreign countries, in total (in thousands), are as follows:
 
 
Contingencies
On April 22, 2004, two plaintiffs filed a product liability claim against us and certain other defendants seeking specific damages of $12,300,000, as well as unspecified damages for future loss of income earning capacity. A brief description of this lawsuit may be found in Part II, Item 1 to this Form 10-Q. On July 11, 2005, the attorneys for the plaintiff signed a stipulated limited judgment of dismissal, dismissing the Company from the lawsuit.
Recent Accounting Pronouncements
In December 2004, the Financial Accounting Standards Board ("FASB") issued SFAS No. 123 (revised 2004), "Share-Based Payment" ("SFAS 123R"), which is a revision of SFAS No. 123, "Accounting for Stock-Based Compensation" ("SFAS 123"). SFAS 123R supersedes APB Opinion No. 25, "Accounting for Stock Issued to Employees", and amends SFAS No. 95, "Statement of Cash Flows." Generally, the approach in SFAS 123R is similar to that described in SFAS 123. SFAS 123R requires all share-based payments to employees, including grants of employee stock options, to be recognized in the statement of operations based on their fair values. Pro forma disclosure will no longer be allowed. Public companies, other than those filing as small business issuers, will be required to apply SFAS 123R as of the first reporting period of the registrant's first fiscal year beginning on or after June 15, 2005. The Company expects to adopt SFAS 123R in fiscal 2007.
SFAS 123R permits public companies to adopt its requirement using one of two methods: (1) a "modified prospective" method in which compensation cost is recognized beginning with the effective date (a) based on the requirements of SFAS 123R for all share-based payments granted after the effective date and (b) based on the requirements of SFAS 123R for all awards granted to employees prior to the effective date of SFAS 123R that remain unvested on the effective date; or (2) a "modified retrospective" method which includes the requirements of the modified prospective method described above, but also permits entities to restate based on the amounts previously recognized under SFAS 123 for purposes of pro forma disclosures either (a) all prior periods presented or (b) prior interim periods of the year of adoption.
As permitted by SFAS 123, the Company currently accounts for share-based payments to employees using the intrinsic value method under APB Opinion No. 25, and as such, the Company generally recognizes no compensation cost for employee stock options. The Company intends to continue to apply APB Opinion No. 25 to equity-based compensation awards until the first quarter of fiscal 2007. Upon the Company's adoption of SFAS 123R, the Company expects to use the modified prospective application transition method without restatement of prior interim or annual periods. This will result in the recognition of compensation cost based on the requirements of SFAS 123R for all equity-based compensation awards issued after March 1, 2006. For all equity-based compensation awards that are unvested as of March 1, 2006, compensation cost will be recognized for the unamortized portion of compensation cost not previously included in the SFAS 123 pro forma footnote disclosure. The Company is currently evaluating the impact that adoption of SFAS 123R may have on the Company's results of operations and financial position. The Company expects that the adoption could have a material effect on the Company's results of operations, depending on the level and form of future equity-based compensation awards issued, but it should not have a material effect on the Company's financial position.
On January 7, 2005, the Company's Board of Directors declared a 3-for-2 stock split on the Company's Common Stock, that was effected as a 50% stock dividend. The new shares and cash payments in lieu of fractional shares were distributed on February 11, 2005 to stockholders of record on January 26, 2005. The total number of authorized Common Stock shares and associated par value were unchanged by this action. As a result of the split, the Company's stockholders received one additional share of the Company's Common Stock for every two shares owned on January 26, 2005. Cash payments in lieu of fractional shares were based on the closing price of the Common Stock on the record date. All share and per-share amounts in the financial statements reflect the impact of the stock split for all periods presented.
Stock Split
Certain reclassifications were made to the fiscal 2005 balance sheet amounts to conform to current year financial presentation.
Reclassification
 

Exhibit 99.3
The following unaudited pro forma condensed combined balance sheet as of December 31, 2005 and the unaudited pro forma condensed combined statement of income for the year ended December 31, 2005 are based on the historical financial statements of Natus Medical Incorporated ("Natus", the "Company"), and Bio-logic Systems Corp. ("Bio-logic") after giving effect to the acquisition of Bio-logic by Natus using the purchase method of accounting and applying the assumptions and adjustments described in the accompanying notes to the unaudited pro forma condensed combined financial statements.
Natus and Bio-logic have different fiscal year ends. Accordingly, the unaudited pro forma condensed combined balance sheet combines the historical condensed consolidated balance sheet of Natus as of December 31, 2005 with the historical condensed consolidated balance sheet of Bio-logic as of December 31, 2005, giving effect to the acquisition as if it had occurred on December 31, 2005. The unaudited pro forma condensed combined statement of income combines the historical consolidated statement of income of Natus for the year ended December 31, 2005, with the historical monthly, consolidated statements of income of Bio-logic for the twelve calendar months ended December 31, 2005, giving effect to the acquisition as though it had occurred on January 1, 2005.
The acquisition has been accounted for under the purchase method of accounting in accordance with Statement of Financial Accounting Standards ("SFAS") No. 141, . Under the purchase method of accounting, the total estimated purchase price, calculated as described in Note 1 to these unaudited pro forma condensed combined financial statements, is allocated to the net tangible and intangible assets of Bio-logic acquired in connection with the acquisition, based on their estimated fair values. Management has made a preliminary allocation of the estimated purchase price to the tangible and intangible assets acquired and liabilities assumed based on various preliminary estimates. The allocation of the estimated purchase price is preliminary pending finalization of various estimates and analyses.
Business Combinations
The unaudited pro forma condensed combined financial statements have been prepared by management for illustrative purposes only and are not necessarily indicative of the condensed consolidated financial position or results of operations in future periods or the results that actually would have been realized had Natus and Bio-logic been a combined company during the specified periods. The pro forma adjustments are based on the preliminary information available at the time of the preparation of this document. The unaudited pro forma condensed combined financial statements, including the notes thereto, are qualified in their entirety by reference to, and should be read in conjunction with the historical consolidated financial statements of Natus included in its Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2005. In addition, the unaudited proforma condensed combined financial statements, including the notes thereto, are based on the historical consolidated financial statements of Bio-logic for the year ended February 28, 2005 and for the nine months ended November 30, 2005, which are included in Exhibits 99.1 and 99.2, respectively, to this Form
8-K/A.
 
Memo:
 
Memo:
 
1 - Basis of Presentation
On January 5, 2006, Natus completed its acquisition of Bio-logic whereby Bio-logic became a wholly owned subsidiary of Natus in a transaction accounted for using the purchase method. Pursuant to the terms of the Agreement and Plan of Merger, each outstanding share of Bio-logic common stock was converted into the right to receive $8.77 in cash. Additionally, each outstanding option to acquire Bio-logic common stock was cancelled, with the holder of the option receiving, for each share covered by the option, an amount equal to the excess (if any) of $8.77 over the exercise price per share of the option.
The preliminary estimated total purchase price of the acquisition is as follows (in thousands):
 
Under the purchase method of accounting, the total estimated purchase price as shown in the table above is allocated to the net tangible and intangible assets of Bio-logic based on their estimated fair values as of January 5, 2006. Management has allocated the preliminary estimated purchase price based on preliminary estimates based on various factors as described in the introduction to these unaudited pro forma condensed combined financial statements. The allocation of the purchase price is preliminary, pending the completion of various analyses and the finalization of estimates. The allocation of the preliminary purchase price, and estimated useful lives and first year amortization on an annualized basis associated with the amortizable identifiable intangible assets, is as follows (in thousands):
 
. A preliminary estimate of $22.1 million has been allocated to net tangible assets, including $15.4 million of cash acquired and approximately $5.5 million of real estate for which approximately $2.8 million is currently subject to a contingent sales contract. The Company has not completed its analysis of the fair market value of other tangible assets acquired and any adjustment to the fair market value will be offset by a corresponding adjustment to goodwill.
Net tangible assets
. Acquired identifiable intangible assets include core technology, developed technology, and tradenames. Core technology represents a combination of Bio-logic processes, patents, and trade secrets developed through years of experience in design and development of their products, which will be amortized on a graded basis over periods from 5 to 20 years. Developed technology relates to Bio-logic's products across all of their product lines that have reached technological feasibility, which will be amortized on a graded basis over 10 years. Tradenames relates to the Bio-logic tradename and the tradenames of specific product lines; they have an indefinite life and will not be amortized.
Identifiable intangible assets
. Approximately $18.4 million has been allocated to goodwill. Goodwill represents the excess of the purchase price over the fair value of the underlying net tangible and intangible assets. In accordance with SFAS No. 142, , goodwill will not be amortized but instead will be tested for impairment at least annually (more frequently if certain indicators are present). In the event that management of the Company determines that the value of goodwill has become impaired, the Company will incur an accounting charge for the amount of impairment during the fiscal quarter in which the determination is made.
Goodwill
Goodwill and Other Intangible Assets
. A preliminary estimate of $761,000 has been allocated to a long-term deferred tax liability, which primarily results from the tradenames that have indefinite lives as well as adjustments to other items associated with net deferred tax liabilities. This amount is offset by an increase in goodwill.
Net Deferred Tax Liability
In addition, the preliminary valuation of amortizable identified intangible assets will result in an approximate $8.7 million long-term deferred tax liability that will be offset by the reversal of the historical valuation allowance associated with deferred tax assets of Natus.
. A preliminary estimate of $5.9 million has been allocated to in-process research and development and will be charged to expense in the quarter ending March 31, 2006. Due to its non-recurring nature, the in-process research and development expense has been excluded from the unaudited pro forma condensed combined statements of income.
In-process research and development
Bio-logic is currently developing new products in several product areas that qualify as in-process research and development. Projects that qualify as in-process research and development represent those that have not yet reached technological feasibility. Technological feasibility is defined as being equivalent to completion of a beta-phase working prototype in which there is no remaining risk relating to the development. The Company believes there is a risk that these development efforts and enhancements will not achieve technological feasibility, or if they do, may not be competitive with other products using alternative technologies that offer comparable functionality.
The value assigned to in-process research and development was determined by considering the importance of each project to the overall development plan, estimating costs to develop the purchased in-process research and development into commercially viable products, estimating the resulting net cash flows from the projects when completed, and discounting the net cash flows to their present value. The revenue estimates used to value the purchased in-process research and development were based on estimates of relevant market sizes and growth factors, expected trends in technology, and the nature and expected timing of new product introductions by Bio-logic and its competitors.
The estimates used in valuing in-process research and development were based upon assumptions believed to be reasonable but which are inherently uncertain and unpredictable. Assumptions may be incomplete or inaccurate, and unanticipated events and circumstances may occur. Accordingly, actual results may vary from these estimates.
2 - Pro Forma Adjustments
Pro forma adjustments are described on the face of the respective financial statements.
Pro forma adjustments are necessary to reflect the estimated purchase price, the estimated value of acquired identified intangible assets, goodwill, the amortization expense related to the estimated amortizable intangible assets and deferred stock-based compensation, and the income tax effect related to the pro forma adjustments based on statutory rates in effect in the United States.
There were no intercompany balances or transactions between Natus and Bio-logic as of the dates and for the periods of these pro forma condensed combined financial statements.
The pro forma combined provision for income taxes does not necessarily reflect the amounts that would have resulted had Natus and Bio-logic filed consolidated income tax returns during the periods presented.
3  Integration Plan
As more fully described in a Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission by Natus on January 12, 2006, Natus initiated an Integration Plan (the "Plan") subsequent to the acquisition, pursuant to which the Company announced it would be reducing the size of its combined workforce by approximately 23 employees, representing approximately 10% of the combined workforce of Natus and Bio-logic. The Company expects that total employee severance costs related to the staff reductions will be approximately $3.0 million, including costs related to change of control provisions in the employment contracts of the chief executive officer, chief operating officer, and two vice-presidents of Bio-logic totaling approximately $2.7 million. Such amount has been recorded as a liability on the balance sheet as of December 31, 2005.
Other than costs associated with the Plan mentioned above, the unaudited pro forma condensed combined financial statements do not include any adjustments for liabilities that may result from further integration activities, as management is in the process of making these assessments and estimates of these costs are not currently known. However, liabilities may ultimately be recorded related to integration activities, including additional costs related to the Plan. Any such adjustments to liabilities will be recorded as an adjustment to the purchase price and a corresponding offsetting adjustment to goodwill.
Although not reflected in the pro forma adjustments, the Company believes that on an annual basis the Plan will result in a reduction of personnel-related costs of approximately $3.2 million. The Company also believes that it will benefit from other synergies of the acquisition that should result in an additional annual reduction of non-personnel-related operating expenses of approximately $1.0 million.
4 - Pro Forma Net Income Per Share
The Company computes net income per share in accordance with SFAS No. 128, . Basic net income per share is based upon the weighted average number of common shares outstanding during the year ended December 31, 2005. Diluted net income per share is based upon the weighted average number of common shares outstanding and dilutive common stock equivalents outstanding during the same period. Common stock equivalents are shares underlying options under the Company's stock option plans and are calculated using the treasury stock method.
Earnings per Share


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BABY/BABY-8K-20060503123049.txt.gz
TIME:20060503123049
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION Washington, D.C. 20549 FORM 8-K CURRENT REPORT Pursuant to Section 13 OR 15(d) of The Securities Exchange Act of 1934 Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported) May 2, 2006 Natus Medical Incorporated - -------------------------------------------------------------------------------- (Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter) Delaware 000-33001 77-0154833 - ---------------------------- -------------- ------------------- (State or other jurisdiction (Commission (IRS Employer of incorporation) File Number) Identification No.) 1501 Industrial Road, San Carlos, California 94070 - -------------------------------------------------------------------------------- (Address of principal executive offices) (Zip Code) Registrant's telephone number, including area code: (650) 802-0400 --------------------------- Not applicable - -------------------------------------------------------------------------------- (Former name or former address, if changed since last report) Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below): [ ] Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [ ] Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [ ] Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [ ] Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
- -------------------------------------------------------------------------------- ITEM 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition. On May 2, 2006, Natus Medical Incorporated (the "Company") is issuing a press release and holding a conference call regarding its financial results for the first quarter of fiscal 2006 ended March 31, 2006 and other financial information. A copy of the press release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 to this Form 8-K. The information in this Form 8-K and the exhibit attached hereto shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act") or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that Section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing. ITEM 9.01. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS, PRO FORMA FINANCIAL INFORMATION AND EXHIBITS. (c) Exhibits. Exhibit No. Description ----------- ----------- 99.1 Press release of Natus Medical Incorporated dated May 2, 2006 describing the Company's results for its first fiscal quarter ended March 31, 2006 and other financial information. - --------------------------------------------------------------------------------
SIGNATURES Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized. NATUS MEDICAL INCORPORATED Date: May 2, 2006 By: /s/ Steven J. Murphy ------------------------- Steven J. Murphy Vice President Finance and Chief Financial Officer
Index to Exhibits Exhibit No. Description ----------- ----------- 99.1 Press release of Natus Medical Incorporated dated May 2, 2006 describing the Company's results for its first fiscal quarter ended March 31, 2006 and other financial information.

Exhibit 99.1 Natus Medical Reports Record Revenue and First-Quarter Non-GAAP Earnings SAN CARLOS, Calif.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--May 2, 2006--Natus Medical Incorporated (Nasdaq:BABY) today reported financial results for the three months ended March 31, 2006. Natus reported revenue of $19.4 million for the quarter ended March 31, 2006, compared to $9.7 million reported in the same period in 2005. The increase was primarily attributable to the acquisition of Bio-logic Systems Corp. Gross margin improved to 62.4% for the three months ended March 31, 2006, compared with 60.1% for the first quarter of 2005. The gross margin for the 2006 period was favorably impacted by the results of Bio-logic as well as product mix among the Company's other products. On a GAAP basis the Company reported a net loss of $4.7 million or $(0.25) per diluted share in the first quarter of 2006, compared to net income of $910,000 or $0.05 per diluted share in the first quarter of 2005. Non-GAAP net income was $1.4 million or $0.07 per diluted share, representing increases of 56% and 40%, respectively, as compared to the same period in 2005. The non-GAAP measures exclude the effect of employee equity-based compensation expense and an in-process research and development charge associated with the January 5, 2006 acquisition of Bio-logic. However, the non-GAAP measures do include the impact of a higher effective tax rate as described below. "I am extremely pleased with our first quarter results," stated Jim Hawkins, President and Chief Executive Officer of Natus. "Our top line results and pre-tax earnings on a non-GAAP basis were beyond our expectations, with strong sales among all our product lines, and we continue to believe that 2006 will be an excellent year for Natus." "The integration of Bio-logic is nearly complete," added Hawkins. "It has gone very smoothly and is ahead of schedule. We are also pleased that Bio-logic's operating results were accretive to our earnings in the first quarter." On January 1, 2006, the Company adopted SFAS 123R and is reporting employee equity-based compensation expense in its GAAP results. The first quarter also included an after-tax in-process research and development charge of $5.9 million associated with the acquisition of Bio-logic. These charges have been excluded from the non-GAAP net income and earnings per share numbers reported above. A reconciliation of GAAP and non-GAAP results is provided in the attached tables. The Company has determined, in consultation with its tax advisors and independent auditors, that the application of purchase accounting rules to the Bio-logic acquisition will result in an increase to its effective tax rate for accounting purposes, although the Company's tax obligations will not change. In 2005 the Company was able to offset much of its tax expense for accounting purposes against its deferred tax assets for which a valuation allowance had been provided. Because of the purchase accounting entries, beginning in the first quarter of 2006 the Company is no longer able to offset its tax expense against its deferred tax assets. As a result, the Company's effective tax rate for the first quarter of 2006 increased to 43.7%, compared to 14.4% for the first quarter of 2005, and the Company expects that its future tax rate for accounting purposes will approximate statutory rates. Mr. Hawkins noted, "This change in tax circumstance does not effect our ability to benefit from our deferred tax assets. For U.S. federal tax purposes, we still expect to benefit from our net operating loss carryforward, and for cash flow purposes nothing has changed. This change in our effective tax rate for accounting purposes increased our tax provision by approximately $650,000, compared to the 15% rate we had expected for 2006 and cited in our previous guidance. Even with this increase, we still reported non-GAAP earnings per share of 7 cents. Had this change in accounting for income tax expense not occurred, our earnings per share would have exceeded the high range of the guidance we provided in February by 3 cents and on a non-GAAP basis our diluted earnings per share would have been 11 cents." The Company will present a more detailed explanation of the change in its effective tax rate during the Company's financial results conference call. Financial Guidance Natus increased revenue guidance for 2006. For the full year, the Company expects to report revenue of $80.5 to $82.0 million. The Company had previously said that it expected to report revenue of $78.0 to $80.0 million. For the second quarter of 2006, the Company expects to report revenue of $19.3 to $19.5 million. The Company had previously said that it expected to report revenue of $19.0 to $19.3 million. For the third quarter of 2006, the Company expects to report revenue of $20.3 to 20.5 million. The Company had previously provided financial guidance for 2006 that was based on an effective tax rate of 15% for accounting purposes. The Company has adjusted its financial guidance for the remainder of 2006, which is now based on an increase in its effective tax rate to approximately 45%. The Company's prior guidance also did not include the impact of expensing employee equity-based compensation ("option expense"). The Company is now adjusting its guidance to include this cost, which it expects to be approximately $1.6 million for 2006. The Company expects that this cost will reduce its earnings by $0.04 to $0.05 per diluted share in 2006. The Company increased its guidance on a before-tax basis for the full year 2006. The new guidance is based on the Company reporting income before tax of $11.2 to $12.3 million. In the guidance the Company provided in February, the estimate of income before tax would have been $9.9 to $10.4 million, had the Company included option expense in that guidance. For the full year 2006, the Company now expects to report earnings per share of $0.30 to $0.33. Natus had previously said it expected to earn $0.49 to $0.51 per diluted share in 2006 on a non-GAAP basis because that guidance excluded option expense. In addition the previous guidance was based on the lower effective tax rate. In February, the Company provided guidance for the second quarter of 2006. With the increase in the effective tax rate, the Company now expects to report diluted earnings per share in the second quarter 2006 of $0.05 to $0.06. This guidance is based on the Company recording approximately $360,000 of option expense and reporting income before taxes of $1.8 to $2.2 million. The Company provided guidance for the third quarter of 2006. For the third quarter of 2006, the Company expects to report diluted earnings per share of $0.08 to $0.09. This guidance is based on the Company recording approximately $460,000 of option expense and reporting income before taxes of approximately $3.0 to $3.4 million. The Company's 2006 annual guidance above excludes the impact of the $5.9 million in-process research and development charge recorded in the first quarter. That charge is expected to reduce earning per share for the full year by approximately $0.29 per diluted share. However, this guidance includes the impact of expensing employee options, which as mentioned above will be $0.04 to $0.05 per diluted share in 2006. Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures In addition to disclosing financial results calculated in accordance with GAAP, this release contains non-GAAP financial measures that exclude the effects of equity-based compensation expense as a result of the Company's adoption of SFAS 123R on January 1, 2006 and costs associated with the January 5, 2006 acquisition of Bio-logic Systems Corp. The Company believes that the presentation of results excluding equity-based compensation expense and the acquisition-related charges provides meaningful supplemental information to both management and investors that is indicative of the Company's core operating results. The Company is using the modified prospective method in its adoption of SFAS 123R and as such, will not restate prior year results for the impact of employee stock option expensing. The Company also believes the in-process research and development charge is not indicative of resources devoted to ongoing research and development efforts. Therefore, the Company believes these non-GAAP financial measures facilitate comparison of operating results across reporting periods. A reconciliation between the Company's results of operations on a GAAP and non-GAAP basis for the periods reported is included as part of the condensed consolidated statements of operations at the end of the Company's financial results release. The Company believes that both management and investors benefit from referring to these non-GAAP financial measures in assessing the Company's performance and when planning, forecasting, and analyzing future periods. These non-GAAP financial measures also facilitate management's internal comparisons to the Company's historical performance. The non-GAAP financial measures disclosed by the Company should not be considered a substitute for or superior to financial measures calculated in accordance with GAAP, and the financial results calculated in accordance with GAAP and reconciliations to those financial statements should be carefully evaluated. Conference Call Natus has scheduled an investor conference call to discuss this announcement beginning at 9:00 a.m. Eastern Time today. Individuals interested in listening to the conference call may do so by dialing (866) 356-4281 for domestic callers, or (617) 597-5395 for international callers, and entering reservation code 29190744. A telephone replay will be available for 48 hours following the conclusion of the call by dialing (888) 286-8010 for domestic callers, or (617) 801-6888 for international callers, and entering reservation code 71522734. The time of the conference call above is an update of the time indicated in the Company's press release issued on April 24, 2005 announcing the conference call. The conference call also will be available real-time via the Internet at http://investor.natus.com, and a recording of the call will be available on the Company's Web site for 90 days following the completion of the call. About Natus Medical Incorporated Natus is a leading provider of healthcare products used for screening, detection, treatment, monitoring and tracking of common medical ailments such as hearing impairment, neurological dysfunction, epilepsy, sleep disorders, newborn jaundice and newborn metabolic testing. Additional information about Natus Medical can be found at www.natus.com. This press release contains forward-looking statements as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, particularly statements regarding the expectations, beliefs, plans, intentions and strategies of Natus. These forward-looking statements include, but are not limited to, statements regarding anticipated revenue and profitability for the full-year 2006 as well as for the second and third quarters of 2006, and the ability to utilize deferred tax assets to offset future tax obligations. These statements relate to future events or Natus' future financial performance or results, and involve known and unknown risks, uncertainties and other factors that may cause actual results, levels of activity, performance, or achievements to differ materially from those expressed or implied by the forward-looking statements. Forward-looking statements are only predictions and the actual events or results may differ materially. Natus cannot provide any assurance that its future results or the results implied by the forward-looking statements will meet expectations. Our future results could differ materially due to a number of factors, including the effects of competition, the demand for our products and services, our ability to expand our sales in international markets, our ability to maintain current sales levels in a mature domestic market, our ability to control costs, and risks associated with bringing new products to market and integrating acquired businesses. Natus disclaims any obligation to update information contained in any forward-looking statement. More information about potential risk factors that could affect the business and financial results of Natus is included in Natus' annual report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2005, and its quarterly reports on Form 10-Q, and in other reports filed from time to time by Natus with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission. NATUS MEDICAL INCORPORATED AND SUBSIDIARIES UNAUDITED CONDENSED CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF OPERATIONS (in thousands, except per share amounts) Three Months Ended March March 2006 2005 --------- --------- Revenue $ 19,383 $ 9,702 Cost of revenue 7,294 3,870 --------- --------- Gross profit 12,089 5,832 --------- --------- Operating expenses: Marketing and selling 5,161 2,605 Research and development 2,490 993 General and administrative 2,155 1,363 Acquired IPR&D 5,900 - --------- --------- Total operating expenses 15,706 4,961 --------- --------- Income (loss) from operations (3,617) 871 --------- --------- Other income/(expense): Interest income 169 183 Interest expense (165) - Other income, net (117) 9 --------- --------- Total other income/(expense) (113) 192 --------- --------- Income (loss) before provision for income tax (3,730) 1,063 Provision for income tax 949 153 --------- --------- Net income (loss) $ (4,679) $ 910 ========= ========= Earnings (loss) per share: Basic: $ (0.25) $ 0.05 Diluted: $ (0.25) $ 0.05 Weighted-average shares used to compute Basic earnings per share 18,485 17,156 Diluted earnings per share 18,485 18,435 NATUS MEDICAL INCORPORATED AND SUBSIDIARIES RECONCILIATION OF NON-GAAP ADJUSTMENTS (UNAUDITED) (in thousands, except per share amounts) Three Months Ended March March 2006 2005 --------- --------- GAAP net income (loss) $ (4,679) $ 910 --------- --------- Earnings per share Basic $ (0.25) $ 0.05 Diluted $ (0.25) $ 0.05 non-GAAP adjustments: Equity-based compensation expense under SFAS 123R (see note below) (a) 357 - Acquired in-process research and development (see note below) (b) 5,900 - Income tax effect (see notes below) (c) (161) - --------- --------- Non-GAAP net income $ 1,417 $ 910 --------- --------- non-GAAP earnings per share Basic $ 0.08 $ 0.05 Diluted $ 0.07 $ 0.05 Weighted-average shares used to compute Non-GAAP basic earnings per share 18,485 17,156 Non-GAAP diluted earnings per share 20,239 18,435 Non-GAAP Adjustments (a) Non-cash equity-based compensation expense of $357,000 related to the Company's adoption of SFAS No. 123R on January 1, 2006 allocated as follows: $24,000 to cost of sales, $139,000 to marketing and selling, $56,000 to research and development, and $138,000 to general and administrative. Management believes that it is useful to investors to understand how the expenses associated with the adoption of SFAS 123R are reflected in net income. Net income for the three months ending March 31, 2005 did not include equity-based compensation expense under SFAS 123. (b) A charge of $5.9 million for acquired in-process research and development expense related to the acquisition of Bio-logic Systems Corp. on January 5, 2006. Management believes that excluding this charge facilitates comparisons to Natus' core operating results during periods when there were no acquisitions. (c) Amount reflects the expected tax impact on the above noted non-GAAP adjustments. Non-GAAP earnings per diluted share in the table above are based on an effective tax rate of approximately 43.7%. Had the tax provision been based on a 15% rate, which the Company believes approximates the rate that would have been applied had it not been for the impact of the purchase accounting rules associated with the Bio-logic acquisition, then the tax provision would have been approximately $650,000 less and non-GAAP earnings per diluted share would have been $0.11 as follows: GAAP income before tax $(3,730) Non-GAAP adjustments: Equity-based compensation expense 357 Acquired in-process research and development 5,900 -------- Non-GAAP income before tax 2,527 Provision for income tax at 15% 379 -------- Non-GAAP net income $2,147 ======== Non-GAAP Earnings per diluted share $0.11 Weighted-average shares used to compute diluted earnings per share 20,239 CONTACT: Natus Medical Incorporated Steven J. Murphy, 650-802-0400 InvestorRelations@Natus.com


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BABY/BABY-8K-20060508133615.txt.gz
TIME:20060508133615
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
 
 
 
ITEM 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On May 2, 2006, Natus Medical Incorporated (the "Company") issued a press release and held a conference call regarding its financial results for the first quarter of fiscal 2006 ended March 31, 2006 and other financial information. A copy of the press release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K and a copy of the conference call transcript is furnished as Exhibit 99.2 to this Current Report on Form 8-K. The press release and conference call transcript contain forward-looking statements regarding the Company and include cautionary statements identifying important factors that could cause actual results to differ materially from those anticipated.
The information in Item 2.02 of this Current Report on Form 8-K, and Exhibits 99.1 and 99.2 attached hereto shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act") or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that Section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
During the aforementioned earnings conference call, James B. Hawkins, the Company's President and Chief Executive Officer, provided certain updates to the Company's guidance for its financial results for the second and third quarter of 2006 and for the full year. In response to a question from one of the participants on the call, Mr. Hawkins provided estimated annual earnings per share for fiscal 2006 on a non-GAAP basis. The table below contains supplemental information regarding the Company's estimated annual earnings per share. This financial information is a non-GAAP financial measure. The reconciliation of the non-GAAP financial measure is as follows:
 
ITEM 9.01. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS, PRO FORMA FINANCIAL INFORMATION AND EXHIBITS.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 99.2
CONFERENCE CALL TRANSCRIPT
NATUS MEDICAL INCORPORATED
(NASDAQ:BABY)
Q1 2006 EARNINGS CONFERENCE CALL EVENT
DATE/TIME: MAY. 02. 2006 / 9:00AM ET
CORPORATE PARTICIPANTS
Brienne Fisher
Natus Medical Incorporated - Director Legal Services
Jim Hawkins
Natus Medical Incorporated - President, CEO
Steve Murphy
Natus Medical Incorporated - VP Finance, CFO
Ken Traverso
Natus Medical Incorporated - VP Sales, Marketing
CONFERENCE CALL PARTICIPANTS
Matt Dolan
Roth Capital Partners - Analyst
Dan Owczarski
Soleil-Belmont Harbor Capital - Analyst
Patrick Winton
Sterne Agee & Leach - Analyst
Joshua Zable
Natexis Bleichroeder - Analyst
David Nierenberg
Nierenberg Investment Management - Analyst
Kevin Kotler
Analyst
PRESENTATION
Operator
Ladies and gentlemen, thank you for standing by and welcome to the Natus Medical 2006 first-quarter financial results conference call. At this time all participants are in a listen-only mode. Later we will conduct a question-and-answer session. (OPERATOR INSTRUCTIONS) As a reminder, this conference call is being recorded today May 2, 2006 and contains time-sensitive information that is accurate only as of today. I would now like to turn the call over to Brienne Fisher at Natus Medical. Please go ahead.
Brienne Fisher
- Natus Medical Incorporated - Director Legal Services
This is Brienne Fisher, Director of Legal Services with Natus Medical and thank you all for participating in this morning's call. Earlier today Natus Medical released financial results for the 2006 first quarter. If you have not received the news release or if you would like to be added to the Company's distribution list, please call Natus Medical in San Carlos, California at 650-802-0400 or email your request to Investor Relations at Natus.com. This call is being broadcast live over the Internet at www.Natus.com and a replay of the call will be available on the Company's website for the next 90 days. In terms of structure for today's call Jim Hawkins, President and Chief Executive Officer of Natus will present opening comments; then Steve Murphy, our Chief Financial Officer, will summarize our financial results. And then Jim will conclude the prepared remarks with comments about our strategy and our financial guidance for 2006. Ken Traverso, our Vice President of sales and marketing is also here and will join in answering any questions. I would like to remind you that some of the information to be furnished in today's
session will constitute forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Forward-looking statements are those focused on future performance, results, plans and events and include our expected results for 2006. We remind you that our future results may differ materially from these forward-looking statements due to a number of risk factors. For a description of the relevant risks and uncertainties that may affect our business see our periodic reports on form 10-K and 10-Q filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission. I would like to turn the call over to Jim Hawkins, President and Chief Executive Officer of Natus.
Jim Hawkins
- Natus Medical Incorporated - President, CEO
Thank you, Brienne. I am exceptionally pleased to report that during the first quarter we exceeded our forecast in both revenues and income before taxes. It was truly a great quarter. We achieved our financial goal of sustained profitability while increasing revenue and controlling costs. Among our financial highlights for the quarter are the following: We reported first-quarter revenue of $19.4 million compared to $9.7 million for the first quarter in 2005. Our guidance for the first quarter of 2006 was $18.1 to $18.3 million. Gross margin improved to 62.4% for the three months ended March 31, 2006 compared with 60.1% for the first quarter of 2005. We reported non-GAAP income of $1.4 million or $0.07 per diluted share; the non-GAAP measures exclude the effect of employee equity based compensation expense and an in-process research and development charge associated with the acquisition of Bio-logic. As noted in our press release, we determined in consultation with our tax advisers and independent auditors that the application of purchase accounting rules to the Bio-logic acquisition would result in an increase to our effective tax rate for accounting purposes. This does not change our tax obligations. As a result, our effective tax rate for the first quarter of 2006 increased to 43.7% compared to 14.4% for the first quarter of 2005.
I want to make it perfectly clear that this change in our effective tax rate does not affect our ability to benefit from our deferred tax assets. The change in our effective tax rate for accounting purposes increased our tax provision by approximately $650,000 compared to the 15% tax we had expected for 2006 and cited in our previous guidance. Even with this increase we still reported non-GAAP earnings per share of $0.07. Had this change in accounting for income tax expense not occurred our non-GAAP earnings per share would have been $0.11 which exceeds the high range of the guidance we provided in February by $0.03.
The integration of Bio-logic is nearly complete. It has gone very smoothly and is ahead of schedule. We are also pleased that Bio-logic's operating results were accretive to our earnings in the first quarter. I am also proud of everyone in the Natus and Bio-logic organizations for their willingness to implement new ideas and processes and for the sales organizations to work and grow their businesses together. We have successfully established the combined company as a dynamic, growing and very profitable medical device company. I believe we are well positioned to continue our penetration into existing markets, expand into new markets and continue to make Natus a leading medical device company. With that overview I would like to turn the call over to Steve Murphy.
Steve Murphy
- Natus Medical Incorporated - VP Finance, CFO
Thank you, Jim. I will be discussing our 2006 first-quarter financial results on a basis consistent with generally accepted accounting principles in the United States, or GAAP, and certain adjustments we have made to our GAAP results that we believe aid in assessing the performance of our core business. I will also discuss the increase in our effective tax rate for accounting purposes and all per share amounts that I will present are on a fully diluted basis. On a GAAP basis we reported a net loss of $4.7 million or a loss of $0.25 per share for the first quarter of 2006 compared with net income of $910,000 or $0.05 per share for the comparable period in 2005. As Jim mentioned, we reported first-quarter revenue of $19.4 million this year, an increase of $9.7 million or 100% from revenue of $9.7 million for the first quarter of 2006. $9.4 million of this increase was attributable to sales of Bio-logic. We have adjusted our first-quarter 2006 GAAP results for two discrete items included in those results. Of greatest magnitude was a $5.9 million charge for in-process research and development associated with our acquisition of Bio-logic. This charge is related to a development project currently underway at Bio-logic for which there are technological hurdles yet to be resolved. The technology has no alternative use. Because this charge is not deductible for tax purposes, the $5.9 million charge is deemed to be on an after-tax basis. In addition, we adopted statement of financial standards 123(R), share based payment, on January 1, 2006, which requires that the value of equity based compensation be recorded as an expense in the financial statements rather than being included in the footnotes on a pro forma basis. In the first quarter 2006 we recorded $357,000 of expenses associated with the adoption of SFAS 123(R).
In our press release issued earlier today, we stated why we believe these discrete adjustments to our GAAP results provides the Company and investors a clearer representation of our actual performance. Taking these adjustments into account, we reported non-GAAP net income of $1.4 million or $0.07 per share. These measures represent increases of 56% and 40%, respectively from the amounts we reported in the first quarter of 2005 when we reported net income of $910,000 and earnings of $0.05 per diluted share. And it is important to note that for the 2006 period we recorded our provision for taxes at an effective rate of 42.7% compared to 14.7% in the 2005 period.
And now to explain more fully why our effective tax rate increased in the first quarter of 2006. The increase is a direct result of our acquisition of Bio-logic. In the years leading up to December 31, 2005 we generated tax loss and credit carryforwards for federal and state income tax reporting. We reported significant deferred tax assets associated with these carryforwards in the notes to our financial statements as of December 31, 2005. Because we had no previous history of generating taxable income, we were unable to take the full benefit of these deferred tax assets to our income statement. However, we were able to reduce our tax provision in 2005 to the extent we were able to utilize those carryforwards in that year. Mechanically this is accomplished by reversing a portion of the valuation allowance that we provide for our deferred tax assets. Had it not been for the purchase accounting of the Bio-logic acquisition, we would have been able to also offset our 2006 tax provision against those net operating loss and credit carryforwards. This is why we based the guidance we provided in February on an effective tax rate of 15%. Because of the impact of purchase accounting rules related to the acquisition, our deferred tax assets have been netted against the deferred tax liabilities generated by the purchase accounting rules. Consequently we are no longer able to offset our book tax provision against our deferred tax assets.
The change in our effective tax rate increased our provision for income tax expense by about $650,000 in the first quarter of 2005 and our earnings per share would have been $0.04 greater had our effective tax rate remained at the 15% rate that we had expected for 2006 and cited in our previous guidance. We estimate that our effective tax rate for the remainder of 2006 will be approximately 45%. This effective tax rate is higher than the statutory rate of 40.5% because of nondeductible expenses in our book income. Revenue from devices and systems contributed to 55% of total revenue for the first quarter of 2006 compared with 45% reported in the first quarter of 2005. The increase was primarily attributable to the addition of Bio-logic's neurology and sleep diagnostic products. Revenue from U.S. operations was $14 million for the first quarter of 2006 compared with $6.1 million reported for the first quarter of 2005. Approximately 89% of the increase was attributable to Bio-logic products. Revenue from international operations increased 50% to $5.4 million for the first quarter 2006 compared with first-quarter 2005 revenue of $3.6 million. The increase was primarily attributable to sales of Bio-logic's hearing screening and diagnostic devices. Our gross margin improved to 62.4% for the first quarter of 2006 compared to 60.1% in the same period last year. The increase in gross margin for the 2006 period was primarily attributable to the results of Bio-logic and product mix, as well as a reduction in manufacturing overhead as a percentage of revenue.
Excluding the IPR&D charge, total operating expense increased by $4.8 million to $9.8 million in the 2006 first quarter compared to $5.2 million in the prior year. Approximately $4.4 million of the increase was attributable to Bio-logic. Operating expenses of the Natus core business were up $536,000 or 11% for the 2006 quarter, however, $333,000 of this increase was attributable to equity based compensation expense related to our adoption of SFAS 123(R).
We acquired Bio-logic Systems Corp. on January 5, 2006 for cash of $68.8 million. We used our existing cash and $12.8 million of Bio-logic's cash to complete the acquisition. We also borrowed $10 million from Wells Fargo Bank in a senior secured credit facility. Principal on this note is payable in 48 equal monthly installments however there is no prepayment penalty. The balance of the note at March 31, 2006 was approximately $9.4 million. We had approximately $10 million of cash at March 31, 2006. With that I will turn the call back to Jim.
Jim Hawkins
- Natus Medical Incorporated - President, CEO
Thanks, Steve. Before opening up the call to your questions I would like to make some comments and review our guidance. Again, the change in our tax circumstance does not affect our ability to benefit from our deferred tax asset. For U.S. federal tax purposes we still expect to benefit from our net operating loss carryforwards, and for cash flow purposes nothing has changed. It is very clear to me that this tax reporting change for accounting purposes only does not change our cash flow, tax payments, earnings before tax or business prospects. As an executive that has the experience in acquiring companies, it is my strong opinion that this tax reporting change does not change the enterprise value of Natus. I remain very excited about our growth prospects that are reflected in our updated guidance. For the full year 2006 we expect revenues of $80.5 million to $82 million. This is an increase of our previous guidance which was $78 to $80 million. In addition, we increased our guidance on a before tax basis for the full year 2006. This new guidance is based on the Company reporting income before tax of $11.2 to $12.3 million. In the guidance we provided in February, the estimate of income before tax would have been $9.9 to $10.4 million had the Company included option expensing in that guidance. For the full year 2006 the Company now expects to report earnings per share of $0.30 to $0.33. Natus had previously said it expected to earn $0.49 to $0.51 per diluted share on a non-GAAP basis, because that guidance excluded stock option expensing. In addition the previous guidance was based on a lower effective tax rate.
We have also updated our second-quarter 2006 revenue guidance to $19.3 to $19.5 million, up from the previous guidance of $19 to $19.3 million. With the increase in the effective tax rate we now expect to report diluted earnings per share in the second quarter of $0.05 to $0.06. The guidance is based on our recording of approximately $360,000 of option expense and reporting income before tax of $1.8 to $2.2 million. For the third quarter of 2006 we expect to report diluted earnings per share of $0.08 to $0.09 on revenues of $20.3 to $20.5 million. This guidance includes approximately $460,000 of option expense and reporting income before taxes of approximately $2.6 to $3 million. In conclusion, Natus had a great first quarter of 2006. Both revenue and earnings came in at much higher than expected levels. Our business has never been better. The
integration of Bio-logic has gone exceptionally well and we remain convinced that our growth strategy which incorporates continued internal growth and when the opportunity arises, additional strategic acquisitions that we expect to be accretive will allow Natus to continue to grow at high levels of profitability. With that said, Steve, Ken and I would be happy to take your questions.
Operator
(OPERATOR INSTRUCTIONS) Matt Dolan, Roth Capital Partners.
Matt Dolan
- Roth Capital Partners - Analyst
Good morning, guys. Just a couple questions here. In terms of the tax issue in the quarter, just to get a little bit more detail, it looks like you had a $20 million NOL at year-end. Maybe Steve can give us an update here on where this stands now, including all the one time items in Q1 and how we should look at that going forward.
Steve Murphy
- Natus Medical Incorporated - VP Finance, CFO
Well, we are currently in the process of doing an evaluation of our net operating loss carryforwards. There are complex rules relating to change of ownership, and those net operating losses go back to 1991. So it is a fairly complicated process to analyze those and we expect to have that completed by the time we file our 10-Q sometime next week. So I am not going to comment further on the extent of the losses only to say that we expect that there is still a substantial benefit from those tax loss carryforwards.
Matt Dolan
- Roth Capital Partners - Analyst
Okay, and then on a going forward basis do you plan on distinguishing between book tax and book operating margin versus operating EPS or I guess a non-GAAP EPS in the reports in the next several quarters until this tax issue kind of balances out?
Jim Hawkins
- Natus Medical Incorporated - President, CEO
Yes, we are going to explore different methods that would really make it I think a clearer picture for investors and stockholders to better evaluate the business. We could look at an EBIT type number that is something that we've really never looked at in the past as well. Certainly we will have GAAP and a non-GAAP number based upon stock based options expense and so we're going to sort that out but we are going to try to give as clear a picture as possible as to the true operations and income of the business.
Matt Dolan
- Roth Capital Partners - Analyst
Right. Very good. And then on the EPS guidance I am assuming we can back into this number but could you provide any type of a general estimate on what 06 EPS would look like given the enhanced sales and operating profit outlook that you provided in the press release?
Jim Hawkins
- Natus Medical Incorporated - President, CEO
I think that, again if we looked at  I think what you are saying, Matt, is if we would have kept the approximate 15% tax rate  if we would not have had the stock option expense the way we have taken it  what would our earnings guidance would have been at this point?
Matt Dolan
- Roth Capital Partners - Analyst
Right.
Jim Hawkins
- Natus Medical Incorporated - President, CEO
In doing that calculation I believe it would have been in the range of $0.53 to $0.58.
Matt Dolan
- Roth Capital Partners - Analyst
Okay.
Jim Hawkins
- Natus Medical Incorporated - President, CEO
Which would have been up from our $0.49 to $0.51 from our last update.
Matt Dolan
- Roth Capital Partners - Analyst
That helps. Thank you. A couple questions on the revenue side, then. In terms of guidance Q1 was obviously a lot stronger than we had anticipated. It looks like Q2  and thanks for the detail there  is relatively flat over Q1. Is there anything going on there that we should be thinking about in terms of seasonality or?
Jim Hawkins
- Natus Medical Incorporated - President, CEO
Yes. No, I think what we've done, Matt, you know we had one quarter in with Bio-logic, and we obviously in our minds blew the quarter out. It was much better than our expectations. Things are going very well. Is it going to continue? We certainly don't want to put that into our guidance at this point and expect that we can potentially blow it out again. We have raised our guidance that we think to an appropriate level based upon just having the business under our belts for one quarter, but we feel very good about the way Bio-logic and both the way Natus is performing.
Matt Dolan
- Roth Capital Partners - Analyst
Okay. That helps and then just one more. I think you mentioned this, Steve, the cash balance at the end of the quarter.
Steve Murphy
- Natus Medical Incorporated - VP Finance, CFO
$10 million.
Matt Dolan
- Roth Capital Partners - Analyst
$10 million, okay, thanks a lot guys, appreciate it.
Operator
Dan Owczarski, Belmont Harbor Capital.
Dan Owczarski
- Soleil-Belmont Harbor Capital - Analyst
Thanks. Good morning and great quarter guys. Just to go back to the first quarter when you had guided you thought you could do 18.1 to 18.3, I mean how much of that did you think Bio-logic would really contribute if that business ended up doing 9.4 million? And then I guess that Bio-logic's cannibalizing any of your base business or was there seasonality in your base business or how did that play out in the first quarter here?
Jim Hawkins
- Natus Medical Incorporated - President, CEO
Dan, we didn't give and we don't really give in the future breakdown of product and/or business by companies, because Natus is now made up of a couple of different companies and as we grow through acquisition it just gets more complex trying to monitor all of that. I can say this, though, that Bio-logic did perform better than we had expected, and Natus performed exceptionally well also.
Dan Owczarski
- Soleil-Belmont Harbor Capital - Analyst
Okay, because I guess I'm looking at if you did the Natus like your base legacy business was at around the 10 million compared to previous quarters, if that was a little bit lower or where the real strength was. But it sounds like you were happy with everything.
Jim Hawkins
- Natus Medical Incorporated - President, CEO
Yes. I think Dan what as we've mentioned before I believe on calls that sometimes looking at the revenue numbers, the shipment numbers always doesn't tell the true story because we do build backlog. And this quarter we did build backlog. And so we could have built backlog in one of the product lines that on paper now potentially looks like the growth wasn't there but perhaps the backlog grew. If you can follow that.
Dan Owczarski
- Soleil-Belmont Harbor Capital - Analyst
And then as far as Welch Allyn, you announced that partnership I guess during the quarter. It sounds like it is more than just a street distribution agreement. Can you talk anymore about that, about what you guys are doing there and is that kicked in, are they selling product right now?
Jim Hawkins
- Natus Medical Incorporated - President, CEO
Sure, you are right, it is more than a distribution agreement. It is a true partnership where we have looked to put a product together the best fits their needs. It has taken place. Units have been shipped. Their sales force has been trained and they are out selling. So we expect to see results in Q2 from that effort.
Dan Owczarski
- Soleil-Belmont Harbor Capital - Analyst
Okay, and can you give us any general insight into the economics of how that works with Welch Allyn with the disposables and equipment?
Jim Hawkins
- Natus Medical Incorporated - President, CEO
No, that is a part of our partnering agreement that all that data is confidential.
Dan Owczarski
- Soleil-Belmont Harbor Capital - Analyst
And then I guess for Steve for 2007 how does all of this effective tax rate and tax rate changes, how does that change in 2007?
Steve Murphy
- Natus Medical Incorporated - VP Finance, CFO
I think the core business as it stands now we are looking at probably an effective tax rate in the mid 40s. Once again, it is higher than the statutory rate because there are some expenses running through the financial statements that aren't deductible for tax purposes which has the impact of increasing the effective tax rate. So I would say that for planning purposes you could look at somewhere in the mid-40s.
Dan Owczarski
- Soleil-Belmont Harbor Capital - Analyst
Okay. I guess one last question, is there anything else you can tell us about the shelf registration as far as timing or what you would be targeting?
Jim Hawkins
- Natus Medical Incorporated - President, CEO
Dan, we filed the shelf  it was $100 million shelf registration. And we have not communicated the timing of that. It will be I think market conditions really how we are looking as far as lining up acquisition possibilities as we stated in the filing that a lot of the funds would be used for acquisition. So it will be timing driven by those events.
Dan Owczarski
- Soleil-Belmont Harbor Capital - Analyst
Okay. Thank you.
Operator
Patrick Winton, Sterne Agee.
Patrick Winton
- Sterne Agee & Leach - Analyst
Can we talk about what you are seeing now in terms of pricing for the hearing screening market with your dominant market share now with Bio-logic?
Jim Hawkins
- Natus Medical Incorporated - President, CEO
Sure. We do have a market leading position in the hearing screening products, and we have  prices have firmed up for us. We do not report on pricing, but certainly we do expect our average sales price to go up this year and certainly in the following year as well.
Patrick Winton
- Sterne Agee & Leach - Analyst
Okay, great. Can we talk a little bit, maybe a little more specifically about how the integration has gone particularly in the neurology area and also in the sleep disorder? What are we seeing there, what kind of feedback are you hearing? What's going on?
Jim Hawkins
- Natus Medical Incorporated - President, CEO
Sure, I will pass that on to Ken Traverso, our VP of worldwide sales and marketing.
Ken Traverso
- Natus Medical Incorporated - VP Sales and Marketing
Hi, Patrick. The integration is going as Jim said, ahead of schedule. The teams in the first quarter were very, very focused on trying to close Bio-logic business and make sure that as the integration occurred nothing fell through the cracks. And that is basically on the domestic side. Internationally the teams have come together and are selling across the line to the distribution partners. Bio-logic's international business wasn't quite as large as ours, but now as an integrated team they are working very well together.
Patrick Winton
- Sterne Agee & Leach - Analyst
Okay, and then what is left in terms of completing the integration? What else do we have  what is really left there?
Jim Hawkins
- Natus Medical Incorporated - President, CEO
I think on the engineering side we are continuing to do work there as we look at next generation products and things of that nature. But other than that, things are pretty well set.
Patrick Winton
- Sterne Agee & Leach - Analyst
Okay, guys. Keep up the good work.
Operator
Joshua Zable, Natexis.
Joshua Zable
- Natexis Bleichroeder - Analyst
Good morning guys. Just a couple quick housekeeping questions. Can you screen U.S. and out of U.S. again for me, Steve?
Steve Murphy
- Natus Medical Incorporated - VP Finance, CFO
I didn't hear the question, sorry.
Joshua Zable
- Natexis Bleichroeder - Analyst
Can you break out U.S. and out-U.S. revenues, international revenues and U.S. revenues?
Steve Murphy
- Natus Medical Incorporated - VP Finance, CFO
I thought I did. The domestic revenue was $14 million, and international revenue was $5.4 million.
Joshua Zable
- Natexis Bleichroeder - Analyst
And then can you break out within the U.S. the devices and disposable number?
Steve Murphy
- Natus Medical Incorporated - VP Finance, CFO
In the U.S. devices and systems was 35% of total revenue.
Joshua Zable
- Natexis Bleichroeder - Analyst
I can figure out the rest. As far as the Bio-logic acquisition, have you guys realized any sort of cost savings yet, or is that sort of incorporated in this quarter's numbers or will we see that on a go forward basis?
Jim Hawkins
- Natus Medical Incorporated - President, CEO
Yes, Joshuaua, we have certainly benefited from some cost savings and synergies of the combining of the two companies. I would say the vast majority of those are behind us, although we will still be able to reap some benefit in future quarters.
Joshua Zable
- Natexis Bleichroeder - Analyst
Okay. And then given sort of this tax issue so to speak, should we expect any additional spending related to getting this just kind of clarifying this?
Jim Hawkins
- Natus Medical Incorporated - President, CEO
No, I don't think of anything, nothing that will be meaningful at all. (multiple speakers)
Joshua Zable
- Natexis Bleichroeder - Analyst
All right. That's pretty much it.
Steve Murphy
- Natus Medical Incorporated - VP Finance, CFO
Joshua, I just want to correct one thing I just said. The number on my schedule was not correct. The devices and systems revenue on the domestic side was 49% of the total.
Joshua Zable
- Natexis Bleichroeder - Analyst
Okay, great. Thanks very much.
Operator
(OPERATOR INSTRUCTIONS) David Nierenberg, Nierenberg Investment Management
David Nierenberg
- Nierenberg Investment Management - Analyst
Good morning, guys. Congratulations on a very nice operating result in your first quarter as a merged company.
Jim Hawkins
- Natus Medical Incorporated - President, CEO
Thanks, David.
David Nierenberg
- Nierenberg Investment Management - Analyst
I was wondering if you can give us some qualitative feelings about your ability to retain the sales force of the merged company, your ability to retain customers, your ability to penetrate customers, your ability to have the sales force carry both sets of products and a general sense of your assessment of the prospects for your ability to market the Bio-logics products both domestically and in foreign markets.
Jim Hawkins
- Natus Medical Incorporated - President, CEO
Wow, David, that's a lot of questions there.
David Nierenberg
- Nierenberg Investment Management - Analyst
Well I'd rather talk about that than taxes.
Jim Hawkins
- Natus Medical Incorporated - President, CEO
We will try to do the best we can there. Certainly on the sales force side things have come together very well. Virtually all of the teams have come together, and I think if you look at the combined company I think we've had one turnover from the beginning of the year, which is sort of typical in a sales force of that size. You typically turn your sales force people about 20% a year, so it has come together very, very well. Let's see, some of the other questions, as far as being able to penetrate new customers, I think certainly being able to offer a full product line on the hearing screening side has certainly benefited customers. And on the EEG and sleep/neuro side I think that we strongly believe that it has been a big benefit that the amount of face time that Bio-logic products are now getting in front of physicians has probably doubled. Which we think and we've seen already, but we think we will continue to have strong benefits in the future. I am trying to remember what else you asked there David.
David Nierenberg
- Nierenberg Investment Management - Analyst
I wanted to get a sense also for your ability to use your international distribution channels and sales forces to sell the Bio-logic products.
Jim Hawkins
- Natus Medical Incorporated - President, CEO
Sure. That's a good question. We certainly are able to do that. And what else it has done and what we think it will continue to do is it will take confusion away from the market. By having one sales force or one distribution channel coming in and representing a wide variety of products we can sit and logically explain the positive and benefits of each product for which applications and the budgeting of the countries as far as their hearing screening program which is the most appropriate product line. Because of this we think it will expedite the process for countries developing and implementing hearing screening systems.
David Nierenberg
- Nierenberg Investment Management - Analyst
Very good. Last question is this, I don't think anybody said anything in the call yet this morning about neoBLUE and I wonder if you guys can give us an update on how your penetration is doing there and on how the new products like cozy are doing.
Jim Hawkins
- Natus Medical Incorporated - President, CEO
On the neoBLUE front that product line has continued to do very well for us, David. It grew very, very fast for last year. In the first quarter we had revenues of approximately about $1.1 million. As far as the Cozy, we have launched the Cozy. It is on a limited basis. We are very positive on that product line; for people that don't know, that is the under baby phototherapy device rather than having the lights on top it is something the babies can lay on and we think it opens up a couple of different markets for us. One is that the phototherapy can now go home with a mother and baby, which we think is a real benefit of having to bring the baby back to the hospital as jaundice is the number one cause for babies to be readmitted. And then two, when there is phototherapy going on at the hospital it can now be done at the mom's bedside which we think again is just better for all involved. So we think it has a chance of not only changing the market but expanding the market into these new applications.
David Nierenberg
- Nierenberg Investment Management - Analyst
Thank you, Jim.
Operator
(OPERATOR INSTRUCTIONS) Kevin Kotler, with (indiscernible).
Kevin Kotler Analyst
Good morning. Great quarter. I was just curious regarding the hearing and the relationship you have with Welch Allyn, is there  I guess if you think more broader in the hearing space  is there opportunities to pursue  I'm not sure if hearing aids, etc. would be a natural fit, but I know that there is a huge issue related to the retail chain and going direct. It has always been something that has been rumored with J&J, etc. But I just wanted to get your take on that.
Jim Hawkins
- Natus Medical Incorporated - President, CEO
We're not in the hearing aid business. The potential opportunity for us in hearing aids of course is would be to develop products that are for hearing aid fitting which is really a very big potential opportunity actually in that hearing aids, one of the difficult things is getting certainly the right frequencies and fit on a patient by patients basis. And we are actually doing some work in that area to look into a hearing aid fitting diagnostic product line but certainly not in hearing aids at this time. Those are typically dominated by the big companies, and we are not  we don't have any thoughts at this time of entering that market.
Kevin Kotler
Analyst
Thank you.
Operator
Sir, we have no further questions at this time.
Jim Hawkins
- Natus Medical Incorporated - President, CEO
I would like to thank everyone for participating in our first quarter 2006 conference call with the combination of Natus and Bio-logic. We are very pleased with our results and look forward to a very exciting 2006. Thanks again.
Operator
Ladies and gentlemen, we thank you for your participation in today's conference. This concludes your presentation, and you may now disconnect.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BABY/BABY-8K-20060522164447.txt.gz
TIME:20060522164447
EVENTS:	Triggering Events That Accelerate or Increase a Direct Financial Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement
TEXT:
ITEM: Triggering Events That Accelerate or Increase a Direct Financial Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
Item 2.04. Triggering Events That Accelerate or Increase a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement.
The Company is a party to a Credit Agreement dated January 4, 2006 with Wells Fargo Bank under which it borrowed $10 million to complete the acquisition of Bio-logic Systems Corp. in January 2006, and under which $9.375 million in principal amount was outstanding at March 31, 2006. The loan is repayable over a four-year period. On May 16, 2006, the day following the Company's release of its financial statements for the quarter ended March 31, 2006, the Company was notified by Wells Fargo Bank that it was not in compliance with a financial covenant contained in the Credit Agreement that requires the Company to satisfy a ratio of total liabilities to tangible net worth. The Company had interpreted the Credit Agreement such that this covenant did not apply until a later date, but does not now dispute Wells Fargo Bank's interpretation of the covenant.
Wells Fargo has granted the Company a waiver of the provisions of such financial covenant, which will be effective until the next measurement date of June 30, 2006. The Company and Wells Fargo are also discussing an amendment to the Credit Agreement that will revise the covenant, thereby establishing a ratio for which the Company was in compliance on March 31, 2006. The Company believes that it and Wells Fargo will enter into such an amendment prior to the next measurement date. Under the Credit Agreement, Wells Fargo has the right to accelerate the payment of the outstanding indebtedness upon the occurrence of a default of this nature.
The Company does not believe that this default will have an impact on any existing agreements between the Company and other third parties.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BABY/BABY-8K-20060614171313.txt.gz
TIME:20060614171313
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
Item 1.01. Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement.
The Company is a party to a Credit Agreement dated January 4, 2006 with Wells Fargo Bank under which it borrowed $10 million to complete the acquisition of Bio-logic Systems Corp. in January 2006, and under which $9.375 million in principal amount was outstanding at March 31, 2006. The loan is repayable over a four-year period. On May 16, 2006, the day following the Company's release of its financial statements for the quarter ended March 31, 2006, the Company was notified by Wells Fargo Bank that it was not in compliance with a financial covenant contained in the Credit Agreement that requires the Company to satisfy a ratio of total liabilities to tangible net worth. On May 23, 2006, Wells Fargo granted the Company a waiver of the provisions of such financial covenant, which is effective until the next measurement date of June 30, 2006.
On June 14, 2006, the Company and Wells Fargo Bank entered into a Second Amendment to the Credit Agreement that revises the financial covenant, such that the Company would have been compliant with the terms of the covenant at March 31, 2006.
The Company will incur administrative fees assessed by Wells Fargo Bank related to the waiver and amendment, which it believes will total less than $10,000. The Company does not believe it will incur any additional costs associated with the default, waiver, or amendment.
The Amendment is attached hereto as Exhibit 10.01.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 10.01
THIS SECOND AMENDMENT TO CREDIT AGREEMENT (this ) is entered into as of June 14, 2006, by and between NATUS MEDICAL INCORPORATED, a Delaware corporation (), and WELLS FARGO BANK, NATIONAL ASSOCIATION ().
"Amendment"
"Borrower"
"Bank"
WHEREAS, Borrower is currently indebted to Bank pursuant to the terms and conditions of that certain Credit Agreement, dated as of January 4, 2006 (as amended, modified and/or supplemented from time to time, the ), by and between Borrower and Bank.
"Credit Agreement"
WHEREAS, Borrower has requested that Bank permit Borrower to make certain changes in the terms and conditions set forth in the Credit Agreement.
WHEREAS, Bank has agreed to Borrower's request to amend the Credit Agreement upon the terms and conditions of this Amendment.
NOW, THEREFORE, for valuable consideration, the receipt and sufficiency of which are hereby acknowledged, the parties hereto agree that the Credit Agreement shall be amended as follows:
1. . Each capitalized term used but not otherwise defined herein has the meaning assigned to it in the Credit Agreement.
Definitions
2. . The Credit Agreement is hereby amended as follows:
Amendments to Credit Agreement
(a) Article I, , is hereby amended by adding to such Article, in correct alphabetic order, each of the following new definitions:
Definitions
means, as of any date of determination, Total Liabilities as of such date of determination the Bio-Logic DTL as of such date of determination the Natus DTA as of such date of determination.
"Adjusted Total Liabilities"
minus
plus
means, as of any date of determination, Tangible Net Worth as of such date of determination Ten Million Two Hundred Thousand Dollars ($10,200,000.00) the greater of (i) zero and (ii) the difference between the Base Date Bio-logic DTL and the Bio-logic DTL as of such date of determination.
"Adjusted Tangible Net Worth"
plus
minus
means the deferred tax liability arising as a direct result of Borrower's merger with Bio-logic (but solely to the extent any such deferred tax liability arose as a direct result of Borrower's merger with Bio-logic), as reflected in Borrower's balance sheet immediately upon the effectiveness of Borrower's merger with Bio-logic.
"Base Date Bio-logic DTL"
means that portion of the deferred tax asset of Borrower for which the valuation allowance was released as a direct result of Borrower's merger with Bio-logic (but solely to the extent any such deferred tax asset was reinstated (or a corresponding valuation allowance released) by Borrower as a direct result of Borrower's merger with Bio-logic), as reflected in Borrower's balance sheet immediately upon the effectiveness of Borrower's merger with Bio-logic.
"Base Date Natus DTA"
means, as of any date of determination, the deferred tax liability reported in Borrower's balance sheet that relates solely to the Base Date Bio-logic DTL (such amount being the Base Date Bio-logic DTL, as adjusted since the original entry in Borrower's financial statements for the Base Date Bio-logic DTL resulting from Borrower's merger with Bio-logic).
"Bio-logic DTL"
means, as of any date of determination, the deferred tax asset reported in Borrower's balance sheet that relates solely to the Base Date Natus DTA (such amount being the Base Date Natus DTA, as adjusted since the original entry in Borrower's financial statements for the Base Date Natus DTA resulting from Borrower's merger with Bio-logic).
"Natus DTA"
(b) Article I, , is hereby amended by amending and restating in their entirety each of the following definitions in such Article:
Definitions
means, as of any date of determination, the aggregate of Borrower's total stockholders' equity less any intangible assets of Borrower.
"Tangible Net Worth"
means, as of any date of determination, the aggregate of the current liabilities and non-current liabilities of Borrower.
"Total Liabilities"
(c) Article V, , is hereby amended by amending and restating in its entirety Section 5.9(b) as follows:
Affirmative Covenants
(b) Adjusted Total Liabilities divided by Adjusted Tangible Net Worth not greater than, (i) on or before September 30, 2006, 1.50 to 1.00, and (ii) after September 30, 2006, 1.00 to 1.00, in all cases as of each fiscal quarter end of Borrower.
 
(d) Article V, , is hereby amended by inserting, immediately after Section 5.3(e) thereof, new Section 5.3(f) as follows:
Affirmative Covenants
(f) not later than 45 days after and as of the end of each fiscal quarter, a certificate of the chief financial officer of Borrower, substantially in the form of hereto stating (i) whether or not such officer has knowledge of the occurrence of any Event of Default, or any condition, event or act which with the giving of notice or the passage of time or both would constitute an Event of Default, in either case not theretofore reported and remedied and, if so, stating in reasonable detail the facts with respect thereto, and (ii) all relevant facts in reasonable detail to evidence, and the computations as to, whether or not Borrower is compliance with the financial covenants contained in Section 5.9 hereof.
Exhibit B
(e) The Compliance Certificate attached hereto as shall become Exhibit B to the Credit Agreement and all references in the Credit Agreement to "Exhibit B" shall be interpreted as references to Exhibit B hereto.
Exhibit B
3. The obligation of Bank to grant the changes provided under this Amendment is subject to the fulfillment to Bank's satisfaction of all of the following conditions by not later than June 16, 2006:
Conditions Precedent.
(a) . Bank shall have received, in form and substance satisfactory to Bank, each of the following, duly executed:
Documentation
 
 
 
(b) . No default or Event of Default under the Credit Agreement shall have occurred and be continuing (except for any such event that would exist but for the execution and delivery of this Amendment).
No Default
(c) . Payment in full by Borrower, in immediately available funds, of a non-refundable waiver fee of $3,500.00.
Amendment Fee
4. . Borrower shall pay to Bank immediately upon demand the full amount of all payments, advances, charges, costs and expenses, including reasonable attorneys' fees (to include outside counsel fees and all allocated costs of Bank's in-house counsel), expended or incurred by Bank in connection with the negotiation and preparation of this Amendment.
Fees and Expenses
5. . Except as specifically provided herein, all terms and conditions of the Credit Agreement remain in full force and effect, without waiver or modification. This Amendment and the Credit Agreement shall be read together, as one document. The Recitals hereto, including the terms defined therein, are incorporated herein by this reference and acknowledged by Borrower to be true, correct and accurate.
Interpretation
 
6. . Effective as of the date of this Amendment, Borrower hereby: (i) remakes all representations and warranties contained in the Credit Agreement; (ii) reaffirms all covenants set forth in the Credit Agreement; (iii) certifies that the corporate borrowing resolution, secretary's certificate and certificate of incumbency delivered in connection with the Credit Agreement are true and correct; and (iv) confirms that no default or Event of Default under the Credit Agreement has occurred and is continuing (except for any such event that would exist but for the execution and delivery of this Amendment).
Representations, Warranties and Covenants
7. . Borrower will make, execute, endorse, acknowledge, and deliver any agreements, documents, or instruments, and take any and all other actions, as may from time to time be reasonably requested by Bank to perfect and maintain the validity and priority of the liens and security interests granted to Bank pursuant to the Credit Agreement and the other Loan Documents and to effect, confirm, or further assure or protect and preserve the interests, rights, and remedies of Bank under the Credit Agreement and the other Loan Documents.
Further Assurances
8. . This Amendment may be executed in any number of counterparts, each of which when executed and delivered shall be deemed to be an original, and all of which when taken together shall constitute one and the same Amendment. Each of the parties hereto understands and agrees that this Amendment (and any other document required herein) may be delivered by any party hereto and thereto either in the form of an executed original or an executed original sent by facsimile transmission to be followed promptly by delivery of a hard copy original, and that receipt by Bank of a facsimile transmitted document purportedly bearing the signature of a party shall bind such party with the same force and effect as the delivery of a hard copy original. Any failure by Bank to receive the hard copy executed original of such document shall not diminish the binding effect of receipt of the facsimile transmitted executed original of such document of the party whose hard copy page was not received by Bank.
Counterparts
9. . This Amendment shall be construed in accordance with the laws of the state of California, except to the extent Bank has greater rights or remedies under United States federal law, whether as a national bank or otherwise, in which case such choice of California law shall not be deemed to deprive Bank of such rights and remedies as may be available under United States federal law.
Governing Law
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have caused this Second Amendment to Credit Agreement to be executed as of the day and year first written above.
 
 
 
This Compliance Certificate is delivered this day of , 20, by the undersigned, as a senior financial officer of the Borrower to Bank in accordance with of the Credit Agreement.
            
                    
    
Section 5.3(f)
The undersigned hereby certifies that:
1. Attached hereto are the [consolidated annual audited] [consolidating quarterly unaudited] financial statements of the Borrower presented fairly in accordance with GAAP that are required to be delivered pursuant to of the Credit Agreement for the period ending ,  (the "").
Section [5.3(a)] [5.3(b)]
                    
    
End Date
2. As of the date of this Compliance Certificate, no Default or Event of Default had occurred and was continuing.
3. The financial condition covenants and other compliance calculations and information set forth on attached hereto are true, complete and accurate on and as of the date of this Compliance Certificate.
Schedule 1
The foregoing certifications, together with the computations set forth in hereto, are made and delivered, and the financial statements referenced above are made or posted, as applicable, this day of , 200, pursuant to the provisions of the Credit Agreement.
Schedule 1
            
                    
    
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Each of the undersigned guarantors of all indebtedness of NATUS MEDICAL INCORPORATED, a Delaware corporation, to WELLS FARGO BANK, NATIONAL ASSOCIATION hereby: (i) consents to the foregoing Second Amendment to Credit Agreement; (ii) reaffirms its obligations under its respective Continuing Guaranty; (iii) reaffirms its waivers of each and every one of the defenses to such obligations as set forth in its respective Continuing Guaranty; and (iv) reaffirms that its obligations under its respective Continuing Guaranty are separate and distinct from the obligations of any other party under said Second Amendment to Credit Agreement and the other Loan Documents described therein.
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BABY/BABY-8K-20060620151239.txt.gz
TIME:20060620151239
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
Item 1.01. Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement.
2000 Director Stock Option Plan
On June 15, 2006, the Board of Directors of Natus Medical Incorporated (the "Company") approved amendments to the Company's 2000 Director Stock Option Plan (the "Director Plan") to: reduce the number of shares subject to automatic annual option grants under the Director Plan from 10,000 to 7,500, reduce the number of options granted upon election to the Board of Directors from 30,000 to 22,500, and reduce the term of options granted under the Director Plan from 10 years to six years. These amendments take effect upon approval by the Board and do not require stockholder approval.
Following the adoption of the amendments, each of Messrs. Gunst, Ludlum, Michael, Moore and Ms. Engibous, constituting all of the non-employee directors of the Company, received a nonstatutory option to purchase 7,500 shares of the Company's common stock at an exercise price of $11.32 pursuant to the annual formula grant provisions of the Director Plan. The options vest in 12 equal monthly installments beginning on the date of grant and expire on the sixth anniversary of the date of grant.
Amended and Restated 2000 Stock Awards Plan
On June 15, 2006, the Board of Directors of the Company approved an amendment to the Company's standard form of option agreement under the Company's Amended and Restated 2000 Stock Awards Plan (the "Awards Plan") to reduce the term of options granted under the Awards Plan from 10 years to six years. This amendment takes effect upon approval by the Board and does not require stockholder approval.
Following adoption of the amendment, the Board approved nonqualified stock option grants to the Company's executive officers. The options vest in 48 equal monthly installments beginning on the date of grant and have an exercise price of $11.32 per share. The options will expire on the sixth anniversary of the date of grant. Each of Dr. Chung and Messrs. Mince, Murphy and Traverso were granted options to purchase 30,000 shares and Mr. Hawkins was granted an option to purchase 80,000 shares.
The Board of Directors also approved restricted stock awards to the non-employee directors and executive officers of the Company. Each of Messrs. Gunst, Ludlum, Michael, Moore and Ms. Engibous received an award of 1,250 shares of restricted stock that will vest in full on the first anniversary of the date of grant. The executive officers were awarded restricted stock that will vest as to 50% of the shares awarded on August 1, 2008 and 25% of the shares awarded on each of August 1, 2009 and August 1, 2010. Dr. Chung and Messrs. Mince, Murphy and Traverso each received 5,000 restricted shares and Mr. Hawkins received 14,000 restricted shares.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BABY/BABY-8K-20060807172153.txt.gz
TIME:20060807172153
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
 
 
 
On August 2, 2006, Natus Medical Incorporated (the "Company") issued a press release and held a conference call regarding its financial results for the second quarter of fiscal 2006 ended June 30, 2006 and other financial information. A copy of the press release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K and a copy of the conference call transcript is furnished as Exhibit 99.2 to this Current Report on Form 8-K. The press release and conference call transcript contain forward-looking statements regarding the Company and include cautionary statements identifying important factors that could cause actual results to differ materially from those anticipated.
The information in Item 2.02 of this Current Report on Form 8-K, and Exhibits 99.1 and 99.2 attached hereto, shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act") or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that Section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
ITEM 9.01. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS, PRO FORMA FINANCIAL INFORMATION AND EXHIBITS.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
(Nasdaq:BABY) today reported financial results for the three and six months ended June 30, 2006.
SAN CARLOS, Calif. (August 2, 2006)  Natus Medical Incorporated
Natus reported record revenue of $20.0 million for the quarter ended June 30, 2006, compared to $10.2 million reported in the same period in 2005. The increase was primarily attributable to the acquisition of Bio-logic Systems Corp. Revenue from the Company's core business, excluding Bio-logic, increased 12% over the previous year. Gross margin improved to 63.9% for the three months ended June 30, 2006, compared with 61.5% for the second quarter of 2005.
Non-GAAP income before tax increased 100% to $2.9 million for the quarter ended June 30, 2006, from $1.4 million reported in the same period in 2005. For the six months ended June 30, 2006, non-GAAP income before tax increased 116% to $5.4 million, compared to $2.5 million reported in 2005.
The non-GAAP results for 2006 exclude from reported income (loss) before tax the effect of employee equity-based compensation expense, an in-process research and development charge associated with the acquisition of Bio-logic, and other acquisition related costs. For the three and six months ended June 30, 2006 respectively, on a GAAP basis, the Company reported income before tax of $2.5 million and a loss before tax of $1.2 million.
The Company reported net income of $1.4 million or $0.07 per diluted share in the second quarter of 2006, compared to net income of $1.3 million or $0.07 per diluted share in the same period in 2005. For the 2006 period, the Company's effective tax rate for book purposes was 45% compared to 12% in the 2005 period.
For the six months ended June 30, 2006, the Company reported a net loss of $3.3 million or ($0.18) per diluted share. Results for the six months include a $5.9 million charge for in-process research and development associated with the acquisition of Bio-logic. And as noted, the Company's effective tax rate for book purposes was 45% in the 2006 period compared to 13% in 2005.
During the quarter the Company completed a formal study of its net operating loss carryforwards and determined that it will benefit from $19.6 million of tax loss carryforwards available as of December 31, 2005. The Company expects that it will pay taxes at a rate of less than 15% for 2006 and 2007.
"I am extremely pleased to report our second quarter results as we exceeded our guidance in both revenue and earnings, and all of our business units had excellent results," stated Jim Hawkins, President and Chief Executive Officer of Natus. "Our results on a before tax basis clearly illustrate the magnitude of what we have accomplished so far this year, as pretax income more than doubled over last year."
"The integration of Bio-logic is now complete," added Hawkins. "It went very smoothly and ahead of our internal schedule. I am also pleased that Bio-logic's operating results were accretive to our earnings in both our first and second quarters."
Financial Guidance
Natus increased its financial guidance for 2006. For the full year, the Company expects to report non-GAAP earnings per diluted share of $0.31 to $0.34 on revenue of $81.5 to $83.0 million. The Company had previously said that it expected to report non-GAAP earnings per share of $0.30 to $0.33 on revenue of $80.5 to $82.0 million.
For the third quarter of 2006, the Company expects to report earnings per diluted share of $0.08 to $0.09 on revenue of $20.8 to $21.0 million. The Company had previously said that it expected to report the same earnings on revenue of $20.3 to $20.5 million.
For the fourth quarter of 2006, the Company expects to report income per diluted share of $0.11 to $0.12 on revenue of $21.4 to $22.7 million.
The Company's 2006 annual guidance excludes the impact of a $5.9 million in-process research and development charge associated with the acquisition of Bio-logic that was recorded in the first quarter of 2006. That charge is expected to reduce earning per share for the full year by approximately $0.29 per diluted share.
The Company's guidance includes the impact of expensing employee equity-based compensation.
Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures
In addition to disclosing financial results calculated in accordance with GAAP, this release contains a non-GAAP financial measure that excludes the effects of employee equity-based compensation expense as a result of the Company's adoption of SFAS 123R on January 1, 2006 and costs associated with the January 5, 2006 acquisition of Bio-logic Systems Corp. The Company believes that the presentation of results excluding equity-based compensation expense and the acquisition-related charges provides meaningful supplemental information to both management and investors that is indicative of the Company's core operating results. The Company is using the modified prospective method in its adoption of SFAS 123R and as such, will not restate prior year results for the impact of employee stock option expensing. The Company also believes the in-process research and development charge is not indicative of resources devoted to ongoing research and development efforts. Therefore, the Company believes the non-GAAP financial measure facilitates comparison of operating results across reporting periods. A reconciliation between the Company's results of operations on a GAAP and non-GAAP basis for the periods reported is included as part of the condensed consolidated statements of operations at the end of the Company's financial results release.
The Company believes that both management and investors benefit from referring to this non-GAAP financial measure in assessing the Company's performance and when planning, forecasting, and analyzing future periods. The non-GAAP financial measure also facilitates management's internal comparisons to the Company's historical performance. The non-GAAP financial measure disclosed by the Company should not be considered a substitute for or superior to financial measures calculated in accordance with GAAP, and the financial results calculated in accordance with GAAP and reconciliations to those financial statements should be carefully evaluated.
Conference Call
Natus has scheduled an investor conference call to discuss this announcement beginning at 11:00 a.m. Eastern Time today (8:00 a.m. Pacific Time). Individuals interested in listening to the conference call
may do so by dialing (866) 770-7146 for domestic callers, or (617) 213-8068 for international callers, and entering reservation code 40885354. A telephone replay will be available for 48 hours following the conclusion of the call by dialing (888) 286-8010 for domestic callers, or (617) 801-6888 for international callers, and entering reservation code 59419955.
The conference call also will be available real-time via the Internet at http://investor.natus.com, and a recording of the call will be available on the Company's Web site for 90 days following the completion of the call.
About Natus Medical Incorporated
Natus is a leading provider of healthcare products used for screening, detection, treatment, monitoring and tracking of common medical ailments such as hearing impairment, neurological dysfunction, epilepsy, sleep disorders, newborn jaundice and newborn metabolic testing.
Additional information about Natus Medical can be found at www.natus.com.
This press release contains forward-looking statements as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, particularly statements regarding the expectations, beliefs, plans, intentions and strategies of Natus. These forward-looking statements include, but are not limited to, statements regarding anticipated revenue and profitability for the full-year 2006 as well as for the third and fourth quarters of 2006, tax rates through 2007, and our ability to benefit from our tax loss carryforwards. These statements relate to future events or Natus' future financial performance or results, and involve known and unknown risks, uncertainties and other factors that may cause actual results, levels of activity, performance, or achievements to differ materially from those expressed or implied by the forward-looking statements. Forward-looking statements are only predictions and the actual events or results may differ materially. Natus cannot provide any assurance that its future results or the results implied by the forward-looking statements will meet expectations. Our future results could differ materially due to a number of factors, including the effects of competition, the demand for our products and services, our ability to expand our sales in international markets, our ability to maintain current sales levels in a mature domestic market, our ability to control costs, and risks associated with bringing new products to market and integrating acquired businesses. Natus disclaims any obligation to update information contained in any forward-looking statement.
More information about potential risk factors that could affect the business and financial results of Natus is included in Natus' annual report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2005, and its quarterly reports on Form 10-Q, and in other reports filed from time to time by Natus with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission.
COMPANY CONTACT:
Natus Medical Incorporated
Steven J. Murphy
Chief Financial Officer
(650) 802-0400
InvestorRelations@Natus.com
 
 
 
Non-GAAP Adjustments
(a) A charge for acquired in-process research and development expense related to the acquisition of Bio-logic Systems Corp. on January 5, 2006. Management believes that excluding this charge facilitates comparisons of Natus' core operating results across multiple reporting periods.
(b) Other costs associated with the acquisition of Bio-logic that are not properly capitalized as part of the acquisition cost that were expensed during the three months ended June 30, 2006.
(c) Non-cash equity-based compensation expense related to the Company's adoption of SFAS No. 123R on January 1, 2006. Management believes that it is useful to investors to understand the impact of expenses associated with the adoption of SFAS 123R on reported results of operations. Net income for the three and six months ended June 30, 2005 did not include equity-based compensation expense under SFAS 123.

Exhibit 99.2
Brienne Fisher  Natus Medical - Director of Legal Services
Good morning. This is Brienne Fisher, the Director of Legal Services with Natus Medical, and I'd like to thank you all for participating in this morning's call. Earlier today Natus Medical released financial results for the second quarter of 2006. If you have not received the news release or if you would like to be added to the Company's distribution list, please call Natus Medical in San Carlos, California, at 650-802-0400, or email your request to Investor Relations at natus.com. This call is being broadcast live over the Internet at www.natus.com and a replay of the call will be available on our website for the next 90 days.
In terms of the structure for today's call, Jim Hawkins, President and Chief Executive Officer of Natus, will present opening comments and then Steve Murphy, our Chief Financial Officer, will summarize our financial results. After that, Jim Hawkins will conclude his prepared remarks with comments about our strategy and our financial guidance for 2006. Ken Traverso, Natus' Vice President of Sales and Marketing, is also here and will join us in answering any questions.
I would like to remind you that some of the information to be furnished in today's session will constitute forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Forward-looking statements are those focused on future performance, results, plans and events and include our expected results for 2006. We remind you that are future results may differ materially from these forward-looking statements due to a number of risk factors. For a description of the relevant risks and uncertainties that may affect our business, please our periodic reports on Form 10-K and Form 10-Q filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission. Without that, I'd like to turn the call over the Jim Hawkins, President and Chief Executive Officer of Natus Medical.
Jim Hawkins - Natus Medical - President & CEO
Thank you, Brienne. While I am exceptionally pleased to report that during the second quarter we exceeded our guidance in revenue, income before taxes, and earnings per share. It was truly a great quarter. We achieved our financial goal of sustained profitability while increasing revenue and controlling costs.
Among our financial highlights the quarter are the following. We reported second quarter revenue of $20 million compared to the $10.2 million for the second quarter in 2005. Our guidance for the second quarter of 2006 was $19.3 to $19.5 million. Gross margin improved to 63.9% for the three months ended June 30 compared with 61.5% for the second quarter of 2005. We reported net income of $1.4 million, or $0.07 per diluted share in the second quarter. This exceeded our guidance of $0.05 to $0.06.
The integration of Bio-logic is now complete. It went very smoothly and ahead of our internal schedule. We are also pleased that Bio-logic's operating results were accretive to our earnings in both the first and second quarters. I am also proud of everyone in the Natus and Bio-logic organizations for their willingness to implement new ideas and processes and for the combined sales organizations to work together to grow the business.
I am also very pleased with our internal revenue growth in the second quarter (technical difficulty) if you compare the second quarter 2006 with the pro forma Natus and Bio-logic would have reported, if we were combined in the second quarter of 2005, which would have been $17.1 million, our 2006 second quarter revenue of $20 million represents a 17% increase. We are very happy with that kind of internal growth, especially when you think of the integration processes that had to take place in the second quarter.
As we look ahead, we are confident that we will maintain our position as a worldwide leader in newborn hearing screening, along with maintaining our strong position in diagnostic hearing and phototherapy. In this last quarter, we believe we gained market share in our new EEG business that was part of the Bio-logic acquisition. Our objective is to continue to gain market share in future periods in the EEG marketplace.
The launches of two new products were also very well-received in the quarter. The neoBLUE cozy introduction was successful, with shipments ramping through our the quarter. Also the pediatric hearing screening product that we manufactured for Walsh Allen has been very well-received in the marketplace. We are anticipating a solid growth opportunity in this developing market that is potentially as large as the hospital-based newborn hearing screening market.
We also look to continue to acquire companies or products that we expect to be accretive and will allow us to leverage our strong and established sales channels. With that overview, I would like to turn the call over to Steve Murphy. Steve?
Steve Murphy - Natus Medical - CFO
Thank you, Jim. I will be discussing our 2006 second quarter financial results on a basis consistent with generally accepted accounting principles in the United States, or GAAP, and certain adjustments we have made to our GAAP results that we believe aid in assessing the performance of our core business.
I will also discuss the results of a formal study of our tax loss carryforwards. All per share amounts that I will present are on a diluted basis. ON GAAP-basis we reported net income of $1.4 million, or $0.07 per share for the second quarter of 2006, compared with net income of $1.3 million, or $0.07 per share for the comparable period in 2005.
For the six months ended June 30, 2006 we reported a net loss of $3.3 million, or a loss of $0.18 per share, compared to a net income of $2.2 million, or $0.12 per share reported in the same period in 2005. Included in the 2006 year-to-date results in a $5.9 million charge for acquired in-process research and development associated with our acquisition of Bio-Logic Systems Corp. in January 2006. This charge was based on the value of R&D projects underway at Bio-logics at the time of the acquisition and was recorded as an expense concurrent with the acquisition.
As Jim mentioned, we reported record second quarter revenue of $20 million this year, an increase of $9.8 million, or 96% from revenue of $10.2 million for the second quarter of 2005. Bio-Logic contributed to $8.6 million of the increase, with the core Natus business lines contributing to $1.2 million of the increase. On a worldwide basis, revenue of our core business lines, excluding Bio-Logic, increased 12% in the second quarter of 2005 to $11.4 million, compared to the same period in 2005.
Revenue from devices and systems contributed to 55% of total revenue in the second quarter 2006, compared with 42% reported for the second quarter of 2005. The increase was primarily attributable to the edition of Bio-Logic's neurology and sleep diagnostic products. Revenue from U.S. operations was $14.7 million for the second quarter of 2006, compared with $6.4 million reported for the second quarter of 2005.
Revenue from international operations increased 41% to $5.3 million for the second quarter 2006, compared with first quarter 2005 revenue of $3.8 million. Our gross margin improved to 63.9% for the second quarter of 2006, compared to 61.5% for the same period last year. The increase in the gross margin for the 2006 period was primarily attributable to the results of Bio-Logic and product mix as well as a reduction in manufacturing overhead as a percentage of revenue. We also saw a marginal increase in the average selling price of the disposable supply product used with our ALGO newborn hearing screening product line.
Total operating expenses increased by $5.1 million to $10.2 million in the 2006 second quarter, compared to $5.1 million in the prior year. Approximately $4 million of the increase was attributable to Bio-Logic, with a remainder coming primarily from equity-basee compensation expense related to our adoption of FAS 123 (R), additional direct costs related to the Bio-Logic acquisition, sales related costs and outside professional fees.
We have adjusted our GAAP results for the three and six months ended June 30, 2006 for the effect of employee equity-basee compensation expense and costs associated with the acquisition of Bio-logic. Our press release issued this morning contains a reconciliation of our GAAP results to the non-GAAP results I will discuss. The press release also contains an explanation of why we believe these adjustments to our GAAP results provides the Company and investors a clearer representation of our actual performance.
Our results for the three and six months ended June 30, 2006 are based on an effective tax rate for book purposes of approximately 45%, while in 2005 our effective tax rate was 12% and 13% for the three and six months periods, respectively. Because of the disparity of our effective tax rates in 2006 and 2005, we believe it is more appropriate to compare our results on a before tax basis.
Our non-GAAP income before tax increased 100% to $2.9 million for the quarter ended June 30, 2006 from $1.4 million reported in the same period in 2005. For the six months ended June 30, 2006 our non-GAAP income before tax increased 116% to $5.4 million, compared to $2.5 million reported in 2005. The non-GAAP adjustments increased income before tax by approximately $350,000 for the three months ended June 30, 2006 and $6.3 million year-to-date in 2006.
Another disparity that is not evident in our GAAP results is the difference between our effective tax rate for book purposes and the actual rate that our payments to taxing authorities will be based on. That disparity relates to our tax loss and credit carryforwards. During the first quarter 2006 working with our tax advisers, we did a very high-level analysis of our tax loss carryforwards and determined that they might be limited by as much as $13 million. Based on that preliminary analysis, we recorded a deferred tax asset of $4.9 million in conjunction with the purchase accounting for the Bio-Logic acquisition.
During the second quarter 2006, we engaged another independent consulting firm to assist us in a formal study of our tax loss carryforwards. That study is now complete, and we have determined that our federal tax loss carryforwards will be limited by only $750,000. As a result of this determination, in the second quarter 2006, we recorded an additional $5.1 million of deferred tax assets.
In summary, during the second quarter we determined that we will benefit from approximately $19.6 million of federal tax loss carryforwards. The tax effective benefit of those tax loss carryforwards and other tax credit carryforwards is approximately $10 million. We expect to realize the benefit of this tax asset over the next two or more years where the amount of tax we actually pay to taxing authorities will be less than 15% of our pre-tax book income. The 15% rate takes into account taxes we pay on foreign jurisdictions, have statutory rates, and the U.S. federal AMT rate which is approximately 2.5%.
The differential between our effective tax rate for book purposes and the 15% rate we expect our tax payments will be based on will have a material beneficial impact on our generation of free cash flow from operations over the next two years. We acquired Bio-Logic Systems Corp. in January 2006 for cash of $68.8 million, using our existing cash and $12.8 million of Bio-Logic's cash to complete the acquisition. We also borrowed $10 million from Wells Fargo Bank in a senior secured credit facility. Principal on the note is payable in 48 equal monthly installments; however there is no prepayment penalty.
During the second quarter 2006, we accelerated $1 million of principal payment on the note, leaving the balance of the note on June 30, 2006 at approximately $7.8 million. We had approximately $9.5 million of cash at June 30, 2006. With that, I will turn the call back to Jim.
Jim Hawkins - Natus Medical - President & CEO
Thanks, Steve. Before opening up the call to your questions, I would like to make a few comments and review our guidance for the third and fourth quarter of 2006. I remain very excited about our growth prospects that are reflected in our updated guidance. The full year 2006 we expect to report revenue of $81.5 million to $83 million. This is $1 million increase from our previous guidance, which was $80.5 million to $82 million.
In addition, we increased our earnings per share guidance for the full- year to 2006. We now expect to report non-GAAP earnings per share of $0.31 to $0.34. This is an increase from our previous guidance, which was $0.30 to $0.33. We have also raised our third quarter 2006 revenue guidance to $20.8 million to $21 million, up from our previous guidance of $20.3 million to $20.5 million. For the third quarter we expect to report diluted earnings per share of $0.08 to $0.09. For the fourth quarter of 2006 the Company expects to report income per diluted share of $0.11 to $0.12.
Our annual guidance for 2006 is on a non-GAAP basis because it excludes the $5.9 million charge associated with the acquisition of Bio-Logic and, although we expect to pay taxes at a rate of less than 15%, our financial guidance is based on our effective tax rate for book purposes of 45%.
In conclusion, Natus had a great second quarter of 2006. Both revenue and earnings came in at much higher than expected levels. Our business has never been better. The integration of Bio-Logic has gone exceptionally well and we remain convinced that our growth strategy which incorporates continued internal growth and when the opportunity arises, additional strategic acquisitions that we expect to be accretive will allow Natus to continue rapid growth with increasing levels of profitability. With that said, Steve, Ken and I will be happy to take your questions. Operator?
QUESTION AND ANSWER
Operator
(OPERATOR INSTRUCTIONS). Dan Owczarski.
Dan Owczarski - Soleil-Belmont Harbor Capital - Analyst
Good morning. A question, Jim, you mentioned that you didn't share in EEG. Is there anything you can share as far as metrics to let us know what exactly that means, or how we can track your progress there?
Jim Hawkins - Natus Medical - President & CEO
Well, in the Bio-Logic business overall, it grew about 20% year-over-year, and we certainly  the EEG business certainly did not grow anywhere near that rate. So with that assumption, we gain market share.
Dan Owczarski - Soleil-Belmont Harbor Capital - Analyst
Okay. I mean do you have an idea  are you single-digits, market share double-digits market share in that area?
Jim Hawkins - Natus Medical - President & CEO
Oh, I see. Where we stand. Overall, we think we are  it is broken up into different segments, of course, asleep and neurology group, but overall, we are somewhere probably in the 12% to 13% market share.
Dan Owczarski - Soleil-Belmont Harbor Capital - Analyst
And that does include sleep?
Jim Hawkins - Natus Medical - President & CEO
Yes.
Dan Owczarski - Soleil-Belmont Harbor Capital - Analyst
And then did you see contribution from Welch-Allyn in this quarter itself?
Jim Hawkins - Natus Medical - President & CEO
Yes, we did. We started shipping product, I believe, in April and you know that overall business has gone very well. The feedback we have received from Welch-Allyn has been very positive and, as we go forward, in fact, we are already seeing some increases in forecast based upon the early introduction of that product line.
Dan Owczarski - Soleil-Belmont Harbor Capital - Analyst
That was my next question. Is that based on this? Do you still have the same expectations for this year for that product? So it might creep up a little bit, your expectations, your forecast there?
Jim Hawkins - Natus Medical - President & CEO
Yes, I think so.
Dan Owczarski - Soleil-Belmont Harbor Capital - Analyst
Now, did they have a minimum, if they committed a minimum amount to purchase from you or a minimum amount of resources to dedicate to that area?
Jim Hawkins - Natus Medical - President & CEO
You know, the dynamics of that agreement are confidential.
Dan Owczarski - Soleil-Belmont Harbor Capital - Analyst
And then on the last conference call, I thought you referred to a backlog in some areas of kind of your legacy business, and that sometimes the backlog can kind of hide the true demand or couldn't give you the perfect picture. I mean was there any filling of backlog during the quarter, or did that level kind of stay the same or did that move around at all?
Jim Hawkins - Natus Medical - President & CEO
Yes, let's see. As we have stated, we really don't give specifics to our backlog, but I think it was commented that we did add to backlog last quarter, and in our second quarter we also added to backlog.
Dan Owczarski - Soleil-Belmont Harbor Capital - Analyst
Just that trend helps. And then as far as international market, newborn hearing. I know maybe it was a couple of quarters ago when you were presenting that you had felt that that market was about 25% penetrated international developed market. Is that  are you seeing any trends, positive or negative, one way or the other? Is that 25% penetrated still good number, or is that creeping up?
Jim Hawkins - Natus Medical - President & CEO
I think that is a good number. I think if we had to guess you know what the future might bring there, in our modeling we believe that if we look five years out, the market should be 70%, 80% penetrated at that point and so we see a little bit of a straight line getting there in our modeling, where if we are at 25% now, I guess you could say that over the next five years it might go up 7% to 10% a year, if that make sense.
Operator
Matt Dolan with Roth Capital.
Matt Dolan - Roth Capital - Analyst
Showed some nice growth there organically for the Natus business and Bio-Logic if I look at which they did in Q2 seemed to be very stronger on 23% over its pre-acquisition days. Is there anything  any specific product segments there that account for that, or could you help us characterize the growth across those businesses?
Jim Hawkins - Natus Medical - President & CEO
The overall, you know, was strong across all fronts, Matt, but the EEG business was certainly the strongest, and as I think we had alluded, we expected to certainly get some benefits and then we are really seeing it by combining the two sales forces together. We are getting a lot of productivity there.
Matt Dolan - Roth Capital - Analyst
Okay. And then I guess following up on the backlog question, we spoke of that somewhat expanding I think on the Q1 call. Can you give us a guide relative to Q1 where the backlog stands at the end of the second quarter?
Jim Hawkins - Natus Medical - President & CEO
We don't report an exact backlog number but our backlog actually grew more in Q2 than it did in Q1.
Matt Dolan - Roth Capital - Analyst
That helps. Thanks. And then just a couple of P&L accounting questions. G&A seemed to grow sequentially up; it looks like about $600,000. Is there anything there in Q2 that's kind of a one-time event that we didn't see in Q1, or is this a good starting point in terms of modeling going forward?
Jim Hawkins - Natus Medical - President & CEO
Steve, do you want to go ahead and answer that one?
Steve Murphy - Natus Medical - CFO
Sure. You know there were some unusual one-time charges included in there. In the non-GAAP schedule in the press release there is about $170,000 of costs associated with the acquisition. Then we had some professional fees in the second quarter to do this tax study, and I would say just probably a higher level of professional fees in the quarter than we would expect going forward.
Matt Dolan - Roth Capital - Analyst
So we might see it drop off Q3 to Q4?
Steve Murphy - Natus Medical - CFO
Yes, I would say.
Matt Dolan - Roth Capital - Analyst
And one more, and then I will drop off. You know on the FAS 123R expenses, it looks like they were down from Q1 as well, and a little bit below what I was expecting. Can you give us any help in terms of what you are looking for maybe on an annual basis for the year?
Steve Murphy - Natus Medical - CFO
I think the year-to-date run rate is probably pretty good for the year. We had been saying that it was going to be somewhere around 1.6 million. I think that was based on expectations for grants this year which are a little lower than we expected, and so I think we're probably at a run rate of maybe $1.4 million for the year.
Matt Dolan - Roth Capital - Analyst
Thanks, guys. Nice quarter.
Operator
Joshua Zable with Natexis.
Joshua Zable - Natexis - Analyst
Good morning, guys, great job. A couple of quick questions; a lot of my questions have been answered. First of all, could you just address the share count? I noticed that went up. Anything going on there or how we should kind of look going forward?
Steve Murphy - Natus Medical - CFO
Well, we have our ESPP which kicked in in the second quarter and it is the  the diluted share count is affected by our stock price. As the stock goes down, the treasury stock method allows you to buy back more shares. There's some unknowns in there, and so it is a little difficult to project where we're going to be at the end of the year.
Joshua Zable - Natexis - Analyst
Fair enough. And then just so I have my numbers right. It seems the first quarter there is a lot of focus on integrating Bio-Logic and getting to their customers and it seems like this quarter, which would make sense, more of the growth was driven by sort of the old Natus products, as probably some of the customers you weren't paying attention to as much, for lack of a better word, probably got those sales coming through. On a go-forward basis, how should we think about kind of the sales as far as what's coming from Bio-Logic and what is coming from old Natus for the rest of the year? And how will that balance out?
Jim Hawkins - Natus Medical - President & CEO
This is Jim Hawkins. You know we have said that we wanted  our objectives were to have core Natus growing at 10% to 15% a year. The core Natus came in at 12 %. So that is right in the middle of the range. Where we  and with Bio-Logic, our objective is really the same, 10% to 15% with them and overall corporate. So when we look at the sort of the outstanding results in the quarter, it was really Bio-Logic driven.
Joshua Zable - Natexis - Analyst
Now, Bio-Logic, I am just trying  I have my growth of Bio-Logic, my number is about 4% so maybe I have some math wrong, but I just wanted to make sure. Can you maybe give me a breakout of those two, because I have 11.4 from old Natus and 8.6 million from Bio-Logic.
Steve Murphy - Natus Medical - CFO
Yes. So you are combining them. That gets you to the 20 million?
Joshua Zable - Natexis - Analyst
Right. And the 8.6 is off of the 
Steve Murphy - Natus Medical - CFO
I think about 6.9 a year ago, for Bio-Logic.
Joshua Zable - Natexis - Analyst
Perfect. Great job, guys. Thanks very much.
Operator
Jayson Bedford with Raymond James.
Jayson Bedford - Raymond James - Analyst
Just a few quick questions. One, on the backlog is fair to look at  you're just  the trending deferred revenue as a proxy for your backlog? It looked like deferred revenue jumped up slightly in the quarter.
Jim Hawkins - Natus Medical - President & CEO
Steve, do you want to answer that?
Steve Murphy - Natus Medical - CFO
Yes, that's probably not a good measure for the backlog. Most of the deferred revenue are service contracts on our devices, some of which of multi-year service contracts. And so you can't really look at that on a quarter-by-quarter basis and relate it back to our sales.
Jayson Bedford - Raymond James - Analyst
That's fair. Can you just comment  you alluded slightly to ASP's particularly in the U.S. Is there any way you could quantify the year-over-year increase in the pricing?
Steve Murphy - Natus Medical - CFO
This is Steve. You know, I said it was marginal. It was less than 5%, but it's a very positive sign because it is the first time in probably 10 quarters that we have seen an increase in the ASP of our supply product.
Jayson Bedford - Raymond James - Analyst
Then just sticking with a P&L here, R&D costs looked like they were a little over 12% of revenue which is still historically a little higher than you have historically. I am wondering is that going to come down going forward?
Jim Hawkins - Natus Medical - President & CEO
You know we have a lot of projects going, and Bio-Logic does as well. I think we have communicated that where we'd like to be able to get to is a 10% R&D costs and really we think long-term, once we get our products on track and moving ahead on a regular schedule, we think R&D can get down to even an 8% or 9% rate.
Jayson Bedford - Raymond James - Analyst
And then, Jim, could you care to allude to maybe some of the new products that you have in the queue over the next six months to a year?
Jim Hawkins - Natus Medical - President & CEO
Not really. We don't talk a lot about new products, Jayson, until they are introduced.
Jayson Bedford - Raymond James - Analyst
That's fair. And then in terms of an acquisition, can you just remind us of your criteria in terms of maybe kind of the valuation metrics, as well as the expected accretion from an acquisition?
Jim Hawkins - Natus Medical - President & CEO
Certainly on the valuation method  metrics, we can talk about that. We have communicated that we believe there is opportunity to buy good solid businesses out there between 1.25 and 1.5 times revenues. This is the range that we have made two acquisitions so far, both Fischer-Zoth and Bio-Logic. And we do see things out there that certainly fall into this range.
As far as trying to quantify the accretiveness of the acquisitions, we have never really gone there except to make the statement that it is certainly our objective to haven them be accretive immediately after a onetime charge for, you know, integration and cost of the acquisitions.
Jayson Bedford - Raymond James - Analyst
That's fair. And then I guess lastly you did roughly 17% growth year-on- year. Looking at your guidance going forward, it kind of implies a deceleration in growth. Just wondering is that a function of something particularly good happening this quarter, or is that just being conservative for the back half of this year?
Jim Hawkins - Natus Medical - President & CEO
I think the 17% is above our internal goals. It's 10% to 15%, so we think that was an exceptional quarter. We also had an exceptional quarter in Q4, where I think we were certainly 17% to 20%  actually 20%, if I remember correctly, internal growth. So it does happen, but when we set our own parameters and give guidance, you know we try to give guidance to numbers that we feel confident with.
Jayson Bedford - Raymond James - Analyst
Great. That's helpful. Nice quarter.
Operator
(OPERATOR INSTRUCTIONS). Brian Kowalchyk with Westpark Capital.
Brian Kowalchyk - Westpark Capital - Analyst
As most my questions have been asked and answered, but I want to clarify one point, Jim. I think that you mentioned the effective tax rate that you are implying in your guidance remains at that higher 45% level.
Jim Hawkins - Natus Medical - President & CEO
That's correct.
Brian Kowalchyk - Westpark Capital - Analyst
So that's consistent with a Q1 guidance in terms of the effective tax rate.
Jim Hawkins - Natus Medical - President & CEO
That's correct.
Brian Kowalchyk - Westpark Capital - Analyst
Very good. Also the Bio-Logic growth rate this quarter, if my number is right and we talked about a 20% plus growth rate for the quarter. What has that been for the kind of six-month period?
Jim Hawkins - Natus Medical - President & CEO
I'm not sure of that off the top of my head, Brian.
Brian Kowalchyk - Westpark Capital - Analyst
Based upon numbers you talked about last quarter  again if my numbers are right  it was another high double-digit number, somewhere in the area of 18% to 20%. With a 20% plus growth this quarter, is there any reason to think that those type of trends aren't sustainable or maybe help me understand what is going on there?
Jim Hawkins - Natus Medical - President & CEO
Well, the markets for these products are probably growing somewhere in the 5% to 10% range if we blend the neurology and and the sleep business. We are hoping to continue to gain market share and I guess we will just leave it at that.
Brian Kowalchyk - Westpark Capital - Analyst
Okay. And you talked to some extent about your ability to increase your ASPs during the quarter. Was that something that was done somewhat mid quarter? Did you get the full benefit of it this quarter? Help me understand what the outlook for that might be going forward.
Jim Hawkins - Natus Medical - President & CEO
The average ASPs that we are talking about are primarily in our hearing screening product line and, starting  in the first quarter we started to have price adjustment increases in that range, the product line range. They took effect some in the first quarter and certainly more in the second quarter, and we expect more to take place actually as they go through over the next really one to two years.
Brian Kowalchyk - Westpark Capital - Analyst
Excellent. Nice job, guys. Look forward to talking to you next quarter.
Operator
Joshua Zable with Natexis.
Joshua Zable - Natexis - Analyst
Just one quick question. Thanks for taking it again. I hate to beat this tax issue because it is getting ridiculous here, but just as far as that higher tax rate on your guidance, obviously, and I know there is accounting issues that are going on, so to speak, so it's not really representative of what you guys are earning. But just as a matter of sort of printing the numbers, 45% is a high number any way you cut it. Is that sort of  so you can kind of get through this, and we can get the kind of real earnings, without this discrepancy going on, or are there still some things you can do to even get that 45% reported rate down on a go-forward basis?
Jim Hawkins - Natus Medical - President & CEO
You know the 45% is the  I guess the term might be statutory tax rate that where Natus is at at this time, having not done or really needed to do, since we are not paying taxes, to have ever really focused on what that rate would be. Since we are having to show that rate now, we do plan on doing some tax strategies where for next year we are hoping that that tax rate on a reported book purposes can be reduced.
Joshua Zable - Natexis - Analyst
Along those lines, is it safe to assume then you guys are going to be bringing in some outside professionals to assist you with that, which we should incorporate that in our G&A spend, things like that?
Jim Hawkins - Natus Medical - President & CEO
Yes, certainly, we are spending some time and energy and money on that. As far as trying to quantify that, it is not a material amount.
Joshua Zable - Natexis - Analyst
Thanks very much and again sorry for beating that tax issue. I know it gets ridiculous, but a great job again.
Operator
Sean McMahon, Kennedy Capital.
Sean McMahon - Kennedy Capital - Analyst
I just had one question on the increase in inventory, you know, sales I think were up 3% sequentially but inventory was up 12%. Can you talk to me about that it all?
Jim Hawkins - Natus Medical - President & CEO
Sure. What happened there, Sean, a little bit is when we acquired Bio-Logic, they had actually let their inventories run down quite a bit and to the point where they were really under what levels we thought were appropriate for the business. So in the quarter we have built those inventories back up to what we think are more of an appropriate level.
Sean McMahon - Kennedy Capital - Analyst
Is this a good run rate here?
Jim Hawkins - Natus Medical - President & CEO
Yes, we wouldn't see that inventory level growing in any meaningful way from here.
Sean McMahon - Kennedy Capital - Analyst
And kind of the inventory days, is this good run rate or I mean with the sales, or do you expect this to increase as kind of the international business continues to grow.
Jim Hawkins - Natus Medical - President & CEO
Yes, I think that as far as inventory turns, there is no reason to think that the inventory levels would go up. If anything, our inventory turns should decrease over time as revenues grow.
Sean McMahon - Kennedy Capital - Analyst
Okay great. Thanks guys.
Operator
There are no further questions in the queue.
Jim Hawkins - Natus Medical - President & CEO
Well, I would like to thank everyone for participating in our second quarter conference call. We remain very excited about our business, the integration of Bio-Logic and really the future for Natus. We think we have a lot of opportunities and look forward to continue to grow revenues and earnings in future quarters. Thank you very much.
Operator
Thank you for your participation in today's conference. This concludes the presentation. You may now disconnect. Have a wonderful day.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BABY/BABY-8K-20060817161641.txt.gz
TIME:20060817161641
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Material Modifications to Rights of Security Holders	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Material Modifications to Rights of Security Holders
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
Item 1.01 Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement.
Reference is made to the Amendment No. 3 to Preferred Stock Rights Agreement between Natus Medical Incorporated (the "Company") and Wells Fargo Bank, National Association ("Wells Fargo") and further described under Item 3.03 of this report. The disclosure contained in Item 3.03 is incorporated by reference into this Item 1.01.
Item 3.03 Material Modifications to Rights of Security Holders.
On August 17, 2006, the Preferred Stock Rights Agreement originally dated as of September 4, 2002 and amended and restated as of October 8, 2002, as amended by Amendment No. 1 dated February 14, 2003 and Amendment No. 2 dated March 15, 2005 between the Company and Equiserve Trust Company, N.A. (the "Rights Agreement") was amended by an Amendment No. 3 to the Rights Agreement ("Amendment No. 3") between the Company and Wells Fargo. Wells Fargo serves as the Company's transfer agent and registrar for the Company's common stock. The Company also has a credit facility with Wells Fargo. The Rights Agreement and Amendment No. 3 relate to Preferred Stock Purchase Rights of the Company. Amendment No. 3 effects the following:
 
 
 
The above description of Amendment No. 3 to the Rights Agreement is qualified in its entirety by Amendment No. 3, which is attached to this report as Exhibit 99.01 and is incorporated by reference into this Item 3.03.
Item 9.01. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS, PRO FORMA FINANCIAL INFORMATION AND EXHIBITS.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 99.01
This Amendment No. 3 dated as of August 17, 2006 (this "Amendment") is to the Preferred Stock Rights Agreement originally dated as of September 4, 2002 and amended and restated as of October 8, 2002, as amended by that certain Amendment No. 1 dated as of February 14, 2003 and that certain Amendment No. 2 dated as of March 15, 2005 (collectively the "Rights Agreement"), between Natus Medical Incorporated, a Delaware corporation (the "Company"), and the Rights Agent (as defined below). Terms not defined herein have the meanings assigned to them in the Rights Agreement.
WHEREAS, the Company has previously approved the appointment of Wells Fargo Bank, National Association as the Rights Agent under the Rights Agreement (the "Rights Agent");
WHEREAS, pursuant to Section 21 of the Rights Agreement, the Company and the Rights Agent desire to formally appoint the Rights Agent, effective as of the date of this Amendment;
WHEREAS, the Company desires to amend the Rights Agreement to change the address for notices under the Rights Agreement and to provide for other changes recommended by the Rights Agent;
WHEREAS, the Company desires to increase the threshold percentage of ownership that would result in a person or group being an Acquiring Person from 20% to 25%; and
WHEREAS, pursuant to Section 27 of the Rights Agreement, the Company and the Rights Agent have agreed to amend the Rights Agreement to effect such changes;
NOW, THEREFORE, in consideration of the promises and the mutual agreements herein set forth, the parties hereby agree to amend the Rights Agreement as follows:
1. . Section 1(a) of the Rights Agreement pertaining to the definition of "Acquiring Person" is amended and restated as follows:
Amendment of Section 1(a)
(a) "Acquiring Person" shall mean any Person, who or which, together with all Affiliates and Associates of such Person, shall be the Beneficial Owner of 25% or more of the Common Shares then outstanding, but shall not include the Company, any Subsidiary of the Company or any employee benefit plan of the Company or of any Subsidiary of the Company, or any entity holding Common Shares for or pursuant to the terms of any such plan. Notwithstanding the foregoing, no Person shall be deemed to be an Acquiring Person as the result of an acquisition of Common Shares by the Company which, by reducing the number of shares outstanding, increases the proportionate number of shares beneficially owned by such Person to 25% or more of the Common Shares of the Company then outstanding; ,
provided
, that if a Person shall become the Beneficial Owner of 25% or more of the Common Shares of the Company then outstanding by reason of share purchases by the Company and shall, after such share purchases by the Company, become the Beneficial Owner of any additional Common Shares of the Company (other than pursuant to a dividend or distribution paid or made by the Company on the outstanding Common Shares in Common Shares or pursuant to a split or subdivision of the outstanding Common Shares), then such Person shall be deemed to be an Acquiring Person unless upon becoming the Beneficial Owner of such additional Common Shares of the Company such Person does not beneficially own 25% or more of the Common Shares of the Company then outstanding. Notwithstanding the foregoing, (i) if the Company's Board of Directors determines in good faith that a Person who would otherwise be an "Acquiring Person," as defined pursuant to the foregoing provisions of this paragraph (a), has become such inadvertently (including, without limitation, because (A) such Person was unaware that it beneficially owned a percentage of the Common Shares that would otherwise cause such Person to be an "Acquiring Person," as defined pursuant to the foregoing provisions of this paragraph (a), or (B) such Person was aware of the extent of the Common Shares it beneficially owned but had no actual knowledge of the consequences of such beneficial ownership under this Agreement) and without any intention of changing or influencing control of the Company, and if such Person divested or divests as promptly as practicable a sufficient number of Common Shares so that such Person would no longer be an "Acquiring Person," as defined pursuant to the foregoing provisions of this paragraph (a), then such Person shall not be deemed to be or to have become an "Acquiring Person" for any purposes of this Agreement including, without limitation Section 1(gg) hereof; and (ii) if, as of the date hereof, any Person is the Beneficial Owner of 25% or more of the Common Shares outstanding, such Person shall not be or become an "Acquiring Person," as defined pursuant to the foregoing provisions of this paragraph (a), unless and until such time as such Person shall become the Beneficial Owner of additional Common Shares (other than pursuant to a dividend or distribution paid or made by the Company on the outstanding Common Shares in Common Shares or pursuant to a split or subdivision of the outstanding Common Shares), unless, upon becoming the Beneficial Owner of such additional Common Shares, such Person is not then the Beneficial Owner of 25% or more of the Common Shares then outstanding.
however
2. . Section 5 of the Rights Agreement is amended and restated as follows:
Amendment of Section 5
Section 5. .
Countersignature and Registration
(a) The Rights Certificates shall be executed on behalf of the Company by its Chairman of the Board, its Chief Executive Officer, its Chief Financial Officer, its President or any Vice President, either manually or by facsimile signature, and by the Secretary or an Assistant Secretary of the Company, either manually or by facsimile signature, and shall have affixed thereto the Company's seal (if any) or a facsimile
thereof. Rights Certificates shall be countersigned by the Rights Agent manually or by facsimile signature and shall not be valid for any purpose unless countersigned. In case any officer of the Company who shall have signed any of the Rights Certificates shall cease to be such officer of the Company before countersignature by the Rights Agent and issuance and delivery by the Company, such Rights Certificates, nevertheless, may be countersigned by the Rights Agent and issued and delivered by the Company with the same force and effect as though the person who signed such Rights Certificates on behalf of the Company had not ceased to be such officer of the Company; and any Rights Certificate may be signed on behalf of the Company by any person who, at the actual date of the execution of such Rights Certificate, shall be a proper officer of the Company to sign such Rights Certificate, although at the date of the execution of this Rights Agreement any such person was not such an officer.
(b) Following the Distribution Date, the Rights Agent will keep or cause to be kept, at its office designated for such purposes, books for registration and transfer of the Rights Certificates issued hereunder. Such books shall show the names and addresses of the respective holders of the Rights Certificates, the number of Rights evidenced on its face by each of the Rights Certificates and the date of each of the Rights Certificates.
3. . Section 8 of the Rights Agreement is amended and restated as follows:
Amendment of Section 8
Section 8. . All Rights Certificates surrendered for the purpose of exercise, transfer, split up, combination or exchange shall, if surrendered to the Company or to any of its agents, be delivered to the Rights Agent for cancellation or in canceled form, or, if surrendered to the Rights Agent, shall be canceled by it, and no Rights Certificates shall be issued in lieu thereof except as expressly permitted by any of the provisions of this Agreement. The Company shall deliver to the Rights Agent for cancellation and retirement, and the Rights Agent shall so cancel and retire, any Rights Certificate purchased or acquired by the Company otherwise than upon the exercise thereof. Subject to applicable law and regulation, the Rights Agent shall maintain in a retrievable database electronic records of all cancelled or destroyed stock certificates which have been canceled or destroyed by the Rights Agent. The Rights Agent shall maintain such electronic records or physical records for the time period required by applicable law and regulation. Upon written request of the Company (and at the expense of the Company), the Rights Agent shall provide to the Company or its designee copies of such electronic records or physical records relating to rights certificates cancelled or destroyed by the Rights Agent.
Cancellation and Destruction of Rights Certificates
4. . Section 26 of the Rights Agreement pertaining to "Notices" is amended and restated as follows:
Amendment of Section 26
Section 26. . Notices or demands authorized by this Agreement to be given or made by the Rights Agent or by the holder of any Rights Certificate to or on the Company shall be sufficiently given or made if sent by first-class mail, postage prepaid, addressed (until another address is filed in writing with the Rights Agent) as follows:
Notices
Natus Medical Incorporated
1501 Industrial Road
San Carlos, California 94070
Attention: Chief Executive Officer
with a copy to:
Fenwick & West LLP
801 California St.
Mountain View, California 94041
Attention: Daniel J. Winnike, Esq.
Subject to the provisions of Section 21 hereof, any notice or demand authorized by this Agreement to be given or made by the Company or by the holder of any Rights Certificate to or on the Rights Agent shall be sufficiently given or made if sent by first-class mail, postage prepaid, addressed (until another address is filed in writing with the Company) as follows:
Wells Fargo Bank, National Association
c/o Wells Fargo Shareowner Services
161 North Concord Exchange
South St. Paul, MN 55075-1139
Attn: Natus Medical Incorporated Account Manager
Notices or demands authorized by this Agreement to be given or made by the Company or the Rights Agent to the holder of any Rights Certificate shall be sufficiently given or made if sent by first-class mail, postage prepaid, addressed to such holder at the address of such holder as shown on the registry books of the Company.
5. . Exhibit B of the Rights Agreement is amended and restated as set forth in Exhibit B hereto.
Amendment of Exhibit B of the Rights Agreement
6. . Exhibit C of the Rights Agreement is amended and restated as set forth in Exhibit C hereto.
Amendment of Exhibit C of the Rights Agreement
7. . Except as expressly amended by this Amendment, all provisions of the Rights Agreement shall remain in full force and effect.
Remaining Provisions
8. . Notices or demands authorized by this Amendment to be given or made by the Rights Agent to or on the Company shall be sufficiently given or made if sent by first-class mail, postage prepaid, addressed (until another address is filed in writing with the Rights Agent) as follows:
Notices
Natus Medical Incorporated
1501 Industrial Road
San Carlos, California 94070
Attention: Chief Executive Officer
with a copy to:
Fenwick & West LLP
801 California Street
Mountain View, California 94041
Attention: Daniel J. Winnike, Esq.
Any notice or demand authorized by this Amendment to be given or made by the Company to or on the Rights Agent shall be sufficiently given or made if sent by first-class mail, postage prepaid, addressed (until another address is filed in writing with the Company) as follows:
Wells Fargo Bank, National Association
c/o Wells Fargo Shareowner Services
161 North Concord Exchange
South St. Paul, MN 55075-1139
Attn: Natus Medical Incorporated Account Manager
9. . Nothing in this Amendment shall be construed to give to any Person other than the Company, the Rights Agent and the registered holders of the Rights Certificates (and, prior to the Distribution Date, the Common Shares) any legal or equitable right, remedy or claim pursuant to this Amendment; but this Amendment shall be for the sole and exclusive benefit of the Company, the Rights Agent and the registered holders of the Rights Certificates (and, prior to the Distribution Date, the Common Shares).
Benefits of this Amendment
10. . If any term, provision, covenant or restriction of this Amendment is held by a court of competent jurisdiction or other authority to be invalid, void or unenforceable, the remainder of the terms, provisions, covenants and restrictions of this Amendment shall remain in full force and effect and shall in no way be affected, impaired or invalidated.
Severability
11. . This Amendment shall be deemed to be a contract made under the laws of the State of Delaware and for all purposes shall be governed by and construed in accordance with the laws of such State applicable to contracts to be made and performed entirely within such State.
Governing Law
12. . This Amendment may be executed in any number of counterparts and each of such counterparts shall for all purposes be deemed to be an original, and all such counterparts shall together constitute but one and the same instrument.
Counterparts
13. . This Amendment may be executed and delivered by facsimile or by email in portable document format (.pdf) and upon delivery of the signature by such method will be deemed to have the same effect as if the original signature had been delivered to the other party.
Facsimile Signatures
14. . Descriptive headings of the several Sections of this Amendment are inserted for convenience only and shall not control or affect the meaning or construction of any of the provisions hereof.
Descriptive Headings
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have caused this Amendment to be duly executed as of the date first above written.
 
 
NOT EXERCISABLE AFTER THE EARLIER OF (i) OCTOBER 11, 2012, (ii) THE DATE TERMINATED BY THE COMPANY OR (iii) THE DATE THE COMPANY EXCHANGES THE RIGHTS PURSUANT TO THE RIGHTS AGREEMENT. THE RIGHTS ARE SUBJECT TO REDEMPTION, AT THE OPTION OF THE COMPANY, AT $0.001 PER RIGHT ON THE TERMS SET FORTH IN THE RIGHTS AGREEMENT. UNDER CERTAIN CIRCUMSTANCES, RIGHTS BENEFICIALLY OWNED BY AN ACQUIRING PERSON OR AN AFFILIATE OR ASSOCIATE OF AN ACQUIRING PERSON (AS SUCH TERMS ARE DEFINED IN THE RIGHTS AGREEMENT) AND ANY SUBSEQUENT HOLDER OF SUCH RIGHTS MAY BECOME NULL AND VOID. [THE RIGHTS REPRESENTED BY THIS RIGHTS CERTIFICATE ARE OR WERE BENEFICIALLY OWNED BY A PERSON WHO WAS OR BECAME AN ACQUIRING PERSON OR AN AFFILIATE OR ASSOCIATE OF AN ACQUIRING PERSON (AS SUCH TERMS ARE DEFINED IN THE RIGHTS AGREEMENT). ACCORDINGLY, THIS RIGHTS CERTIFICATE AND THE RIGHTS REPRESENTED HEREBY MAY BECOME NULL AND VOID IN THE CIRCUMSTANCES SPECIFIED IN SECTION 7(e) OF SUCH RIGHTS AGREEMENT.]
*
This certifies that                                         , or registered assigns, is the registered owner of the number of Rights set forth above, each of which entitles the owner thereof, subject to the terms, provisions and conditions of the Rights Agreement originally dated as of September 4, 2002 and amended and restated as of October 8, 2002, as amended by that certain Amendment No. 1 dated as of February 14, 2003, that certain Amendment No. 2 dated as of March 15, 2005 and that certain Amendment No. 3 dated as of August 17, 2006 (collectively the "Rights Agreement"), between Natus Medical Incorporated, a Delaware corporation (the "Company"), and Wells Fargo Bank, National Association (the "Rights Agent"), to purchase from the Company at any time after the Distribution Date (as such term is defined in the Rights Agreement) and prior to 5:00 p.m., New York time, on October 11, 2012 at the office of the Rights Agent designated for such purpose, or at the office of its successor as Rights Agent, one one-thousandth (0.001) of a fully paid and non-assessable share of Series A Participating Preferred Stock, par value $0.001 per share (the "Preferred Shares"), of the Company, at an Exercise Price of $23.00 per one-thousandth (0.001) of a Preferred Share (the "Exercise Price"), upon presentation and surrender of
 
this Rights Certificate with the Form of Election to Purchase and related Certificate duly executed. The number of Rights evidenced by this Rights Certificate (and the number of one-thousandths (0.001) of a Preferred Share which may be purchased upon exercise hereof) set forth above are the number and Exercise Price as of October 11, 2002 based on the Preferred Shares as constituted at such date. As provided in the Rights Agreement, the Exercise Price and the number and kind of Preferred Shares or other securities which may be purchased upon the exercise of the Rights evidenced by this Rights Certificate are subject to modification and adjustment upon the happening of certain events.
This Rights Certificate is subject to all of the terms, provisions and conditions of the Rights Agreement, which terms, provisions and conditions are hereby incorporated herein by reference and made a part hereof and to which Rights Agreement reference is hereby made for a full description of the rights, limitations of rights, obligations, duties and immunities hereunder of the Rights Agent, the Company and the holders of the Rights Certificates, which limitations of rights include the temporary suspension of the exercisability of such Rights under the specific circumstances set forth in the Rights Agreement. Copies of the Rights Agreement are on file at the principal executive offices of the Company and the above-mentioned office of the Rights Agent.
Subject to the provisions of the Rights Agreement, the Rights evidenced by this Rights Certificate (i) may be redeemed by the Company, at its option, at a redemption price of $0.001 per Right or (ii) may be exchanged by the Company in whole or in part for Common Shares, substantially equivalent rights or other consideration as determined by the Company.
This Rights Certificate, with or without other Rights Certificates, upon surrender at the office of the Rights Agent designated for such purpose, may be exchanged for another Rights Certificate or Rights Certificates of like tenor and date evidencing Rights entitling the holder to purchase a like aggregate amount of securities as the Rights evidenced by the Rights Certificate or Rights Certificates surrendered shall have entitled such holder to purchase. If this Rights Certificate shall be exercised in part, the holder shall be entitled to receive upon surrender hereof another Rights Certificate or Rights Certificates for the number of whole Rights not exercised.
No fractional portion of less than one one-thousandth (0.001) of a Preferred Share will be issued upon the exercise of any Right or Rights evidenced hereby but in lieu thereof a cash payment will be made, as provided in the Rights Agreement.
No holder of this Rights Certificate, as such, shall be entitled to vote or receive dividends or be deemed for any purpose the holder of the Preferred Shares or of any other securities of the Company which may at any time be issuable on the exercise hereof, nor shall anything contained in the Rights Agreement or herein be construed to confer upon the holder hereof, as such, any of the rights of a stockholder of the Company or any right to vote for the election of directors or upon any matter
submitted to stockholders at any meeting thereof, or to give or withhold consent to any corporate action, or to receive notice of meetings or other actions affecting stockholders (except as provided in the Rights Agreement), or to receive dividends or subscription rights, or otherwise, until the Right or Rights evidenced by this Rights Certificate shall have been exercised as provided in the Rights Agreement.
This Rights Certificate shall not be valid or obligatory for any purpose until it shall have been countersigned by the Rights Agent.
WITNESS the facsimile signature of the proper officers of the Company and its corporate seal. Dated as of                     ,             .
 
Countersigned:
 
(To be executed by the registered holder if such holder desires to transfer the Rights Certificate)
FOR VALUE RECEIVED hereby sells, assigns and transfers unto
                                                                             
                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                       
                                                                          
                                                                                                                                                                               
(Please print name and address of transferee)
                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                       
                                                                          
                                                                                                                                                                               
this Rights Certificate, together with all right, title and interest therein, and does hereby irrevocably constitute and appoint                      Attorney, to transfer the within Rights Certificate on the books of the within-named Company, with full power of substitution.
Dated:                     ,
                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                       
Signature
Signature Medallion Guaranteed:
Signatures must be guaranteed by an "Eligible Guarantor Institution" (with membership in an approved signature guarantee medallion program) pursuant to Rule 17Ad-15 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended.
The undersigned hereby certifies by checking the appropriate boxes that:
(1) this Rights Certificate [ ] is [ ] is not being sold, assigned and transferred by or on behalf of a Person who is or was an Acquiring Person, or an Affiliate or Associate of any such Person (as such terms are defined in the Rights Agreement);
(2) after due inquiry and to the best knowledge of the undersigned, it [ ] did [ ] did not acquire the Rights evidenced by this Rights Certificate from any Person who is, was or subsequently became an Acquiring Person or an Affiliate or Associate of any such Person.
Dated:                    ,
                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                       
Signature
Signature Medallion Guaranteed:
Signatures must be guaranteed by an "Eligible Guarantor Institution" (with membership in an approved signature guarantee medallion program) pursuant to Rule 17Ad-15 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended.
To:
 
                                                         
The undersigned hereby irrevocably elects to exercise Rights represented by this Rights Certificate to purchase the number of one-thousandths (0.001) of a Preferred Share issuable upon the exercise of such Rights and requests that certificates for such number of one-thousandths (0.001) of a Preferred Share issued in the name of:
                                                             
Please insert social security
or other identifying number
                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                       
If such number of Rights shall not be all the Rights evidenced by this Rights Certificate, a new Rights Certificate for the balance remaining of such Rights shall be registered in the name of and delivered to:
Please insert social security
or other identifying number
                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                       
Dated: ,
                                             
                        
                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                       
Signature
Signature Medallion Guaranteed:
Signatures must be guaranteed by an "Eligible Guarantor Institution" (with membership in an approved signature guarantee medallion program) pursuant to Rule 17Ad-15 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended.
The undersigned hereby certifies by checking the appropriate boxes that:
(1) the Rights evidenced by this Rights Certificate [ ] are [ ] are not being exercised by or on behalf of a Person who is or was an Acquiring Person or an Affiliate or Associate of any such Person (as such terms are defined in the Rights Agreement);
(2) after due inquiry and to the best knowledge of the undersigned, it [ ] did [ ] did not acquire the Rights evidenced by this Rights Certificate from any Person who is, was or subsequently became an Acquiring Person or an Affiliate or Associate of any such Person.
Dated: ,
                                             
                        
                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                       
Signature
Signature Medallion Guaranteed:
Signatures must be guaranteed by an "Eligible Guarantor Institution" (with membership in an approved signature guarantee medallion program) pursuant to Rule 17Ad-15 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended.
The signature in the foregoing Forms of Assignment and Election must conform to the name as written upon the face of this Rights Certificate in every particular, without alteration or enlargement or any change whatsoever.
Summary of Rights
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BABY/BABY-8K-20060818062421.txt.gz
TIME:20060818062421
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
Item 1.01. Entry Into a Material Definitive Agreement.
On August 17, 2006, Natus Medical Incorporated ("Natus") entered into a common stock purchase agreement (the "Purchase Agreement") with Roth Capital Partners, LLC (the "Underwriter"). The Purchase Agreement provides for the sale of 2,300,000 shares of Natus common stock at a price to the Underwriter of $11.0485 per share (the "Offering"). Natus also granted the Underwriter an option to purchase up to 345,000 additional shares solely to cover over-allotments, if any. These shares are being offered and sold under a prospectus supplement filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission pursuant to Rule 424(b)(2) of the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, in connection with an offering pursuant to Natus's shelf registration statement on Form S-3 (Registration No. 333-133480) (the "Registration Statement").
The above description of the Purchase Agreement is qualified in its entirety by the Purchase Agreement, which is attached to this report as Exhibit 1.01 and is incorporated by reference into the Registration Statement.
Item 8.01. Other Events.
In connection with the Offering, Natus is filing a legal opinion and consent as Exhibit No. 5.01 and Exhibit No. 23.01 to this report, which are incorporated by reference into the Registration Statement.
Item 9.01. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS, PRO FORMA FINANCIAL INFORMATION AND EXHIBITS.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 

Exhibit 1.01
August 17, 2006
ROTH CAPITAL PARTNERS, LLC 24 Corporate Plaza Newport Beach, CA 92660
Ladies and Gentlemen:
Natus Medical Incorporated, a Delaware corporation (the ) proposes, subject to the terms and conditions stated herein, to issue and sell to Roth Capital Partners, LLC (the ) an aggregate of 2,300,000 authorized but unissued shares (the ) of Common Stock, $.001 par value per share (the ), of the Company.
"Company"
"Underwriter"
"Securities"
"Common Stock"
The Company and the Underwriter hereby confirm their agreement with respect to the purchase and sale of the Securities as follows:
The Company has prepared and filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the "Commission") a registration statement on Form S-3 (File No. 333-133480) under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended (the "Securities Act") and the rules and regulations (the "Rules and Regulations") of the Commission thereunder, and such amendments to such registration statement as may have been required to the date of this Agreement. Such registration statement has been declared effective by the Commission. Such registration statement, at any given time, including amendments thereto to such time, the exhibits and any schedules thereto at such time, the documents incorporated by reference therein pursuant to Item 12 of Form S-3 under the Securities Act at such time and the documents and information otherwise deemed to be a part thereof or included therein by Rule 430B under the Securities Act or otherwise pursuant to the Rules and Regulations at such time, is herein called the "Registration Statement." The Registration Statement at the time it originally became effective is herein called the "Original Registration Statement."
1. Registration Statement and Prospectus.
The Company is filing with the Commission pursuant to Rule 424 under the Securities Act a final prospectus supplement relating to the Securities to a form of prospectus included in the Registration Statement in the form heretofore delivered to the Underwriter. Such prospectus in the form in which it appears in the Registration Statement is hereinafter called the Such supplemental form of prospectus, in the form in which it shall be filed with the Commission pursuant to Rule 424(b) (including the Base Prospectus as so supplemented) is hereinafter called the Any reference herein to the Base Prospectus or the
"Base Prospectus."
"Prospectus."
Prospectus shall be deemed to include the documents incorporated by reference therein pursuant to Item 12 of Form S-3 under the Securities Act as of the date of such prospectus.
For purposes of this Agreement, all references to the Registration Statement, the Base Prospectus, the Prospectus or any amendment or supplement to any of the foregoing shall be deemed to include the copy filed with the Commission pursuant to its Electronic Data Gathering, Analysis and Retrieval System (). All references in this Agreement to amendments or supplements to the Registration Statement, the Base Prospectus or the Prospectus shall be deemed to mean and include the subsequent filing of any document under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (the ) which is deemed to be incorporated therein by reference therein or otherwise deemed by the Rules and Regulations to be a part thereof.
"EDGAR"
"Exchange Act"
2. Representations and Warranties of the Company.
(a) The Company represents and warrants to, and agrees with, the Underwriter as follows:
(i) No order preventing or suspending the use of any Prospectus has been issued by the Commission and each Prospectus, at the time of filing or the time of first use within the meaning of the Rules and Regulations, complied in all material respects with the requirements of the Securities Act and the Rules and Regulations and did not contain an untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading; except that the foregoing shall not apply to statements in or omissions from any Prospectus in reliance upon, and in conformity with, written information furnished to the Company by the Underwriter specifically for use in the preparation thereof.
(ii) The Company has complied to the Commission's satisfaction with all requests of the Commission for additional or supplemental information. No stop order suspending the effectiveness of the Registration Statement is in effect and no proceedings for such purpose have been instituted or are pending or, to the best knowledge of the Company, are contemplated or threatened by the Commission.
(iii) Each part of the Registration Statement and any post-effective amendment thereto, at the time such part became effective (including each deemed effective date with respect to the Underwriter pursuant to Rule 430B under the Securities Act), at all other subsequent times until the expiration of the Prospectus Delivery Period (as defined below), and at the Closing Date (as hereinafter defined), and the Prospectus (or any amendment or supplement to the Prospectus), at the time of filing or the time of first use within the meaning of the Rules and Regulations, at all subsequent times until expiration of the Prospectus Delivery Period, and at the Closing Date complied and will comply in all material respects with the applicable requirements and provisions of the Securities Act, the Rules and Regulations and the Exchange Act and did not and will not contain any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading. The
 
Prospectus, as amended or supplemented, as of its date, or the time of first use within the meaning of the Rules and Regulations, at all subsequent times until the expiration of the Prospectus Delivery Period, and at the Closing Date, did not and will not contain any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading. The representations and warranties set forth in the two immediately preceding sentences do not apply to statements in or omissions from the Registration Statement or any post-effective amendment thereto, or the Prospectus, or any amendments or supplements thereto, made in reliance upon and in conformity with written information furnished to the Company by the Underwriter, specifically for use in the preparation thereof.
(iv) Neither (A) the Issuer General Free Writing Prospectus(es) issued at or prior to the Time of Sale, the Statutory Prospectus and the information set forth in Schedule IV to this Agreement, all considered together (collectively, the "Time of Sale Disclosure Package"), nor (B) any individual Issuer Limited-Use Free Writing Prospectus, when considered together with the Time of Sale Disclosure Package, included as of the Time of Sale any untrue statement of a material fact or omitted as of the Time of Sale to state any material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading. The preceding sentence does not apply to statements in or omissions from any Statutory Prospectus included in the Registration Statement or any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus based upon and in conformity with written information furnished to the Company by the Underwriter specifically for use therein. As used in this paragraph and elsewhere in this Agreement:
(1) means 7:00 pm (Eastern time) on the date of this Agreement.
"Time of Sale"
(2) as of any time means the Prospectus that is included in the Registration Statement immediately prior to that time. For purposes of this definition, information contained in a form of prospectus that is deemed retroactively to be a part of the Registration Statement pursuant to Rule 430B under the Securities Act shall be considered to be included in the Statutory Prospectus as of the actual time that form of prospectus is filed with the Commission pursuant to Rule 424(b) under the Securities Act.
"Statutory Prospectus"
(3) means any "issuer free writing prospectus," as defined in Rule 433 under the Securities Act, relating to the Securities that (A) is required to be filed with the Commission by the Company, or (B) is exempt from filing pursuant to Rule 433(d)(5)(i) under the Securities Act because it contains a description of the Securities or of the offering that does not reflect the final terms, in each case in the form filed or required to be filed with the Commission or, if not required to be filed, in the form retained in the Company's records pursuant to Rule 433(g) under the Securities Act.
"Issuer Free Writing Prospectus"
 
(4) means any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus that is intended for general distribution to prospective investors, as evidenced by its being specified in Schedule I to this Agreement.
"Issuer General Free Writing Prospectus"
(5) means any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus that is not an Issuer General Free Writing Prospectus.
"Issuer Limited-Use Free Writing Prospectus"
(v) (A) Each Issuer Free Writing Prospectus, as of its issue date and at all subsequent times through the Prospectus Delivery Period or until any earlier date that the Company notified or notifies the Underwriter as described in Section 4(a)(iii)(B), did not, does not and will not include any information that conflicted, conflicts or will conflict with the information contained in the Registration Statement, any Statutory Prospectus or the Prospectus. The foregoing sentence does not apply to statements in or omissions from any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus based upon and in conformity with written information furnished to the Company by the Underwriter specifically for use therein.
(B) (1) At the earliest time after the filing of the Registration Statement that the Company or another offering participant made a offer (within the meaning of Rule 164(h)(2) under the Securities Act) of the Securities and (2) at the date hereof, the Company was not and is not an "ineligible issuer," as defined in Rule 405 under the Securities Act, including the Company or any subsidiary in the preceding three years not having been convicted of a felony or misdemeanor or having been made the subject of a judicial or administrative decree or order as described in Rule 405 (without taking account of any determination by the Commission pursuant to Rule 405 that it is not necessary that the Company be considered an ineligible issuer), nor an "excluded issuer" as defined in Rule 164 under the Securities Act.
bona fide
(C) Each Issuer Free Writing Prospectus satisfied, as of its issue date and at all subsequent times through the Prospectus Delivery Period, all other conditions to use thereof as set forth in Rules 164 and 433 under the Securities Act.
(vi) The financial statements of the Company, together with the related notes, included or incorporated by reference in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Disclosure Package and the Prospectus comply in all material respects with the requirements of the Securities Act and the Exchange Act and fairly present the financial condition of the Company as of the dates indicated and the results of operations and changes in cash flows for the periods therein specified in conformity with generally accepted accounting principles consistently applied throughout the periods involved; and the supporting schedules included in the Registration Statement present fairly the information required to be stated therein. No other financial statements or schedules are required to be included in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Disclosure Package or the Prospectus. To the Company's knowledge, each of Deloitte & Touche, LLP and BDO/Seidman, each of which has expressed its opinion with respect to the financial statements and schedules filed as a part of the Registration Statement and
 
included in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Disclosure Package and the Prospectus, is an independent public accounting firm within the meaning of the Securities Act and the Rules and Regulations and such accountants are not in violation of the auditor independence requirements of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002 (the "Sarbanes-Oxley Act").
(vii) Each of the Company and its subsidiaries has been duly organized and is validly existing as a corporation in good standing under the laws of its jurisdiction of incorporation. Each of the Company and its subsidiaries has the corporate power and authority to own its properties and conduct its business as currently being carried on and as described in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Disclosure Package and the Prospectus, and is duly qualified to do business as a foreign corporation in good standing in each jurisdiction in which it owns or leases real property or in which the conduct of its business makes such qualification necessary and in which the failure to so qualify would have a material adverse effect upon the business, prospects, properties, operations, condition (financial or otherwise) or results of operations of the Company and its subsidiaries, taken as a whole, or in its ability to perform its obligations under this Agreement ("Material Adverse Effect").
(viii) Except as contemplated in the Time of Sale Disclosure Package and in the Prospectus, subsequent to the respective dates as of which information is given in the Time of Sale Disclosure Package, neither the Company nor any of its subsidiaries has incurred any material liabilities or obligations, direct or contingent, or entered into any material transactions, or declared or paid any dividends or made any distribution of any kind with respect to its capital stock; and there has not been any change in the capital stock (other than a change in the number of outstanding shares of Common Stock due to the issuance of shares upon the exercise of outstanding options or warrants or to the issuance of restricted stock under the Company's existing stock awards plan), or any material change in the short-term or long-term debt, or any issuance of options, warrants, convertible securities or other rights to purchase the capital stock, of the Company or any of its subsidiaries (other than the issuance of options under the Company's existing stock awards plans), or any material adverse change in the financial condition, business, prospects, property, operations or results of operations of the Company and its subsidiaries, taken as a whole ("Material Adverse Change").
(ix) Except as set forth in the Time of Sale Disclosure Package and the Prospectus, there is not pending or, to the knowledge of the Company, threatened or contemplated, any action, suit or proceeding to which the Company or any of its subsidiaries is a party or of which any property or assets of the Company is the subject before or by any court or governmental agency, authority or body, or any arbitrator, which, individually or in the aggregate, might reasonably be expected to result in any Material Adverse Change.
(x) This Agreement has been duly authorized, executed and delivered by the Company, and constitutes a valid, legal and binding obligation of the Company, enforceable in accordance with its terms, except as rights to indemnity hereunder may be limited by federal or state securities laws and except as such enforceability may be
 
limited by bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization or similar laws affecting the rights of creditors generally and subject to general principles of equity. The execution, delivery and performance of this Agreement and the consummation of the transactions herein contemplated will not result in a breach or violation of any of the terms and provisions of, or constitute a default under, any statute, any agreement or instrument to which the Company is a party or by which it is bound or to which any of its property is subject, or any order, rule, regulation or decree of any court or governmental agency or body having jurisdiction over the Company or any of its properties except for violations and defaults which individually or in the aggregate would not reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect. The execution, delivery and performance of this Agreement and the consummation of the transactions herein contemplated will not result in a breach or violation of any of the terms and provisions of, or constitute a default under, the Company's charter or by-laws. No consent, approval, authorization or order of, or filing with, any court or governmental agency or body is required for the execution, delivery and performance of this Agreement or for the consummation of the transactions contemplated hereby, including the issuance or sale of the Securities by the Company, except such as may be required under the Securities Act or state securities or blue sky laws; and the Company has the power and authority to enter into this Agreement and to authorize, issue and sell the Securities as contemplated by this Agreement.
(xi) All of the issued and outstanding shares of capital stock of the Company, including the outstanding shares of Common Stock, are duly authorized and validly issued, fully paid and nonassessable, have been issued in compliance with all federal and state securities laws, were not issued in violation of or subject to any preemptive rights or other rights to subscribe for or purchase securities that have not been waived in writing (a copy of which has been delivered to counsel to the Underwriter); the Securities which may be sold hereunder by the Company have been duly authorized and, when issued, delivered and paid for in accordance with the terms of this Agreement, will have been validly issued and will be fully paid and nonassessable; and the capital stock of the Company, including the Common Stock, conforms to the description thereof in the Registration Statement, in the Time of Sale Disclosure Package and in the Prospectus. Except as otherwise stated in the Registration Statement, in the Time of Sale Disclosure Package or in the Prospectus, there are no preemptive rights or other rights to subscribe for or to purchase, or any restriction upon the voting or transfer of, any shares of Common Stock pursuant to the Company's charter, by-laws or any agreement or other instrument to which the Company is a party or by which the Company is bound. Neither the filing of the Registration Statement nor the offering or sale of the Securities as contemplated by this Agreement gives rise to any rights for or relating to the registration of any shares of Common Stock or other securities of the Company that have not been waived. All of the issued and outstanding shares of capital stock of each of the Company's subsidiaries have been duly and validly authorized and issued and are fully paid and nonassessable, and, except as otherwise described in the Registration Statement, in the Time of Sale Disclosure Package or in the Prospectus and except for any directors' qualifying shares, the Company owns of record and beneficially, free and clear of any security interests, claims, liens, proxies, equities or other encumbrances, all of the issued and outstanding shares of such stock, except such as are described in the Registration Statement, in the Time of Sale Disclosure Package or in the Prospectus. Except as
 
described in the Registration Statement, in the Time of Sale Disclosure Package in the Prospectus, there are no options, warrants, agreements, contracts or other rights in existence to purchase or acquire from the Company or any subsidiary of the Company any shares of the capital stock of the Company or any subsidiary of the Company. The Company has an authorized and outstanding capitalization as set forth in the Registration Statement, in the Time of Sale Disclosure Package and in the Prospectus (except as outstanding capitalization may have changed as a result of the exercise of stock options subsequent thereto).
or
(xii) The Company and each of its subsidiaries holds, and is operating in compliance in all material respects with, all franchises, grants, authorizations, licenses, permits, easements, consents, certificates and orders of any governmental or self-regulatory body required for the conduct of its business, and all such franchises, grants, authorizations, licenses, permits, easements, consents, certifications and orders are valid and in full force and effect in all material respects; and the Company and each of its subsidiaries is in compliance in all material respects with all applicable federal, state, local and foreign laws, regulations, orders and decrees.
(xiii) The Company and its subsidiaries have good and marketable title to all property (whether real or personal) described in the Registration Statement, in the Time of Sale Disclosure Package and in the Prospectus as being owned by them which are material to the business of the Company, in each case free and clear of all liens, claims, security interests, other encumbrances or defects except such as are described in the Registration Statement, in the Time of Sale Disclosure Package in the Prospectus. The property held under lease by the Company and its subsidiaries is held by them under valid, subsisting and enforceable leases with only such exceptions with respect to any particular lease as do not interfere in any material respect with the conduct of the business of the Company or its subsidiaries.
or
(xiv) The Company and each of its subsidiaries owns or possesses or has valid right to use all patents, patent applications, trademarks, service marks, tradenames, trademark registrations, service mark registrations, copyrights, licenses, inventions, trade secrets and rights necessary for the conduct of the business of the Company and its subsidiaries as currently carried on and as described in the Registration Statement, in the Time of Sale Disclosure Package and in the Prospectus; except as stated in the Registration Statement, in the Time of Sale Disclosure Package in the Prospectus, to the knowledge of the Company, no name which the Company or any of its subsidiaries uses and no other aspect of the business of the Company or any of its subsidiaries will involve or give rise to any infringement of, or license or similar fees for, any patents, patent applications, trademarks, service marks, tradenames, trademark registrations, service mark registrations, copyrights, licenses, inventions, trade secrets or other similar rights of others material to the business or prospects of the Company and neither the Company nor any of its subsidiaries has received any notice alleging any such infringement or fee.
or
(xv) Neither the Company nor any of its subsidiaries is in violation of its respective charter or by-laws or in breach of or otherwise in default, and no event has
 
occurred which, with notice or lapse of time or both, would constitute such a default, in the performance of any material obligation, agreement or condition contained in any bond, debenture, note, indenture, loan agreement or any other material contract, lease or other instrument to which it is subject or by which any of them may be bound, or to which any of the material property or assets of the Company or any of its subsidiaries is subject.
(xvi) The Company and its subsidiaries have timely filed all federal, state and local income tax returns required to be filed and are not in default in the payment of any taxes which were payable pursuant to said returns or any assessments with respect thereto, other than any which the Company or any of its subsidiaries is contesting in good faith.
(xvii) The Company has not distributed and will not distribute any prospectus or other offering material in connection with the offering and sale of the Securities other than any Preliminary Prospectus, the Time of Sale Disclosure Package or the Prospectus or other materials permitted by the Securities Act to be distributed by the Company; provided, however, that, except as set forth on Schedule I, the Company has not made and will not make any offer relating to the Securities that would constitute a "free writing prospectus" as defined in Rule 405 under the Securities Act, except in accordance with the provisions of Section 4(a)(xiv) of this Agreement.
(xviii) The Common Stock is registered pursuant to Section 12(b) of the Exchange Act and is included or approved for inclusion on the Nasdaq Global Market and the Company has taken no action designed to, or likely to have the effect of, terminating the registration of the Common Stock under the Exchange Act or delisting the Common Stock from the Nasdaq Global Market (although the Company may choose to list its securities on the NYSE) nor has the Company received any notification that the Commission or the Nasdaq Global Market is contemplating terminating such registration or listing. The Company has complied in all material respects with the applicable requirements of the Nasdaq Global Market for maintenance of inclusion of the Common Stock thereon. The Company has filed an application to include the Securities on the Nasdaq Global Market.
(xix) Other than the subsidiaries of the Company listed on hereto, the Company, directly or indirectly, owns no capital stock or other equity or ownership or proprietary interest in any corporation, partnership, association, trust or other entity.
Schedule III
(xx) The Company maintains a system of internal accounting controls sufficient to provide reasonable assurances that (A) transactions are executed in accordance with management's general or specific authorization; (B) transactions are recorded as necessary to permit preparation of financial statements in conformity with generally accepted accounting principles and to maintain accountability for assets; (C) access to assets is permitted only in accordance with management's general or specific authorization; and (D) the recorded accountability for assets is compared with existing assets at reasonable intervals and appropriate action is taken with respect to any
 
differences. Except as described in the Registration Statement, in the Time of Sale Disclosure Package in the Prospectus, since June 30, 2006, there has been no change in the Company's internal control over financial reporting that has materially affected, or is reasonably likely to materially affect, the Company's internal control over financial reporting.
or
(xxi) Other than as contemplated by this Agreement, the Company has not incurred any liability for any finder's or broker's fee or agent's commission in connection with the execution and delivery of this Agreement or the consummation of the transactions contemplated hereby.
(xxii) The Company carries, or is covered by, insurance in such amounts and covering such risks as is adequate for the conduct of its business and the value of its properties and as is customary for companies engaged in similar businesses in similar industries.
(xxiii) The Company is not and, after giving effect to the offering and sale of the Securities, will not be an "investment company," as such term is defined in the Investment Company Act of 1940, as amended.
(xxiv) The conditions for use of Form S-3, set forth in the General Instructions thereto, have been satisfied. The Company also complies with the standards for using Form S-3 as in place prior to October 21, 1992, namely, as of a date within 30 days prior to the date of this Agreement, the aggregate market value of the voting and non-voting common equity of the Company held by non-affiliates of the Company exceeded $150,000,000 (as calculated by reference to the closing price of the Common Stock on the Nasdaq Global Market) and non-affiliates of the Company held more than 16,898,455 shares of the Common Stock on such date.
(xxv) The documents incorporated by reference in the Time of Sale Disclosure Package, the Registration Statement and in the Prospectus, when they became effective or were filed with the Commission, as the case may be, conformed in all material respects to the requirements of the Securities Act or the Exchange Act, as applicable, and were filed on a timely basis with the Commission and none of such documents contained an untrue statement of a material fact or omitted to state a material fact necessary to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading; any further documents so filed and incorporated by reference in the Time of Sale Disclosure Package, the Registration Statement or in the Prospectus, when such documents are filed with the Commission, will conform in all material respects to the requirements of the Exchange Act, and will not contain an untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact necessary to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading.
(xxvi) The Company is in substantial compliance with all applicable provisions of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act and the rules and regulations of the Commission thereunder that are effective with respect to the Company and its subsidiaries on the date
 
of this Agreement, except where such noncompliance would not have, individually or in the aggregate, a Material Adverse Effect.
(xxvii) The Company has established and maintains disclosure controls and procedures (as defined in Rules 13a-14 and 15d-14 under the Exchange Act) and such controls and procedures are effective in ensuring that material information relating to the Company, including its subsidiaries, is made known to the principal executive officer and the principal financial officer. The Company has utilized such controls and procedures in preparing and evaluating the disclosures in the Registration Statement, in the Time of Sale Disclosure Package and in the Prospectus.
(b) Any certificate signed by any officer of the Company and delivered to the Underwriter or to the Underwriter's Counsel shall be deemed a representation and warranty by the Company to the Underwriter as to the matters covered thereby.
3. Purchase, Sale and Delivery of Securities.
(a) On the basis of the representations, warranties and agreements herein contained, but subject to the terms and conditions herein set forth, the Company agrees to issue and sell the Securities to the Underwriter, and the Underwriter agrees to purchase from the Company the Securities as set forth opposite the name of such Underwriter below on the signature page hereof. The purchase price for each share of the Securities shall be $11.63 per share. The Company agrees to pay the Underwriter's compensation as set forth in Schedule IV hereto.
In addition, the Company hereby grants to the Underwriter the option to purchase an aggregate of up to 15% of the Securities purchased pursuant to this Agreement and, upon the basis of the warranties and representations and subject to the terms and conditions herein set forth, the Underwriter shall have the right to purchase, from the Company (subject to such adjustment as you shall determine to avoid fractional shares), all or a portion of additional shares ("Additional Shares") as may be necessary to cover over-allotments made in connection with the offering of the Securities, at the same purchase price per share to be paid by the Underwriter to the Company for the Securities. This option may be exercised by you at any time (but not more than once) on or before the thirtieth day following the date hereof, by written notice to the Company. Such notice shall set forth the aggregate number of Additional Shares as to which the option is being exercised, and the date and time when the Additional Shares are to be delivered (such date and time being herein referred to as the ""); , , that the Option Closing Date shall not be earlier than the Closing Date (as defined below) nor earlier than the second business day after the date on which the option shall have been exercised nor later than the fifth business day after the date on which the option shall have been exercised unless the Company and you otherwise agree.
Option Closing Date
provided
however
Payment of the purchase price and delivery for the Additional Shares shall be made at the Option Closing Date in the same manner and at the same office as the payment for the Securities as set forth in subparagraph (b) below. For the purpose of expediting the checking of the certificate for the Additional Shares by you, the Company agrees to make a form of such
 
certificate available to you for such purpose at least one full business day preceding the Option Closing Date.
(b) The Securities will be delivered by the Company to the Underwriter against payment of the purchase price therefor by wire transfer of same day funds payable to the order of the Company, as appropriate, at the offices of Roth Capital Partners LLC, 24 Corporate Plaza, Newport Beach, CA 92660, or such other location as may be mutually acceptable, at 9:00 a.m. PST or Central time, respectively, on the third (or if the Securities are priced, as contemplated by Rule 15c6-1(c) under the Exchange Act, after 4:30 p.m. Eastern time, the fourth) full business day following the date hereof, or at such other time and date as the Underwriter and the Company determine pursuant to Rule 15c6-1(a) under the Exchange Act, such time and date of delivery being herein referred to as the "Closing Date." If the Underwriter so elects, delivery of the Securities may be made by credit through full fast transfer to the account at The Depository Trust Company designated by the Underwriter. Certificates representing the Securities, in definitive form and in such denominations and registered in such names as the Underwriter may request upon at least two business days' prior notice to the Company, will be made available for checking and packaging not later than 10:30 a.m., PST or Central time, as applicable, on the business day next preceding the Closing Date at the above addresses, or such other location as may be mutually acceptable.
4. Covenants.
(a) The Company covenants and agrees with the Underwriter as follows:
(i) During the period beginning on the date hereof and ending on the later of the Closing Date or such date, as in the opinion of counsel for the Underwriter, the Prospectus is no longer required by law to be delivered (or in lieu thereof the notice referred to in Rule 173(a) under the Securities Act is no longer required to be provided), in connection with sales by an underwriter or dealer (the "Prospectus Delivery Period"), prior to amending or supplementing the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Disclosure Package or the Prospectus, the Company shall furnish to the Underwriter for review a copy of each such proposed amendment or supplement, and the Company shall not file any such proposed amendment or supplement to which the Underwriter reasonably object.
(ii) After the date of this Agreement, the Company shall promptly advise the Underwriter in writing (i) of the receipt of any comments of, or requests for additional or supplemental information from, the Commission, (ii) of the time and date of any filing of any post-effective amendment to the Registration Statement or any amendment or supplement to any Prospectus, the Time of Sale Disclosure Package or the Prospectus, (iii) of the time and date that any post-effective amendment to the Registration Statement becomes effective and (iv) of the issuance by the Commission of any stop order suspending the effectiveness of the Registration Statement or any post-effective amendment thereto or of any order preventing or suspending its use or the use of any Prospectus, the Time of Sale Disclosure Package, the Prospectus or any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus, or of any proceedings to remove, suspend or terminate from listing or quotation the Common Stock from any securities exchange upon which it is
 
listed for trading or included or designated for quotation, or of the threatening or initiation of any proceedings for any of such purposes. If the Commission shall enter any such stop order at any time, the Company will use its reasonable efforts to obtain the lifting of such order at the earliest possible moment. Additionally, the Company agrees that it shall comply with the provisions of Rules 424(b), 430A and 430B, as applicable, under the Securities Act and will use its reasonable efforts to confirm that any filings made by the Company under Rule 424(b) or Rule 433 were received in a timely manner by the Commission (without reliance on Rule 424(b)(8) or Rule 164(b)).
(iii) (A) During the Prospectus Delivery Period, the Company will comply as far as it is able with all requirements imposed upon it by the Securities Act, as now and hereafter amended, and by the Rules and Regulations, as from time to time in force, and by the Exchange Act so far as necessary to permit the continuance of sales of or dealings in the Securities as contemplated by the provisions hereof, the Time of Sale Disclosure Package, and the Registration Statement and the Prospectus. If during such period any event occurs as a result of which the Prospectus (or if the Prospectus is not yet available to prospective purchasers, the Time of Sale Disclosure Package ) would include an untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact necessary to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances then existing, not misleading, or if during such period it is necessary or appropriate in the opinion of the Company or its counsel or the Underwriter or counsel to the Underwriter to amend the Registration Statement or supplement the Prospectus (or if the Prospectus is not yet available to prospective purchasers, the Time of Sale Disclosure Package ) to comply with the Securities Act or to file under the Exchange Act any document which would be deemed to be incorporated by reference in the Prospectus in order to comply with the Securities Act or the Exchange Act, the Company will promptly notify the Underwriter and will amend the Registration Statement or supplement the Prospectus (or if the Prospectus is not yet available to prospective purchasers, the Time of Sale Disclosure Package) or file such document (at the expense of the Company) so as to correct such statement or omission or effect such compliance.
(B) If at any time following issuance of an Issuer Free Writing Prospectus there occurred or occurs an event or development as a result of which such Issuer Free Writing Prospectus conflicted or would conflict with the information contained in the Registration Statement, the Statutory Prospectus or the Prospectus or included or would include an untrue statement of a material fact or omitted or would omit to state a material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances prevailing at that subsequent time, not misleading, the Company has promptly notified or promptly will notify the Underwriter and has promptly amended or will promptly amend or supplement, at its own expense, such Issuer Free Writing Prospectus to eliminate or correct such conflict, untrue statement or omission.
(iv) The Company shall take or cause to be taken all necessary action to qualify the Securities for sale under the securities laws of such jurisdictions as the Underwriter reasonably designates and to continue such qualifications in effect so long as required for the distribution of the Securities, except that the Company shall not be
 
required in connection therewith to qualify as a foreign corporation or to execute a general consent to service of process in any state.
(v) The Company will furnish to the Underwriter and counsel for the Underwriter copies of the Registration Statement, the Prospectus, any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus, and all amendments and supplements to such documents, in each case as soon as available and in such quantities as the Underwriter may from time to time reasonably request.
(vi) The Company will make generally available to its security holders as soon as practicable, but in any event not later than 15 months after the end of the Company's current fiscal quarter, an earnings statement (which need not be audited) covering a 12-month period that shall satisfy the provisions of Section 11(a) of the Securities Act and Rule 158 of the Rules and Regulations.
(vii) The Company, whether or not the transactions contemplated hereunder are consummated or this Agreement is terminated, will pay or cause to be paid (A) all expenses (including transfer taxes allocated to the respective transferees) incurred in connection with the delivery to the Underwriter of the Securities, (B) all expenses and fees (including, without limitation, fees and expenses of the Company's counsel) in connection with the preparation, printing, filing, delivery, and shipping of the Registration Statement (including the financial statements therein and all amendments, schedules, and exhibits thereto), the Securities, the Prospectus, any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus and any amendment thereof or supplement thereto, and the printing, delivery, and shipping of this Agreement and other underwriting documents, including Blue Sky Memoranda (covering the states and other applicable jurisdictions), (C) all filing fees and fees and disbursements of the Underwriter's counsel incurred in connection with the qualification of the Securities for offering and sale by the Underwriter or by dealers under the securities or blue sky laws of the states and other jurisdictions which the Underwriter shall designate, (D) the fees and expenses of any transfer agent or registrar, (E) the filing fees and fees and disbursements of Underwriter's counsel incident to any required review and approval by the National Association of Securities Dealers, Inc. of the terms of the sale of the Securities, (F) listing fees, if any, and (G) all other costs and expenses incident to the performance of its obligations hereunder that are not otherwise specifically provided for herein. If this Agreement is terminated by the Underwriter pursuant to Section 8(i), (ii) or (iii) hereof or if the sale of the Securities provided for herein is not consummated by reason of any failure, refusal or inability on the part of the Company to perform any, agreement on its part to be performed, or because any other condition of the Underwriter's obligations hereunder required to be fulfilled by the Company is not fulfilled, the Company will reimburse the Underwriter for all out-of-pocket disbursements (including but not limited to fees and disbursements of counsel, printing expenses, travel expenses, postage, facsimile and telephone charges) incurred by the Underwriter in connection with their investigation, preparing to market and marketing the Securities or in contemplation of performing their obligations hereunder. Notwithstanding anything contained herein, the maximum amount payable by the Company for Underwriter's counsel fees, disbursements and expenses pursuant to this Section 4(a)(vii) shall be $50,000.
 
(viii) The Company will apply the net proceeds from the sale of the Securities to be sold by it hereunder for the purposes set forth in the Time of Sale Disclosure Package and in the Prospectus.
(ix) The Company has not taken and will not take, directly or indirectly, any action designed to or which might reasonably be expected to cause or result in, or which has constituted, the stabilization or manipulation of the price of any security of the Company to facilitate the sale or resale of the Securities
(x) The Company will not incur any liability for any finder's or broker's fee or agent's commission in connection with the execution and delivery of this Agreement or the consummation of the transactions contemplated hereby.
(xi) During the Prospectus Delivery Period, the Company will file on a timely basis with the Commission such periodic and special reports as required by the Rules and Regulations.
(xii) The Company and its subsidiaries will maintain such controls and other procedures, including without limitation those applicable to the Company and required by Sections 302 and 906 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act and the applicable regulations thereunder, that are designed to ensure that information required to be disclosed by the Company in the reports that it files or submits under the Exchange Act is recorded, processed, summarized and reported within the time periods specified in the Commission's rules and forms, including without limitation, controls and procedures designed to ensure that information required to be disclosed by the Company in the reports that it files or submits under the Exchange Act is accumulated and communicated to the Company's management, including its principal executive officer and its principal financial officer, or persons performing similar functions, as appropriate to allow timely decisions regarding required disclosure, to ensure that material information relating to Company, including its subsidiaries, is made known to them by others within those entities.
(xiii) The Company and its subsidiaries will substantially comply with all effective applicable provisions of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act.
(xiv) The Company represents and agrees that, unless it obtains the prior written consent of the Underwriter, and the Underwriter represents and agrees that, unless it obtains the prior written consent of the Company, it has not made and will not make any offer relating to the Securities that would constitute an "issuer free writing prospectus," as defined in Rule 433 under the Securities Act, or that would otherwise constitute a "free writing prospectus," as defined in Rule 405 under the Securities Act, required to be filed with the Commission; provided that the prior written consent of the parties hereto shall be deemed to have been given in respect of the free writing prospectuses included in Schedule I. Any such free writing prospectus consented to by the Company and the Underwriter is hereinafter referred to as a "." The Company represents that it has treated or agrees that it will treat each Permitted Free Writing Prospectus as an "issuer free writing prospectus," as defined in
Permitted Free Writing Prospectus
 
Rule 433, and has complied and will comply with the requirements of Rule 433 applicable to any Permitted Free Writing Prospectus, including timely Commission filing where required, legending and record keeping.
The obligations of the Underwriter hereunder are subject to the accuracy, as of the date hereof and at the Closing Date (as if made at the Closing Date), of and compliance with all representations, warranties and agreements of the Company contained herein, to the performance by the Company of its obligations hereunder and to the following additional conditions:
5. Conditions of the Underwriter's Obligations.
(a) If filing of the Prospectus, or any amendment or supplement thereto, or any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus, is required under the Securities Act or the Rules and Regulations, the Company shall have filed the Prospectus (or such amendment or supplement) or such Issuer Free Writing Prospectus with the Commission in the manner and within the time period so required (without reliance on Rule 424(b)(8) or Rule 164(b)); the Registration Statement shall remain effective; no stop order suspending the effectiveness of the Registration Statement or any part thereof, or any amendment thereof, nor suspending or preventing the use of the Time of Sale Disclosure Package, the Prospectus or any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus shall have been issued; no proceedings for the issuance of such an order shall have been initiated or threatened; any request of the Commission for additional information (to be included in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Disclosure Package, the Prospectus, any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus or otherwise) shall have been complied with to the Underwriter's satisfaction; and the NASD shall have raised no objection to the fairness and reasonableness of the underwriting terms and arrangements.
(b) The Underwriter shall not have reasonably determined, and advised the Company, that the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Disclosure Package or the Prospectus, or any amendment thereof or supplement thereto, or any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus, contains an untrue statement of fact which, in the Underwriter's reasonable opinion, is material, or omits to state a fact which, in the Underwriter's reasonable opinion, is material and is required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading.
(c) Except as contemplated in the Time of Sale Disclosure Package in the Prospectus, subsequent to the respective dates as of which information is given in the Time of Sale Disclosure Package, neither the Company nor any of its subsidiaries shall have incurred any material liabilities or obligations, direct or contingent, or entered into any material transactions, or declared or paid any dividends or made any distribution of any kind with respect to its capital stock; and there shall not have been any change in the capital stock (other than a change in the number of outstanding shares of Common Stock due to the issuance of shares upon the exercise of outstanding options or warrants), or any material change in the short-term or long-term debt of the Company, or any issuance of options, warrants, convertible securities or other rights to purchase the capital stock of the Company or any of its subsidiaries, or any Material Adverse Change (whether or not arising in the ordinary course of business), or any loss by strike, fire, flood, earthquake, accident or other calamity, whether or not covered by insurance, incurred by the Company or any subsidiary, the effect of which, in any such case described above, in the Underwriter's judgment, makes it impractical or inadvisable to offer or deliver the Securities on
or
 
the terms and in the manner contemplated in the Time of Sale Disclosure Package, the Registration Statement and in the Prospectus.
(d) On or after the Time of Sale (i) no downgrading shall have occurred in the rating accorded any of the Company's securities by any "nationally recognized statistical organization," as that term is defined by the Commission for purposes of Rule 436(g)(2) under the Securities Act, and (ii) no such organization shall have publicly announced that it has under surveillance or review, with possible negative implications, its rating of any of the Company's securities.
(e) On the Closing Date, there shall have been furnished to the Underwriter the opinion of Fenwick & West LLP, counsel for the Company, dated the Closing Date and addressed to the Underwriter, in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to the Underwriter, to the effect set forth in Schedule II.
In rendering such opinion such counsel may rely (i) as to matters of law other than California, Delaware and federal law, upon the opinion or opinions of local counsel provided that the extent of such reliance is specified in such opinion and that such counsel shall state that such opinion or opinions of local counsel are satisfactory to them and that they believe they and the Underwriter are justified in relying thereon and (ii) as to matters of fact, to the extent such counsel deems reasonable upon certificates of officers of the Company and its subsidiaries provided that the extent of such reliance is specified in such opinion.
(f) On the Closing Date, the Underwriter shall have received a letter of Deloitte & Touche LLP, dated the Closing Date and addressed to the Underwriter, confirming that they are independent public accountants within the meaning of the Securities Act and are in compliance with the applicable requirements relating to the qualifications of accountants under Rule 2-01 of Regulation S-X of the Commission, and stating, as of the date of such letter (or, with respect to matters involving changes or developments since the respective dates as of which specified financial information is given in the Time of Sale Disclosure Package, as of a date not prior to the date hereof or more than five days prior to the date of such letter), the conclusions and findings of said firm with respect to the financial information and other matters covered by its letter delivered to the Underwriter concurrently with the execution of this Agreement, and the effect of the letter so to be delivered on the Closing Date shall be to confirm the conclusions and findings set forth in such prior letter.
(g) On the Closing Date, there shall have been furnished to the Underwriter a certificate, dated the Closing Date and addressed to the Underwriter, signed by the chief executive officer or the chief financial officer of the Company, in their capacity as officers of the Company, to the effect that:
(i) The representations and warranties of the Company in this Agreement are true and correct, in all material respects, as if made at and as of the Closing Date, and the Company has complied with all the agreements and satisfied all the conditions on its part to be performed or satisfied at or prior to the Closing Date;
 
(ii) No stop order or other order suspending the effectiveness of the Registration Statement or any part thereof or any amendment thereof or the qualification of the Securities for offering or sale nor suspending or preventing the use of the Time of Sale Disclosure Package, the Prospectus or any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus, has been issued, and no proceeding for that purpose has been instituted or, to the best of their knowledge, is contemplated by the Commission or any state or regulatory body; and
(iii) The signers of said certificate have carefully examined the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Disclosure Package and the Prospectus, and any amendments thereof or supplements thereto (including any documents filed under the Exchange Act and deemed to be incorporated by reference into the Time of Sale Disclosure Package, the Registration Statement or the Prospectus), and
(A) each part of the Registration Statement and the Prospectus, and any amendments thereof or supplements thereto (including any documents filed under the Exchange Act and deemed to be incorporated by reference into the Prospectus) contain, and contained, when such part of the Registration Statement (or such amendment) became effective, all statements and information required to be included therein, each part of the Registration Statement, or any amendment thereof, does not contain, and did not contain, when such part of the Registration Statement (or such amendment) became effective, any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state, and did not omit to state when such part of the Registration Statement (or such amendment) became effective, any material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading, and the Prospectus, as amended or supplemented, does not include and did not include as of its date, or the time of first use within the meaning of the Rules and Regulations, any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state and did not omit to state as of its date, or the time of first use within the meaning of the Rules and Regulations, a material fact necessary to make the statements therein, in light of the circumstances under which they were made,
(B) neither (1) the Time of Sale Disclosure Package nor (2) any individual Issuer Limited-Use Free Writing Prospectus, when considered together with the Time of Sale Disclosure Package, include, nor included as of the Time of Sale any untrue statement of a material fact or omits, or omitted as of the Time of Sale, to state any material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading.
(C) since the Time of Sale, there has occurred no event required to be set forth in an amended or supplemented prospectus which has not been so set forth, and no event which has required that there be filed under the Exchange Act any report that upon such filing would be deemed to be incorporated by reference into the Time of Sale Disclosure Package, the Registration Statement or into the Prospectus that has not been so filed,
(D) subsequent to the respective dates as of which information is given in the Time of Sale Disclosure Package, neither the Company nor any of its
 
subsidiaries has incurred any material liabilities or obligations, direct or contingent, or entered into any material transactions, not in the ordinary course of business, or declared or paid any dividends or made any distribution of any kind with respect to its capital stock, and except as disclosed in the Time of Sale Disclosure Package in the Prospectus, there has not been any change in the capital stock (other than a change in the number of outstanding shares of Common Stock due to the issuance of shares upon the exercise of outstanding options or warrants), or any material change in the short-term or long-term debt, or any issuance of options, warrants, convertible securities or other rights to purchase the capital stock, of the Company, or any of its subsidiaries, or any Material Adverse Change or any development involving a prospective Material Adverse Change (whether or not arising in the ordinary course of business), or any loss by strike, fire, flood, earthquake, accident or other calamity, whether or not covered by insurance, incurred by the Company or any subsidiary, and
or
(E) except as stated in the Time of Sale Disclosure Package in the Prospectus, there is not pending, or, to the knowledge of the Company, threatened or contemplated, any action, suit or proceeding to which the Company or any of its subsidiaries is a party before or by any court or governmental agency, authority or body, or any arbitrator, which could reasonably be expected to result in any Material Adverse Change.
or
(h) The Company shall have furnished to the Underwriter and counsel for the Underwriter such additional documents, certificates and evidence as the Underwriter or counsel for the Underwriter may have reasonably requested.
All such opinions, certificates, letters and other documents will be in compliance with the provisions hereof only if they are satisfactory in form and substance to the Underwriter and counsel for the Underwriter. The Company will furnish the Underwriter with such conformed copies of such opinions, certificates, letters and other documents as the Underwriter shall reasonably request.
6. Indemnification and Contribution.
(a) The Company agrees to indemnify and hold harmless the Underwriter against any losses, claims, damages or liabilities to which the Underwriter may become subject, under the Securities Act or otherwise (including in settlement of any litigation if such settlement is effected with the written consent of the Company), insofar as such losses, claims, damages or liabilities (or actions in respect thereof) arise out of or are based upon (i) an untrue statement or alleged untrue statement of a material fact contained in the Registration Statement, including the information deemed to be a part of the Registration Statement at the time of effectiveness and at any subsequent time pursuant to Rules 430A and 430B of the Rules and Regulations, the Time of Sale Disclosure Package, the Prospectus, or any amendment or supplement thereto (including any documents filed under the Exchange Act and deemed to be incorporated by reference into the Prospectus), any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus or in any materials or information provided to investors by, or with the approval of, the Company in connection with the marketing of the offering of the Common Stock (""), including any roadshow or investor
Marketing Materials
 
presentations made to investors by the Company (whether in person or electronically) or arise out of or are based upon the omission or alleged omission to state therein a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading, and will reimburse the Underwriter for any legal or other expenses reasonably incurred by it in connection with investigating or defending against such loss, claim, damage, liability or action; or (ii) in whole or in part upon any inaccuracy in the representations and warranties of the Company contained herein; or (iii) in whole or in part upon any failure of the Company to perform its obligations hereunder or under law; , that the Company shall not be liable in any such case to the extent that any such loss, claim, damage, liability or action arises out of or is based upon an untrue statement or alleged untrue statement or omission or alleged omission made in the Registration Statement, any Preliminary Prospectus, the Time of Sale Disclosure Package, the Prospectus, or any such amendment or supplement, any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus or in any Marketing Materials, in reliance upon and in conformity with written information furnished to the Company by the Underwriter specifically for use in the preparation thereof.
provided, however
The Company agrees that, as an interim measure during the pendency of any claim, action, investigation, inquiry or other proceeding arising out of or based upon any statement or omission, or any alleged statement or omission, described in this Section 6(a), it will reimburse the Underwriter on a monthly basis for all reasonable legal fees or other expenses incurred in connection with investigating or defending any such claim, action, investigation, inquiry or other proceeding, notwithstanding the absence of a judicial determination as to the propriety and enforceability of the Company's obligation to reimburse the Underwriter for such expenses and the possibility that such payments might later be held to have been improper by a court of competent jurisdiction. To the extent that any such interim reimbursement payment is so held to have been improper, the Underwriter shall promptly return it to the Company, together with interest, compounded daily, determined on the basis of the prime rate (or other commercial lending rate for borrowers of the highest credit standing) announced from time to time by Wells Fargo Bank, N.A. (the ). Any such interim reimbursement payments which are not made to the Underwriter within 30 days of a written request for reimbursement shall bear interest at the Prime Rate from the date of such request. This indemnity agreement shall be in addition to any liabilities which the may otherwise have.
"Prime Rate"
(b) The Underwriter will indemnify and hold harmless the Company against any losses, claims, damages or liabilities to which the Company may become subject, under the Securities Act or otherwise (including in settlement of any litigation, if such settlement is effected with the written consent of such Underwriter), insofar as such losses, claims, damages or liabilities (or actions in respect thereof) arise out of or are based upon an untrue statement or alleged untrue statement of a material fact contained in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Disclosure Package, the Prospectus, or any amendment or supplement thereto any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus or any marketing materials, or arise out of or are based upon the omission or alleged omission to state therein a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading, in each case to the extent, but only to the extent, that such untrue statement or alleged untrue statement or omission or alleged omission was made in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Disclosure Package, the Prospectus, or any amendment or supplement thereto, or any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus or any marketing materials in reliance upon and in conformity with written information furnished to
 
the Company by the Underwriter specifically for use in the preparation thereof, and will reimburse the Company for any legal or other expenses reasonably incurred by the Company in connection with investigating or defending against any such loss, claim, damage, liability or action.
The Company agrees that, as an interim measure during the pendency of any claim, action, investigation, inquiry or other proceeding arising out of or based upon any statement or omission, or any alleged statement or omission, described in this Section 6(b), it will reimburse the Underwriter on a monthly basis for all reasonable legal fees or other expenses incurred in connection with investigating or defending any such claim, action, investigation, inquiry or other proceeding, notwithstanding the absence of a judicial determination as to the propriety and enforceability of the Company's obligation to reimburse the Underwriter for such expenses and the possibility that such payments might later be held to have been improper by a court of competent jurisdiction. To the extent that any such interim reimbursement payment is so held to have been improper, the Underwriter shall promptly return it to the Company, together with interest, compounded daily, determined on the basis of the prime rate (or other commercial lending rate for borrowers of the highest credit standing) announced from time to time by Wells Fargo Bank, N.A. (the ). Any such interim reimbursement payments which are not made to the Underwriter within 30 days of a written request for reimbursement shall bear interest at the Prime Rate from the date of such request. This indemnity agreement shall be in addition to any liabilities which the may otherwise have.
"Prime Rate"
(c) Promptly after receipt by an indemnified party under subsection (a) or (b) above of notice of the commencement of any action, such indemnified party shall, if a claim in respect thereof is to be made against the indemnifying party under such subsection, notify the indemnifying party in writing of the commencement thereof; but the omission so to notify the indemnifying party shall not relieve the indemnifying party from any liability that it may have to any indemnified party except to the extent such indemnifying party has been materially prejudiced by such failure. In case any such action shall be brought against any indemnified party, and it shall notify the indemnifying party of the commencement thereof, the indemnifying party shall be entitled to participate in, and, to the extent that it shall wish, jointly with any other indemnifying party similarly notified, to assume the defense thereof, with counsel satisfactory to such indemnified party, and after notice from the indemnifying party to such indemnified party of the indemnifying party's election so to assume the defense thereof, the indemnifying party shall not be liable to such indemnified party under such subsection for any legal or other expenses subsequently incurred by such indemnified party in connection with the defense thereof other than reasonable costs of investigation; provided, however, that if (i) the indemnified party has reasonably concluded (based on advice of counsel) that there may be legal defenses available to it or other indemnified parties that are different from or in addition to those available to the indemnifying party, (ii) or a conflict or potential conflict exists (based on advice of counsel to the indemnified party) between the indemnified party and the indemnifying party (in which case the indemnifying party will not have the right to direct the defense of such action on behalf of the indemnified party), or (iii) the indemnifying party has not in fact employed counsel reasonably satisfactory to the indemnified party to assume the defense of such action with a reasonable time after receiving notice of the commencement of the action, the indemnified party shall have the right to employ a single counsel to represent it in any claim in respect of which indemnity may be sought under subsection (a) or (b) of this Section 6, in which event the reasonable fees and
 
expenses of such separate counsel shall be borne by the indemnifying party or parties and reimbursed to the indemnified party as incurred (in accordance with the provisions of the second paragraph in subsection (a) above).
The indemnifying party under this Section 6 shall not be liable for any settlement of any proceeding effected without its written consent, but if settled with such consent or if there be a final judgment for the plaintiff, the indemnifying party agrees to indemnify the indemnified party against any loss, claim, damage, liability or expense by reason of such settlement or judgment. No indemnifying party shall, without the prior written consent of the indemnified party, effect any settlement, compromise or consent to the entry of judgment in any pending or threatened action, suit or proceeding in respect of which any indemnified party is or could have been a party and indemnity was or could have been sought hereunder by such indemnified party, unless such settlement, compromise or consent (a) includes an unconditional release of such indemnified party from all liability on claims that are the subject matter of such action, suit or proceeding and (b) does not include a statement as to or an admission of fault, culpability or a failure to act by or on behalf of any indemnified party.
(d) If the indemnification provided for in this Section 6 is unavailable or insufficient to hold harmless an indemnified party under subsection (a) or (b) above, then each indemnifying party shall contribute to the amount paid or payable by such indemnified party as a result of the losses, claims, damages or liabilities referred to in subsection (a) or (b) above, (i) in such proportion as is appropriate to reflect the relative benefits received by the Company on the one hand and the Underwriter on the other from the offering of the Securities or (ii) if the allocation provided by clause (i) above is not permitted by applicable law, in such proportion as is appropriate to reflect not only the relative benefits referred to in clause (i) above but also the relative fault of the Company on the one hand and the Underwriter on the other in connection with the statements or omissions that resulted in such losses, claims, damages or liabilities, as well as any other relevant equitable considerations. The relative benefits received by the Company on the one hand and the Underwriter on the other shall be deemed to be in the same proportion as the total net proceeds from the offering (before deducting expenses) received by the Company bear to the total underwriting discounts and commissions received by the Underwriter, in each case as set forth in the table on the cover page of the Prospectus. The relative fault shall be determined by reference to, among other things, whether the untrue or alleged untrue statement of a material fact or the omission or alleged omission to state a material fact relates to information supplied by the Company or the Underwriter and the parties' relevant intent, knowledge, access to information and opportunity to correct or prevent such untrue statement or omission. The Company and the Underwriter agree that it would not be just and equitable if contributions pursuant to this subsection (d) were to be determined by pro rata allocation or by any other method of allocation which does not take account of the equitable considerations referred to in the first sentence of this subsection (d). The amount paid by an indemnified party as a result of the losses, claims, damages or liabilities referred to in the first sentence of this subsection (d) shall be deemed to include any legal or other expenses reasonably incurred by such indemnified party in connection with investigating or defending against any action or claim which is the subject of this subsection (d). Notwithstanding the provisions of this subsection (d), the Underwriter shall not be required to contribute any amount in excess of the amount by which the total price at which the Securities were offered to the public exceeds the amount of any damages that the Underwriter has otherwise been required to pay by reason of
 
such untrue or alleged untrue statement or omission or alleged omission. No person guilty of fraudulent misrepresentation (within the meaning of Section 11(f) of the Securities Act) shall be entitled to contribution from any person who was not guilty of such fraudulent misrepresentation.
(e) The obligations of the Company under this Section 6 shall be in addition to any liability which the Company may otherwise have and the benefits of such obligations shall extend, upon the same terms and conditions, to each person, if any, who controls the Underwriter within the meaning of the Securities Act; and the obligations of the Underwriter under this Section 6 shall be in addition to any liability that the Underwriter may otherwise have and the benefits of such obligations shall extend, upon the same terms and conditions, to each director of the Company (including any person who, with his consent, is named in the Registration Statement as about to become a director of the Company), to each officer of the Company who has signed the Registration Statement and to each person, if any, who controls the Company within the meaning of the Securities Act.
(f) The Underwriter confirms and the Company acknowledges that there is no information concerning the Underwriter furnished in writing to the Company by the Underwriter specifically for inclusion in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Disclosure Package, the Prospectus or any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus.
All representations, warranties, and agreements of the Company herein or in certificates delivered pursuant hereto, including but not limited to the agreements of the Underwriter and the Company contained in Section 6 hereof, shall remain operative and in full force and effect regardless of any investigation made by or on behalf of the Underwriter or any controlling person thereof, or the Company or any of its officers, directors, or controlling persons, and shall survive delivery of, and payment for, the Securities to and by the Underwriter hereunder.
7. Representations and Agreements to Survive Delivery.
8. Termination of this Agreement.
(a) The Underwriter shall have the right to terminate this Agreement by giving notice to the Company as hereinafter specified at any time at or prior to the Closing Date, if (i) the Company shall have failed, refused or been unable, at or prior to the Closing Date, to perform any material agreement on its part to be performed hereunder, (ii) any condition of the Underwriter's obligations hereunder is not fulfilled, (iii) trading in the Company's Common Stock shall have been suspended by the Commission or the American Stock Exchange or trading in securities generally on the Nasdaq Global Market, New York Stock Exchange or the American Stock Exchange shall have been suspended, (iv) minimum or maximum prices for trading shall have been fixed, or maximum ranges for prices for securities shall have been required, on the Nasdaq Global Market, New York Stock Exchange or the American Stock Exchange, by such Exchange or by order of the Commission or any other governmental authority having jurisdiction, (v) a banking moratorium shall have been declared by federal or California or New York state authorities, or (vi) there shall have occurred any attack on, outbreak or escalation of hostilities or act of terrorism involving the United States, any declaration by the United States of a national emergency or war, any change in financial markets, any substantial change or development involving a prospective substantial change in United States or international political, financial or economic conditions, or any other calamity or crisis that, in
 
the Underwriter's judgment, is material and adverse and makes it impractical or inadvisable to proceed with the completion of the sale of and payment for the Securities. Any such termination shall be without liability of any party to any other party except that the provisions of Section 4(a)(vii) and Section 6 hereof shall at all times be effective and shall survive such termination.
(b) If the Underwriter elects to terminate this Agreement as provided in this Section, the Company shall be notified promptly by the Underwriter by telephone, confirmed by letter.
If the Company shall fail at the Closing Date to sell and deliver the Securities which it is obligated to sell hereunder, then this Agreement shall terminate without any liability on the part of the Underwriter or, except as provided in Section 4(a)(vii), any non-defaulting party. No action taken pursuant to this Section shall relieve the Company from liability, if any, in respect of such default.
9. Default the Company.
Except as otherwise provided herein, all communications hereunder shall be in writing and, if to the Underwriter, shall be mailed, delivered or telecopied to Roth Capital Partners, LLC, 24 Corporate Plaza, Newport Beach, CA 92660, Attn: Aaron Gurewitz; if to the Company, shall be mailed, delivered or telecopied to it at 1501 Industrial Road, San Carlos, California 94070, Attention: James B. Hawkins; or in each case to such other address as the person to be notified may have requested in writing. Any party to this Agreement may change such address for notices by sending to the parties to this Agreement written notice of a new address for such purpose.
10. Notices.
This Agreement shall inure to the benefit of and be binding upon the parties hereto and their respective successors and assigns and the controlling persons, officers and directors referred to in Section 6. Nothing in this Agreement is intended or shall be construed to give to any other person, firm or corporation any legal or equitable remedy or claim under or in respect of this Agreement or any provision herein contained. The term "successors and assigns" as herein used shall not include any purchaser, as such purchaser, of any of the Securities from the Underwriter.
11. Persons Entitled to Benefit of Agreement.
The Company acknowledges and agrees that: (a) the Underwriter has been retained solely to act as underwriter in connection with the sale of the Securities and that no fiduciary, advisory or agency relationship between the Company and the Underwriter has been created in respect of any of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement, irrespective of whether the Underwriter has advised or is advising the Company on other matters; (b) the price and other terms of the Securities set forth in this Agreement were established by the Company following discussions and arms-length negotiations with the Underwriter and the Company is capable of evaluating and understanding and understands and accepts the terms, risks and conditions of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement; (c) it has been advised that the Underwriter and its affiliates are engaged in a broad range of transactions which may involve interests that differ from those of the Company and that the Underwriter has no obligation to disclose such interest and transactions to the Company by virtue of any fiduciary, advisory or agency relationship; (d) it has been advised that the Underwriter is acting, in respect of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement, solely for the benefit of the Underwriter, and not on behalf of the Company.
12. Absence of Fiduciary Relationship.
 
This Agreement shall be governed by and construed in accordance with the laws of the State of California.
13. Governing Law.
This Agreement may be executed in one or more counterparts and, if executed in more than one counterpart, the executed counterparts shall each be deemed to be an original and all such counterparts shall together constitute one and the same instrument.
14. Counterparts.
 
Please sign and return to the Company the enclosed duplicates of this letter whereupon this letter will become a binding agreement between the Company and the Underwriter in accordance with its terms.
 
Confirmed as of the date first above-
mentioned by the Underwriter.
ROTH CAPITAL PARTNERS, LLC
 
Number of Securities Purchased
2,300,000
 
None.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Natus Acquisition Corporation (d/b/a Neometrics, Inc., a Division of Natus) (Delaware)
Bio-logic Systems Corp. (Delaware)
Bio-logic Holding Inc. (Delaware)
Bio-logic Systems Corporation Ltd. (Israel)
Bio-logic Finance Corp. (Delaware)
Natus Neonatal Ltd. (United Kingdom)
Fischer-Zoth Diagnosesysteme GmbH (Germany)
Fischer-Zoth GmbH (Austria)
Fischer-Zoth Modulare Hordiagnostik GmBH & Co KG (German limited partnership)
 
On August 17, 2006, the Company priced the transaction that we previously discussed with you. The public offering price was determined to be $11.63 per share or an aggregate $26,749,000 for the 2,300,000 shares offered. Our underwriting discount is 5%, amounting to a rate of $0.5815 per share (except for the 350,000 shares sold to D
3
Family Fund, L.P., D
3
Family Bulldog Fund, L.P., D
3
 Offshore Fund, L.P., or affiliated individuals and investment funds, collectively the "D
3
Family Funds") or $1,133,925. The proceeds, before expenses to the Company, are $11.63 on those shares sold to the D
3
Family Funds and $11.137 per share on all other shares sold, or $25,615,075. On August 17, 2006, the last reported sale price of the Company's common stock on the Nasdaq Global Market was $11.63 per share.
The Company has entered into an underwriting agreement with us with respect to 2,300,000 shares of common stock which are being offered pursuant to a prospectus supplement. Pursuant to the underwriting agreement the Company has agreed to sell to us, and we have agreed to purchase from the Company, an aggregate of 2,300,000 shares of common stock.
We propose to offer to the public (including the shares sold to D
3
Family Funds) the shares of common stock purchased pursuant to the underwriting agreement at the public offering price of $11.63 per share. In connection with the sale of the shares of common stock to be purchased by us, we will be deemed to have received compensation in the form of underwriting discounts (except for the shares sold to D
3
Family Funds). Our commission and discount (except for the shares sold to D
3
Family Funds) will be 5%, amounting to $0.5815 per share of common stock for a total of $1,133,925. The Company will bear the expenses of the offering which are estimated to be $125,000. The net proceeds to the Company, after our commission and discount and the offering expenses, will be $25,490,075.
Pursuant to the underwriting agreement, the Company has agreed to indemnify us, in our role as underwriter, and certain other parties against certain liabilities, including liabilities under the Securities Act, or to contribute to payments which we or such other indemnified parties may be required to make in respect of any such liabilities.
The estimated net proceeds to the Company if it sells the maximum number of shares offered in this offering, including the over-allotment option, will be $29,301,807, after deducting our commission and discount and estimated offering expenses of $1,459,543. The Company expects to use the net proceeds to it from this offering for general corporate purposes, which may include the financing of acquisitions of, or investments in, companies and technologies that complement our business; capital expenditures or additions to our working capital. We may also use a portion of the proceeds to repay some portion or all of the remaining balance of approximately $7.5 million under our senior secured credit facility with Wells Fargo Bank, the terms of which are described in "Use of Proceeds" in the base prospectus.
 

Exhibit 5.01
Natus Medical Incorporated
1501 Industrial Road
San Carlos, CA 94070
Ladies and Gentlemen:
At your request, we have examined the Registration Statement on Form S-3 (File Number 333-133480) (the "") filed by Natus Medical Incorporated, a Delaware corporation (the ""), with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the "") on April 24, 2006, as amended on August 9, 2006 and August 15, 2006, as subsequently supplemented by the prospectus filed with the Commission on August 18, 2006, and the prospectus supplement applicable to the Offering (as defined below), in connection with the registration under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, of the proposed issuance and sale, from time to time, by the Company of shares of its common stock having a maximum aggregate public offering price of One Hundred Million Dollars ($100,000,000) (the "").
Registration Statement
Company
Commission
Stock
The Company currently proposes to sell up to an aggregate of 2,300,000 shares (the "") of the Company's common stock, par value of $0.001 per share (the ""), under the Registration Statement (the ""), all of which will be sold to the Underwriter (as defined herein) pursuant to that certain Purchase Agreement (the "") dated August 17, 2006, by and between the Company and Roth Capital Partners LLC (the "").
Takedown Shares
Common Stock
Offering
Purchase Agreement
Underwriter
In rendering this opinion, we have examined such matters of fact as we have deemed necessary in order to render the opinion set forth herein, which included examination of the following:
 
 
 
 
Natus Medical Incorporated
August 18, 2006
Page 2 of 4
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
In our examination of documents for purposes of this opinion, we have assumed, and express no opinion as to, the authenticity and completeness of all documents submitted to us as originals, the genuineness of all signatures on original documents, the conformity to originals and completeness of all documents submitted to us as copies, the legal capacity of all persons or entities executing the same, the lack of any undisclosed termination, modification, waiver or amendment to any documents reviewed by us, and the due authorization, execution and delivery of all documents where authorization, due execution and delivery are prerequisites to the effectiveness thereof. We have also assumed that, if and to the extent that the Takedown Shares are issued in certificated form, the certificates representing the Takedown Shares will be, when issued, in the form of the certificate reviewed by us and properly signed by authorized officers of the Company or their agents.
As to matters of fact relevant to this opinion, we have relied solely upon our examination of the documents referred to above and have assumed the current accuracy and completeness of the information included in the documents referred to above and the representations and warranties made by representatives of the Company to us, including but not limited to those set forth in the Management Certificate. We have made no independent investigation or other attempt to verify the accuracy of any of such information or to determine the existence or non-existence of any other factual matters; however, we are not aware of any facts that would cause us to believe that the opinion expressed herein is not accurate.
Natus Medical Incorporated
August 18, 2006
Page 3 of 4
In connection with our opinion expressed below, we have assumed that, at or prior to the time of the delivery of any of the Takedown Shares, there will not have occurred any change in law affecting the validity of the Takedown Shares.
This opinion is limited to such California State and United States of America federal laws or statutes, the General Corporation Law of the State of Delaware as in effect on the date hereof, rules or regulations of any California State and United States of America federal courts or arbitrators or governmental or regulatory authorities, or consents, approvals, authorizations, orders, registrations or qualifications of or with any United States federal or California State court, arbitratoradministrative agency or governmental or regulatory authority, as in our experience are generally applied to transactions of the type provided for in the Purchase Agreement. We express no opinion herein with respect to any other laws or to the application of the laws of any other jurisdiction. Additionally, we disclaim any opinion as to the application of any law of any city, county or other local subdivision of the States of California and Delaware. We have made no inquiry into, and express no opinion with respect to, any statutes, rules, regulations, treaties or common laws of any other nation, state or jurisdiction, or the effect on the transactions provided for in the Purchase Agreement of non-compliance under any such statutes, rules, regulations, treaties or common law. The opinions expressed herein are qualified by, and are subject to, and we express no opinion with respect to, compliance by the Company or the Underwriter with any state or foreign "blue sky" statute, rule or regulation in connection with the issuance and sale of the Securities pursuant to the Purchase Agreement.
,
Based upon the foregoing, it is our opinion that the Takedown Shares, when issued, sold and delivered in the manner and for the consideration stated in the Registration Statement, the Base Prospectus, and Prospectus Supplement and pursuant to the terms of the Underwriting Agreement, will be validly issued, fully paid and nonassessable.
We consent to the use of this opinion as an exhibit to the Form 8-K and further consent to all references to us, if any, in the Registration Statement, the Base Prospectus and Prospectus Supplement constituting a part thereof and any amendments thereto. This opinion is intended solely for use in connection with the issuance and sale of Takedown Shares subject to the Registration Statement and is not to be relied upon for any other purpose. This opinion speaks as of the date first above written, and we assume no obligation to advise you of any fact, circumstance, event or change in the law or the facts that may hereafter be brought to our attention whether or not such occurrence would affect or modify the opinions expressed herein.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BABY/BABY-8K-20060823060922.txt.gz
TIME:20060823060922
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
Item 8.01. Other Events.
As previously announced, on August 17, 2006 Natus Medical Incorporated ("Natus") entered into a common stock purchase agreement (the "Purchase Agreement") with Roth Capital Partners, LLC (the "Underwriter"). The Purchase Agreement provides for the sale of 2,300,000 shares of Natus common stock at a price to the Underwriter of $11.0485 per share (the "Offering"). Natus also granted the Underwriter an option to purchase up to 345,000 additional shares solely to cover over-allotments, if any. These shares are being offered and sold under a prospectus supplement filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission pursuant to Rule 424(b)(2) of the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, in connection with an offering pursuant to Natus's shelf registration statement on Form S-3 (Registration No. 333-133480) (the "Registration Statement").
On August 22, 2006 the Underwriter advised the Company that it was exercising in full its over-allotment option granted pursuant to the Purchase Agreement. In connection with the exercise of the over-allotment, Natus is filing a legal opinion and consent as Exhibit No. 5.01 and Exhibit No. 23.01 to this report, which are incorporated by reference into the Registration Statement.
The above description of the Purchase Agreement is qualified in its entirety by the Purchase Agreement, a copy of which is attached as Exhibit 1.01 to the Company's report on Form 8-K filed with the SEC on August 18, 2006.
Item 9.01. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS, PRO FORMA FINANCIAL INFORMATION AND EXHIBITS.
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 

Exhibit 5.01
Natus Medical Incorporated
1501 Industrial Road
San Carlos, CA 94070
Ladies and Gentlemen:
At your request, we have examined the Registration Statement on Form S-3 (File Number 333-133480) (the "") filed by Natus Medical Incorporated, a Delaware corporation (the ""), with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the "") on April 24, 2006, as amended on August 9, 2006 and August 15, 2006, as subsequently supplemented by the prospectus filed with the Commission on August 18, 2006, and the prospectus supplement applicable to the Offering (as defined below), in connection with the registration under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, of the proposed issuance and sale, from time to time, by the Company of shares of its common stock having a maximum aggregate public offering price of One Hundred Million Dollars ($100,000,000) (the "").
Registration Statement
Company
Commission
Stock
The Company currently proposes to sell up to an aggregate of 345,000 shares (the "") of the Company's common stock, par value of $0.001 per share (the ""), under the Registration Statement (the ""), all of which will be sold to the Underwriter (as defined herein) pursuant to the election by the Underwriter to exercise in full the over-allotment option granted pursuant to that certain Purchase Agreement (the "") dated August 17, 2006, by and between the Company and Roth Capital Partners LLC (the "").
Takedown Shares
Common Stock
Offering
Purchase Agreement
Underwriter
In rendering this opinion, we have examined such matters of fact as we have deemed necessary in order to render the opinion set forth herein, which included examination of the following:
 
 
Natus Medical Incorporated
August 23, 2006
Page 2 of 4
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
In our examination of documents for purposes of this opinion, we have assumed, and express no opinion as to, the authenticity and completeness of all documents submitted to us as originals, the genuineness of all signatures on original documents, the conformity to originals and completeness of all documents submitted to us as copies, the legal capacity of all persons or entities executing the same, the lack of any undisclosed termination, modification, waiver or amendment to any documents reviewed by us, and the due authorization, execution and delivery of all documents where authorization, due execution and delivery are prerequisites to the effectiveness thereof. We have also assumed that, if and to the extent that the Takedown Shares are issued in certificated form, the certificates representing the Takedown Shares will be, when issued, in the form of the certificate reviewed by us and properly signed by authorized officers of the Company or their agents.
Natus Medical Incorporated
August 23, 2006
Page 3 of 4
 
As to matters of fact relevant to this opinion, we have relied solely upon our examination of the documents referred to above and have assumed the current accuracy and completeness of the information included in the documents referred to above and the representations and warranties made by representatives of the Company to us, including but not limited to those set forth in the Management Certificate. We have made no independent investigation or other attempt to verify the accuracy of any of such information or to determine the existence or non-existence of any other factual matters; however, we are not aware of any facts that would cause us to believe that the opinion expressed herein is not accurate.
In connection with our opinion expressed below, we have assumed that, at or prior to the time of the delivery of any of the Takedown Shares, there will not have occurred any change in law affecting the validity of the Takedown Shares.
This opinion is limited to such California State and United States of America federal laws or statutes, the General Corporation Law of the State of Delaware as in effect on the date hereof, rules or regulations of any California State and United States of America federal courts or arbitrators or governmental or regulatory authorities, or consents, approvals, authorizations, orders, registrations or qualifications of or with any United States federal or California State court, arbitratoradministrative agency or governmental or regulatory authority, as in our experience are generally applied to transactions of the type provided for in the Purchase Agreement. We express no opinion herein with respect to any other laws or to the application of the laws of any other jurisdiction. Additionally, we disclaim any opinion as to the application of any law of any city, county or other local subdivision of the States of California and Delaware. We have made no inquiry into, and express no opinion with respect to, any statutes, rules, regulations, treaties or common laws of any other nation, state or jurisdiction, or the effect on the transactions provided for in the Purchase Agreement of non-compliance under any such statutes, rules, regulations, treaties or common law. The opinions expressed herein are qualified by, and are subject to, and we express no opinion with respect to, compliance by the Company or the Underwriter with any state or foreign "blue sky" statute, rule or regulation in connection with the issuance and sale of the Securities pursuant to the Purchase Agreement.
,
Based upon the foregoing, it is our opinion that the Takedown Shares, when issued, sold and delivered in the manner and for the consideration stated in the Registration Statement, the Base Prospectus, and Prospectus Supplement and pursuant to the terms of the Underwriting Agreement, will be validly issued, fully paid and nonassessable.
We consent to the use of this opinion as an exhibit to the Form 8-K and further consent to all references to us, if any, in the Registration Statement, the Base Prospectus and Prospectus Supplement constituting a part thereof and any amendments thereto. This opinion is intended solely for use in connection with the issuance and sale of Takedown Shares subject to the Registration Statement and is not to be relied upon for any other purpose. This opinion speaks as
Natus Medical Incorporated
August 23, 2006
Page 4 of 4
 
of the date first above written, and we assume no obligation to advise you of any fact, circumstance, event or change in the law or the facts that may hereafter be brought to our attention whether or not such occurrence would affect or modify the opinions expressed herein.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BABY/BABY-8K-20060915163433.txt.gz
TIME:20060915163433
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
Item 1.01. Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement.
The Company is a party to a Credit Agreement dated January 4, 2006 with Wells Fargo Bank under which it borrowed $10 million to complete the acquisition of Bio-logic Systems Corp. in January 2006, and under which $7.75 million in principal amount was outstanding at June 30, 2006. The loan is repayable over a four-year period.
On September 12, 2006, the Company and Wells Fargo Bank entered into the Third Amendment to the Credit Agreement primarily to modify certain terms and covenants in the agreement associated with the Company's planned acquisition of DELTAMED SA. The Company completed the acquisition of DELTAMED SA on September 12, 2006.
The Amendment is attached hereto as Exhibit 10.01.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 

E 10.01
XHIBIT
THIS THIRD AMENDMENT TO CREDIT AGREEMENT (this ) is entered into as of September 12, 2006, by and between NATUS MEDICAL INCORPORATED, a Delaware corporation (), and WELLS FARGO BANK, NATIONAL ASSOCIATION ().
"Amendment"
"Borrower"
"Bank"
WHEREAS, Borrower is currently indebted to Bank pursuant to the terms and conditions of that certain Credit Agreement, dated as of January 4, 2006 (as amended, modified and/or supplemented from time to time, the ), by and between Borrower and Bank.
"Credit Agreement"
WHEREAS, Borrower has requested that Bank permit Borrower to make certain changes in the terms and conditions set forth in the Credit Agreement.
WHEREAS, Bank has agreed to Borrower's request to amend the Credit Agreement upon the terms and conditions of this Amendment.
NOW, THEREFORE, for valuable consideration, the receipt and sufficiency of which are hereby acknowledged, the parties hereto agree that the Credit Agreement shall be amended as follows:
1. . Each capitalized term used but not otherwise defined herein has the meaning assigned to it in the Credit Agreement.
Definitions
2. . The Credit Agreement is hereby amended as follows:
Amendments to Credit Agreement
(a) Article I, , is hereby amended by adding to such Article, in correct alphabetic order, each of the following new definitions:
Definitions
means that certain Asset Purchase Agreement, dated on or about September 11, 2006, between the "Seller," as named therein, and Borrower, as presented to, and found to be satisfactory to, Bank.
"Purchase Agreement"
means the purchase or acquisition by Borrower from Seller of certain product lines of Seller specified in the Purchase Agreement, so long as each of the following conditions is satisfied with respect to such purchase or acquisition: (i) the Closing Date (as defined in the Purchase Agreement) occurs on or before September 30, 2006; (ii) the total aggregate cost of such purchase or acquisition (including, without limitation, the assumption of indebtedness or payment of cash or other consideration in connection with such purchase or acquisition) does not exceed $1,475,000.00; (iii) after giving effect to such purchase or acquisition, no Event of Default or condition, event or act which with the giving of notice or the
"Permitted Acquisition"
passage of time or both would constitute such an Event of Default, shall exist, and (iv) such purchase or acquisition is made pursuant to the terms and provisions of the Purchase Agreement.
means Borrower's capital contribution to one or more Domestic Subsidiaries and/or Foreign Subsidiaries of Borrower's ownership interests in Specified Foreign Subsidiaries.
"Permitted Capital Contribution"
means the Seller, as such party is defined in the Purchase Agreement.
"Seller"
means DeltaMed SA, a organized under the laws of France, acquired pursuant to that certain Share Purchase Agreement executed on or about August 31, 2006, as presented to, and found to be satisfactory to, Bank, and each wholly owned subsidiary of DeltaMed SA in existence as of the Third Amendment Closing Date, whether owned by Borrower directly or indirectly through one or more Domestic Subsidiaries and/or Foreign Subsidiaries of Borrower.
"Specified Foreign Subsidiaries"
socit anonyme
means September 12, 2006.
"Third Amendment Closing Date"
(b) Article I, , is hereby amended by amending and restating in their entirety each of the following definitions in such Article:
Definitions
means, as of any date of determination, Tangible Net Worth as of such date of determination Five Million One Hundred Thousand Dollars ($5,100,000.00) the greater of (i) zero and (ii) the difference between the Base Date Bio-logic DTL and the Bio-logic DTL as of such date of determination.
"Adjusted Tangible Net Worth"
plus
minus
means each of Natus Neonatal, a company organized under the laws of the United Kingdom, Fischer-Zoth Diagnosesysteme GmbH, a company organized under the laws of Germany, Fischer-Zoth Diagnosesysteme GmbH, a company organized under the laws of Austria, and any other corporation, association, partnership, limited liability company, joint venture or other business entity of which more than 50% of the voting stock, membership interests or other equity interests (in the case of entities other than corporations), is owned or controlled directly or indirectly by Borrower, or one or more of the subsidiaries of Borrower, or a combination thereof, and which is organized under the laws of a country (or political subdivision thereof) other than the United States of America.
"Foreign Subsidiary"
"Permitted Investments" means:
(a) investments by Borrower existing as of, and disclosed to Bank prior to, the Closing Date;
(b) investments by Borrower in (i) marketable direct obligations issued or unconditionally guaranteed by the United States of America or any agency or any state thereof maturing within one year from the date of acquisition thereof, (ii) commercial paper maturing no more than one year from the date of creation thereof and currently having rating of at least A-2 or P-2 from either Standard & Poor's Corporation or Moody's Investors Service, (iii) Bank's certificates of deposit maturing no more than one year from the date of investment therein, and (iv) Bank's money market accounts;
(c) investments by Borrower consisting of the endorsement of negotiable instruments for deposit or collection or similar transactions in the ordinary course of business of Borrower;
(d) investments by Borrower consisting of deposit accounts in which Bank has a first priority perfected security interest;
(e) investments by Borrower in (i) Foreign Subsidiaries that are not Specified Foreign Subsidiaries not to exceed $250,000.00 in the aggregate in any fiscal year and (ii) Specified Foreign Subsidiaries not to exceed $5,000,000 at any time;
(f) investments by Borrower in Domestic Subsidiaries;
(g) investments by Borrower not to exceed $100,000.00 in the aggregate in any fiscal year consisting of (i) travel advances and employee relocation loans and other employee loans and advances in the ordinary course of business, and (ii) loans to employees, officers or directors relating to the purchase of equity securities of Borrower pursuant to employee stock purchase plans or agreements approved by Borrower's board of directors;
(h) investments (including debt obligations) by Borrower not to exceed $50,000.00 in the aggregate outstanding at any time received in connection with the bankruptcy or reorganization of customers or suppliers and in settlement of delinquent obligations of, and other disputes with, customers or suppliers arising in the ordinary course of business;
(i) investments by Borrower not to exceed $50,000.00 in the aggregate outstanding at any time consisting of notes receivable of, or prepaid royalties and other credit extensions, to customers and suppliers who are not affiliates, in the ordinary course of business; that this paragraph (i) shall not apply to investments of Borrower in any Subsidiary;
provided
(j) the Permitted Acquisition; and
(k) other investments by Borrower not otherwise described in paragraphs (a) through (i) above not exceeding $100,000.00 in the aggregate outstanding at any time.
(c) Section 2.4, , is hereby amended and restated in its entirety as follows:
Collateral
SECTION 2.4. COLLATERAL.
As security for all indebtedness of Borrower to Bank created by the Loan Documents, Borrower hereby grants to Bank security interests of first priority (except for Permitted Liens that are senior to Bank's security interests), in all Borrower's personal property (including, without limitation, all Borrower's accounts receivable, inventory, equipment and intellectual property now owned or hereafter acquired), but excluding interests as a lessee under real property and personal property leases and shares of voting stock of each Foreign Subsidiary that represent more than 65% of the voting stock of such Foreign Subsidiary.
As additional security for all indebtedness of Borrower to Bank created by the Loan Documents, Borrower shall cause Bio-logic to grant to Bank security interests of first priority in all Bio-logic's personal property (including, without limitation, all Bio-logic's accounts receivable, inventory, equipment and intellectual property now owned or hereafter acquired), but excluding interests as a lessee under real property and personal property leases.
As additional security for all indebtedness of Borrower to Bank created by the Loan Documents, Borrower shall cause each Domestic Subsidiary and each Foreign Subsidiary to grant to Bank security interests of first priority in all such Domestic Subsidiary's or Foreign Subsidiary's ownership interest in any other Domestic Subsidiary or Foreign Subsidiary, but excluding shares of voting stock of each Foreign Subsidiary that represent more than 65% of the voting stock of such Foreign Subsidiary and, with respect to each Foreign Subsidiary, subject to the time frames established in Section 5.13 hereof.
As security for all indebtedness of Borrower to Bank created by the Loan Documents, Borrower shall cause Bio-logic to grant to Bank a lien of not less than first priority on that certain real property located at One Bio-logic Plaza, Mundelein, IL 60060 (the ); that Bank acknowledges and agrees that the Real Property Collateral includes the 14 Acre Parcel and that, pursuant to the consummation of the sale of the 14 Acre Parcel pursuant to the terms and conditions of that certain Real Estate Purchase Agreement, dated April 15, 2005, between Avis Investments, Inc., and Bio-logic, a copy of which was provided to Bank prior to the date hereof, and payment in immediately available funds of the proceeds thereof to Borrower, Bank shall reconvey its interest in the 14 Acre Parcel arising pursuant to the mortgage executed by Borrower pursuant to the terms of this Section 2.4.
"Real Property Collateral"
provided
All of the foregoing shall be evidenced by and subject to the terms of such security agreements, financing statements, deeds or mortgages, and other documents as Bank shall reasonably require, all in form and substance satisfactory to Bank. Borrower shall
reimburse Bank immediately upon demand for all costs and expenses incurred by Bank in connection with any of the foregoing security, including without limitation, filing and recording fees and costs of appraisals, audits and title insurance.
(d) Article V, , is hereby amended by amending and restating in its entirety Section 5.13 as follows:
Affirmative Covenants
SECTION 5.13. FOREIGN SUBSIDIARIES. By not later than (i) with respect to each Foreign Subsidiary in existence as of the Closing Date, sixty (60) calendar days after the Closing Date, and (ii) with respect to each Foreign Subsidiary formed or acquired on or after the Closing Date, forty-five (45) calendar days after the formation or acquisition of such Foreign Subsidiary, Borrower shall execute, or cause to be executed, such further agreements, documents or instruments, or take such other actions, as Bank reasonably deems necessary in order to effectuate the pledge to Bank of security interests in Borrower's, and/or Borrower's subsidiaries', ownership interest in such Foreign Subsidiary (such pledge exclusive of shares of voting stock of such Foreign Subsidiary that represent more than 65% of the voting stock of such Foreign Subsidiary, as described in Section 2.4 hereof), including, without limitation, (i) executing and delivering to each such Foreign Subsidiary, a notice of the pledge of Borrower's and/or Borrower's subsidiaries' interests therein to Bank, (ii) causing such Foreign Subsidiary to execute and deliver to Bank an acknowledgment of pledge related to Borrower's and/or such subsidiaries' pledge of its or their interest in such Foreign Subsidiary, and (iii) delivering to Bank stock certificates (or comparable certificates of ownership) evidencing Borrower's and/or such subsidiaries' ownership interest in such Foreign Subsidiary, accompanied by appropriate assignments separate from stock certificates, in each case, in form in substance satisfactory to Bank.
(e) Article VI, , is hereby amended by amending and restating in its entirety Section 6.5 as follows:
Negative Covenants
SECTION 6.5. MERGER, CONSOLIDATION, TRANSFER OF ASSETS. Merge into or consolidate with any other entity; make any substantial change in the nature of Borrower's business as conducted as of the date hereof; acquire all or substantially all of the assets of any other entity; nor sell, lease, transfer or otherwise dispose of all or a substantial or material portion of Borrower's assets except in the ordinary course of its business; that, notwithstanding the foregoing, Borrower may sell the 14 Acre Parcel as described in Section 5.12 hereof; that, notwithstanding the foregoing, Borrower may make the Permitted Acquisition; that, notwithstanding the foregoing, Borrower may make the Permitted Capital Contribution.
provided
provided, further,
provided, further,
(f) Article VIII, , is hereby amended by adding the following new Section 8.13 to such Article immediately after Section 8.12 thereof:
Miscellaneous
SECTION 8.13. OTHER INTERPRETIVE PROVISIONS. For purposes of this Agreement (a) the meanings of defined terms are equally applicable
to the singular and plural forms of the defined terms, (b) the words "hereof," "herein," "hereunder" and similar words refer to this Agreement as a whole and not to any particular provision of this Agreement, and subsection, Section, Schedule and Exhibit references are to this Agreement unless otherwise specified, (c) the term "documents" includes any and all instruments, documents, agreements, certificates, indentures, notices and other writings, however evidenced, (d) the term "including" is not limiting and means "including without limitation" and (e) the captions and headings of this Agreement are for convenience of reference only and shall not affect the interpretation of this Agreement.
(g) The Compliance Certificate attached hereto as shall replace in its entirety the form of Compliance Certificate attached to the Credit Agreement as Exhibit B thereto.
Exhibit B
3. The obligation of Bank to grant the changes provided under this Amendment is subject to the fulfillment to Bank's satisfaction of all of the following conditions by not later than September 12, 2006:
Conditions Precedent.
(a) . Bank shall have received, in form and substance satisfactory to Bank, each of the following, duly executed:
Documentation
 
 
 
 
 
(b) . No default or Event of Default under the Credit Agreement shall have occurred and be continuing (except for any such event that would exist but for the execution and delivery of this Amendment).
No Default
(c) . Payment in full by Borrower, in immediately available funds, of a non-refundable amendment fee of $5,000.00.
Amendment Fee
4. . Borrower shall pay to Bank immediately upon demand the full amount of all payments, advances, charges, costs and expenses, including reasonable attorneys' fees (to include outside counsel fees and all allocated costs of Bank's in-house counsel), expended or incurred by Bank in connection with the negotiation and preparation of this Amendment.
Fees and Expenses
5. . Except as specifically provided herein, all terms and conditions of the Credit Agreement remain in full force and effect, without waiver or modification. This Amendment and the Credit Agreement shall be read together, as one document. The Recitals hereto, including the terms defined therein, are incorporated herein by this reference and acknowledged by Borrower to be true, correct and accurate.
Interpretation
6. . Effective as of the date of this Amendment, Borrower hereby: (i) remakes all representations and warranties contained in the Credit Agreement; (ii) reaffirms all covenants set forth in the Credit Agreement; (iii) certifies that the corporate borrowing resolution, secretary's certificate and certificate of incumbency delivered in connection with the Credit Agreement are true and correct; (iv) represents and warrants to Bank that the copy of the Asset Purchase Agreement, to be dated on or about September 11, 2006, between the "Seller," as named therein, and Borrower, delivered by Borrower to Bank is a true and correct copy thereof, in substantially final form; (v) represents and warrants to Bank that the copy of the Share Purchase Agreement, executed on or about August 31, 2006, between the "Sellers," as named therein, and Borrower, delivered by Borrower to Bank is a true and correct copy thereof, in substantially final form; and (vi) confirms that no default or Event of Default under the Credit Agreement has occurred and is continuing (except for any such event that would exist but for the execution and delivery of this Amendment).
Representations, Warranties and Covenants
7. . Borrower will make, execute, endorse, acknowledge, and deliver any agreements, documents, or instruments, and take any and all other actions, as may from time to time be reasonably requested by Bank to perfect and maintain the validity and priority of the liens and security interests granted to Bank pursuant to the Credit Agreement and the other Loan Documents and to effect, confirm, or further assure or protect and preserve the interests, rights, and remedies of Bank under the Credit Agreement and the other Loan Documents.
Further Assurances
8. . This Amendment may be executed in any number of counterparts, each of which when executed and delivered shall be deemed to be an original, and all of which when taken together shall constitute one and the same Amendment. Each of the parties hereto understands and agrees that this Amendment (and any other document required herein) may be delivered by any party hereto and thereto either in the form of an executed original or an executed original sent by facsimile transmission to be followed promptly by delivery of a hard copy original, and that receipt by Bank of a facsimile transmitted document purportedly bearing the signature of a party shall bind such party with the same force and effect as the delivery of a hard copy original. Any failure by Bank to receive the hard copy executed original of such document shall not diminish the binding effect of receipt of the facsimile transmitted executed original of such document of the party whose hard copy page was not received by Bank.
Counterparts
9. . This Amendment shall be construed in accordance with the laws of the state of California, except to the extent Bank has greater rights or remedies under United States federal law, whether as a national bank or otherwise, in which case such choice of California law shall not be deemed to deprive Bank of such rights and remedies as may be available under United States federal law.
Governing Law
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have caused this Third Amendment to Credit Agreement to be executed as of the day and year first written above.
 
 
Bank under that certain Credit Agreement, dated as of January 4, 2006 (as amended, restated, modified and/or supplemented from time to time, the ""), between N M I, a Delaware corporation (the ""), and Bank.
Credit Agreement
ATUS
EDICAL
NCORPORATED
Borrower
This Compliance Certificate is delivered this day of, 20, by the undersigned, as a senior financial officer of Borrower to Bank in accordance with of the Credit Agreement.
            
                            
    
Section 5.3(f)
The undersigned hereby certifies that:
1. Attached hereto are the [consolidated annual audited] [consolidating quarterly unaudited] financial statements of Borrower presented fairly in accordance with GAAP that are required to be delivered pursuant to of the Credit Agreement for the period ending , (the "").
Section [5.3(a)] [5.3(b)]
                            
             
End Date
2. As of the date of this Compliance Certificate, no Default or Event of Default had occurred and was continuing.
3. The financial condition covenants and other compliance calculations and information set forth on attached hereto are true, complete and accurate on and as of the date of this Compliance Certificate.
Schedule 1
The foregoing certifications, together with the computations set forth in hereto, are made and delivered, and the financial statements referenced above are made or posted, as applicable, this day of, 200, pursuant to the provisions of the Credit Agreement.
Schedule 1
            
            
    
 
 
Each of the undersigned guarantors of all indebtedness of NATUS MEDICAL INCORPORATED, a Delaware corporation, to WELLS FARGO BANK, NATIONAL ASSOCIATION hereby: (i) consents to the foregoing Third Amendment to Credit Agreement; (ii) reaffirms its obligations under its respective Continuing Guaranty; (iii) reaffirms its waivers of each and every one of the defenses to such obligations as set forth in its respective Continuing Guaranty; and (iv) reaffirms that its obligations under its respective Continuing Guaranty are separate and distinct from the obligations of any other party under said Third Amendment to Credit Agreement and the other Loan Documents described therein.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BABY/BABY-8K-20061019153215.txt.gz
TIME:20061019153215
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Completion of Acquisition or Disposition of Assets	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Completion of Acquisition or Disposition of Assets
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
Item 1.01. Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement.
On October 16, 2006, Natus Medical Incorporated (the "Company") entered into a Stock Purchase Agreement (the "Stock Purchase Agreement") with Jay A. Jones and Mary J. Jones, sole stockholders (the "Stockholders") of Olympic Medical Corp., a Washington Corporation ("Olympic"), pursuant to which the Company purchased from the Stockholders all of the outstanding shares of capital stock of Olympic (the "Stock Purchase"). The purchase price for the acquisition consisted of a cash payment of approximately $16.6 million made at closing, a portion of which was placed in escrow as security for the Stockholders' representations and warranties, the assumption of Olympic's payables, including approximately $2.7 million of obligations due immediately following the closing, and the Company's promise to make specified cash payments over a three year period depending on sales of a product in the final stage of the Food and Drug Administration's approval process. A copy of the Stock Purchase Agreement is attached to this Current Report on Form 8-K as Exhibit 2.01. The foregoing description of the Stock Purchase Agreement and Stock Purchase does not purport to be complete and is qualified in its entirety by reference to the Stock Purchase Agreement, a copy of which is attached to this Current Report on Form 8-K as Exhibit 2.01.
On October 16, 2006, the Company issued a press release relating to the Stock Purchase, a copy of which is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1.
Item 2.01. Completion of Acquisition or Disposition of Assets.
On October 16, 2006, the Company completed its purchase of all of the outstanding shares of capital stock of Olympic, pursuant to the Stock Purchase Agreement described in Item 1.01 above. The foregoing description of the Stock Purchase Agreement and Stock Purchase does not purport to be complete and is qualified in its entirety by reference to the Stock Purchase Agreement, a copy of which is attached to this Current Report on Form 8-K as Exhibit 2.01.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 2.01
Final
 
 
 
 
STOCK PURCHASE AGREEMENT, dated as of October 16, 2006 (this ""), by and between Natus Medical Incorporated, a Delaware corporation ("") and Jay A. Jones and Mary J. Jones as husband and wife, (together, the ""), who represent the only stockholders of Olympic Medical Corp., a Washington corporation (the "").
Agreement
Natus
Stockholders
Company
A. The parties intend that, subject to the terms and conditions hereinafter set forth, Natus will purchase from Stockholders all of the outstanding shares of capital stock of the Company (the "", and also sometimes referred to herein as the "").
Transaction
Stock Purchase
B. Natus and the Stockholders desire to make certain representations, warranties, covenants and agreements in connection with the Transaction and to prescribe various conditions to the Transaction.
C. Concurrently with the execution of this Agreement and as a material inducement to the willingness of Natus to enter into this Agreement, Jay A. Jones is entering into an employment agreement and a non-competition and non-solicitation agreement with Natus (together, the "") substantially in the form of Exhibit A hereto, to become effective upon the Closing.
Employment Agreement
NOW, THEREFORE, in consideration of the foregoing and the mutual covenants and agreements herein contained, and intending to be legally bound hereby, Natus and Stockholders hereby agree as follows:
SECTION 1.01 .
Definitions
(a) For purposes of this Agreement:
"" of a specified person means a person who, directly or indirectly through one or more intermediaries, controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with, such specified person.
affiliate
"", with respect to any Shares, has the meaning ascribed to such term under Rule 13d-3(a) of the Exchange Act.
beneficial owner
"" means a day (a) other than Saturday or Sunday and (b) on which commercial banks are open for business in Seattle, Washington.
business day
"" means the Company's unaudited balance sheet as of June 30, 2006 included in the Company Financial Statements.
Company Balance Sheet
"" means (A) the Company's balance sheets dated December 31, 2003, December 31, 2004, December 31, 2005 and June 30, 2006, and (B) the Company's statements of operations, statements of cash flows and statements of changes in shareholders' equity for the year ended December 31, 2005 and for the 6-month period ended June 30, 2006, including any notes to the foregoing financial statements.
Company Financial Statements
"" means all IT Systems used in, intended to be used in, or held for use in connection with the business of the Company or any subsidiary.
Company IT Systems
"" (including the terms "" and "") means the possession, directly or indirectly, or as trustee or executor, of the power to direct or cause the direction of the management and policies of a person, whether through the ownership of voting securities, as trustee or executor, by contract or credit arrangement or otherwise.
control
controlled by
under common control with
"" means any United States federal, state, local or non United States laws, statutes, ordinances, regulations, rules, codes, orders, other requirements of law and common law relating to (i) releases or threatened releases of Hazardous Substances or materials containing Hazardous Substances; (ii) exposure or alleged exposure to Hazardous Substances; (iii) the manufacture, handling, transport, recycling, reclamation, use, treatment, storage or disposal of Hazardous Substances or materials containing Hazardous Substances; or (iv) pollution, natural resource damages or protection of the environment, health or safety.
Environmental Laws
"" means any trade or business (whether or not incorporated) under common control with the Company or any subsidiary and which, together with the Company or any subsidiary, is treated as a single employer within the meaning of Section 414(b), (c), (m) or (o) of the Code.
ERISA Affiliate
"" means the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended.
Exchange Act
"" means generally accepted accounting principles in the United States.
GAAP
"" means (i) those substances defined in or regulated under the following United States federal statutes and their state and local counterparts, as each may be amended from time to time, and all regulations thereunder: the Hazardous Materials Transportation Act, the Resource Conservation and Recovery Act, the Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation and Liability Act, the Clean Water Act, the Safe Drinking Water Act, the Atomic Energy Act, the Federal Insecticide, Fungicide, and Rodenticide Act and the Clean Air Act; (ii) petroleum and petroleum products, including crude oil and any fractions thereof; (iii) natural gas, synthetic gas, and any mixtures thereof; (iv) polychlorinated biphenyls, asbestos, mold and radon; and (v) any other contaminant, substance, material or waste regulated by any Governmental Authority pursuant to any Environmental Law.
Hazardous Substances
"" means the following laws or regulations relating to the regulation of the healthcare industry (as such laws are currently enforced or as interpreted at the Closing by existing, publicly available judicial and administrative decisions and regulations): (i) Sections 1877, 1128, 1128A or 1128B of the Social Security Act (the ""); (ii) the licensure, certification or registration requirements of healthcare facilities, services or equipment; (iii) any state certificate of need or similar law governing the establishment of healthcare facilities or services or the making of healthcare capital expenditures; (iv) any state law relating to fee-splitting or the corporate practice of medicine; (v) any state physician self-referral prohibition or state anti-kickback law; (vi) any criminal offense relating to the delivery of, or claim for payment for, a healthcare item or service under any federal or state healthcare program; and (vii) any federal or state law relating to the interference with or obstruction of any investigation into any criminal offense.
Healthcare Law
SSA
 
"" means, collectively, all of the following worldwide legal rights, whether or not filed, perfected, registered or recorded, that may exist under the laws of any jurisdiction to and under all: (i) patents, patent applications, statutory invention registrations, patent rights, including all continuations, continuations-in-part, divisions, reissues, reexaminations or extensions thereof, whether now existing or hereafter filed, issues or acquired, and all inventions, whether or not patentable, (ii) trademarks, service marks, domain names, (including, but not limited to Internet domain names, Internet and World Wide Web URLs, and domain name registrations and pending applications therefore) trade dress, logos, trade names, corporate names, and other identifiers of source or goodwill, including registrations and applications for registration thereof, (iii) rights associated with works of authorship (including audiovisual works) including mask works and copyrights, including copyrights in Software, and registrations and applications for registration thereof, and (iv) rights relating to the protection of trade secrets, know-how, invention rights, and other confidential or proprietary technical, business and other information, including manufacturing and production processes and techniques, research and development information, technology, drawings, specifications, designs, plans, proposals, technical data, financial, marketing and business data, pricing and cost information, business and marketing plans, customer and supplier lists and information, and all rights in any jurisdiction to limit the use or disclosure thereof.
Intellectual Property
"" means computer systems, programs, networks, hardware, Software, databases, operating systems, Internet websites, website content and links and equipment used to process, store, maintain and operate data, information and functions.
IT Systems
"", or other references to Company's "knowledge", mean the actual knowledge of any director or executive officer of the Company and such knowledge that any such individual would obtain after the exercise of reasonable investigation.
knowledge of the Company
"" means Intellectual Property licensed to the Company or any subsidiary pursuant to the Licenses.
Licensed Intellectual Property
"" means (i) licenses of Intellectual Property or IT Systems by the Company or any subsidiary to any third party, (ii) licenses of Intellectual Property or IT Systems by any third party to the Company or any subsidiary, (iii) agreements between the Company or any subsidiary and any third party relating to the development or use of Intellectual Property or IT Systems, the development or transmission of data, or the use, modification, framing, linking, advertisement, or other practices with respect to Internet web sites, and (iv) consents, settlements, decrees, orders, injunctions, judgments or rulings governing the use, validity or enforceability of Owned Intellectual Property or any other Intellectual Property used in, intended to be used in, or held for use in connection with the business of the Company or any subsidiary.
Licenses
"" means with respect to any property or asset of the Company or any subsidiary, all mortgages, pledges, liens, security interests, conditional and installment sale agreements, encumbrances, charges or other claims of third parties of any kind with respect to such property or asset, including, without limitation, any easement, right of way or other encumbrance to title, or any option, right of first refusal, or right of first offer, but excluding in all cases Permitted Encumbrances.
Liens
 
"" means, when used in connection with the Company or any subsidiary, any event, circumstance, change or effect that, individually or in the aggregate with any other events, circumstances, changes and effects, is or is reasonably likely to be or become materially adverse to (i) the business, condition (financial or otherwise), assets, liabilities or results of operations of the Company and the subsidiaries taken as a whole or (ii) the ability of the Company to consummate the Transaction.
Material Adverse Effect
"" means any plan, contract or agreement required to be set forth on or of the Disclosure Schedule pursuant to or hereof.
Material Contract
Schedule 3.10(a)
Schedule 3.16(a)
Section 3.10(a)
Section 3.16(a)
"" means Intellectual Property owned by the Company or any subsidiary.
Owned Intellectual Property
"" means (A) liens for current Taxes and assessments not yet past due, (B) inchoate mechanics' and materialmen's liens for construction in progress, (C) workmen's, repairmen's, warehousemen's and carriers' liens arising in the ordinary course of business of the Company or such subsidiary consistent with past practice, and (D) all matters of record, liens and other imperfections of title and encumbrances that, would not, individually or in the aggregate, have a material adverse effect on the Company's or any subsidiary's, as the case may be, ability to occupy and utilize such property.
Permitted Encumbrances
"" means an individual, corporation, partnership, limited partnership, limited liability company, syndicate, person (including a "person" as defined in Section 13(d)(3) of the Exchange Act), trust, association or entity or government, political subdivision, agency or instrumentality of a government.
person
"" means computer software, programs and databases in any form, including Internet web sites, web content and links, all versions, updates, corrections, enhancements, and modifications thereof, and all related documentation.
Software
"" or "" of the Company, Natus or any other person means an affiliate controlled by such person, directly or indirectly, through one or more intermediaries.
subsidiary
subsidiaries
"" shall mean any and all taxes, fees, levies, duties, tariffs, imposts and other similar charges of any kind (together with any and all interest, penalties, additions to tax and additional amounts imposed with respect thereto) imposed by any Governmental Authority or taxing authority, including, without limitation: taxes or other charges on or with respect to income, franchise, windfall or other profits, gross receipts, property, sales, use, capital stock, payroll, employment, social security, workers' compensation, unemployment compensation or net worth; taxes or other charges in the nature of excise, withholding, ad valorem, stamp, transfer, value-added or gains taxes; license, registration and documentation fees; and customers' duties, tariffs and similar charges.
Taxes
 
"" means any return, report, declaration, estimate, claim for refund, or information return or statement relating to Taxes, including any schedule or attachment thereto, and including any amendment thereof.
Tax Return
(b) The following terms have the meaning set forth in the Sections set forth below:
 
 
SECTION 2.01 .
The Transaction
(a) Subject to the terms and conditions of this Agreement, Stockholders will sell to Natus, and Natus will purchase from Stockholders, 25,000 shares of Common Stock of the Company, par value $1 per share (the ""), which Shares represent all of the issued and outstanding shares of capital stock of the Company.
Shares
(b) The purchase price for the Shares shall consist of (i) a cash payment at Closing of $16,556,378.12 (less the Escrow Cash), and (ii) additional cash payments, if any, payable to Stockholders as further provided in subsection (c) below.
(c) Natus shall pay to the Stockholders, collectively and in the aggregate, the amounts set forth below as determined by future Cool Cap Revenue in the respective calendar years listed below:
(i) . For each full dollar of Cool Cap Revenue in 2007 in excess of $500,000, Natus shall pay Stockholders $0.63456, provided that the maximum amount that Natus shall pay Stockholders for Cool Cap Revenue in 2007 shall be $507,648, regardless of the Cool Cap Revenue for such year.
2007
(ii) . For each full dollar of Cool Cap Revenue in 2008 in excess of $1,000,000, Natus shall pay Stockholders $0.52881, provided that the maximum amount that Natus shall pay Stockholders for Cool Cap Revenue in 2008 shall be $846,080, regardless of the Cool Cap Revenue for such year.
2008
(iii) . For each full dollar of Cool Cap Revenue in 2009 in excess of $2,000,000, Natus shall pay Stockholders $0.39661, provided that the maximum amount that Natus shall pay Stockholders for Cool Cap Revenue in 2008 shall be $1,269,120, regardless of the Cool Cap Revenue for such year.
2009
Any payment due pursuant to subsection (i) above shall be made on, or at the discretion of Natus before, March 21, 2008, pursuant to subsection (ii) above shall be made on, or at the discretion of Natus before, March 23, 2009, and pursuant to subsection (iii) above shall be made on, or at the discretion of Natus before, March 22, 2010. Such payment(s), if any, shall be made by wire transfer to an account designated in advance by Stockholders, and shall be accompanied by a certificate of the chief financial officer or controller of Natus certifying on behalf of Natus as to the amount of Cool Cap Revenue for the respective year. On at least thirty (30) days' prior written notice from Stockholders to Natus given within ninety (90) days after Stockholders' receipt of any such payments, Stockholders shall have a right to audit the books and records of Natus to verify Cool Cap Revenue for the latest calendar year end. The parties intend the
 
payments (set forth in subsections (i) through (iii) above) to qualify for installment sale reporting under  453 of the Code. Such payments shall be treated as imputed interest to the extent required by the Code.
If the maximum payment in respect of Cool Cap Revenue is not earned in either of 2007 or 2008, such unearned amount shall not in any way increase the amount of payment in respect of Cool Cap Revenue in any subsequent year. By way of example, if Cool Cap Revenue is $1,000,000 in 2007 and $3,000,000 in 2008, then Natus shall pay Stockholders $317,280 in respect of Cool Cap Revenue in 2007 and $846,080 in respect of Cool Cap Revenue in 2008.
Natus shall use reasonable and good faith business efforts to obtain all governmental approvals for the sale of the Cool Cap Product and thereafter to promote, manufacture, market and sell the Cool Cap Product. In the event that Natus sells to a third party the Cool Cap Product, whether directly or by way of sale of a subsidiary that owns the right to produce and sell the Cool Cap Product, then within thirty days following such sale, Natus shall pay to Stockholders the full amount of any additional cash payments that Stockholders may be eligible to receive under this subsection (c) in respect of sales occurring in years that have not yet been completed as of the date of such sale.
For purposes of this Agreement, "" for any year shall be the amount of revenue recognized by Natus in its audited annual financial statements for the respective fiscal year from the sales of the Cool Cap Product in such year by Natus or any subsidiary of Natus. For purposes of this Agreement, "" shall mean a device developed by the Company for treating hypoxic ischemic encephalopathy in term newborns, FDA reference number P040025, including any design changes, or new models and improvements effecting either hardware or software, or derivative products that may be developed based solely on the Cool-Cap or any other intended uses of the Cool-Cap and its derivative products that may be approved by the FDA in the future. Natus hereby covenants to Stockholders that the revenue set forth in Natus' audited annual financial statements for 2007, 2008 and 2009 shall be reported in accordance with GAAP consistently applied over the periods presented. Cool Cap revenue for any fiscal year shall also include the amount of revenue from the sale of the Cool Cap Product recognized in such year by any person who has licensed from Natus or one of its subsidiaries the right to sell the Cool Cap Product, and for this purpose the amount of such revenue reported by such licensee to Natus, or one of its subsidiaries, shall be deemed to be the amount of such revenue recognized by such licensee; provided that if the amount of such revenue is subsequently adjusted pursuant to any audit right, correction-of-mistake or other provision of any agreement between Natus, or one of its subsidiaries, and any such licensee, then the amount of revenue as so adjusted shall be deemed to be the amount of revenue recognized by such licensee, and Natus shall pay to Stockholders any additional amount due if such adjustment increases the amount of such revenue and Stockholders shall repay to Natus any amount of overpayment that was made if such adjustment decreases the amount of such revenue.
Cool Cap Revenue
Cool Cap Product
SECTION 2.02 .
Closing
The closing ("") of the Transaction shall take place simultaneously with the execution of this Agreement on October 16, 2006 at the offices of Fenwick & West LLP, 801 California Street, Mountain View, California, or at such other time and place as the parties shall
Closing
 
mutually agree in writing (the date on which the Closing occurs being defined herein as the ""). At the Closing, Stockholders shall deliver to Natus stock certificates duly endorsed for transfer to Natus representing the Shares, and Natus shall deliver to Stockholders by wire transfer to an account previously designated by Stockholders the sum of $15,056,378.12 and shall deliver by wire transfer to the Escrow Agent, the Escrow Cash, which deliveries shall be in addition to the other documents or items to be delivered in accordance with the covenants and closing conditions contained herein.
Closing Date
SECTION 2.03 .
Escrow
On or prior to the Closing, Natus, Stockholders and Wells Fargo Bank, N.A., who shall be appointed as the escrow agent for the Transaction (""), shall enter into an Escrow Agreement substantially in the form of Exhibit B hereto. On the day of the Closing, Natus shall deposit $1,500,000 (and together with any interest earned thereon, the "") with the Escrow Agent. Any interest paid on the Escrow Cash shall be treated for tax purposes as owned by Stockholders.
Escrow Agent
Escrow Cash
As an inducement to Natus to enter into this Agreement, and subject to the disclosures set forth in the disclosure schedule prepared by Stockholders and delivered by Stockholders to Natus prior to the execution and delivery of this Agreement (the "") (each of which disclosures, in order to be effective, shall clearly indicate the Section and, if applicable, the Subsection of this to which it relates (unless and only to the extent the relevance to other representations and warranties is readily apparent from the actual text of the disclosures), and each of which disclosures shall also be deemed to be representations and warranties made by the Stockholders to Natus under this ), Stockholders hereby represents and warrants to Natus that:
Disclosure Schedule
Article III
Article III
SECTION 3.01 .
Organization and Qualification; Subsidiaries
(a) The Company is a corporation duly organized, validly existing and in good standing under the laws of the jurisdiction of its incorporation and has the requisite corporate power and authority and all necessary governmental approvals to own, lease and operate its properties and to carry on its business as it is now being conducted, except where the failure to be so organized, existing or in good standing or to have such power, authority and governmental approvals would not prevent or materially delay consummation of the Transaction and would not have a material effect on the Company. The Company is duly qualified or licensed as a foreign corporation to do business, and is in good standing, in each jurisdiction where the character of the properties owned, leased or operated by it or the nature of its business makes such qualification or licensing necessary, except for such failures to be so qualified or licensed and in good standing that would not prevent or materially delay consummation of the Transaction and would not have a material effect on the Company.
(b) The Company does not have any subsidiaries and does not directly or indirectly own any equity or similar interest in, or any interest convertible into or exchangeable or exercisable for any equity or similar interest in, any corporation, partnership, joint venture or other business association or entity.
 
SECTION 3.02 .
Articles of Incorporation and By-laws
The Company has heretofore made available to Natus a complete and correct copy of the Articles of Incorporation and the By-laws of the Company. Such Articles of Incorporation and By-laws are in full force and effect. The Company is not in violation of any of the provisions of its Articles of Incorporation or By-laws.
SECTION 3.03 .
Capitalization
(a) The authorized capital stock of the Company consists solely of 50,000 shares of $1 par value common stock. The Shares are the only issued and outstanding shares of capital stock of the Company and all of the Shares are validly issued, fully paid and nonassessable. There are no options, warrants or other rights, agreements, arrangements or commitments of any character relating to the issued or unissued capital stock of the Company or obligating the Company to issue or sell any shares of capital stock of, or other equity interests in, the Company. There are no outstanding contractual obligations of the Company to repurchase, redeem or otherwise acquire any Shares or to provide funds to, or make any investment (in the form of a loan, capital contribution or otherwise) in, any subsidiary or any other person. The Shares have been issued in compliance with all applicable securities laws and other applicable Laws. Stockholders are the record and beneficial owner of the Shares, free and clear of any charge, claim, community property interest, condition, equitable interest, Lien, option, pledge, security interest, right of first refusal or restriction of any kind, including any restriction on use, voting or transfer (any of the foregoing being an ""), and upon consummation of the Transaction in accordance with the terms hereof Natus will acquire title to the Shares free of any Encumbrance (other than any Encumbrance that may have been independently created by Natus).
Encumbrance
SECTION 3.04 .
Authority Relative to This Agreement
No corporate proceedings on the part of the Company are necessary for Stockholders' execution of this Agreement or consummation of the Transaction. This Agreement has been duly and validly executed and delivered by the Stockholders and, assuming the due authorization, execution and delivery by Natus, constitutes the legal, valid and binding obligation of Stockholders, enforceable against Stockholders in accordance with its terms.
SECTION 3.05 .
No Conflict; Required Filings and Consents
(a) The execution and delivery of this Agreement by Stockholders do not, and the performance of this Agreement by Stockholders will not, (i) conflict with or violate the Articles of Incorporation, By-laws of the Company, (ii) conflict with or violate any United States or non-United States national, state, provincial, municipal or local statute, law, ordinance, regulation, rule, code, executive order, injunction, judgment, decree or other order ("") applicable to Stockholders or the Company or by which any property or asset of Stockholders or the Company is bound or affected, or (iii) result in any breach of or constitute a default (or an event which, with notice or lapse of time or both, would become a default) under, or give to others any right of
Law
 
termination, amendment, acceleration or cancellation of, or result in the creation of a Lien or other encumbrance on any property or asset of Stockholders or the Company pursuant to, any material note, bond, mortgage, indenture, contract, agreement, lease, license, permit, franchise or other instrument or obligation to which Stockholders or the Company is a party or by which Stockholders or the Company or any material property or asset of Stockholders or the Company is bound or affected.
(b) The execution and delivery of this Agreement by Stockholders does not, and the performance of this Agreement by Stockholders will not, require any consent, approval, authorization or permit of, or filing with or notification to, any United States or non-United States national, state, provincial, municipal or local government, governmental, regulatory or administrative authority, agency, instrumentality or commission or any court, tribunal, or judicial or arbitral body (a "").
Governmental Authority
SECTION 3.06 .
Permits; Compliance
(a) of the Disclosure Schedule contains a complete and accurate list of all material franchises, grants, authorizations, licenses, permits, easements, variances, exceptions, consents, certificates, approvals and orders of any Governmental Authority necessary for the Company to own, lease and operate its properties or to carry on its business as it is now being conducted (the ""). The Company is in possession of all Permits. No suspension or cancellation of any of the Permits is pending or, to the knowledge of the Company, threatened. The Company is not, in any material respect, in conflict with, or in default, breach or violation of, (a) any Law applicable to the Company or by which any property or asset of the Company is bound or affected, including, without limitation, with respect to design, labeling, testing and inspection of the Company's products, and any Law of the United States Food and Drug Administration, or (b) any note, bond, mortgage, indenture, contract, agreement, lease, license, Permit, franchise or other instrument or obligation to which the Company is a party or by which the Company or any property or asset of the Company is bound.
Section 3.06
Permits
(b) Except as set forth in of the Disclosure Schedule, (i) the Company has not received, at any time since January 1, 2001, any formal notice or other formal communication from any Governmental Authority or any other person regarding (A) any actual, alleged, possible, or potential violation of or failure to comply with any term or requirement of any Permit, or (B) any actual, proposed, possible, or potential revocation, withdrawal, suspension, cancellation, termination of, or modification to any Permit, and (ii) all applications required to have been filed for the renewal of any Permit have been duly filed on a timely basis with the appropriate Governmental Authority, and all other filings required to have been made with respect to any such Permit have been duly made on a timely basis with the appropriate Governmental Authority.
Section 3.06
SECTION 3.07 .
Financial Statements
(a) of the Disclosure Schedule includes the Company Financial Statements. Except as otherwise disclosed on of the Disclosure Schedule, the Company Financial Statements: (a) are derived from and are in accordance with the books and records of the Company; (b) fairly present the financial condition of the Company at the dates
Section 3.07
Section 3.07
 
therein indicated and the results of operations and cash flows of the Company for the periods therein specified (subject, in the case of interim period financial statements, to normal recurring year-end audit adjustments, none of which individually or in the aggregate will be material in amount); (c) complied as to form in all material respects with applicable accounting requirements with respect thereto as of their respective dates, and (d) have been prepared in accordance with GAAP applied on a basis consistent with prior periods (except that the interim period financial statements do not have notes thereto).
(b) Except as and to the extent set forth on the Company Balance Sheet, the Company has no material liability or obligation of any nature (whether accrued, absolute, contingent or otherwise), except for liabilities and obligations, incurred in the ordinary course of business consistent with past practice since June 30, 2006. Without limiting the foregoing, the Company has no liability or obligation of any nature (whether absolute, accrued, contingent or otherwise) to Stockholders, any other officer or director of the Company or any family member of Stockholders or any other officer or director of the Company.
(c) All accounts receivable of the Company reflected on the Company Balance Sheet or arising thereafter have arisen from bona fide transactions in the ordinary course of business consistent with past practices and are reflected in accordance with GAAP applied on a consistent basis and are not subject to valid defenses, setoffs or counterclaims.
SECTION 3.08 .
Absence of Certain Changes or Events
Since December 31, 2005, except as set forth in of the Disclosure Schedule, or as expressly contemplated by this Agreement, (a) the Company has conducted its businesses only in the ordinary course and in a manner consistent with past practice, and (b) there has not been any Material Adverse Effect.
Section 3.08
SECTION 3.09 .
Absence of Litigation
Except as set forth in of the Disclosure Schedule, there is no private or governmental litigation, suit, claim, action, proceeding or investigation (an "") pending or, to the knowledge of the Company, threatened against the Company (or any of its respective directors, officers or employees (in their capacities as such or relating to their employment, services or relationship with the Company)), or any property or asset of the Company, before any Governmental Authority nor is there any Action that seeks to materially delay or prevent the consummation of the Transaction. Neither the Company nor any property or asset of the Company is subject to any continuing order of, consent decree, settlement agreement or similar written agreement with, or, to the knowledge of the Company, continuing investigation by, any Governmental Authority, or any order, writ, judgment, injunction, decree, determination or award of any Governmental Authority. The Company has no action, suit, proceeding, claim, mediation, arbitration or investigation pending against any other Person.
Section 3.09
Action
SECTION 3.10 .
Employee Benefit Plans
(a) of the Disclosure Schedule lists (i) all employee benefit plans (as defined in Section 3(3) of the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, as amended ("")) (including any self-insured arrangements that are clearly identified as such, and any
Section 3.10(a)
ERISA
 
stop-loss insurance policies issued in connection with such self-insured arrangements), and all incentive, deferred compensation, retiree medical or life insurance, supplemental retirement, severance or other benefit plans, programs or arrangements, and all employment, termination, severance or other contracts or agreements, whether legally enforceable or not, to which the Company is a party, with respect to which the Company has any obligation or which are maintained, contributed to or sponsored by the Company for the benefit of any current or former employee, officer or director of, or any current or former consultant to, the Company, (ii) each employee benefit plan for which the Company could incur liability under Section 4069 of ERISA in the event such plan has been or were to be terminated, (iii) any plan in respect of which the Company could incur liability under Section 4212(c) of ERISA, and (iv) any contracts (including loan agreements), arrangements or understandings between the Company and any employee of the Company including, without limitation, any contracts, arrangements or understandings relating in any way to a sale of the Company (collectively, the ""). Each Plan is in writing and the Company has furnished to Natus a true and complete copy of each Plan and has delivered to Natus a true and complete copy of each material document, if any, prepared in connection with each such Plan, including, without limitation, (i) a copy of each trust or other funding arrangement, (ii) each summary plan description and summary of material modifications, (iii) the three most recently filed Internal Revenue Service (the "") Form 5500s, (iv) the most recently received determination letter from the IRS for each such Plan, (v) the most recently prepared actuarial report and financial statement in connection with each such Plan and (vi) any stop-loss insurance policies pertaining to an employee welfare benefit plan (as defined in Section 3(1) of ERISA) that is self-insured. The Company has no express or implied commitment, whether legally enforceable or not, (i) to create, incur liability with respect to or cause to exist any other employee benefit plan, program or arrangement, (ii) to enter into any contract or agreement to provide compensation or benefits to any individual, or (iii) to modify, change or terminate any Plan, other than with respect to a modification, change or termination required by ERISA or the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended (the "").
Plans
IRS
Code
(b) Except for the Company's severance plan ("") that provides that the Company will pay to any employee (with exceptions noted in of the Disclosure Schedule) whose employment is terminated without cause within 12 months of the Closing a severance payment equal to one week of the employee's then current salary or wages for each full year of employment with the Company, all as more fully described in of the Disclosure Schedule, none of the Plans (i) provides for the payment of separation, severance, termination or similar-type benefits to any person, (ii) obligates the Company to pay separation, severance, termination or similar-type benefits solely or partially as a result of any transaction contemplated by this Agreement, or (iii) obligates the Company to make any payment or provide any benefit as a result of a "change in control", within the meaning of such term under Section 280G of the Code. None of the Plans provides for or promises retiree medical, disability or life insurance benefits to any current or former employee, officer or director of the Company. Each of the Plans is subject only to the Laws of the United States or a political subdivision thereof. of the Disclosure Schedule sets forth the amount that would be payable under the Severance Plan to each current employee of the Company if each such employee were terminated following the Closing Date on January 1, 2007.
Severance Plan
Section 3.10(b)
Section 3.10(b)
Section 3.10(b)
(c) Each Plan is now and always has been operated in all material respects in accordance with its terms and the requirements of all applicable Laws including, without
 
limitation, ERISA and the Code. The Company has performed all obligations required to be performed by it under, are not in any respect in default under or in violation of, and has no knowledge of any default or violation by any party to, any Plan. No Action is pending or, to the knowledge of the Company, threatened with respect to any Plan (other than claims for benefits in the ordinary course) and no fact or event exists that could reasonably be expected to give rise to any such Action.
(d) Each Plan that is intended to be qualified under Section 401(a) of the Code or Section 401(k) of the Code has timely received a favorable determination letter from the IRS covering all of the provisions applicable to the Plan for which determination letters are currently available that the Plan is so qualified and each trust established in connection with any Plan which is intended to be exempt from federal income taxation under Section 501(a) of the Code has received a determination letter from the IRS that it is so exempt, and no fact or event has occurred since the date of such determination letter or letters from the IRS to adversely affect the qualified status of any such Plan or the exempt status of any such trust.
(e) There has not been any prohibited transaction (within the meaning of Section 406 of ERISA or Section 4975 of the Code) with respect to any Plan. None of the Plans is subject to Title IV of ERISA and the Company has not incurred, or could reasonably be expected to incur, any liability under, arising out of or by operation of Title IV of ERISA.
(f) All contributions, premiums or payments required to be made with respect to any Plan have been made on or before their due dates. All such contributions have been fully deducted for income tax purposes and no such deduction has been challenged or disallowed by any Governmental Authority and no fact or event exists which could give rise to any such challenge or disallowance.
(g) All directors, officers, management employees, and technical and professional employees of the Company and the subsidiaries are under written obligation to the Company to maintain in confidence all confidential or proprietary information acquired by them in the course of their employment and to assign to the Company all inventions made by them within the scope of their employment during such employment and for a reasonable period thereafter.
(h) Except as set forth in of the Disclosure Schedule, no benefit payable or that may become payable by the Company pursuant to any agreement or arrangement or as a result of, in connection with or arising under this Agreement shall constitute a "parachute payment" (as defined in Section 280G(b)(2) of the Code) that is subject to the imposition of an excise tax under Section 4999 of the Code or that would not be deductible by reason of Section 280G of the Code. Unless otherwise indicated in of the Disclosure Schedule, the Company is not a party to any: (i) contract agreement or arrangement with any person (A) the benefits of which are contingent, or the terms of which are materially altered, upon the occurrence of a transaction involving the Company in the nature of the Stock Purchase or any of the other transactions contemplated by this Agreement, (B) providing any term of employment or compensation guarantee, or (C) providing severance benefits or other benefits after the termination of employment of such employee regardless of the reason for such termination of employment; or (ii) benefit plan or arrangement, any of the benefits of which shall be increased, or the vesting of benefits of which shall be accelerated, by the occurrence of the Stock Purchase
Section 3.10(h)
Section 3.10(h)
 
or any of the other transactions contemplated by this Agreement, or any event subsequent to the Stock Purchase such as the termination of employment of any person, or the value of any of the benefits of which shall be calculated on the basis of any of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement. Neither the Company nor any of its subsidiaries has any obligation to pay any material amount or provide any material benefit to any former employee or officer.
(i) The Company has no benefit plan which constitutes, or has since the enactment of ERISA, constituted, (i) a "multiemployer plan" as defined in Section 3(37) of ERISA, (ii) a "multiple employer plan" as defined in ERISA or Code Section 413(c), or (iii) a "funded welfare plan" within the meaning of Code Section 419. No pension plan of the Company is subject to Title IV of ERISA.
(j) All claims incurred as of the Closing Date under any "employee welfare benefit plan" as defined in Section 3(1) of ERISA that is self-insured will be paid by the Company no later than the Closing Date.
SECTION 3.11 .
Labor and Employment Matters
(a) Except as set forth in of the Disclosure Schedule, (i) there are no controversies pending or, to the knowledge of the Company, threatened between the Company and any of their respective employees and (ii) the Company is not a party to any collective bargaining agreement or other labor union contract applicable to persons employed by the Company, nor, to the knowledge of the Company, are there any activities or proceedings of any labor union to organize any such employees.
Section 3.11(a)
(b) The Company is in compliance with all applicable laws relating to the employment of labor, including those related to wages, hours, immigration and naturalization, collective bargaining and the payment and withholding of taxes and other sums as required by the appropriate Governmental Authority and has withheld and paid to the appropriate Governmental Authority or is holding for payment not yet due to such Governmental Authority all amounts required to be withheld from employees of the Company and is not liable for any arrears of wages, taxes, penalties or other sums for failure to comply with any of the foregoing. The Company has paid in full to all employees or adequately accrued for in accordance with GAAP consistently applied all wages, salaries, commissions, bonuses, benefits and other compensation due to or on behalf of such employees and there is no claim with respect to payment of wages, salary or overtime pay that has been asserted or is now pending or threatened before any Governmental Authority with respect to any persons currently or formerly employed by the Company. The Company is not a party to, or otherwise bound by, any consent decree with, or citation by, any Governmental Authority relating to employees or employment practices. Except as disclosed in of the Disclosure Schedule: (i) there is no charge or proceeding with respect to a violation of any occupational safety or health standards that has been asserted or is now pending or to the knowledge of the Company threatened with respect to the Company; (ii) there is no charge of discrimination in employment or employment practices, for any reason, including, without limitation, age, gender, race, religion or other legally protected category, which has been asserted or is now pending or to the knowledge of the Company threatened before the United States Equal Employment Opportunity Commission, or any other Governmental Authority in any jurisdiction in which the Company has employed, employs or has been alleged to employ any person.
Section 3.11(b)
 
(c) To the knowledge of the Company no employee or consultant of the Company or any subsidiary is in material violation of (i) any contract or agreement or (ii) any restrictive covenant relating to the right of any such employee or consultant to be employed by the Company or to use trade secrets or proprietary information of others.
(d) In the past two years, there has been no "mass layoff," "employment loss," or "plant closing" as defined by the Workers Adjustment and Retraining Notification Act in respect of the Company.
(e) of the Disclosure Schedule lists as of the Closing Date each employee of the Company who is not fully available to perform work because of disability or other leave and also lists, with respect to each such employee, the basis of such disability or leave and the anticipated date of return to full service.
Section 3.11(e)
(f) Since December 31, 2005, the Company has not hired additional employees or increased the compensation payable or to become payable or the benefits provided to its directors, officers or employees, or granted any severance or termination pay to, or entered into any employment or severance agreement with, any director, officer or other employee of the Company, or established, adopted, entered into or amended any collective bargaining, bonus, profit-sharing, thrift, compensation, stock option, restricted stock, pension, retirement, deferred compensation, employment, termination, severance or other plan, agreement, trust, fund, policy or arrangement for the benefit of any director, officer or employee.
SECTION 3.12 .
Real Property; Title to Assets
(a) The Company does not currently own, and has not for the ten years prior to the Closing Date owned, any parcel of real property.
(b) of the Disclosure Schedule lists each parcel of real property currently leased or subleased by the Company, with the name of the lessor and the date of the lease, sublease, assignment of the lease, any guaranty given or leasing commissions payable by the Company in connection therewith and each amendment to any of the foregoing (collectively, the ""). True, correct and complete copies of all Lease Documents have been delivered to Natus. All such current leases and subleases are in full force and effect, are valid and effective in accordance with their respective terms, and there is not, under any of such leases, any existing material default or event of default (or event which, with notice or lapse of time, or both, would constitute a default) by the Company or, to the Company's knowledge, by the other party to such lease or sublease, or person in the chain of title to such leased premises.
Section 3.12(b)
Lease Documents
(c) There are no contractual or legal restrictions that preclude or restrict the ability to use any real property owned or leased by the Company for the purposes for which it is currently being used. There are no material latent defects or material adverse physical conditions affecting the real property, and improvements thereon, owned or leased by the Company.
 
(d) The Company has good and valid title to, or, in the case of leased properties and assets, valid leasehold or subleasehold interests in, all of its properties and assets, tangible and intangible, real, personal and mixed, used or held for use in its business, free and clear of any Liens, except for such imperfections of title, if any, that do not materially interfere with the present value of the subject property.
SECTION 3.13 .
Intellectual Property
(a) of the Disclosure Schedule sets forth a true and complete list of (i) all patents and patent applications, trademark and copyright registrations and applications, common law trademarks, and domain names and URLs included in the Owned Intellectual Property, (ii) all Licenses (other than licenses of commercially available off-the-shelf Software licensed pursuant to shrink-wrap or click-wrap licenses that is not material to the business of the Company or any subsidiary), and (iii) Company IT Systems and other Owned Intellectual Property that are material to the business of the Company. of the Disclosure Schedule further sets forth a description of all proceedings or actions before any governmental body (including the United States Patent and Trademark Office or equivalent authority anywhere else in the world) related to any of the Intellectual Property owned by the Company including without limitation any (x) interference, reissue, reexamination or similar proceedings pertaining to the scope, validity and/or ownership of any of the patents of the Company, (y) trademark opposition proceedings, or (z) proceedings relating to Internet domain names.
Section 3.13(a)
Section 3.13(a)
(b) The conduct of the business of the Company as currently conducted and as currently contemplated to be conducted, the use of the Owned Intellectual Property, Licensed Intellectual Property and Company IT Systems in connection therewith and the transmission, use, linking and other practices of the Company related to their web sites, the content thereof and the advertisements contained therein, do not conflict with, infringe upon, misappropriate or otherwise violate the Intellectual Property rights of any third party, and no Actions are pending or, to the knowledge of the Company, threatened against the Company or any subsidiary alleging any of the foregoing. To the knowledge of the Company, no person is engaging in any activity that infringes upon, misappropriates or otherwise violates the Owned Intellectual Property or Licensed Intellectual Property.
(c) The Company is the exclusive owner of the entire and unencumbered right, title and interest in and to the Owned Intellectual Property. The Company has the valid right to use the Owned Intellectual Property and Licensed Intellectual Property, and access and use the Company IT Systems, in the continued operation of their respective businesses as presently conducted or as contemplated to be conducted without limitation. All necessary registration, maintenance and renewal fees currently due in connection with Intellectual Property owned by the Company have been made and all necessary documents, recordations and certificates in connection with such Intellectual Property have been filed with the relevant governmental bodies in the United States or those foreign jurisdictions in which applications for such Intellectual Property have been filed, as the case may be, for the purposes of prosecuting, maintaining or perfecting such Intellectual Property.
(d) No Owned Intellectual Property or, to the knowledge of the Company, any Licensed Intellectual Property, is subject to any outstanding decree, order, injunction, judgment
 
or ruling restricting the use of such Intellectual Property or that would impair the validity or enforceability of such Intellectual Property. The Owned Intellectual Property and, to the knowledge of the Company, the Licensed Intellectual Property, are subsisting, valid and enforceable, and have not been adjudged invalid or unenforceable in whole or part.
(e) The Owned Intellectual Property and the Licensed Intellectual Property include all of the Intellectual Property used in the operation of the business of the Company, and there are no other items of Intellectual Property that are material to the operation of the business of the Company. The Company IT Systems include all of the IT Systems used in the operation of the business of the Company, and there are no other IT Systems that are material to the operation of the business of the Company.
(f) To the knowledge of the Company, (i) each License is valid and enforceable, is binding on all parties thereto, and is in full force and effect; (ii) no party to any License is in material breach thereof or default thereunder; and (iii) neither the execution of this Agreement nor the consummation of the Transaction shall (x) adversely affect any of the rights of the Company with respect to the Owned Intellectual Property or Licensed Intellectual Property, or (y) impair or interrupt the Company's access and use of, or their right to access and use, the Company IT Systems or, to the extent applicable, their customers' access and use of, or their right to access and use, the Company IT Systems.
(g) The Company has taken all reasonable steps in accordance with normal industry practice to maintain the confidentiality of the trade secrets and other confidential Intellectual Property used in connection with the business of the Company. To the knowledge of the Company, (i) there has been no misappropriation by any person of any material trade secrets or other material confidential Intellectual Property used in connection with the business of the Company; (ii) no employee, former employee, independent contractor or agent of the Company has misappropriated any trade secrets of any other person in the course of performance as an employee, independent contractor or agent of the Company; and (iii) no employee, former employee, independent contractor or agent of the Company is in default or breach of any term of any employment agreement, nondisclosure agreement, assignment of invention agreement or similar agreement or contract relating in any way to the protection, ownership, development, use or transfer of Intellectual Property. Without limiting the foregoing, the Company has and enforces policies requiring each employee and contractor involved in proprietary aspects of the business or with Intellectual Property to execute nondisclosure and proprietary information agreements. All persons who have contributed to the creation, invention, modification or improvement of any Intellectual Property owned by the Company or any of its subsidiaries, in whole or in part, have signed written agreements ensuring that all such Intellectual Property is owned exclusively by the Company and its subsidiaries, and a list of all persons executing such agreements is set forth in of the Disclosure Schedule.
Section 3.13(g)
(h) To the knowledge of the Company, the Company IT Systems are free of all viruses, worms, and other known contaminants, and do not contain any errors or problems, that would (i) disrupt the ordinary operation of such IT Systems in the conduct of the business of the Company or any subsidiary as presently conducted or as contemplated to be conducted, or (ii) have an adverse impact on the operation of other Software or operating systems. The Company IT Systems do not incorporate any GNU or "open" source code or object code under which the
 
Company IT Systems are subject to the GNU general public license, GNU lesser general public license and other "copyleft" license. The Company has taken all reasonable steps in accordance with normal industry practice to secure the Company IT Systems from unauthorized access or use by any person, and to enable the continued and uninterrupted operation of the Company IT Systems. The access and use of the Company IT Systems by the Company and any customer thereof (to the extent applicable) in connection with the operation of the business of the Company as currently conducted and as currently contemplated to be conducted do not violate any applicable Laws in any material respect.
SECTION 3.14 .
Taxes
Except as specifically disclosed in of the Disclosure Schedule:
Section 3.14
(a) The Company (i) has filed all Tax Returns required to be filed by it; (ii) has timely paid and discharged all Taxes required to be paid or discharged; (iii) has established accruals and reserves for Taxes reflected in the Company Financial Statements that are adequate to cover all Taxes accruable through the date thereof (including interest and penalties, if any, thereon) in accordance with GAAP; (iv) has made all estimated Tax payments required to be made; and (v) has no liability for Taxes in excess of the amount so paid or accruals or reserves so established except for Taxes subsequent to the dates covered by the Company Financial Statements incurred in the ordinary course of business. All such Tax Returns are true, accurate and complete. The Company is not delinquent in the payment of any Tax or in the filing of any Returns, or is not the beneficiary of any extension of time within which to file any Returns, and no deficiencies for any Tax have been claimed, proposed or assessed, or to the knowledge of the Company, threatened against the Company. The Company has not received any notification from the IRS or any other taxing authority regarding any issues that (i) are currently pending before the IRS or any other taxing agency or authority (including any sales or use taxing authority) regarding the Company, or (ii) have been raised by the IRS or other taxing agency or authority and not yet finally resolved. Neither Stockholders, nor any director, officer (or employee responsible for Tax matters) of the Company, expects any authority to assess any additional Taxes for any period for which Tax Returns have been filed. No Return of the Company is under audit by the IRS or any other taxing agency or authority and any such past audits (if any) have been completed and fully resolved to the satisfaction of the applicable taxing agency or authority conducting such audit and all taxes determined by such audit to be due from the Company have been paid in full to the applicable taxing agencies or authorities. The Company has not granted any waiver of any statute of limitations with respect to, or any extension of a period for the assessment of, any Tax. There are no Tax Liens upon any property or assets of the Company except liens for current Taxes not yet due. The Company has delivered to Natus correct and complete copies of all federal income Tax Returns, examination reports, and statements of deficiencies assessed against or agreed to by the Company and filed or received since January 1, 2000.
(b) The Company has withheld and paid (and until the Closing will withhold and pay) all Taxes required to have been withheld and paid (including withholding of taxes pursuant to Sections 1441, 1442, 1445 and 1446 of the Code or similar provisions under any foreign law) in connection with any amounts paid or owing to any employee, independent contractor, creditor, Stockholders, or other third party, and have timely filed all withholding Tax Returns. The
 
Company (i) has no liability for the Taxes of any other person (other than the Company) by reason of having joined in the filing of a consolidated, combined or unitary Tax Return, by contract, by transferee liability or otherwise; (ii) is not a party to or bound by any Tax sharing, tax indemnity, or Tax allocation agreement; (iii) has not filed any disclosures under Section 6662 of the Code or comparable provisions of state, local or foreign law to prevent the imposition of penalties with respect to any Tax reporting position taken on any Return; (iv) has not consummated, has not participated in, and is not currently participating in any transaction which was or is a "tax shelter" transaction as defined in Sections 6662, 6011, 6012 or 6111 of the Code or the Treasury Regulations promulgated thereunder; (v) has never been a member of a consolidated, combined, unitary or aggregate group of which the Company was not the ultimate parent corporation; (vi) has never been a "distributing corporation" or a "controlled corporation" in a distribution intended to qualify under Section 355(e) of the Code within the past five years; (vii) has never received a notice from a taxing authority for a jurisdiction in which a Tax Return has not been filed asserting that, or inquiring as to whether, the filing of such a Tax Return may be required; (viii) has never been at any time a member of any partnership or joint venture or the holder of a beneficial interest in any trust for any period for which the statute of limitations for any Tax has not expired.
(c) Neither the Company nor any "dual resident corporation" (within the meaning of Section 1503(d) of the Code) in which the Company is considered to hold an interest, has incurred a dual consolidated loss within the meaning of Section 1503 of the Code. The Company has not been and will not be required to include any item of income in, or exclude any item of deduction from, taxable income for any taxable period (or portion thereof) ending after the Transaction as a result of any: (i) change in method of accounting for a taxable period ending on or prior to the Transaction; (ii) "closing agreement" as described in Section 7121 of the Code (or any corresponding or similar provision of state, local or foreign income tax law) executed on or prior to the Transaction; (iii) intercompany transaction or any excess loss account described in Treasury Regulation under Section 1502 of the Code (or any corresponding or similar provision of state, local or foreign income tax law); (iv) installment sale or open transaction disposition made on or prior to the Transaction; or (v) prepaid amount received on or prior to the Transaction. There is currently no limitation on the utilization of net operating losses, capital losses, built-in losses, tax credits or similar items of the Company under Sections 269, 382, 383, 384 or 1502 of the Code (and any comparable provisions of foreign, state, local or municipal law). The Company is not, and has not been at any time during the past five years, a United States real property holding corporation within the meaning of Section 897 of the Code.
(d) The Company (and any predecessor of the Company) has been a validly electing S corporation within the meaning of Section 1361 and Section 1362 of the Code at all times since July 1, 1983 and the Company will be an S corporation up to and including the Closing Date.
(e) The Company shall not be liable for any Tax under Section 1374 of the Code and any comparable state provision in connection with the deemed sale of the Company's assets caused by the Section 338(h)(10) Election. The Company has not in the past 10 years, (A) acquired assets, including goodwill, from another corporation in a transaction in which the Company's Tax basis for the acquired assets was determined, in whole or in part, by reference to the Tax basis of the acquired assets (or any other property) in the hands of the transferor or (B) acquired the stock of any corporation that is a qualified subchapter S subsidiary. The Company does not own stock of any corporation which is a qualified subchapter S subsidiary.
 
SECTION 3.15 .
Environmental Matters
Except as described in of the Disclosure Schedule: (a) the Company has not committed any material violation of, or has liability under, any Environmental Law; (b) none of the properties (including associated soils and surface and ground waters and building materials) currently or formerly owned, leased, used, occupied or operated by the Company are contaminated in any material respect with any Hazardous Substance; (c) the Company is not actually, potentially or allegedly liable for any material off-site contamination by Hazardous Substances; (d) the Company is not actually, potentially or allegedly liable under any Environmental Law, or under any contract that allocates or assigns liability or responsibility with respect to Environmental Laws or Hazardous Substances (including with respect to pending or threatened Liens or claims for damages, penalties, fines or contribution) and the Company has not received any notice of such liability, except in the case of any of the foregoing that would not have a material effect on the Company; (e) the Company has all permits, licenses and other authorizations required under any Environmental Law (""); (f) the Company has always been and is in compliance with its Environmental Permits; and (g) neither the execution of this Agreement nor the consummation of the Transaction will require any investigation, remediation or other action with respect to Hazardous Substances, or any notice to or consent of Governmental Authorities or third parties, pursuant to any applicable Environmental Law or Environmental Permit.
Section 3.15
Environmental Permits
SECTION 3.16 .
Material Contracts
(a) Subsections (i) through (xvi) of of the Disclosure Schedule lists the following types of contracts and agreements to which the Company or any subsidiary is a party:
Section 3.16(a)
(i) each contract and agreement, whether or not made in the ordinary course of business, that contemplates an exchange of consideration with a value of more than $10,000, in the aggregate, over the term of such contract or agreement;
(ii) all contracts and agreements evidencing indebtedness;
(iii) all joint venture, partnership, strategic alliance and business acquisition or divestiture agreements (and all letters of intent and term sheets relating to any such pending transactions);
(iv) all agreements relating to issuances of securities of the Company (and all letters of intent and term sheets relating to any such pending transactions);
(v) all agreements between the Company and Stockholders, any officer or director of the Company and any family member of Stockholders or any officer or director of the Company, on the other hand;
(vi) all exclusive distribution contracts to which the Company is a party;
 
(vii) all broker, distributor, dealer, manufacturer's representative, franchise, agency, sales promotion, market research, marketing consulting and advertising contracts and agreements to which the Company is a party and any other contract that compensates any person based on any sales by the Company;
(viii) all management contracts (excluding contracts for employment, which are to be listed on of the Disclosure Schedule) and contracts with other consultants, including any contracts involving the payment of royalties or other amounts calculated based upon the revenues or income of the Company or income or revenues related to any product of the Company to which the Company is a party;
Section 3.10(a)
(ix) all contracts and agreements with any Governmental Authority to which the Company is a party;
(x) all Licenses;
(xi) all contracts and agreements that limit, or purport to limit, the ability of the Company to compete in any line of business or with any person or entity or in any geographic area or during any period of time;
(xii) all material contracts or arrangements that result in any person or entity holding a power of attorney from the Company that relates to the Company or its respective businesses;
(xiii) all agreements related to professional services rendered to the Company in connection with the Transaction and this Agreement;
(xiv) each warranty, guaranty or other similar undertaking with respect to any contractual performance extended by the Company;
(xv) all contracts containing a provision of the type commonly referred to as a "most favored nation" provision; and
(xvi) all other contracts and agreements, whether or not made in the ordinary course of business, which are material to the Company, taken as a whole.
(b) (i) Each Material Contract is a legal, valid and binding agreement; (ii) the Company has not received any claim of material default under or cancellation of any Material Contract and the Company is not, in any material respect, in breach or violation of, or default under, any Material Contract; (iii) to the Company's knowledge, no other party is, in any material respect, in breach or violation of, or default under, any Material Contract; and (iv) neither the execution of this Agreement nor the consummation of the Transaction shall constitute a material default under, give rise to cancellation rights under, or otherwise adversely affect any of the material rights of the Company under any Material Contract. The Company has furnished or made available to Natus true and complete copies of all Material Contracts, including any amendments thereto.
 
SECTION 3.17 .
Customers and Suppliers
of the Disclosure Schedule sets forth a true and complete list of the top ten customers of the Company (based on the revenue from such customer during the 12-month period ended December 31, 2005 and the 6-month period ended June 30, 2006). of the Disclosure Schedule sets forth a true and complete list of the top ten suppliers of the Company (based on amounts paid or payable by the Company to such supplier during the 12-month period ended December 31, 2005 and the 6-month period ended June 30, 2006). None of the customers listed in of the Disclosure Schedule and none of the suppliers listed in of the Disclosure Schedule, (i) has cancelled or otherwise terminated any contract with the Company prior to the expiration of the contract term, or (ii) to the Company's knowledge, has threatened, or indicated its intention, to cancel or otherwise terminate its relationship with the Company or to reduce substantially its purchase from or sale to the Company of any products, equipment, goods or services.
Section 3.17(a)
Schedule 3.17(b)
Section 3.17(a)
Section 3.17(b)
SECTION 3.18 .
Inventory
All inventory of the Company and any subsidiary, including consigned inventory, whether or not reflected in the Company Balance Sheet, consists of a quality and quantity usable and salable in the ordinary course of business and is sufficient for the operation of the business of the Company in the ordinary course and consistent with past practice, except for obsolete items and items of below-standard quality, all of which have been written off or written down to net realizable value on the Company Balance Sheet. All inventories not written off have been priced at the lower of cost or net realizable value on a first in, first out basis. The quantities of each item of inventory (whether raw materials, work-in-process, or finished goods) are not excessive, but are reasonable in the present circumstances of the Company. Schedule 3.18 sets forth the location of all items of the Company's inventory, including consigned inventory, as of the 8-month period ended August 31, 2006 and the Company's procedures for tracking and controlling consigned inventory, and such procedures are adequate for such purposes and have been followed by the Company and each subsidiary consistent with past practice.
SECTION 3.19 .
Company Products and Services
(a) Schedule 3.19 of the Disclosure Schedule lists all Company Products by name and version number. "" means all products or services produced, marketed, licensed, sold, distributed or performed by or on behalf of the Company and all products or services currently under development by the Company. Each Company Product has been in conformity in all material respects with all applicable contractual commitments, any applicable Law and all express and implied warranties, and the Company has no material liabilities or obligations for replacement or repair thereof or other damages in connection therewith. The Company has not been required to file any notice or other report with, or provide information to, any product safety agency, commission, board or other Governmental Authority concerning actual or potential hazards with respect to any Company Product. The Company has no material liabilities or obligations arising out of any injury to persons or property as a result of the ownership, possession or use of any Company Product.
Company Products
 
(b) Since January 1, 2004 there have been no (i) recalls related to any product manufactured sold, leased or delivered by the Company, or (ii) withdrawals of any product manufactured sold, leased or delivered by the Company due to quality or safety issues.
SECTION 3.20 .
Insurance
The Company maintains the policies of insurance and bonds set forth in of the Disclosure Schedule, including all legally required workers' compensation insurance and errors and omissions, casualty, fire and general liability insurance. There is no material claim pending under any of such policies or bonds as to which coverage has been questioned, denied or disputed by the underwriters of such policies or bonds. All premiums due and payable under all such policies and bonds have been timely paid, and the Company is otherwise in compliance with the terms of such policies and bonds. All such policies and bonds remain in full force and effect, and the Company has no knowledge of any threatened termination of, or material premium increase with respect to, any of such policies or bonds.
Section 3.20
SECTION 3.21 .
Certain Business Practices
Neither the Company nor, to the Company's knowledge, any directors or officers, agents or employees of the Company, has (i) used any funds for unlawful contributions, gifts, entertainment or other unlawful expenses related to political activity; (ii) made any unlawful payment to foreign or domestic government officials or employees or to foreign or domestic political parties or campaigns or violated any provision of the Foreign Corrupt Practices Act of 1977, as amended; or (iii) made any payment in the nature of criminal bribery.
SECTION 3.22 .
Government Regulation
(a) Neither the Company nor any of its managers or employees (as defined in 42 C.F.R. Part 420 Subpart C and 42 C.F.R. Section 1001.1001(a)(2)) has been, or is being investigated with respect to, any activity that materially contravenes or could contravene, or constitutes or could constitute, a material violation of any Healthcare Law.
(b) Neither the Company nor its managers or employees has engaged in any activity that contravenes or constitutes a violation of any Healthcare Law during their employment or association with the Company.
(c) The Company has not: (i) had a material civil monetary penalty assessed against it under Section 1128A of the SSA or any regulations promulgated thereunder; or (ii) been convicted (as that term is defined in 42 C.F.R. Section 1001.2) of any of the following categories of offenses as described in SSA Section 1128(a) and (b)(1), (2), (3), or any regulations promulgated thereunder: (A) criminal offenses relating to the delivery of an item or service under any state or federal healthcare program; (B) criminal offenses under federal or state law for misconduct in connection with the delivery of a healthcare item or service or with respect to any act or omission in a program operated by or financed in whole or in part by any federal, state or local government agency; or (C) federal or state laws relating to the interference with or obstruction of any investigation into any criminal offense described in this clause.
 
(d) Since January 1, 2003, the Company has not received or been subject to: (i) any United States Food and Drug Administration ("") Form 483's relating to any product manufactured, sold, leased or delivered by the Company; (ii) any FDA Notices of Adverse Findings relating to any product manufactured, sold, leased or delivered by the Company; or (iii) any warning letters or other written correspondence from the FDA or any other Governmental Authority concerning any product manufactured, sold, leased or delivered by the Company in which the FDA or such other Governmental Authority asserted that the operations of the Company were not in compliance with applicable Law, regulations, rules or guidelines with respect to any product manufactured, sold, leased or delivered by the Company.
FDA
SECTION 3.23 .
Brokers
No broker, finder or investment banker is entitled to any brokerage, finder's or other fee or commission in connection with this Agreement or the Transaction based upon arrangements made by or on behalf of the Company or Stockholders.
SECTION 3.24
Representations Complete.
None of the representations or warranties made by the Stockholders herein or in any exhibit or schedule hereto, including the Disclosure Letter, or in any certificate furnished by the Stockholders pursuant to this Agreement, when all such documents are read together in their entirety, contains any untrue statement of a material fact, or omits to state any material fact necessary in order to make the statements contained herein or therein, in the light of the circumstances under which made, not misleading.
As an inducement to the Stockholders to enter into this Agreement, Natus hereby represents and warrants to Stockholders that:
SECTION 4.01 .
Corporate Organization
Natus is a corporation duly organized, validly existing and in good standing under the laws of Delaware and has the requisite corporate power and authority and all necessary governmental approvals to own, lease and operate its properties and to carry on its business as it is now being conducted, except where the failure to be so organized, existing or in good standing or to have such power, authority and governmental approvals would not, individually or in the aggregate, prevent or materially delay consummation of the Transaction.
SECTION 4.02 .
Authority Relative to This Agreement
Natus has all necessary corporate power and authority to execute and deliver this Agreement, to perform its obligations hereunder and to consummate the Transaction. The execution and delivery of this Agreement by Natus and the consummation by Natus of the Transaction have been duly and validly authorized by all necessary corporate action, and no other corporate proceedings are necessary to authorize this Agreement or to consummate the Transaction. This Agreement has been duly and validly executed and delivered by Natus and, assuming due authorization, execution and delivery by the Company, constitutes the legal, valid and binding obligation of Natus enforceable against Natus in accordance with its terms.
 
SECTION 4.03 .
No Conflict; Required Filings and Consents
(a) The execution and delivery of this Agreement by Natus does not, and the performance of this Agreement by Natus will not, and the consummation of the Transaction by Natus will not, (i) conflict with or violate the Certificate of Incorporation or By-laws of Natus, (ii) assuming that all consents, approvals and other authorizations described in have been obtained and that all filings and other actions described in have been made or taken, conflict with or violate any Law applicable to Natus or by which any property or asset of Natus is bound or affected, or (iii) result in any breach of, or constitute a default (or an event which, with notice or lapse of time or both, would become a default) under, or give to others any rights of termination, amendment, acceleration or cancellation of, or result in the creation of a Lien or other encumbrance on any property or asset of Natus pursuant to, any note, bond, mortgage, indenture, contract, agreement, lease, license, permit, franchise or other instrument or obligation to which Natus is a party or by which Natus or any property or asset of Natus is bound or affected, except, with respect to clauses (ii) and (iii), for any such conflicts, violations, breaches, defaults or other occurrences which would not, individually or in the aggregate, prevent or materially delay consummation of the Transaction.
Section 4.03(b)
Section 4.03(b)
(b) The execution and delivery of this Agreement by Natus does not, and the performance of this Agreement by Natus will not, require any consent, approval, authorization or permit of, or filing with or notification to, any Governmental Authority, except for (i) applicable requirements, if any, of the Exchange Act, and (ii) where the failure to obtain such consents, approvals, authorizations or permits, or to make such filings or notifications, would not prevent or materially delay consummation of the Stock Purchase.
SECTION 4.04 .
Financing
Natus has sufficient cash resources to pay the full amount of the purchase price due hereunder.
SECTION 4.05 .
Investment Intent
Natus is an "accredited investor" as such term is defined in Rule 501 promulgated by the Securities and Exchange Commission as part of Regulation D. Natus will acquire the Shares hereunder for its own investment intent, with no view to the distribution of such Shares.
SECTION 5.01
Further Action; Reasonable Best Efforts.
Upon the terms and subject to the conditions of this Agreement, each of the parties hereto shall use its reasonable best efforts to take, or cause to be taken, all appropriate action, and to do, or cause to be done, all things necessary, proper or advisable under applicable Laws to consummate and make effective the Transaction, including, without limitation, using its
 
reasonable best efforts to obtain all Permits, consents, approvals, authorizations, qualifications and orders of Governmental Authorities and parties to contracts with the Company as are necessary for the consummation of the Transaction. In case, at any time after the Closing Date, any further action is necessary or desirable to carry out the purposes of this Agreement, the proper officers and directors of each party to this Agreement shall use their reasonable best efforts to take all such action.
SECTION 5.02
Public Announcements.
Stockholders shall consult with Natus before issuing any press release or otherwise making any public statements with respect to this Agreement or the Transaction and shall not issue any such press release or make any such public statement prior to such consultation, except as may be required by Law or the rules or regulations of any United States securities exchange. The parties have agreed upon the form of a joint press release announcing the Transaction.
SECTION 5.03 .
Tax Matters
(a) . The Company and Stockholders shall join with Natus in making an election under Section 338(h)(10) of the Code (and any corresponding election under state, local, and foreign tax law) with respect to the purchase and sale of the Company's stock hereunder (collectively, a ""). Stockholders shall include any income, gain, loss, deduction, or other tax item resulting from the Section 338(h)(10) Election on Stockholders' Tax Return to the extent required by applicable law.
Section 338(h)(10) Election
Section 338(h)(10) Election
(b) . Natus will prepare an allocation of the aggregate purchase price and the liabilities of the Company (plus other relevant items) among the assets of the Company in a manner consistent with Sections 338 and 1060 of the Code and the Treasury Regulations thereunder (the ""). The Asset Allocation will be binding upon Natus, the Stockholders and the Company. Natus (and, to the extent required, the Company and Stockholders) will file all Tax Returns (including, but not limited to, IRS Form 8594) in all respects and for all purposes in a manner consistent with the Asset Allocation. Neither Natus, Stockholders nor the Company shall take any position (whether in audits, tax returns or otherwise) that is inconsistent with such allocation unless required to do so by applicable law.
Purchase Price Allocation
Asset Allocation
(c) . The Company and Stockholders shall not revoke the Company's election to be taxed as an S corporation within the meaning of Section 1361 and Section 1362 of the Code. The Company and Stockholders shall not take or allow any action other than the sale of the Company's stock pursuant to this agreement that would result in the termination of the Company's status as a validly electing S corporation within the meaning of Section 1361 and Section 1362 of the Code.
S Corporation Status
(d) . Natus shall prepare or cause to be prepared and file or cause to be filed all Tax Returns for the Company for all periods ending on or prior to the Closing Date that are filed after the Closing Date. To the extent permitted by applicable law, Stockholders shall include any income, gain, loss, deduction or other tax items for such periods on their Tax Returns in a manner consistent with the Schedule K-1s furnished by the Company to Stockholders for such periods.
Tax Periods Ending on or before Closing Date
 
(e) .
Cooperation on Tax Matters
(i) Natus, the Company, and Stockholders shall cooperate fully, as and to the extent reasonably requested by the other party, in connection with the filing of Tax Returns and any audit, litigation or other proceeding with respect to Taxes. Such cooperation shall include the retention and (upon the other party's request) the provision of records and information reasonably relevant to any such audit, litigation, or other proceeding and making employees available on a mutually convenient basis to provide additional information and explanation of any material provided hereunder. The Company, Stockholders, and Natus agree to retain all books and records with respect to Tax matters pertinent to the Company relating to any taxable period beginning before the Closing Date until expiration of the statute of limitations of the respective taxable periods, and to abide by all record retention agreements entered into with any taxing authority.
(ii) Stockholders further agree, upon request, to use its best efforts to obtain any certificate or other document from any governmental authority or any other Person as may be necessary to mitigate, reduce or eliminate any Tax that could be imposed (including with respect to the transactions contemplated hereby).
(f) . All transfer, documentary, sales, use, stamp, registration and other such Taxes and fees (including any penalties and interest) incurred in connection with this Agreement shall be paid by Stockholders when due, and Stockholders shall, at their own expense, file all necessary Tax Returns and other documentation with respect to all such transfer, documentary, sales, use, stamp, registration and other Taxes and fees, and, if required by applicable law, Natus shall, and shall cause its affiliates to, join in the execution of any such Tax Returns and other documentation.
Certain Taxes
(g) . The Company shall provide Natus, upon its request prior to the Closing Date, a certificate (in a form reasonably satisfactory to Natus) meeting the requirements of Treasury Regulation Sections 1.897-2(h) and 1.1445-5(b)(4)(iii).
Tax Certificate
SECTION 5.04 .
Payments to Employees
In full satisfaction of amounts due to Edward Bateman, Jopeph Reback and Edward Weller ("", "" and "", respectively, and collectively, "") pursuant to agreements between the Company and each of the Employees dated October 13, 2006, payments shall be made to the Employees as follows:
Bateman
Reback
Weller
Employees
(a) . Immediately following the Closing, Natus shall, or shall cause the Company to, make the following cash payments to the Employees: Bateman - $1,137,670.38; Reback - $758,446.95; Weller - $758,446.95.
Closing
(b) . If any amounts of remaining Escrow Cash are returned to the Company (or to such other party as the Escrow Holder is directed by Natus) pursuant to , then promptly upon receipt of such Escrow Cash, the Company shall pay to the Employees the following percentages of such remaining amounts of Escrow Cash: Bateman - 6.50134%; Reback - 4.33373%; Weller - 4.33373%.
Escrow Payments
Section 8.08
 
(c) . Olympic shall pay to the Employees, collectively and in the aggregate, the amounts set forth below as determined by future Cool Cap Revenue in the respective calendar years listed below at the same time that corresponding payments are made to the Stockholders pursuant to :
Cool Cap Revenue
Section 2.01(c)
(i) . For each full dollar of Cool Cap Revenue in 2007 in excess of $500,000, Natus shall pay Employees the following, provided that the maximum amount that Natus shall pay to the Employees collectively for Cool Cap Revenue in 2007 shall be $91,012, regardless of the Cool Cap Revenue for such year: Bateman - $.04876 Reback - $.0325029; Weller - $.0325029.
2007
(ii) . For each full dollar of Cool Cap Revenue in 2008 in excess of $1,000,000, Natus shall pay Employees the following, provided that the maximum amount that Natus shall pay to the Employees collectively for Cool Cap Revenue in 2008 shall be $151,688, regardless of the Cool Cap Revenue for such year: Bateman - $.0406333; Reback - $.0270858; Weller - $.0270858.
2008
(iii) . For each full dollar of Cool Cap Revenue in 2009 in excess of $2,000,000, Natus shall pay Employees the following, provided that the maximum amount that Natus shall pay to the Employees collectively for Cool Cap Revenue in 2009 shall be $227,532, regardless of the Cool Cap Revenue for such year: Bateman - $.030475; Reback - $.,0203143; Weller - $.0203143.
2009
Any payment due pursuant to subsections (a), (b) or (c) above shall be subject to all applicable withholding taxes required by law.
In the event that any Employee asserts any claim for the right to receive any payment from Olympic or Natus as a result of the Transaction in excess of the amounts provided in this , Stockholders shall indemnify and hold harmless the Company and Natus from the cost of defending any such claims and from any amounts that are ultimately paid as a result of such claims. If any such claims are so asserted, such claims shall be defended in accordance with the provisions of .
Section 5.04
Section 8.05
SECTION 6.01 .
Conditions at or Simultaneous with the Stock Purchase
(a) The obligation of Stockholders to effect the Transaction shall be subject to the satisfaction at or prior to the Closing of the following conditions:
(i) The representations and warranties of Natus set forth herein shall be true and correct in all material respects (except for any statement in a representation that contains a standard of materiality, which statements shall be true and correct in all respects giving effect to such standard), at and as of the Closing Date and at the Closing Stockholders shall have received a certificate to such effect executed by an executive officer of Natus;
 
(ii) The Escrow Agreement shall have been executed and delivered by the Escrow Agent and Natus.
(iii) The Employment Agreement shall have been executed and delivered by Natus to Jay A. Jones.
(b) The obligation of Natus to effect the Transaction shall be subject to the satisfaction at or prior to the Closing of the following conditions:
(i) The representations and warranties of Stockholders set forth herein, shall be true and correct in all material respects (except for any statement in a representation that contains a standard of materiality, which statements shall be true and correct in all respects giving effect to such standard), and at the Closing Natus shall have received a certificate to such effect executed by Stockholders.
(ii) There shall have been obtained at or prior to the Closing Date such permits or authorizations, and there shall have been taken all such other actions by any Governmental Authority or other regulatory authority having jurisdiction over the parties and the actions herein proposed to be taken, as may be required to consummate the Transaction.
(iii) Natus shall have received from Lane Powell, PC, legal counsel to the Company, an opinion opining to the matters set forth in Exhibit C hereto.
(iv) Natus shall have received duly executed copies of all third party consents, approvals, assignments, notices, waivers, authorizations or other certificates (including those set forth in  of the Disclosure Schedule) necessary to provide for the continuation in full force and effect of any and all Material Contracts after the Transaction and for the parties to consummate the Transaction, in each case, in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to Natus.
Section 3.5(a) or (b)
(v) The persons holding the positions of a director or officer of the Company, in office immediately prior to the Closing, shall have resigned from such positions in writing effective as of the Closing, provided that Jay A. Jones shall not have resigned from his position as President of the Company.
(vi) Stockholders shall have executed and delivered to Natus a release in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to Natus that acknowledges that Stockholders have no claim of any nature against the Company and that the Company has no liability to Stockholders except as otherwise expressly provided herein with respect to the Employment Agreement for the year following the Closing Date.
(vii) The Escrow Agreement shall have been executed and delivered by the Escrow Agent and Stockholders.
(viii) The Employment Agreement shall have been executed and delivered by Jay A. Jones to Natus.
 
(ix) The Company's cash and cash equivalents as of the Closing Date shall be at least $1,200,000 and the Company shall have delivered a certificate executed by the Company's President certifying the amount of the Company's cash and cash equivalents as of the Closing Date.
SECTION 7.01 .
Termination
This Agreement may be terminated at any time prior to the Closing Date if the Transaction shall not have been consummated by October 31, 2006, ,, that the right to terminate this Agreement under this shall not be available to any party whose failure to comply with any provision of this Agreement has been the cause of, or resulted in, the failure of the Transaction to be consummated by such date.
provided
however
Section 7.01
SECTION 7.02 .
Effect of Termination
In the event of termination of this Agreement as provided in hereof, this Agreement shall forthwith become void and there shall be no liability on the part of any of the parties, except (a) with respect this (Effect of Termination), as well as (General Provisions) to the extent applicable to such surviving sections, each of which shall survive termination of this Agreement, and (b) that nothing herein shall relieve any party from any material breach of its representations, warranties or covenants contained herein. No termination of this Agreement shall affect the obligations of the parties contained in any Confidentiality and Nondisclosure Agreement between Natus and the Company dated June 26, 2006, all of which obligations shall survive termination of this Agreement.
Section 7.01
Section 7.02
Article IX
SECTION 8.01 .
Survival
If the Transaction is consummated, the representations and warranties of Stockholders contained in this Agreement shall survive the Closing Date and remain in full force and effect, regardless of any investigation or disclosure made by or on behalf of any of the parties to this Agreement, until the one-year anniversary of the Closing Date; , , that the representations and warranties contained in (with respect to representations and warranties in pertaining to matters of Federal and Washington State income taxes) and will remain operative and in full force and effect, regardless of any investigation or disclosure made by or on behalf of any of the parties to this Agreement, until the expiration of the applicable statute of limitations for claims against Stockholders which seek recovery of Damages arising out of a failure of such representations or warranties; , that no right to indemnification pursuant to this in respect of any claim based upon any failure of a representation or warranty that is set forth in a Notice of Claim delivered prior to the applicable expiration date of such representation or warranty shall be affected by the expiration of such representation or warranty; and , , that such
provided
however
Sections 3.03, 3.14
Section 3.14
Section 3.15
provided further
Article VIII
provided
further
 
expiration shall not affect the rights of any Natus Indemnified Person under or otherwise to seek recovery of Damages arising out of any fraud, willful breach or intentional misrepresentation by Stockholders until the expiration of the applicable statute of limitations. If the Transaction is consummated, the representations and warranties of Natus contained in this Agreement and the other agreements, certificates and documents contemplated hereby shall expire and be of no further force or effect as of the Closing Date. If the Transaction is consummated, all covenants of the parties shall expire and be of no further force or effect as of the Closing Date, except to the extent such covenants provide that they are to be performed after the Closing Date; , , that no right to indemnification pursuant to in respect of any claim based upon any breach of a covenant shall be affected by the expiration of such covenant.
Article VIII
provided
however
Article VIII
SECTION 8.02 .
Agreement to Indemnify
Stockholders shall indemnify and hold harmless Natus and its officers, directors, agents, representatives, stockholders and employees, and each person, if any, who controls or may control Natus within the meaning of the Securities Act or the Exchange Act (each hereinafter referred to individually as a "" and collectively as "") from and against any and all losses, reductions in value, costs, damages, liabilities and expenses (including reasonable attorneys' fees, other professionals' and experts' fees, costs of investigation and court costs), calculated net of actual recoveries under existing insurance policies (net of any applicable collection costs and reserves, deductibles, premium adjustments and retrospectively rated premiums) (hereinafter collectively referred to as ""), arising from assessments, taxes, claims, demands, assertions of liability, or actual or threatened actions, suits or proceedings (whether civil, criminal, administrative or investigative) directly or indirectly arising out of, resulting from or in connection with: (a) any failure of any representation or warranty made by Stockholders in this Agreement or the Disclosure Schedule or any exhibit or schedule to this Agreement to be true and correct as of the Closing Date (as though such representation or warranty were made as of the Closing Date, except in the case of representations and warranties which by their terms speak only as of a specific date or dates); (b) any failure of any certification, representation or warranty made by Stockholders in any certificate delivered to Natus pursuant to any provision of this Agreement to be true and correct as of the date such certificate is delivered to Natus; (c) any breach of or default in connection with any of the covenants or agreements made by Stockholders in this Agreement or the Disclosure Schedule; or (d) the actual or alleged contamination described in that certain letter from Lane Powell, PC on behalf of the Company and addressed to the President & CEO of Natus, dated September 29, 2006 (the "").
Natus Indemnified Person
Natus Indemnified Persons
Damages
Environmental Letter
SECTION 8.03 .
Limitations
(a) Recovery from the Escrow Cash shall be the sole and exclusive remedy under this Agreement for the matters listed in the foregoing clauses (a)  (d) of , except in the case of (i) fraud, willful breach or intentional misrepresentation by the Company or any subsidiary, (ii) any failure of any of the representations and warranties contained in (with respect to representations and warranties in pertaining to matters of Federal and Washington State income taxes) to be true and correct as aforesaid, or (iii) the matters set forth in clause (d) of . In the case of (i) fraud,
Section 8.02
Sections 3.03, 3.10(j), 3.14
Section 3.14
and 3.15
Section 8.02
 
willful breach or intentional misrepresentation by Stockholders, (ii) any failure of any of the representations and warranties contained in (with respect to representations and warranties in pertaining to matters of Federal and Washington State income taxes) and to be true and correct as aforesaid, or (iii) the matters set forth in clause (d) of , after Natus has exhausted or made claims upon all amounts of Escrow Cash (after taking into account all other claims for indemnification from the Escrow Cash made by Natus), Stockholders shall be liable for the amount of any Damages resulting therefrom; , , that (A) with respect to (i) fraud, willful breach or intentional misrepresentation by Stockholders and (ii) any failure of any of the representations and warranties contained in (with respect to representations and warranties in pertaining to matters of Federal and Washington State income taxes) to be true and correct, such liability shall be limited to the aggregate amount paid or payable to Stockholders pursuant to and (B) with respect to (i) any failure of any of the representations and warranties contained in to be true and correct or (ii) the matters set forth in clause (d) of , such liability shall be limited to $5,000,000. In the event that the Stockholders are able to obtain insurance on behalf of the Company and Natus after the Closing which Natus reasonably determines fully protects Natus and the Company to the same extent as the indemnification provided hereunder by Stockholders against (i) any Damages relating to any failure of any of the representations and warranties contained in to be true and correct and (ii) the matters set forth in clause (d) of , Natus will then agree that recovery from the Escrow Cash shall be its sole and effective claim under this Agreement (other than access to the insurance so provided by Stockholders) for the matters described in (i) and (ii) of this sentence.
Sections 3.03, 3.10(j), 3.14
Section 3.14
Section 3.15
Section 8.02
provided
however
Sections 3.03, 3.10(j), 3.14
Section 3.14
Section 2.01
Section 3.15
Section 8.02
Section 3.15
Section 8.02
(b) The Natus Indemnified Persons may not receive any Escrow Cash in respect of any claim for indemnification under this unless and until Damages in an aggregate amount greater than $100,000 have been incurred, paid or properly accrued by Natus Indemnified Persons, and if Damages greater than $100,000 have been so incurred, paid or properly accrued, the Natus Indemnified Persons shall be entitled to receive Escrow Cash in indemnification therefore without regard to such $100,000 threshold; provided, however, that this sentence shall not limit a Natus Indemnified Person's right to recover for any failure of any of the representations and warranties contained in (with respect to representations and warranties in pertaining to matters of Federal and Washington State income taxes).
Article VIII
Sections 3.03, 3.10(j) and 3.14
Section 3.14
SECTION 8.04 .
Notice of Claim
As used herein, the term "" means a claim for indemnification of Natus or any other Natus Indemnified Person for Damages under this . Natus may give notice of a Claim under this Agreement, whether for its own Damages or for Damages incurred by any other Natus Indemnified Person, and Natus shall give written notice of a Claim executed by an officer of Natus (a "") to the Stockholders (with a copy to the Escrow Agent if the Claim involves recovery against the Escrow Cash) promptly after Natus becomes aware of the existence of any potential claim by an Natus Indemnified Person for indemnification from Stockholders under this , arising from or relating to:
Claim
Article VIII
Notice of Claim
Article VIII
(a) any matter specified in ; or
Section 8.02
 
(b) the assertion, whether orally or in writing, against Natus or any other Natus Indemnified Person of a claim, demand, suit, action, arbitration, investigation, inquiry or proceeding brought by a third party against Natus or such other Natus Indemnified Person (in each such case, a "") that is based on, arises out of or relates to any matter specified in .
Third-Party Claim
Section 8.02
The period during which claims may be initiated (the "") for indemnification from the Escrow Cash shall commence at the Closing Date and terminate at the one-year anniversary of the Closing Date. The Claims Period for indemnification from and against Damages arising out of, resulting from or in connection with (i) fraud, willful breach or intentional misrepresentation by the Company or any Company subsidiary, (ii) any failure of any of the representations and warranties contained in (with respect to representations and warranties in pertaining to matters and Federal and Washington State income taxes) and to be true and correct as aforesaid, or (iii) the matters set forth in clause (d) of , shall commence at the Closing Date and terminate upon the expiration of the applicable statute of limitations. Notwithstanding anything contained herein to the contrary, any Claims for Damages specified in any Notice of Claim delivered to Stockholders prior to expiration of the applicable Claims Period with respect to facts and circumstances existing prior to expiration of the applicable Claims Period shall remain outstanding until such Claims for Damages have been resolved or satisfied, notwithstanding the expiration of such Claims Period. Until the expiration of the applicable Claims Period, no delay on the part of Natus in giving Stockholders a Notice of Claim shall relieve Stockholders from any of its obligations under this unless (and then only to the extent that) Stockholders are materially prejudiced thereby.
Claims Period
Sections 3.03, 3.14
Section 3.14
Section 3.15
Section 8.02
Article VIII
SECTION 8.05 .
Defense of Third-Party Claims
(a) Natus shall determine and conduct the defense or settlement of any Third-Party Claim , and the costs and expenses incurred by Natus in connection with such defense or settlement (including reasonable attorneys' fees, other professionals' and experts' fees and court or arbitration costs) shall be included in the Damages for which Natus may seek indemnification pursuant to a Claim made by any Natus Indemnified Person hereunder.
(b) Stockholders shall have the right to receive copies of all pleadings, notices and communications with respect to the Third-Party Claim to the extent that receipt of such documents by Stockholders does not affect any privilege relating to the Natus Indemnified Person and may participate in, but not to determine or conduct, any defense of the Third-Party Claim or settlement negotiations with respect to the Third-Party Claim.
(c) No settlement of any such Third-Party Claim with any third party claimant shall be determinative of the existence of or amount of Damages relating to such matter, except with the consent of Stockholders, which consent shall not be unreasonably withheld, conditioned or delayed and which shall be deemed to have been given unless Stockholders shall have objected within 15 days after a written request for such consent by Natus. In the event that Stockholders has consented to any such settlement, Stockholders shall not have any power or authority to object under any provision of this to the amount of any claim by or on behalf of any Natus Indemnified Person against the Escrow Cash or Stockholders for indemnity with respect to such settlement.
Article VIII
 
SECTION 8.06 .
Contents of Notice of Claim
Each Notice of Claim by Natus given pursuant to shall contain the following information:
Section 8.04
(a) that Natus or another Natus Indemnified Person has directly or indirectly incurred, paid or properly accrued (in accordance with GAAP) or, in good faith, believes it shall have to directly or indirectly incur, pay or accrue (in accordance with GAAP), Damages in an aggregate stated amount arising from such Claim (which amount may be the amount of damages claimed by a third party in an action brought against any Natus Indemnified Person based on alleged facts, which if true, would give rise to liability for Damages to such Natus Indemnified Person under this ); and
Article VIII
(b) a brief description, in reasonable detail (to the extent reasonably available to Natus), of the facts, circumstances or events giving rise to the alleged Damages based on Natus's good faith belief thereof, including the identity and address of any third-party claimant (to the extent reasonably available to Natus) and copies of any formal demand or complaint, the amount of Damages, the date each such item was incurred, paid or properly accrued, or the basis for such anticipated liability, and the specific nature of the breach to which such item is related.
SECTION 8.07 .
Resolution of Notice of Claim
Each Notice of Claim given by Natus shall be resolved as follows:
(a) . If, within 15 business days after a Notice of Claim is received by Stockholders, Stockholders does not contest such Notice of Claim in writing to Natus as provided in , Stockholders shall be conclusively deemed to have consented, to the recovery by the Natus Indemnified Person of the full amount of Damages specified in the Notice of Claim in accordance with this , including the forfeiture of Escrow Cash to the extent of such Damages, and, without further notice, to have stipulated to the entry of a final judgment for damages against Stockholders for such amount in any court having jurisdiction over the matter where venue is proper.
Uncontested Claims
Section 8.07(b)
Article VIII
(b) . If Stockholders gives Natus written notice contesting all or any portion of a Notice of Claim (a "") (with a copy to the Escrow Agent) within the 15 business day period specified in , then such Contested Claim shall be resolved by either (i) a written settlement agreement executed by Natus and Stockholders (a copy of which shall be furnished to the Escrow Agent) or (ii) in the absence of such a written settlement agreement within 30 business days following receipt by Natus of the written notice from Stockholders, by binding litigation between Natus and Stockholders in accordance with the terms and provisions of .
Contested Claims
Contested Claim
Section 8.07(a)
Section 8.07(c)
(c) . Either Natus or Stockholders may bring suit in the courts of the State of Washington and the Federal courts of the United States of America located within the State of Washington to resolve the Contested Claim. Regardless of which
Litigation of Contested Claims
 
party brings suit to resolve a matter, Natus shall bear the burden of proof by a preponderance of the evidence that Natus or other Natus Indemnified Persons are entitled to indemnification pursuant to this . The decision of the trial court as to the validity and amount of any claim in such Notice of Claim shall be nonappealable, binding and conclusive upon the parties to this Agreement and the Escrow Agent shall be entitled to act in accordance with such decision and make or withhold payments out of the Escrow Cash in accordance therewith. Judgment upon any award rendered by the trial court may be entered in any court having jurisdiction. For purposes of this , in any suit hereunder in which any claim or the amount thereof stated in the Notice of Claim is at issue, the Court shall determine which party is the non-prevailing party. The non-prevailing party to a suit shall pay its own expenses and the expenses, including attorneys' fees and costs, reasonably incurred by the other party to the suit.
Article VIII
Section 8.07(c)
SECTION 8.08 .
Release of Remaining Escrow Cash
Within five business days following the expiration of the Claims Period, Natus shall instruct the Escrow Agent to deliver all of the remaining Escrow Cash (if any) in excess of any amount of Escrow Cash that is necessary to satisfy all unresolved, unsatisfied or disputed claims for Damages specified in any Notice of Claim delivered to Stockholders before the expiration of the Claims Period as follows: there shall be delivered to the Stockholders an amount equal to 0.846080 times the amount of such remaining Escrow Cash and there shall be delivered to the Company (or to such other party as Escrow Holder shall be directed in writing by Natus and the Company), the balance of such remaining Escrow Cash. If any Claims are unresolved, unsatisfied or disputed as of the expiration of the Claims Period, then the Escrow Agent shall retain possession and custody of that amount of Escrow Cash that equals the total maximum amount of Damages then being claimed by Natus Indemnified Persons in all such unresolved, unsatisfied or disputed Claims, and as soon as all such Claims have been resolved, the Escrow Agent shall deliver to the Stockholders 84.6080% of the remaining Escrow Cash (if any) not required to satisfy such Claims and shall deliver the balance of any remaining Escrow Cash to the Company (or to such other party as Escrow Holder shall be directed in writing by Natus and the Company). The parties intend the Escrow Cash to qualify for installment sale reporting under  453 of the Code. Distributions from Escrow Cash shall be treated as imputed interest to the extent required by the Code.
SECTION 8.09 .
Tax Consequences of Indemnification Payments
All payments (if any) made to any Natus Indemnified Person pursuant to any indemnification obligations under this will be treated as adjustments to the purchase price for tax purposes and such agreed treatment will govern for purposes of this Agreement, unless otherwise required by law.
Article VIII
SECTION 9.01 .
Notices
All notices, requests, claims, demands and other communications hereunder shall be in writing and shall be given (and shall be deemed to have been duly given upon receipt) by
 
delivery in person, by overnight courier, by facsimile or by registered or certified mail (postage prepaid, return receipt requested) to the respective parties at the following addresses (or at such other address for a party as shall be specified in a notice given in accordance with this ):
Section 9.01
if to Natus:
Natus Medical Incorporated
1501 Industrial Road
San Carlos, CA 94070
Telecopier No.: (650) 802-0401
Attention: James B. Hawkins
with a copy to:
Fenwick & West LLP
801 California Street
Mountain View, CA 94041
Telecopier No. (650) 938-5200
Attention: Daniel J. Winnike
if to Stockholders:
Jay A. Jones and Mary J. Jones
Address, as provided under separate cover.
with a copy to:
Lane Powell PC
1420 5
th
Avenue, Suite 4100
Seattle, WA 98101-2338
Telepcopier No. (206) 223-7107
Attention: Michael D. Dwyer
SECTION 9.02 .
Severability
If any term or other provision of this Agreement is invalid, illegal or incapable of being enforced by any rule of law, or public policy, all other conditions and provisions of this Agreement shall nevertheless remain in full force and effect so long as the economic or legal substance of the Transaction is not affected in any manner materially adverse to any party. Upon such determination that any term or other provision is invalid, illegal or incapable of being enforced, the parties hereto shall negotiate in good faith to modify this Agreement so as to effect the original intent of the parties as closely as possible in a mutually acceptable manner in order that the Transaction be consummated as originally contemplated to the fullest extent possible.
 
SECTION 9.03 .
Entire Agreement; Assignment
This Agreement constitutes the entire agreement among the parties with respect to the subject matter hereof and supersedes all prior agreements and undertakings, both written and oral, among the parties, or any of them, with respect to the subject matter hereof. This Agreement shall not be assigned (whether pursuant to a merger, by operation of law or otherwise), except that Natus may assign all or any of its rights and obligations hereunder to any affiliate of Natus, provided that no such assignment shall relieve the assigning party of its obligations hereunder if such assignee does not perform such obligations.
SECTION 9.04 .
Parties in Interest
This Agreement shall be binding upon and inure solely to the benefit of each party hereto and the successors of such parties, and nothing in this Agreement, express or implied, is intended to or shall confer upon any other person any right, benefit or remedy of any nature whatsoever under or by reason of this Agreement.
SECTION 9.05 .
Specific Performance
The parties hereto agree that irreparable damage would occur in the event any provision of this Agreement were not performed in accordance with the terms hereof and that the parties shall be entitled to specific performance of the terms hereof, in addition to any other remedy at law or equity.
SECTION 9.06 .
Governing Law
This Agreement shall be governed by, and construed in accordance with, the laws of the State of Washington applicable to contracts executed in and to be performed in that State.
SECTION 9.07 .
Waiver of Jury Trial
Each of the parties hereto hereby waives to the fullest extent permitted by applicable law any right it may have to a trial by jury with respect to any litigation directly or indirectly arising out of, under or in connection with this Agreement or the Transaction. Each of the parties hereto (a) certifies that no representative, agent or attorney of any other party has represented, expressly or otherwise, that such other party would not, in the event of litigation, seek to enforce that foregoing waiver and (b) acknowledges that it and the other hereto have been induced to enter into this Agreement and the Transaction, as applicable, by, among other things, the mutual waivers and certifications in this .
Section 9.07
SECTION 9.08 .
Headings
The descriptive headings contained in this Agreement are included for convenience of reference only and shall not affect in any way the meaning or interpretation of this Agreement.
 
SECTION 9.09 .
Counterparts
This Agreement may be executed and delivered (including by facsimile transmission) in one or more counterparts, and by the different parties hereto in separate counterparts, each of which when executed shall be deemed to be an original but all of which taken together shall constitute one and the same agreement.
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, Natus and the Stockholders have caused this Agreement to be executed as of the date first written above.
 

Exhibit 99.1
(Nasdaq:BABY) today announced that it has agreed to acquire privately held Olympic Medical Corp. in a cash acquisition valued at approximately $19.3 million. The Company expects to complete the acquisition today.
SAN CARLOS, Calif. (October 16, 2006)  Natus Medical Incorporated
Olympic Medical, based in Seattle, Washington develops and markets medical products used in the neonatal intensive care unit ("NICU") and pediatric department of the hospital, including devices for the detection of neurologic function of newborns. The acquisition adds to Natus' growth opportunities by broadening its product offerings, which the Company plans to leverage through its direct sales force in the U.S. and international distribution organization. Natus believes the acquisition will be immediately accretive to earnings, excluding associated one-time charges.
Natus plans to retain Olympic Medical's operations, as well as their well-established brands and existing products. Jay Jones, President and founder of Olympic Medical, will continue on as President of the organization. Olympic Medical has approximately 100 employees and recorded sales of $16.0 million during calendar 2005.
"We believe that we can add significant value to Olympic Medical by leveraging their unique products through our marketing and sales organizations," stated Jim Hawkins, President and Chief Executive Officer of Natus. "Olympic Medical is a profitable operation, delivering high-quality products to their customers, including a significant recurring revenue stream generated through disposable products. We will seek to accelerate Olympic's sales growth by bringing their products into new markets around the world."
Olympic Medical develops and manufactures products for the neonatal, pediatric, and operating room markets, and currently sells it products through telemarketing, mail order, and distributors, primarily in the United States. Their proprietary Cerebral Function Monitor can be used in the NICU and other acute care departments to continuously monitor an infant's brain activity. It enables clinical staff to assess the neurological status of the brain as an aid to both diagnosis and treatment.
"We are excited to be joining Natus, a company that shares our passion for quality, innovation, and market leadership," commented Mr. Jones. "Through this business combination, we will be able to take advantage of Natus' worldwide sales organization to more quickly penetrate the international market for our products."
The purchase price for the acquisition consists of a cash payment of approximately $16.6 million to be made at closing, a portion of which will be placed in escrow as security for representations and warranties of the sellers, and the assumption of Olympic Medical's existing payables, including approximately $2.7 million of obligations due immediately following the closing. Olympic Medical is expected to have approximately $1.2 million of cash on its balance sheet as of the closing.
The Company is also obligated to make additional cash payments over a three year period depending on sales of a product developed by Olympic Medical that is currently in the final stage of an FDA approval process.
Natus expects to record a one-time charge in the fourth quarter 2006 for the write-off of acquired in-process research and development associated with the acquisition, which the Company expects could be in the range of $4 million to $6 million. Neither this charge, nor any aspect of the Olympic Medical business, was included in financial guidance previously provided by the Company.
Conference Call
Natus has scheduled an investor community conference call to discuss this announcement beginning at 11:00 a.m. Eastern Time today (8:00 a.m. Pacific Time). Individuals interested in listening to the conference call may do so by dialing (866) 356-4123 for domestic callers, or (617) 597-5393 for international callers, and entering reservation code 12377414. A telephone replay will be available for 48 hours following the conclusion of the call by dialing (888) 286-8010 for domestic callers, or (617) 801-6888 for international callers, and entering reservation code 55406786.
The conference call also will be available real-time via the Internet at http://investor.natus.com, and a recording of the call will be available on the Company's Web site for 90 days following the completion of the call.
About Natus Medical Incorporated
Natus is a leading provider of healthcare products used for the screening, detection, treatment, monitoring and tracking of common medical ailments such as hearing impairment, neurological dysfunction, epilepsy, sleep disorders, newborn jaundice and newborn metabolic testing.
Additional information about Natus Medical can be found at www.natus.com.
This press release contains forward-looking statements as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, particularly statements regarding the expectations, beliefs, plans, intentions and strategies of Natus. These forward-looking statements include, but are not limited to, statements regarding the accretive nature of the acquisition, the amount of acquired in-process research and development that will be written off, and the ability of Natus to accelerate Olympic's growth and enable it to better penetrate international markets. These statements relate to future events or Natus' future financial performance or results, and involve known and unknown risks, uncertainties and other factors that may cause actual results, levels of activity, performance, or achievements to differ materially from those expressed or implied by the forward-looking statements. Forward-looking statements are only predictions and the actual events or results may differ materially. Natus cannot provide any assurance that its future results or the results implied by the forward-looking statements will meet expectations. Our future results could differ materially due to a number of factors, including the effects of competition, the demand for our products and services, our ability to expand our sales in international markets, our ability to maintain current sales levels in a mature domestic market, our ability to control costs, and risks associated with bringing new products to market and integrating acquired businesses. Natus disclaims any obligation to update information contained in any forward-looking statement.
More information about potential risk factors that could affect the business and financial results of Natus is included in Natus' annual report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2005, and its quarterly reports on Form 10-Q, and in other reports filed from time to time by Natus with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BABY/BABY-8K-20061101060041.txt.gz
TIME:20061101060041
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION Washington, D.C. 20549 FORM 8-K CURRENT REPORT Pursuant to Section 13 OR 15(d) of The Securities Exchange Act of 1934 Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported): November 1, 2006 Natus Medical Incorporated - ------------------------------------------------------------------------------- (Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter) - ------------------------------ -------------------- -------------------------- Delaware 000-33001 77-0154833 - ------------------------------ -------------------- -------------------------- (State or other jurisdiction (Commission (IRS Employer of incorporation) File Number) Identification No.) - ------------------------------ -------------------- -------------------------- 1501 Industrial Road, San Carlos, California 94070 - ------------------------------------------------------------------------------ (Address of principal executive offices) (Zip Code) Registrant's telephone number, including area code: (650) 802-0400 ------------------------- Not applicable ------------------------------------------------------------------------------ (Former name or former address, if changed since last report) Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions: [_] Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [_] Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [_] Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [_] Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
ITEM 2.02 RESULTS OF OPERATIONS AND FINANCIAL CONDITION. On November 1, 2006, Natus Medical Incorporated (the "Company") is issuing a press release and holding a conference call regarding its financial results for the third quarter of fiscal 2006 ended September 30, 2006 and other financial information. A copy of the press release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 to this Form 8-K. The information in this Form 8-K and the exhibit attached hereto shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act") or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that Section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing. ITEM 9.01. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS, PRO FORMA FINANCIAL INFORMATION AND EXHIBITS. (c) Exhibits. Exhibit No. Description - ------------ ----------- 99.1 Press release of Natus Medical Incorporated dated November 1, 2006 describing the Company's results for its third fiscal quarter ended September 30, 2006 and other financial information.
SIGNATURES Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized. NATUS MEDICAL INCORPORATED Date: November 1, 2006 By: /s/ Steven J. Murphy ---------------------------------- Steven J. Murphy Vice President Finance and Chief Financial Officer
Index to Exhibits Exhibit No. Description - ------------ ----------- 99.1 Press release of Natus Medical Incorporated dated November 1, 2006 describing the Company's results for its third fiscal quarter ended September 30, 2006 and other financial information.

Exhibit 99.1 Natus Medical Reports Record Third Quarter Revenue and Earnings -- Non-GAAP Pretax Income Up 136% Over Prior Year -- Company Increases 2006 Revenue and Earnings Guidance SAN CARLOS, Calif.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--Nov. 1, 2006--Natus Medical Incorporated (Nasdaq:BABY) today reported financial results for the three and nine months ended September 30, 2006. Natus reported record revenue of $21.8 million for the quarter ended September 30, 2006, an increase of 107% compared to $10.6 million reported in the same period in 2005. The increase was primarily attributable to the acquisition of Bio-logic Systems Corp. in January of 2006. Gross margin was 61.9% for the three months ended September 30, 2006, compared with 65.4% for the third quarter of 2005. The Company reported net income of $1.9 million or $0.09 per diluted share in the third quarter of 2006, compared to net income of $1.5 million or $0.08 per diluted share in the same period in 2005. For the 2006 period, the Company's effective tax rate for book purposes was 45% compared to 7% in the 2005 period. For the nine months ended September 30, 2006, the Company reported a net loss of $1.4 million or ($0.08) per diluted share. Results for the nine months include a $5.9 million charge for in-process research and development associated with the acquisition of Bio-logic. Additionally, the Company's effective tax rate for book purposes was 45% in the 2006 period compared to 10% in 2005. For the three and nine months ended September 30, 2006, respectively, the Company reported income before tax of $3.4 million and $2.2 million. Non-GAAP income before tax increased 136% to $3.8 million for the quarter ended September 30, 2006, from $1.6 million reported in the same period in 2005. For the nine months ended September 30, 2006, non-GAAP income before tax increased 124% to $9.2 million, compared to $4.1 million reported in 2005. The non-GAAP results for 2006 exclude the effect of employee equity-based compensation expense, an in-process research and development charge associated with the acquisition of Bio-logic, and other Bio-logic acquisition related costs. The acquisition of Deltamed on September 12, 2006 did not add significantly to revenue or results of operations for the three months ended September 30, 2006. "I am very pleased to report our excellent third quarter results, with our revenue growing by 107% and our non-GAAP income before tax increasing by 136%," stated Jim Hawkins, President and Chief Executive Officer of Natus. "We are excited about our recently announced acquisitions of Olympic Medical and Deltamed. They strengthen our position as a leading medical device company in both the neonatal and EEG markets. With the integration of Olympic Medical products into our sales channels in 2007, we believe we will achieve significant revenue growth in those products," added Hawkins. "Additionally, with the synergies we expect to achieve from these acquisitions, we believe that in 2007 we will continue to see earnings growth at levels exceeding that of our revenue growth." Financial Guidance Natus increased its financial guidance for the fourth quarter and full year 2006. The Company now expects to report revenue of $27.5 million to $28.5 million in the fourth quarter of 2006, and $88.7 million to $89.7 million for the full year 2006. The Company had previously said that it expected to report revenue of $21.4 million to $21.7 million for the quarter and $81.5 million to $83.0 million for the full year. The Company also expects to report non-GAAP income per diluted share of $0.11 to $0.13 in the fourth quarter 2006, and $0.33 to $0.35 for the full year. The Company had previously said that it expected to report non-GAAP earnings per share of $0.11 to $0.12 for the quarter and $0.31 to $0.34 for the full year. The Company's 2006 fourth-quarter and annual guidance excludes the impact of an in-process research and development charge of $5.9 million associated with the acquisition of Bio-logic recorded in the first quarter 2006, and an in-process research and development charge associated with the acquisition of Olympic Medical that the Company expects to record in the fourth quarter of 2006. The Company's guidance includes the impact of expensing employee equity-based compensation. Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures In addition to disclosing financial results calculated in accordance with GAAP, this release contains a non-GAAP financial measure that excludes the effects of employee equity-based compensation expense as a result of the Company's adoption of SFAS 123R on January 1, 2006 and costs associated with the January 5, 2006 acquisition of Bio-logic Systems Corp. The Company believes that the presentation of results excluding equity-based compensation expense and the acquisition-related charges provides meaningful supplemental information to both management and investors that is indicative of the Company's core operating results. The Company is using the modified prospective method in its adoption of SFAS 123R and as such, will not restate prior year results for the impact of employee stock option expensing. The Company also believes the in-process research and development charge is not indicative of resources devoted to ongoing research and development efforts. Therefore, the Company believes the non-GAAP financial measure facilitates comparison of operating results across reporting periods. A reconciliation between the Company's results of operations on a GAAP and non-GAAP basis for the periods reported is included as part of the condensed consolidated statements of operations at the end of the Company's financial results release. The Company believes that both management and investors benefit from referring to this non-GAAP financial measure in assessing the Company's performance and when planning, forecasting, and analyzing future periods. The non-GAAP financial measure also facilitates management's internal comparisons to the Company's historical performance. The non-GAAP financial measure disclosed by the Company should not be considered a substitute for or superior to financial measures calculated in accordance with GAAP, and the financial results calculated in accordance with GAAP and reconciliations to those financial statements should be carefully evaluated. Conference Call Natus has scheduled an investor conference call to discuss this announcement beginning at 11:00 a.m. Eastern Time today (8:00 a.m. Pacific Time). Individuals interested in listening to the conference call may do so by dialing (866) 700-6067 for domestic callers, or (617) 213-8834 for international callers, and entering reservation code 83873550. A telephone replay will be available for 48 hours following the conclusion of the call by dialing (888) 286-8010 for domestic callers, or (617) 801-6888 for international callers, and entering reservation code 18741771. The conference call also will be available real-time via the Internet at http://investor.natus.com, and a recording of the call will be available on the Company's Web site for 90 days following the completion of the call. About Natus Medical Incorporated Natus is a leading provider of healthcare products used for the screening, detection, treatment, monitoring and tracking of common medical ailments such as hearing impairment, neurological dysfunction, epilepsy, sleep disorders, newborn jaundice and newborn metabolic testing. Additional information about Natus Medical can be found at www.natus.com. This press release contains forward-looking statements as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, particularly statements regarding the expectations, beliefs, plans, intentions and strategies of Natus. These forward-looking statements include, but are not limited to, statements regarding revenue growth associated with the acquisition of Olympic Medial, revenue and earnings growth in 2007, and anticipated revenue and profitability for the fourth-quarter and full-year 2006. These statements relate to future events or Natus' future financial performance or results, and involve known and unknown risks, uncertainties and other factors that may cause actual results, levels of activity, performance, or achievements to differ materially from those expressed or implied by the forward-looking statements. Forward-looking statements are only predictions and the actual events or results may differ materially. Natus cannot provide any assurance that its future results or the results implied by the forward-looking statements will meet expectations. Our future results could differ materially due to a number of factors, including the effects of competition, the demand for our products and services, our ability to expand our sales in international markets, our ability to maintain current sales levels in a mature domestic market, our ability to control costs, and risks associated with bringing new products to market and integrating acquired businesses. Natus disclaims any obligation to update information contained in any forward-looking statement. More information about potential risk factors that could affect the business and financial results of Natus is included in Natus' annual report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2005, and its quarterly reports on Form 10-Q, and in other reports filed from time to time by Natus with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission. NATUS MEDICAL INCORPORATED AND SUBSIDIARIES UNAUDITED CONDENSED CONSOLIDATED BALANCE SHEETS (in thousands, except share amounts) Sep 30, Dec 31, 2006 2005 ASSETS Current assets: Cash and equivalents $ 37,155 $ 40,046 Short-term investments - 12,163 Accounts receivable, net of allowance for doubtful accounts of $506 in 2006 and $173 in 2005 16,107 8,460 Inventories 8,912 3,482 Deferred income tax 562 - Prepaid expenses and other current assets 1,402 1,041 Total current assets 64,138 65,192 Property and equipment, net 7,510 2,116 Goodwill 22,372 3,836 Intangible assets 30,131 6,174 Deferred income tax 410 - Other assets 871 78 Total assets $125,432 $ 77,396 LIABILITIES AND STOCKHOLDERS' EQUITY Current liabilities: Accounts payable $ 5,228 $ 1,817 Current portion of long term debt 7,125 - Accrued liabilities 11,985 5,441 Deferred revenue 1,810 439 Total current liabilities 26,148 7,697 Long term liabilities Note payable - - Deferred income tax - 734 Total liabilities 26,148 8,431 Commitments and contingencies Stockholders' equity: Common stock, $0.001 par value, 120,000,000 shares authorized; shares issued and outstanding: 21,274,917 in 2006 and 18,444,753 in 2005 131,720 99,634 Accumulated deficit (32,189) (30,750) Accumulated other comprehensive income (247) 81 Total stockholders' equity 99,284 68,965 Total liabilities and stockholders' equity $125,432 $ 77,396 NATUS MEDICAL INCORPORATED AND SUBSIDIARIES UNAUDITED CONDENSED CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF OPERATIONS (in thousands, except per share amounts) Three Months Ended Nine Months Ended Sep Sep Sep Sep 2006 2005 2006 2005 --------- -------- -------- -------- Revenue $21,806 $10,551 $61,156 $30,422 Cost of revenue 8,299 3,645 22,809 11,435 --------- -------- -------- -------- Gross profit 13,507 6,906 38,347 18,987 --------- -------- -------- -------- Operating expenses: Marketing and selling 4,809 2,916 14,965 8,355 Research and development 2,438 1,162 7,387 3,233 General and administrative 2,994 1,521 7,928 4,071 Acquired IPR&D - - 5,900 - --------- -------- -------- -------- Total operating expenses 10,241 5,599 36,180 15,659 --------- -------- -------- -------- Income from operations 3,266 1,307 2,167 3,328 --------- -------- -------- -------- Other income/(expense): Interest income 247 314 491 750 Interest expense (160) - (498) - Other income, net 59 5 23 37 --------- -------- -------- -------- Total other income/(expense) 146 319 16 787 --------- -------- -------- -------- Income before provision for income tax 3,412 1,626 2,183 4,115 Provision for income tax 1,543 111 3,622 426 --------- -------- -------- -------- Net income (loss) $ 1,869 $ 1,515 $(1,439) $ 3,689 ========= ======== ======== ======== Earnings (loss) per share: Basic $ 0.09 $ 0.09 $ (0.08) $ 0.21 Diluted $ 0.09 $ 0.08 $ (0.08) $ 0.20 Weighted-average shares used to compute Basic earnings per share 19,749 17,292 18,949 17,224 Diluted earnings per share 20,860 18,877 18,949 18,574 NATUS MEDICAL INCORPORATED AND SUBSIDIARIES RECONCILIATION OF NON-GAAP ADJUSTMENTS (UNAUDITED) (in thousands) Three Months Ended Nine Months Ended Sep Sep Sep Sep 2006 2005 2006 2005 ---------- ------- --------- ------- GAAP income before provision for income tax $3,412 $1,626 $2,183 $4,115 non-GAAP adjustments: Acquired in-process research and development (see note) (a) - - 5,900 - Other transaction related costs associated with the acquisiton of Bio-logic. (see note) (b) - - 168 - Equity-based compensation expense under SFAS 123R (see note) (c) 419 966 ---------- ------- --------- ------- Non-GAAP income before provision for income tax $3,831 $1,626 $9,217 $4,115 ========== ======= ========= ======= Non-GAAP Adjustments (a) A charge for acquired in-process research and development expense related to the acquisition of Bio-logic Systems Corp. on January 5, 2006. Management believes that excluding this charge facilitates comparisons of Natus' core operating results across multiple reporting periods. (b) Other costs associated with the acquisition of Bio-logic that are not properly capitalized as part of the acquisition cost and were expensed. (c) Non-cash equity-based compensation expense related to the Company's adoption of SFAS No. 123R on January 1, 2006. Management believes that it is useful to investors to understand the impact of expenses associated with the adoption of SFAS 123R on reported results of operations. Net income for the three and nine months ended September 30, 2005 did not include equity-based compensation expense under SFAS 123. CONTACT: Natus Medical Incorporated Steven J. Murphy, Chief Financial Officer, 650-802-0400 InvestorRelations@Natus.com


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BABY/BABY-8K-20061220155533.txt.gz
TIME:20061220155533
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
At its December 14, 2006 meeting, the Compensation Committee of the Board of Directors of Natus Medical Incorporated (the "Company") approved the base salaries and bonus program for the Company's executive officers for the period beginning January 1, 2007 and ending December 31, 2007.
The Compensation Committee approved the base salary amounts set forth on the table below based on a review of the Company's performance and competitive market data:
 
The Compensation Committee approved a cash bonus plan for executive officers of the Company based on the Company achieving its budgeted pre-tax profit for 2007. Mr. Hawkins' cash bonus may range from 37.5% to a maximum of 112.5%, and the cash bonuses for each of Dr. Chung and Messrs. Murphy and Mince may range from 17.5% to a maximum of 52.5% of the target amount (based on the amount of actual pre-tax profit relative to the budgeted amount). The target bonus for each of Dr. Chung and Messrs. Mince and Murphy is 35% of 2007 base salary, and for Mr. Hawkins is 75% of 2007 base salary. Mr. Traverso's bonus is comprised of payments made pursuant to a sales compensation plan that is paid on a regular basis throughout the year. The payment of bonuses pursuant to this plan is at the discretion of the Board of Directors.
The Compensation Committee also approved the form of an amendment to the employment agreements between the Company and each of its executive officers to provide that the acceleration-of-vesting provisions that apply to certain stock options will similarly apply to all equity awards. The form of the amendment is attached hereto as Exhibit 10.1.
 
(d) Exhibits.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 

Exhibit 10.1
WHEREAS, on [date], Natus Medical Incorporated (the "Company") and [Executive] entered into an Employment Agreement (the "Agreement"); and
WHEREAS, the Board of Directors of Natus Medical Incorporated has approved amending the Agreement to extend the vesting acceleration afforded stock options under the Agreement to other forms of equity award as well.
NOW THEREFORE IT IS AGREED BETWEEN THE PARTIES, that subpart (ii) of Section 7(a) of the Agreement that details [Executive]'s benefits for termination other than for "Cause" (as defined in the Agreement) is hereby amended in its entirety to read as follows:
(ii)the immediate vesting and exercisability (if the shares are not already outstanding) of 100% of the shares subject to all of Executive's stock awards covering shares of Company Common Stock (whether currently outstanding or granted following the Effective Date) outstanding on the date such release of claims becomes effective (the "Stock Awards") and
 
IT IS FURTHER AGREED BETWEEN THE PARTIES, that "Stock Options" in subpart (i) of Section 7(b) of the Agreement is hereby replaced with "Stock Awards" so that it now reads:
(i)all vesting of Stock Awards will immediately cease
 
This Amendment is entered into as of .
                    
NATUS MEDICAL INCORPORATED
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BABY/BABY-8K-20061229170540.txt.gz
TIME:20061229170540
EVENTS:	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
On October 19, 2006, Natus Medical Incorporated ("Natus") filed a Current Report on Form 8-K to report that it had entered into a Stock Purchase Agreement (the "Stock Purchase Agreement") with Jay A. Jones and Mary J. Jones, sole stockholders (the "Stockholders") of Olympic Medical Corp., a Washington corporation ("Olympic"), pursuant to which Natus purchased from the Stockholders all of the outstanding shares of capital stock of Olympic. This Form 8-K/A is being filed to provide the financial statements described under Item 9.01 below. The financial statements are filed as Exhibits 99.1, 99.2 and 99.3 hereto.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
Financial Statements of Business Acquired
(a)
The required financial statements of Olympic Medical Corporation as of and for the year ended December 31, 2005 are attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1 and are incorporated in their entirety herein by reference.
The required financial statements of Olympic Medical Corporation as of and for the nine months ended September 30, 2006 and 2005 are attached hereto as Exhibit 99.2 and are incorporated in their entirety herein by reference.
Pro Forma Financial Information
(b)
The required pro forma balance sheet as of September 30, 2006, and the required pro forma statements of operations for the year ended December 31, 2005 and for the nine months ended September 30, 2006, are attached hereto as Exhibit 99.3 and are incorporated in their entirety herein by reference.
Exhibits. The following exhibits are filed herewith:
(d)
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 23.1
We consent to the incorporation by reference in Natus Medical Incorporated's Registration Statement No. 333-133480 on Form S-3/Aof our report dated December 22, 2006, relating to the financial statements of Olympic Medical Corporation as of and for the year ended December 31, 2005, appearing in this Current Report on Form 8-K/A of Natus Medical Incorporated.
/s/ Deloitte and Touche LLP
San Francisco, CA
December 29, 2006

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
INDEPENDENT AUDITORS' REPORT
To the Board of Directors and Stockholders of
Natus Medical, Inc
San Carlos, CA
We have audited the accompanying balance sheet of Olympic Medical Corporation (the "Company"), a wholly owned subsidiary of Natus Medical Incorporated, as of December 31, 2005, and the related statements of operations, stockholders' equity, and cash flow for the year ended December 31, 2005. These financial statements are the responsibility of the Company's management. Our responsibility is to express an opinion on these financial statements based on our audit.
We conducted our audit in accordance with auditing standards generally accepted in the United States of America. Those standards require that we plan and perform the audit to obtain reasonable assurance about whether the financial statements are free of material misstatement. An audit includes consideration of internal control over financial reporting as a basis for designing audit procedures that are appropriate in the circumstances, but not for the purpose of expressing an opinion on the effectiveness of the Company's internal control over financial reporting. Accordingly, we express no such opinion. An audit also includes examining, on a test basis, evidence supporting the amounts and disclosures in the financial statements, assessing the accounting principles used and significant estimates made by management, as well as evaluating the overall financial statement presentation. We believe that our audit provides a reasonable basis for our opinion.
In our opinion, such financial statements present fairly, in all material respects, the financial position of the Company as of December 31, 2005 and the results of its operations and its cash flows for the year then ended in conformity with accounting principles generally accepted in the United States of America.
Deloitte and Touche LLP
San Francisco, CA
December 22, 2006
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
1. Organization and Significant Accounting Policies
- Olympic Medical Corporation (the "Company") was incorporated in Washington in 1965. The Company is a medical device manufacturer regulated by the U.S. Food and Drug Administration ("FDA") that develops, manufactures, and distributes professional medical equipment and supplies primarily to hospitals. The Company's principal product lines are pediatric devices for hospital nurseries. Other product lines include surgical, disinfecting, and respiratory devices. The Company's products are marketed under the brand name "Olympic Medical Corp." and are distributed by means of direct mailings and Company sales representatives stationed throughout the United States and Canada. Other international sales are made through distributors. The Company operates in one reportable segment.
Organization
All of the outstanding shares of stock of the Company are owned by two individuals, husband and wife. One of the shareholders acts as the Company's Chief Executive Officer.
For federal and state income tax purposes the Company is an S Corporation. Accordingly, all taxes on the earnings of the Company are paid by the owner. No provision for income taxes is provided for in the Company's financial statements.
- The preparation of financial statements in conformity with accounting principles generally accepted in the United States of America requires management to make estimates and assumptions that affect the reported amounts of assets and liabilities and disclose contingent assets and liabilities in the consolidated financial statements. Such estimates include allowances for potentially uncollectible accounts receivable reserve, use tax, and warranty reserve. Actual results could differ from those estimates.
Use of Estimates
- The Company recognizes revenue, net of discounts, from sales of medical devices and supplies, including sales to distributors, when a purchase order has been received, title transfers (generally upon shipment), the selling price is fixed or determinable, and collection of the resulting receivable is reasonably assured. Terms of sales to customers are generally F.O.B. Seattle, Washington.
Revenue Recognition
Revenue from service and maintenance is recognized when the service is performed. No long-term service or maintenance contracts are initiated.
The Company provides rights of return on certain products. Customers are given the right to return products within one year. After 60 days, they are charged a restocking fee. The Company recorded a returns provision of $68,000 in 2005, based on its historical experience of sales returns under Financial Standards Accounting Board ("FASB") Statement of Financial Standards (" SFAS") No. 48, .
Revenue Recognition When Right of Return Exists
The Company accepts trade-ins on two of its medical devices. Trade-ins are recorded as a reduction of revenue in accordance with FASB Emerging Issues Task Force ("EITF") No. 00-24, .
Revenue Recognition: Sales Arrangements That Include Specified-Price Trade-in Rights
- The Company considers all highly liquid equity instruments purchased with an original maturity of three months or less to be cash equivalents.
Cash and Cash Equivalents
- Financial instruments that potentially subject the Company to credit risk consist principally of cash and cash equivalents and accounts receivable. Cash and cash equivalents consist of cash in bank accounts and investments in money market funds. To minimize its exposure to credit risk, the Company invests in highly liquid, high investment-grade financial instruments.
Certain Significant Risks and Uncertainties
 
The Company sells its products primarily to hospitals and medical institutions. The Company generally does not require its customers to provide collateral or other security to support accounts receivable. The Company maintains allowances for estimated potential bad debt losses. No single customer or distributor accounted for more than 10% of accounts receivable as of December 31, 2005.
- The Company's financial instruments include cash and cash equivalents and accounts receivable. Cash and cash equivalents are reported at their respective fair values on the balance sheet dates. The recorded carrying amount of accounts receivable approximates their fair value due to their short-term maturities.
Fair Value of Financial Instruments
- Inventories are stated at the lower of current cost, which approximates actual cost on a first-in, first-out basis, or market. The Company may be exposed to a number of factors that could result in portions of its inventory becoming either obsolete or in excess of anticipated usage. These factors include, but are not limited to, technological changes in its markets, competitive pressures in products and prices, and the introduction of new product lines. The Company regularly evaluates its ability to realize the value of its inventory based on a combination of factors, including historical usage rates, forecasted sales, product life cycles, and market acceptance of new products. When inventory that is obsolete or in excess of anticipated usage is identified, it is written down to realizable salvage value.
Inventories
- Property and equipment are stated at cost. Depreciation is computed using the straight line method for leasehold improvements and on the double declining balance method for other assets over estimated useful lives of three to seven years. Leasehold improvements are amortized over the shorter of the lease term or the estimated useful life.
Property and Equipment
- Costs incurred in research and development are charged to the statement of operations as incurred. The costs to develop software have not been capitalized, as the Company believes its current software development process is essentially completed concurrent with the establishment of technological feasibility of the software.
Research and Development Costs
- Gains and losses from transactions denominated in currencies other than the functional currencies of the Company are included in the statement of operations. In 2005, net foreign currency transaction gains and losses were immaterial. Foreign currency gains and losses result primarily from fluctuations in the exchange rate between the U.S. dollar and the Canadian dollar.
Foreign Currency
- In November 2004, the Financial Accounting Standards Board ("FASB") issued Statement of Financial Accounting Standards ("SFAS") No. 151, Inventory Costs, an amendment of ARB No. 43, Chapter 4, to clarify that abnormal amounts of idle facility expense, freight, handling costs, and wasted material (spoilage) should be recognized as current period charges, and that fixed production overhead should be allocated to inventory based on normal capacity of production facilities. This statement is effective for inventory costs incurred during fiscal years beginning after June 15, 2005. Accordingly, the Company adopted SFAS No. 151 for the fiscal year beginning January 1, 2006. The adoption of SFAS No. 151 did not have a significant impact on the Company's results of operations, financial position ,or cash flows.
Recently Issued Accounting Standards
2. Inventories
Inventories at December 31, 2005, consist of the following:
 
 
3. Property and Equipment
Property and equipment at December 31, 2005, consist of the following:
 
Depreciation expense on property and equipment was $166,660 for the year ended December 31, 2005.
4. Accrued liabilities
Accrued liabilities at December 31, 2005, consist of the following:
 
5. Reserve for Product Warranties
The Company provides a one-year warranty on all medical device products. The Company also sells extended service agreements on its medical device products. Service for domestic customers is provided by Company-owned service centers that perform all service, repair and calibration services. Service for international customers is provided by a combination of Company-owned facilities and third-party vendors on a contract basis.
The Company has accrued a warranty reserve, included in accrued liabilities on the accompanying balance sheet, for the expected future costs of servicing products during the initial one-year warranty period. Amounts are added to the reserve on a per-unit basis by reference to historical experience in honoring warranty obligations. On new products, where the Company does not have historical experience of the cost to honor warranties, additions to the reserve are based on a combination of factors including the standard cost of the product and other judgments, such as the degree to which the product incorporates new technology. As warranty costs are incurred, the reserve is reduced.
 
Activity in the warranty reserve during the twelve months ended December 31, 2005 consisted of:
 
6. Commitments and contingencies
In the normal course of business, the Company enters into obligations and commitments that require future contractual payments. The commitments result primarily from firm, noncancellable purchase orders placed with contract vendors that manufacture some of the components used in our medical devices, as well as commitments for leased office, manufacturing, and warehouse facilities.
The Company currently is, and may from time to time, become a party to various legal proceedings or claims that arise in the ordinary course of business. Management has reviewed the eminent matters and believes that the resolution of them will not have a significant adverse effect on its financial condition.
- Effective January 1, 1992, the Company entered into an operating lease for office and manufacturing space in Seattle, Washington. The initial lease term was for five years with provisions for multiple five year extensions, and was extended in October 2006, through December 31, 2011. Rent expense for the year ended December 31, 2005 was $345,500. The annual lease amount increased to $372,000 with the October 2006 extension. Rent expense is straightlined over the term of the lease.
Leases
The Company sub-leases a portion of its facility in Seattle, Washington on a month-to-month basis. Lease income from the sub-lease for the year ended December 31, 2005 was approximately $82,383 and is recorded as Other Income.
Future minimum lease payments are as follows:
 
- The Company had various purchase commitments for inventory totaling approximately $152,132 at December 31, 2005.
Purchase Commitments
 
7. Stockholders' Equity
The Company has 50,000 shares of common stock authorized and 25,000 shares issued and outstanding at a par value of $1.00 per share. On December 31, 2005, the Company distributed $150,000 to its stockholders.
Common Stock
-
8. Other income expense, net
Other income (expense), net for the twelve months ended December 31, 2005 consisted of
 
9. Employee Benefit Plan
The Company has a profit sharing plan under which eligible employees are allocated a percentage of the discretionary Company contribution to the plan for the year. Employees cannot contribute into this plan and are eligible for the discretionary contribution after the completion of one year of service with the Company. The allocated percentage of the discretionary contribution awarded to the eligible employees is based on the ratio of the employee's gross wages to the total gross wages of the Company. The Company funds the discretionary contribution over the nine months following the plan year. The Company's discretionary contribution was $467,800 in 2005. These amounts were allocated as expense to various departments, based on each employee's departmental classification. Employees vest in the contributions over a six year period as follows:
 
If employees terminate their employment before they are fully vested (6 years), they are eligible for only their total employer contribution times their vested percentage, which is based on their number of years of service as seen in the table above. In the event that employees terminate their employment before they are fully vested, their non- vested portion is distributed to the remaining employees in the pool.
10. Subsequent Event
On October 16, 2006 all of the outstanding stock of the Company was acquired by Natus Medical, Incorporated for $19.5 million.
 

Exhibit 99.2
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
1. Basis of Presentation
The accompanying interim condensed financial statements of Olympic Medical Incorporated ("Olympic," the "Company") have been prepared in accordance with accounting principles generally accepted in the United Sates of America ("GAAP"). The accounting policies followed in the preparation of the interim condensed financial statements are consistent in all material respects with those presented in Note 1 to the audited financial statements for the year ended December 31, 2005 contained herein as Exhibit 99.1 in this Current Report on Form 8-K.
Interim financial reports are prepared in accordance with the rules and regulations of the Securities and Exchange Commission; accordingly, they do not include all of the information and notes required by GAAP for annual financial statements. The interim financial information is unaudited, but reflects all normal adjustments that are, in the opinion of management, necessary for fair presentation of our financial position, results of operations and cash flows for the interim periods presented. Operating results for the nine months ended September 30, 2006 are not necessarily indicative of the results that may be expected for the year ending December 31, 2006.
Recently Issued Accounting Standards
In December 2004, the Financial Accounting Standards Board ("FASB") issued Statement of Financial Accounting Standards ("SFAS") No. 123R, . Because the Company has not awarded share-based compensation the Company does not expect that this statement will have a material impact on its results of operations, financial position, or cash flows.
Share-Based Payment
In June 2005, the FASB issued SFAS No. 154, . SFAS 154 changes the requirements for the accounting for and reporting of a change in accounting principle. The Company does not expect that this statement will have a material impact on its results of operations, financial position, or cash flows.
Accounting Changes and Error Corrections, a replacement of APB Opinion No. 20, Accounting Changes, and SFAS No. 3, Reporting Accounting Changes in Interim Financial Statements
In June 2006, the FASB issued Interpretation ("FIN") No. 48, FIN No. 48 is an interpretation of FASB Statement No. 109, , and must be adopted by the Company no later than January 1, 2007. FIN 48 prescribes a comprehensive model for recognizing, measuring, presenting, and disclosing in the financial statements uncertain tax positions that the Company has taken or expects to take in its tax returns. Because the Company is an S Corporation for federal and state income tax purposes, all taxes on the earnings of the Company are paid by the owner. Accordingly, the Company does not expect that this statement will have a material impact on its results of operations, financial position, or cash flows.
Accounting for Uncertainty in Income Taxes
.
Accounting for Income Taxes
In September 2006, the FASB issued SFAS 157, . SFAS 157 defines fair value, establishes a framework for measuring fair value in generally accepted accounting principles and expands disclosures about fair value measurements. SFAS 157 is effective for fiscal years beginning after November 15, 2007 and interim periods within those fiscal years. The Company is evaluating the impact of adopting SFAS 157.
Fair Value Measurements
 
2. Inventories
Inventories consisted of:
 
3. Property and Equipment
Property and equipment consisted of:
 
The Company recorded depreciation expense of approximately $141,852 and $121,934 for the nine months ended September 30, 2006 and 2005, respectively.
4. Stockholders' Equity
The following are the changes in stockholders' equity:
 
5. Reserve For Product Warranties
The Company provides a one-year warranty on all medical device products. The Company also sells extended service agreements on its medical device products. Service for domestic customers is provided by Company-owned service centers that perform all service, repair and calibration services. Service for international customers is provided by a combination of Company-owned facilities and third-party vendors on a contract basis.
The Company has accrued a warranty reserve, included in accrued liabilities on the accompanying balance sheets, for the expected future costs of servicing products during the initial one-year warranty period. Amounts are added to the reserve on a per-unit basis by reference to historical experience in honoring warranty obligations. On
 
new products, where the Company does not have historical experience of the cost to honor warranties, additions to the reserve are based on a combination of factors including the standard cost of the product and other judgments, such as the degree to which the product incorporates new technology. As warranty costs are incurred, the reserve is reduced.
Activity in the warranty reserve during the nine months ended September 30, 2006 and 2005 consisted of:
 
6. Other income (expense), net
Other income (expense), net consisted of:
 
7. Commitments and Contingencies
In the normal course of business, we enter into obligations and commitments that require future contractual payments. The commitments result primarily from firm, noncancellable purchase orders placed with contract vendors that manufacture some of the components used in our medical devices, as well as commitments for leased office, manufacturing, and warehouse facilities.
We currently are, and may from time to time, become a party to various legal proceedings or claims that arise in the ordinary course of business. Our management has reviewed the eminent matters and believes that the resolution of them will not have a significant adverse effect on our financial condition.
The Company had various purchase commitments for inventory totaling approximately $139,000 at September 30, 2006.
8. Subsequent Event
On October 16, 2006 all of the outstanding stock of the Company was acquired by Natus Medical, Incorporated for $19.5 million.
 

Exhibit 99.3
On October 16, 2006, Natus Medical Incorporated (the "Company") entered into a Stock Purchase Agreement (the "Agreement") with Jay A. Jones and Mary J. Jones, sole stockholders (the "Stockholders") of Olympic Medical Corporation, a Washington state Corporation ("Olympic"), pursuant to which the Company purchased from the Stockholders all of the outstanding shares of capital stock of Olympic (the "Stock Purchase"). The purchase price for the acquisition consisted of a cash payment of approximately $16.6 million made at the closing for all outstanding shares of Olympic, and approximately $2.7 million of payments to Olympic employees concurrent with the acquisition. $1.5 million of the purchase price was placed in escrow as security for the Stockholders' representations and warranties. The Agreement also provides for the payment of additional purchase consideration dependent upon sales results of a product in the final stage of the Food and Drug Administration's approval process. If paid, the additional purchase consideration will be recorded as goodwill.
The following unaudited pro forma condensed combined balance sheet as of September 30, 2006, and the unaudited pro forma condensed combined statements of operations for the year ended December 31, 2005 and the nine months ended September 30, 2006, are based on the historical financial statements of Natus and Olympic after giving effect to Natus' acquisition of Olympic using the purchase method of accounting and applying the assumptions and adjustments described in the accompanying notes to the unaudited pro forma condensed combined financial statements.
The unaudited pro forma condensed combined balance sheet combines the historical condensed consolidated balance sheet of Natus as of September 30, 2006 as filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission ("SEC") on Form 10-Q, with the historical condensed consolidated balance sheet of Olympic as of September 30, 2006, giving effect to the acquisition as if it had occurred on September 30, 2006. The unaudited pro forma condensed combined statements of operations for the year ended December 31, 2005 and the nine months ended September 30, 2006 combines the historical consolidated statement of operations of Natus for the year ended December 31, 2005, as filed with the SEC in its annual report on Form 10-K, and for the nine months ended September 30, 2006, as filed with the SEC in its quarterly report on Form 10-Q, with the historical statement of operations of Olympic for the year ended December 31, 2005, and the nine months ended September 30, 2006, giving effect to the acquisition as though it had occurred at the beginning of the periods presented.
The acquisition has been accounted for under the purchase method of accounting in accordance with Statement of Financial Accounting Standards ("SFAS") No. 141, . Under the purchase method of accounting, the total estimated purchase price, calculated as described in Note 1 to these unaudited pro forma condensed combined financial statements, is allocated to the net tangible and intangible assets of Olympic acquired in connection with the acquisition, based on their estimated fair values. Management has made a preliminary allocation of the estimated purchase price to the tangible and intangible assets acquired and liabilities assumed based on various preliminary estimates. The allocation of the estimated purchase price is preliminary pending finalization of various estimates and valuation analyses.
Business Combinations
The unaudited pro forma condensed combined financial statements have been prepared by management for illustrative purposes only and are not necessarily indicative of the financial position or results of operations in future periods or the results that actually would have been realized had Natus and Olympic been a combined company during the specified periods. The pro forma adjustments are based on the preliminary information available at the time of the preparation of this document. The unaudited pro forma condensed combined financial statements, including the notes thereto, are qualified in their entirety by reference to, and should be read in conjunction with the historical consolidated financial statements of Natus included in its annual report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2005, and in its quarterly report on Form 10-Q for the nine months ended September 30, 2006. In addition, the unaudited pro forma condensed combined financial statements, including the notes thereto, are based on the historical financial statements of Olympic for the year ended December 31, 2005 and for the nine months ended September 30, 2006, which are included in Exhibits 99.1 and 99.2, respectively, to this current report on Form 8-K.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
1 - Basis of Presentation
On October 16, 2006, Natus completed its acquisition of Olympic whereby Olympic became a wholly owned subsidiary of Natus in a transaction accounted for using the purchase method. The preliminary estimated total purchase price of the acquisition is as follows (in thousands):
 
The Agreement also provides for the payment of additional purchase consideration dependent upon sales results of a product in the final stage of the Food and Drug Administration's approval process. Because payment of the additional purchase consideration is not determinable beyond a reasonable doubt, the additional purchase consideration has not been recorded as an obligation as of the purchase date. If paid, the additional purchase consideration will be recorded as goodwill.
$1.5 million of the purchase price was placed in escrow as security for the Stockholders' representations and warranties.
Under the purchase method of accounting, the total estimated purchase price as shown in the table above is allocated to the net tangible and intangible assets of Olympic based on their estimated fair values as of October 16, 2006. Management has allocated the preliminary estimated purchase price based on preliminary estimates based on various factors as described in the introduction to these unaudited pro forma condensed combined financial statements. The allocation of the purchase price is preliminary, pending the completion of various analyses and the finalization of estimates. The allocation of the preliminary purchase price, and estimated useful lives and first year amortization on an annualized basis associated with the amortizable identifiable intangible assets, is as follows (in thousands):
 
 
- A preliminary estimate of $5.6 million has been allocated to net tangible assets. The Company has not completed its analysis of the fair market value of other tangible assets acquired and any adjustment to the fair market value will be offset by a corresponding adjustment to goodwill.
Net tangible assets
- Acquired identifiable intangible assets include core technology, developed technology, and tradenames. Core technology represents a combination of Olympic processes, patents, and trade secrets developed through years of experience in design and development of their products, which will be amortized on a straight-line basis over a period of 15 years. Developed technology relates to Olympic's products across all of their product lines that are currently marketed to their customers, which will be amortized on a straight-line basis over a period of 10 years. Tradenames relates to the Olympic tradename and the tradenames of specific product lines; they have an indefinite life and will not be amortized.
Identifiable intangible assets
- A preliminary estimate of $700,000 has been allocated to customer-related intangibles, representing the value of the business attributable to repeat business from customers of the Company at the time of the acquisition. The customer-related intangible will be amortized on a straight-line basis over a period of seven years.
Customer-related intangibles
- A preliminary estimate of $3.9 million has been allocated to in-process research and development and will be charged to expense as of the date of the acquisition. Due to its non-recurring nature, the in-process research and development expense has been excluded from the unaudited pro forma condensed combined statements of operations.
In-process research and development
Olympic is currently developing new products that qualify as in-process research and development. Projects that qualify as in-process research and development represent those that have not yet reached technological feasibility. Technological feasibility is defined as being equivalent to completion of a beta-phase working prototype in which there is no remaining risk relating to the development. The Company believes there is a risk that these development efforts and enhancements will not achieve technological feasibility, or if they do, may not be competitive with other products using alternative technologies that offer comparable functionality.
The value assigned to in-process research and development was determined by considering the importance of each project to the overall development plan, estimating costs to develop the purchased in-process research and development into commercially viable products, estimating the resulting net cash flows from the projects when completed, and discounting the net cash flows to their present value. The revenue estimates used to value the purchased in-process research and development were based on estimates of relevant market sizes and growth factors, expected trends in technology, and the nature and expected timing of new product introductions by Olympic and its competitors.
The estimates used in valuing in-process research and development were based upon assumptions believed to be reasonable but which are inherently uncertain and unpredictable. Assumptions may be incomplete or inaccurate, and unanticipated events and circumstances may occur. Accordingly, actual results may vary from these estimates.
- Concurrent with the acquisition, Olympic made payments totaling $2.7 million to employees of Olympic. These payments have been charged to expense as of the date of the acquisition. Due to the non-recurring nature of these payments, the payments to employees have been excluded from the unaudited pro forma condensed combined statements of operations.
Payments to employees
- Approximately $1.8 million has been allocated to goodwill. Goodwill represents the excess of the purchase price over the fair value of the underlying net tangible and intangible assets. The Company expects that all of the goodwill will be deductible for federal and state corporate tax purposes. In accordance with SFAS No. 142, , goodwill will not be amortized but instead will be tested for impairment at least annually (more frequently if certain indicators are present). In the event that management of the Company determines that the value of goodwill has become impaired, the Company will incur an accounting charge for the amount of impairment during the fiscal quarter in which the determination is made.
Goodwill
Goodwill and Other Intangible Assets
2 - Pro Forma Adjustments
Pro forma adjustments are described on the face of the respective financial statements.
 
Pro forma adjustments are necessary to reflect the estimated purchase price, the estimated value of acquired identified intangible assets, goodwill, the amortization expense related to the estimated amortizable intangible assets and the income tax effect related to the pro forma adjustments based on statutory rates in effect in the United States.
There were no proforma adjustments related to the change in the method of depreciation of fixed assets from the double declining balance method to the straightline method to correspond with the Company's accounting policy for depreciation. This adjustment is not expected to have a material impact on the Company's financial position, results of operations, or cash flows.
The pro forma combined provision for income taxes does not necessarily reflect the amounts that would have resulted had Natus and Olympic filed consolidated income tax returns during the periods presented. The effective tax rate used for the proforma adjustments is the effective tax rate for Natus standalone for the twelve months ended December 31, 2005 and nine months ended September 30, 2006. The tax adjustments include the tax effect of the results of operations of Olympic as well as the proforma adjustments.
There were no intercompany balances or transactions between Natus and Olympic as of the dates and for the periods of these pro forma condensed combined financial statements.
3 - Pro Forma Net Income Per Share
The Company computes net income per share in accordance with SFAS No. 128,. Basic net income per share is based upon the weighted average number of common shares outstanding during the year ended December 31, 2005 and for the nine months ended September 30, 2006. Diluted net income per share is based upon the weighted average number of common shares outstanding and dilutive common stock equivalents outstanding during the same period. Common stock equivalents are shares underlying options under the Company's stock option plans and are calculated using the treasury stock method.
Earnings per Share
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BABY/BABY-8K-20070220060716.txt.gz
TIME:20070220060716
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
[ ] Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
[ ] Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 
[ ] Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
[ ] Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
 
ITEM 2.02. 
Results of Operations and Financial Condition
.
On February 20, 2007 Natus Medical Incorporated (the Company) is issuing a press release and holding a conference call regarding its financial results for the fourth quarter and year ended December 31, 2006 and other financial information. A copy of the press release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 to this Form 8-K.
The information in this Form 8-K and the exhibit attached hereto shall not be deemed filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the Exchange Act) or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that Section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
ITEM 9.01. 
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS, PRO FORMA FINANCIAL INFORMATION AND EXHIBITS.
 
 
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 

 
 
Natus Medical Announces 2006 Fourth Quarter and Year Financial Results
 
- Company Reports Record Fourth Quarter Revenue and Non-GAAP Earnings
 
- Increases 2007 Guidance
SAN CARLOS, Calif. (February 20, 2007) - Natus Medical Incorporated
(Nasdaq:BABY) today announced financial results for the three months and year ended December 31, 2006.
For the fourth quarter ended December 31, 2006, Natus reported revenue of $28.8 million, representing a 128% increase from $12.6 million in the comparable quarter of the previous year. The Company reported net income of $512,000, or $0.02 per diluted share, for the fourth quarter of 2006, compared with net income of $2.5 million, or $0.13 per diluted share, for the fourth quarter of 2005.
Non-GAAP income before tax for the fourth quarter of 2006 was $4.8 million, representing an increase of 90% from $2.5 million reported in the fourth quarter of 2005. Non-GAAP net income for the fourth quarter of 2006 was $2.9 million, or $0.13 per diluted share.
During 2006 the Company completed the acquisitions of Bio-logic Systems in January, Deltamed in September, and Olympic Medical in October. These acquisitions contributed to the revenue growth in 2006, while acquisition-related costs reduced GAAP based earnings. Non-GAAP results for the fourth quarter of 2006 exclude the effect of an in-process research and development charge associated with the acquisition of Olympic Medical, but include the cost of employee equity-based compensation.
For the year ended December 31, 2006, the Company reported record revenue of $89.9 million, an increase of 109% from $43.0 million for the year ended December 31, 2005. The Company reported a net loss of $927,000, or a loss of ($0.05) per share for the full year 2006, compared with net income of $6.2 million, or $0.33 per diluted share, for the year ended December 31, 2005.
Non-GAAP income before tax for 2006 was $12.9 million, representing an increase of 94% over $6.7 million reported in 2005. Non-GAAP net income for 2006 was $7.3 million, or $0.35 per diluted share. The non-GAAP results exclude the effects of in-process research and development charges associated with the acquisitions of Bio-logic and Olympic, but include the cost of employee equity-based compensation.
In 2006, the Company released its valuation allowance against its deferred tax assets; consequently, its effective tax rate increased to 45% in 2006, compared to 8% for the 2005 period. The Companys results for the three months and year ended December 31 2006 include employee equity-based compensation expense of $442,000 and $1.4 million, respectively, for which there was no corresponding charge in 2005.
As of December 31, 2006 the Company had cash, cash equivalents, and short-term investments of $15 million, stockholders' equity of $101 million, working capital of $31 million, and no long-term debt. During the fourth quarter of 2006 the Company paid off the entire $7.2 million outstanding balance of an existing term-loan.
Jim Hawkins, President and Chief Executive Officer of the Company said, Last year was an eventful and productive year for Natus as we completed three acquisitions and saw revenue increase by more than 100%. Excluding charges for in-process research and development and stock based compensation, our pre tax earnings more than doubled.
 
 
 
 
 
 
I am extremely pleased with our results for the fourth quarter and full year 2006, added Hawkins. With the integration of Olympic Medical near completion, I believe Natus is well positioned for continued revenue and earnings growth in 2007.
In addition, I am most excited that the FDA recently awarded PMA approval for our Cool-Cap product. The Cool-Cap System, which is the only FDA approved device for the treatment of hypoxic ischemic encephalopathy (HIE) in term newborns has the opportunity to become the standard of care for treatment of this type of brain injury, stated Hawkins. We are very encouraged by the initial response to the mid-January introduction of the Cool-Cap, which has already generated not only great interest, but also orders.
Based on the early acceptance of the Cool-Cap, we are comfortable incorporating some benefit from this product into our expectations for 2007 and we are now increasing our revenue and earnings guidance, added Hawkins.
 
Increase Full Year 2007 Financial Guidance
 
 
Natus increased its financial guidance for the full year 2007. For the full year 2007, the Company now expects revenue to range from $115 million to $117 million and earnings per share to range from $0.49 to $0.52. The Company had previously said revenue would range from $114 million to $116 million and earnings per share would range from $0.47 to $0.51.
Natus reiterated its previously announced guidance for the first and second quarters of 2007.
For the first quarter 2007, the Company expects revenue to range from $25.5 million to $26.0 million and earnings per share to range from $0.07 to $0.08. This compares to revenue of $19.4 million and a loss per share of ($0.25) reported in the first quarter 2006. Results for the 2006 period included the impact of a $5.9 million charge for in-process research and development associated with the acquisition of Bio-logic, and earnings per share on a non-GAAP basis excluding the charge would have been $0.06.
For the second quarter 2007, the Company expects revenue to range from $27.5 million to $28.0 million and earnings per share to range from $0.10 to $0.11. This compares to revenue of $20.0 million and earnings per share of $0.07 reported in the second quarter 2006.
The guidance is based on an effective tax rate for book purposes of approximately 45%. Because the Company will utilize tax net operating loss carryforwards to significantly reduce its taxable income in 2007, it expects that it will pay taxes at a rate of only 12% to 15% for the year.
The Companys 2007 guidance is on a GAAP basis, including the impact of expensing employee equity-based compensation, however it does not include the impact of any one-time acquisition or restructuring related charges that may be incurred in 2007. All earnings per share amounts are on a diluted basis.
 
Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures
In addition to disclosing financial results calculated in accordance with GAAP, this release contains non-GAAP financial measures that exclude the effects of costs associated with the January 5, 2006 acquisition of Bio-logic Systems Corp., and the October 16, 2006 acquisition of Olympic Medical. The Company believes that the presentation of results excluding these acquisition-related charges provides meaningful supplemental information to both management and investors that is indicative of the Company's core operating results.
The Company also believes the in-process research and development charges are not indicative of resources devoted to ongoing research and development efforts. Therefore, the Company believes the non-GAAP financial measures facilitate comparison of operating results across reporting periods. A reconciliation between the Company's results of operations on a GAAP and non-GAAP basis for the periods reported is included as part of the condensed consolidated statements of operations at the end of the Company's financial results release.
 
 
 
 
 
 
The Company believes that both management and investors benefit from referring to these non-GAAP financial measures in assessing the Company's performance and when planning, forecasting, and analyzing future periods. The non-GAAP financial measures also facilitate management's internal comparisons to the Company's historical performance. The non-GAAP financial measures disclosed by the Company should not be considered a substitute for or superior to financial measures calculated in accordance with GAAP, and the financial results calculated in accordance with GAAP and reconciliations to those financial statements should be carefully evaluated.
Conference Call
 
Natus has scheduled an investment-community conference call to discuss this announcement beginning at 11:00 a.m. Eastern Time today (8:00 a.m. Pacific Time). Individuals interested in listening to the conference call may do so by dialing (866) 270-6057 for domestic callers, or (617) 213-8891 for international callers, and entering reservation code 30647968. A telephone replay will be available for 48 hours following the conclusion of the call by dialing (888) 286-8010 for domestic callers, or (617) 801-6888 for international callers, and entering reservation code 40282401.
 
The conference call also will be available real-time via the Internet at http://investor.natus.com, and a recording of the call will be available on the Companys Web site for 90 days following the completion of the call.
 
About Natus Medical Incorporated
 
Natus is a leading provider of healthcare products used for the screening, detection, treatment, monitoring and tracking of common medical ailments such as hearing impairment, neurological dysfunction, epilepsy, sleep disorders, newborn jaundice and newborn metabolic testing.
 
Additional information about Natus Medical can be found at www.natus.com.
 
This press release contains forward-looking statements as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, particularly statements regarding the expectations, beliefs, plans, intentions and strategies of Natus. These forward-looking statements include, but are not limited to, statements regarding future results from the Cool-Cap product, and anticipated revenue and profitability for the full year and first two quarters of 2007. These statements relate to future events or Natus' future financial performance or results, and involve known and unknown risks, uncertainties and other factors that may cause actual results, levels of activity, performance, or achievements to differ materially from those expressed or implied by the forward-looking statements. Forward-looking statements are only predictions and the actual events or results may differ materially. Natus cannot provide any assurance that its future results or the results implied by the forward-looking statements will meet expectations. Our future results could differ materially due to a number of factors, including the effects of competition, the demand for our products and services, our ability to expand our sales in international markets, our ability to maintain current sales levels in a mature domestic market, our ability to control costs, and risks associated with bringing new products to market and integrating acquired businesses. Natus disclaims any obligation to update information contained in any forward-looking statement.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
More information about potential risk factors that could affect the business and financial results of Natus is included in Natus' annual report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2005, and its quarterly reports on Form 10-Q, and in other reports filed from time to time by Natus with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission.
 
COMPANY CONTACT:
Natus Medical Incorporated
Steven J. Murphy
Chief Financial Officer
(650) 802-0400
InvestorRelations@Natus.com
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BABY/BABY-8K-20070503081341.txt.gz
TIME:20070503081341
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION Washington, D.C. 20549 FORM 8-K CURRENT REPORT Pursuant to Section 13 OR 15(d) of The Securities Exchange Act of 1934 Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported) May 3, 2007 Natus Medical Incorporated - -------------------------------------------------------------------------------- (Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter) Delaware 000-33001 77-0154833 - ------------------------- ----------------------- -------------------- (State or other jurisdiction (Commission (IRS Employer of incorporation) File Number) Identification No.) 1501 Industrial Road, San Carlos, California 94070 - -------------------------------------------------------------------------------- (Address of principal executive offices) (Zip Code) Registrant's telephone number, including area code: (650) 802-0400 ---------------------------- Not applicable - -------------------------------------------------------------------------------- (Former name or former address, if changed since last report) Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below): [ ] Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [ ] Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [ ] Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [ ] Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
- -------------------------------------------------------------------------------- ITEM 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition. On May 3, 2007, Natus Medical Incorporated (the "Company") is issuing a press release and holding a conference call regarding its financial results for the first quarter of fiscal 2007 ended March 31, 2007 and other financial information. A copy of the press release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 to this Form 8-K. The information in this Form 8-K and the exhibit attached hereto shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act") or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that Section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing. ITEM 9.01. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS, PRO FORMA FINANCIAL INFORMATION AND EXHIBITS. (c) Exhibits. Exhibit No. Description ----------- ----------- 99.1 Press release of Natus Medical Incorporated dated May 3, 2007 describing the Company's results for its first fiscal quarter ended March 31, 2007 and other financial information. - --------------------------------------------------------------------------------
SIGNATURES Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized. NATUS MEDICAL INCORPORATED Date: May 3, 2007 By: /s/ Steven J. Murphy ------------------------------------------------------- Steven J. Murphy Vice President Finance and Chief Financial Officer
Index to Exhibits Exhibit No. Description ----------- ----------- 99.1 Press release of Natus Medical Incorporated dated May 3, 2007 describing the Company's results for its first fiscal quarter ended March 31, 2007 and other financial information.

Exhibit 99.1 Natus Medical Announces 2007 First Quarter Financial Results -- Company Reports Record First Quarter Revenue and Earnings -- Increases 2007 Revenue Guidance SAN CARLOS, Calif.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--May 3, 2007--Natus Medical Incorporated (Nasdaq:BABY) today announced financial results for the three months ended March 31, 2007. For the first quarter ended March 31, 2007, Natus reported revenue of $27.1 million, representing a 40% increase from $19.4 million in the comparable quarter of the previous year. The Company reported net income of $1.5 million, or $0.07 per diluted share, for the first quarter of 2007, compared with a net loss of $4.7 million, or a loss of $(0.25) per share, for the first quarter of 2006. The results for the first quarter of 2006 included a charge for in-process research and development associated with the acquisition of Bio-logic Systems Corp. in January 2006. Excluding this charge, non-GAAP earnings were $1.2 million, or $0.06 per diluted share. The results for 2007 reflect increases in net income and earnings per share of 24% and 17%, respectively, compared to the 2006 non-GAAP results. During 2006 the Company completed the acquisitions of Bio-logic Systems in January, Deltamed in September, and Olympic Medical in October. The acquisitions of Deltamed and Olympic contributed to the revenue growth in the first quarter 2007. As of March 31, 2007 the Company had cash, cash equivalents, and short-term investments of $16.8 million, stockholders' equity of approximately $103 million, working capital of approximately $34 million, and no long-term debt. Jim Hawkins, President and Chief Executive Officer of the Company, said, "I am very pleased with our results for the first quarter of 2007. We achieved outstanding results at Olympic Medical, along with solid year over year revenue results in our core Natus lines. With the integration of Olympic substantially complete, I believe we are well positioned for continued revenue and earnings growth throughout the remainder of 2007." "As the quarter progressed, the strength in our top-line growth gave us the confidence to invest additional resources towards building infrastructure to support our long term growth plans," added Hawkins. "As anticipated, our first quarter overhead expenses ran at a higher rate than normal." "We are clearly pleased with the results for Olympic, including the Olympic CFM brain monitor and Cool-Cap head-cooling system, and the strong performance of our core brands. With the transition to our direct selling approach for the Olympic product lines now complete, and the favorable revenue results for the quarter, we are increasing our revenue guidance for 2007," said Hawkins. "We are maintaining our earnings guidance for the year, as it is our intent to continue building infrastructure to achieve our aggressive growth targets for 2008 and 2009." 2007 Guidance Natus increased its revenue guidance for the full year 2007. For the full year 2007, the Company now expects revenue to range from $117.5 million to $119.0 million and earnings per share to range from $0.49 to $0.52. The Company had previously said revenue would range from $115 million to $117 million. Natus also increased its previously announced revenue guidance for the second quarter of 2007. For the second quarter 2007, the Company expects revenue to range from $28.0 million to $28.5 million and earnings per share to range from $0.10 to $0.11. This compares to revenue of $20.0 million and earnings per share of $0.07 reported in the second quarter 2006. The Company had previously said revenue would range from $27.5 million to $28.0 million. For the third quarter 2007, the Company expects revenue to range from $29.5 million to $30.0 million and earnings per share to range from $0.13 to $0.14. This compares to revenue of $21.8 million and earnings per share of $0.09 reported in the third quarter 2006. The Company expects that it will utilize tax net operating loss carryforwards to significantly reduce its taxable income in 2007, such that it will pay taxes at a rate of only 12% to 15% for the year. The Company's 2007 guidance is on a GAAP basis, including the impact of expensing employee equity-based compensation, however it does not include the impact of any one-time acquisition or restructuring related charges that may be incurred in 2007. All earnings per share amounts are on a diluted basis. Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures In addition to disclosing financial results calculated in accordance with GAAP, this release contains non-GAAP financial measures that exclude the effects of costs associated with the January 5, 2006 acquisition of Bio-logic Systems Corp. The Company believes that the presentation of results excluding this acquisition-related charge provides meaningful supplemental information to both management and investors that is indicative of the Company's core operating results. The Company also believes the in-process research and development charge is not indicative of resources devoted to ongoing research and development efforts. Therefore, the Company believes the non-GAAP financial measures facilitate comparison of operating results across reporting periods. A reconciliation between the Company's results of operations on a GAAP and non-GAAP basis for the periods reported is included as part of the condensed consolidated statements of operations at the end of the Company's financial results release. The Company believes that both management and investors benefit from referring to these non-GAAP financial measures in assessing the Company's performance and when planning, forecasting, and analyzing future periods. The non-GAAP financial measures also facilitate management's internal comparisons to the Company's historical performance. The non-GAAP financial measures disclosed by the Company should not be considered a substitute for or superior to financial measures calculated in accordance with GAAP, and the financial results calculated in accordance with GAAP and reconciliations to those financial statements should be carefully evaluated. Conference Call Natus has scheduled an investment-community conference call to discuss this announcement beginning at 11:00 a.m. Eastern Time today (8:00 a.m. Pacific Time). Individuals interested in listening to the conference call may do so by dialing (866) 277-1184 for domestic callers, or (617) 597-5360 for international callers, and entering reservation code 93291375. A telephone replay will be available for 48 hours following the conclusion of the call by dialing (888) 286-8010 for domestic callers, or (617) 801-6888 for international callers, and entering reservation code 89050786. The conference call also will be available real-time via the Internet at http://investor.natus.com, and a recording of the call will be available on the Company's Web site for 90 days following the completion of the call. About Natus Medical Incorporated Natus is a leading provider of healthcare products used for the screening, detection, treatment, monitoring and tracking of common medical ailments such as hearing impairment, neurological dysfunction, epilepsy, sleep disorders, and newborn care. Product offerings include computerized neurodiagnostic systems for audiology, neurology, polysomnography, and neonatology, as well as newborn care products such as hearing screening systems, phototherapy devices for the treatment of newborn jaundice, head-cooling products for the treatment of brain injury in newborns, and software systems for managing and tracking disorders and diseases for public health laboratories. Additional information about Natus Medical can be found at www.natus.com. This press release contains forward-looking statements as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, particularly statements regarding the expectations, beliefs, plans, intentions and strategies of Natus. These forward-looking statements include, but are not limited to, statements regarding future revenue, expenses, cash tax rates, and earnings growth, and anticipated revenue and profitability for the second quarter, third quarter, and full year 2007. These statements relate to future events or Natus' future financial performance or results, and involve known and unknown risks, uncertainties and other factors that may cause actual results, levels of activity, performance, or achievements to differ materially from those expressed or implied by the forward-looking statements. Forward-looking statements are only predictions and the actual events or results may differ materially. Natus cannot provide any assurance that its future results or the results implied by the forward-looking statements will meet expectations. Our future results could differ materially due to a number of factors, including the effects of competition, the demand for our products and services, our ability to expand our sales in international markets, our ability to maintain current sales levels in a mature domestic market, our ability to control costs, and risks associated with bringing new products to market and integrating acquired businesses. Natus disclaims any obligation to update information contained in any forward-looking statement. More information about potential risk factors that could affect the business and financial results of Natus is included in Natus' annual report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2006, and its quarterly reports on Form 10-Q, and in other reports filed from time to time by Natus with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission. NATUS MEDICAL INCORPORATED AND SUBSIDIARIES UNAUDITED CONDENSED CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF OPERATIONS (in thousands, except per share amounts) Three Months Ended March March 2007 2006 --------- --------- Revenue $ 27,050 $ 19,383 Cost of revenue 10,175 7,294 --------- --------- Gross profit 16,875 12,089 --------- --------- Operating expenses: Marketing and selling 6,496 5,161 Research and development 3,824 2,490 General and administrative 4,108 2,155 Acquired IPR&D - 5,900 --------- --------- Total operating expenses 14,428 15,706 --------- --------- Income from operations 2,447 (3,617) -------- -------- Other income/(expense): Interest income 186 169 Interest expense - (165) Other income, net 55 (117) --------- --------- Total other income/(expense) 241 (113) --------- --------- Income before provision for income tax 2,688 (3,730) Provision for income tax 1,169 949 --------- --------- Net income (loss) $ 1,519 $ (4,679) ========= ========= Earnings (loss) per share: Basic $ 0.07 $ (0.25) Diluted $ 0.07 $ (0.25) Weighted-average shares used to compute Basic earnings per share 21,466 18,485 Diluted earnings per share 22,734 18,485 NATUS MEDICAL INCORPORATED AND SUBSIDIARIES RECONCILIATION OF NON-GAAP ADJUSTMENTS (UNAUDITED) (in thousands) Three Months Ended March March 2007 2006 --------- --------- GAAP based results: Net Income (loss) $ 1,519 $ (4,679) Non-GAAP adjustments: Acquired in-process research and development (see note) - 5,900 (a) Non-GAAP net income $ 1,519 $ 1,221 ========= ========= Earnings per share: Basic $ 0.07 $ 0.07 Diluted $ 0.07 $ 0.06 Weighted-average shares used to compute Basic earnings per share 21,466 18,485 Diluted earnings per share 22,734 20,239 (a) Charges for acquired in-process research and development expense of $5,900 related to the acquisition of Bio-logic Systems Corp. on January 5, 2006. Management believes that excluding this charges facilitates comparisons of Natus' core operating results across multiple reporting periods. Since the IPR&D charge is not expected to be tax deductible, reversal of this charge has no impact on the tax provision. CONTACT: Natus Medical Incorporated Steven J. Murphy, 650-802-0400 Chief Financial Officer InvestorRelations@Natus.com


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BABY/BABY-8K-20070802060514.txt.gz
TIME:20070802060514
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION Washington, D.C. 20549 FORM 8-K CURRENT REPORT Pursuant to Section 13 OR 15(d) of The Securities Exchange Act of 1934 Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported) August 2, 2007 Natus Medical Incorporated - -------------------------------------------------------------------------------- (Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter) Delaware 000-33001 77-0154833 - ---------------------------- ------------------------ ------------------- (State or other jurisdiction (Commission File Number) (IRS Employer of incorporation) Identification No.) 1501 Industrial Road, San Carlos, California 94070 - -------------------------------------------------------------------------------- (Address of principal executive offices) (Zip Code) Registrant's telephone number, including area code: (650) 802-0400 --------------------------- Not applicable - -------------------------------------------------------------------------------- (Former name or former address, if changed since last report) Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below): [ ] Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [ ] Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [ ] Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [ ] Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
- -------------------------------------------------------------------------------- ITEM 2.02. Results of Operations and Financial Condition. On August 2, 2007, Natus Medical Incorporated (the "Company) is issuing a press release and holding a conference call regarding its financial results for the second quarter of fiscal 2007 ended June 30, 2007 and other financial information. A copy of the press release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 to this Form 8-K. The information in this Form 8-K and the exhibit attached hereto shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act") or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that Section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing. ITEM 9.01. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS, PRO FORMA FINANCIAL INFORMATION AND EXHIBITS. (d) Exhibits. Exhibit No. Description ----------- ----------- 99.1 Press release of Natus Medical Incorporated dated August 2, 2007 describing the Company's results for its second fiscal quarter ended June 30, 2007 and other financial information. - --------------------------------------------------------------------------------
SIGNATURES Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized. NATUS MEDICAL INCORPORATED Date: August 2, 2007 By: /s/ Steven J. Murphy ------------------------------------ Steven J. Murphy Vice President Finance and Chief Financial Officer
Index to Exhibits Exhibit No. Description ----------- ----------- 99.1 Press release of Natus Medical Incorporated dated August 2, 2007 describing the Company's results for its second fiscal quarter ended June 30, 2007 and other financial information.

Exhibit 99.1 Natus Medical Announces Record 2007 Second Quarter Financial Results - Company Reports Record Second Quarter Revenue and Earnings - Updates 2007 Revenue and Earnings Guidance SAN CARLOS, Calif.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--Aug. 2, 2007--Natus Medical Incorporated (Nasdaq:BABY) today announced financial results for the three and six month periods ended June 30, 2007. For the second quarter ended June 30, 2007, Natus reported revenue of $28.3 million, representing a 42% increase from $20.0 million in the comparable quarter of the previous year. The Company reported net income of $2.3 million, or $0.10 per diluted share, for the second quarter of 2007, compared with net income of $1.4 million, or $0.07 per diluted share, for the second quarter of 2006. For the six months ended June 30, 2007, the Company reported net income of $3.8 million, or $0.17 per diluted share, compared to a loss of $3.3 million, or $(0.18) per share, for the comparable period in 2006. The results for the 2006 period included a charge for in-process research and development associated with the acquisition of Bio-logic Systems Corp. in January 2006. Excluding this charge, non-GAAP earnings for the six months ended June 30, 2006 were $2.6 million, or $0.13 per diluted share. The results for the first six months of 2007 reflect increases in net income and earnings per share of 48% and 31%, respectively, compared to the non-GAAP results in 2006. Jim Hawkins, President and Chief Executive Officer of the Company said, "I am pleased with our record results for the second quarter. The quarter was led by strong growth in our worldwide hearing screening business and the results of our most recent acquisition, Olympic Medical. "As we previously reported, we increased spending for infrastructure in the first quarter. In the second quarter of this year, our general and administrative expenses have come down to more normal levels. Our higher level of spending on R&D initiatives has continued into the second quarter, most notably for our hearing and EEG product lines, but we expect that our expenditures for these projects should be winding down in the fourth quarter." "In transitioning production of the Olympic Cool-Cap from clinical units to commercial units, we updated many of its components. Because of its Class III device status, these component updates must receive FDA pre-market approval. Consequently, in June we put a hold on shipments of Cool-Cap units. While this delay impacted shipments, it did not have an adverse impact on orders. We held up approximately $500,000 of Cool-Cap shipments in the second quarter because of this issue. We will resume shipments of the Cool-Cap upon FDA approval of the new components, which we anticipate happening in the third quarter," added Hawkins. "Even with this shipping delay, we still had an excellent quarter with record results. Through our internal product development and acquisitions we have developed market-leading positions for a number of our products. We remain confident in our strategy as we continue to position the company for growth in 2008 and beyond," said Hawkins. During 2006 the Company completed the acquisitions of Bio-logic Systems, Deltamed, and Olympic Medical, in January, September, and October, respectively. The acquisitions of Deltamed and Olympic contributed to the reported revenue growth in the second quarter 2007. As of June 30, 2007 the Company had cash and cash equivalents of $18.3 million, stockholders' equity of $107 million, working capital of $39 million, and no long-term debt. 2007 Guidance Natus increased its revenue guidance for the full year 2007. For the full year 2007, the Company now expects revenue to range from $118.3 million to $119.3 million. The Company had previously said revenue would range from $117.5 million to $119.0 million. The Company reiterated its earnings per share guidance, which it expects to range from $0.49 to $0.52 per share. Natus also increased its previously announced revenue guidance for the third quarter of 2007. For the third quarter of 2007, the Company expects revenue to range from $30.0 million to $30.5 million. The Company had previously said revenue would range from $29.5 million to $30.0 million. The Company reiterated its earnings per share guidance, which it expects to range from $0.13 to $0.14. This compares to revenue of $21.8 million and earnings per share of $0.09 reported in the third quarter of 2006. For the fourth quarter of 2007, the Company expects revenue to range from $32.9 million to $33.4 million and earnings per share to range from $0.19 to $0.21. This compares to revenue of $28.8 million and earnings per share of $0.02 reported in the fourth quarter of 2006. The results for the 2006 period included a $3.9 million charge for acquired in-process research and development associated with the acquisition of Olympic Medical. The Company expects that it will utilize tax net operating loss carryforwards to significantly reduce its taxable income in 2007, such that it will pay taxes at a rate of only 12% to 15% for the year. The Company's 2007 guidance is on a GAAP basis, including the impact of expensing employee equity-based compensation, which the Company expects to be approximately $2.1 million for the full year 2007. The Company's guidance does not include the impact of any one-time acquisition or restructuring related charges. All earnings per share amounts are on a diluted basis. Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures In addition to disclosing financial results calculated in accordance with GAAP, this release contains non-GAAP financial measures that exclude the effects of costs associated with the January 5, 2006 acquisition of Bio-logic Systems Corp. The Company believes that the presentation of results excluding this acquisition-related charge provides meaningful supplemental information to both management and investors that is indicative of the Company's core operating results. The Company also believes the in-process research and development charge is not indicative of resources devoted to ongoing research and development efforts. Therefore, the Company believes the non-GAAP financial measures facilitate comparison of operating results across reporting periods. A reconciliation between the Company's results of operations on a GAAP and non-GAAP basis for the periods reported is included as part of the condensed consolidated statements of operations at the end of the Company's financial results release. The Company believes that both management and investors benefit from referring to these non-GAAP financial measures in assessing the Company's performance and when planning, forecasting, and analyzing future periods. The non-GAAP financial measures also facilitate management's internal comparisons to the Company's historical performance. The non-GAAP financial measures disclosed by the Company should not be considered a substitute for or superior to financial measures calculated in accordance with GAAP, and the financial results calculated in accordance with GAAP and reconciliations to those financial statements should be carefully evaluated. Conference Call Natus has scheduled an investment-community conference call to discuss this announcement beginning at 11:00 a.m. Eastern Time today (8:00 a.m. Pacific Time). Individuals interested in listening to the conference call may do so by dialing (866) 700-7101 for domestic callers, or (617) 213-8837 for international callers, and entering reservation code 28035577. A telephone replay will be available for 48 hours following the conclusion of the call by dialing (888) 286-8010 for domestic callers, or (617) 801-6888 for international callers, and entering reservation code 36859792. The conference call also will be available real-time via the Internet at http://investor.natus.com, and a recording of the call will be available on the Company's Web site for 90 days following the completion of the call. About Natus Medical Incorporated Natus is a leading provider of healthcare products used for the screening, detection, treatment, monitoring and tracking of common medical ailments such as hearing impairment, neurological dysfunction, epilepsy, sleep disorders, and newborn care. Product offerings include computerized neurodiagnostic systems for audiology, neurology, polysomnography, and neonatology, as well as newborn care products such as hearing screening systems, phototherapy devices for the treatment of newborn jaundice, head-cooling products for the treatment of brain injury in newborns, and software systems for managing and tracking disorders and diseases for public health laboratories. Additional information about Natus Medical can be found at www.natus.com. This press release contains forward-looking statements as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, particularly statements regarding the expectations, beliefs, plans, intentions and strategies of Natus. These forward-looking statements include, but are not limited to, statements regarding future revenue, expenses, cash tax rates, earnings growth, anticipated revenue and profitability for the third quarter, fourth quarter, and full year 2007, and the timing for resumption of shipment of Cool-Cap units. These statements relate to future events or Natus' future financial performance or results, and involve known and unknown risks, uncertainties and other factors that may cause actual results, levels of activity, performance, or achievements to differ materially from those expressed or implied by the forward-looking statements. Forward-looking statements are only predictions and the actual events or results may differ materially. Natus cannot provide any assurance that its future results or the results implied by the forward-looking statements will meet expectations. Our future results could differ materially due to a number of factors, including the effects of competition, challenges incurred in integrating acquired companies, the demand for our products and services, our ability to expand our sales in international markets, our ability to maintain current sales levels in a mature domestic market, our ability to control costs, and risks associated with bringing new products to market and integrating acquired businesses. Natus disclaims any obligation to update information contained in any forward-looking statement. More information about potential risk factors that could affect the business and financial results of Natus is included in Natus' annual report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2006, and its quarterly reports on Form 10-Q, and in other reports filed from time to time by Natus with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission. NATUS MEDICAL INCORPORATED AND SUBSIDIARIES UNAUDITED CONDENSED CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF OPERATIONS (in thousands, except per share amounts) Three Months Six Months Ended Ended June June June June 2007 2006 2007 2006 ------- ------- ------- ------- Revenue $28,260 $19,966 $55,310 $39,349 Cost of revenue 10,151 7,216 20,326 14,509 ------- ------- ------- ------- Gross profit 18,109 12,750 34,984 24,840 ------- ------- ------- ------- Operating expenses: Marketing and selling 6,900 4,993 13,395 10,156 Research and development 4,372 2,459 8,196 4,949 General and administrative 3,589 2,779 7,698 4,933 Acquired IPR&D - - - 5,900 ------- ------- ------- ------- Total operating expenses 14,861 10,231 29,289 25,938 ------- ------- ------- ------- Income from operations 3,248 2,519 5,695 (1,098) ------- ------- ------- ------- Other income/(expense): Interest income 184 75 370 244 Interest expense - (173) - (339) Other income, net 50 80 105 (36) ------- ------- ------- ------- Total other income/(expense) 234 (18) 475 (131) ------- ------- ------- ------- Income before provision for income tax 3,482 2,501 6,170 (1,229) Provision for income tax 1,156 1,130 2,325 2,079 ------- ------- ------- ------- Net income (loss) $ 2,326 $ 1,371 $ 3,845 $(3,308) ======= ======= ======= ======= Earnings (loss) per share: Basic $ 0.11 $ 0.07 $ 0.18 $ (0.18) Diluted $ 0.10 $ 0.07 $ 0.17 $ (0.18) Weighted-average shares used to compute Basic earnings per share 21,584 18,597 21,525 18,541 Diluted earnings per share 22,830 19,923 22,783 18,541 NATUS MEDICAL INCORPORATED AND SUBSIDIARIES RECONCILIATION OF NON-GAAP ADJUSTMENTS (UNAUDITED) (in thousands, except per share amounts) Three Months Ended Six Months Ended June June June June 2007 2006 2007 2006 --------- -------- ------- -------- GAAP based results: Net Income (loss) $ 2,326 $ 1,371 $ 3,845 $(3,308) Non-GAAP adjustments: Acquired in-process research and development (see note) - - - 5,900 (a) --------- -------- ------- -------- Non-GAAP net income $ 2,326 $ 1,371 $ 3,845 $ 2,592 ========= ======== ======= ======== Earnings per share: Basic $ 0.11 $ 0.07 $ 0.18 $ 0.14 Diluted $ 0.10 $ 0.07 $ 0.17 $ 0.13 Weighted-average shares used to compute Basic earnings per share 21,584 18,597 21,525 18,541 Diluted earnings per share 22,830 19,923 22,783 19,980 (a) Charges for acquired in-process research and development expense of $5,900 related to the acquisition of Bio-logic Systems Corp. on January 5, 2006. Management believes that excluding this charges facilitates comparisons of Natus' core operating results across multiple reporting periods. Since the IPR&D charge is not expected to be tax deductible, reversal of this charge has no impact on the tax provision. CONTACT: Natus Medical Incorporated Steven J. Murphy, 650-802-0400 Chief Financial Officer InvestorRelations@Natus.com


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BABY/BABY-8K-20071012152451.txt.gz
TIME:20071012152451
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
On October 9, 2007, Natus Medical Incorporated (the "Company"), Excel-Tech Ltd. ("XLTEK"), and 4437713 Canada Inc., a wholly-owned subsidiary of the Company ("Sub"), entered into an arrangement agreement (the "Arrangement Agreement"), a copy of which is attached to this Current Report on Form 8-K as Exhibit 10.1, pursuant to which Sub will acquire XLTEK. The transaction will be implemented by means of a court-approved plan of arrangement (the "Arrangement") under the . The Arrangement is subject to the approval of XLTEK shareholders, the Ontario Superior Court of Justice and applicable regulatory authorities. This description of the Arrangement Agreement and the Arrangement does not purport to be complete and is qualified in its entirety by reference to the Arrangement Agreement, a copy of which is attached to this Current Report on Form 8-K as Exhibit 10.1. All references to currency herein shall be deemed to be references to Canadian currency.
Canada Business Corporations Act
Directors (including directors who are executive officers), and certain related shareholders, of XLTEK have entered into support agreements with the Company and XLTEK, pursuant to which they have agreed to vote the shares of XLTEK common stock they own or control in favor of the Arrangement.
Pursuant to the Arrangement Agreement, Sub will acquire all of the outstanding common shares of XLTEK for a price of $3.25 in cash for each XLTEK common share. Under the Arrangement, all options (whether vested or unvested) that are outstanding immediately before the effective date of the Arrangement will be acquired by the Company in return for a cash payment of an amount equal to $3.25 per share issuable on the exercise of such options less the applicable exercise price per share. In addition, all deferred share units granted and outstanding immediately prior to the effective date of the Arrangement (whether or not vested) will be redeemed by the holder thereof and cancelled by the Company in exchange for a payment from the Company to the holder in cash equal to the product of the number of shares underlying such deferred share units and $3.25. The Company currently expects that the Merger will be consummated by early December 2007.
On October 10, 2007, the Company and XLTEK issued a joint press release relating to the Merger, a copy of which is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1. The information contained in the press release is incorporated herein by reference.
It is expected that XLTEK will file under the Canadian Securities Administrators (the "CSA") a management proxy circular and other relevant materials in connection with the Arrangement. The management proxy circular will be sent to the shareholders of XLTEK. Before making any voting or investment decision with respect to the Arrangement, investors and shareholders of XLTEK are urged to read the management proxy circular and any other relevant materials filed with the CSA, when they become available, because they will contain important information about the Arrangement. The management proxy circular and other relevant materials (when they become available), and any other documents filed by XLTEK with the CSA, may be obtained free of charge at the CSA's web site at www.sedar.com. In addition, investors and shareholders of XLTEK may obtain free copies of the documents filed with the CSA by contacting XLTEK at 905-829-5300.
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
EXHIBIT INDEX
 

Exhibit 10.1
 
 
 
 
 
 
made October 9, 2007
THIS AGREEMENT
BETWEEN:
, a corporation incorporated under the laws of the State of Delaware ("")
NATUS MEDICAL INCORPORATED
Parent
- and -
, a corporation incorporated under the laws of Canada ("")
4437713 CANADA INC.
Subco
- and -
, a corporation incorporated under the laws of Canada (the "").
EXCEL-TECH LTD.
Company
subject to the terms and conditions of this Agreement, the parties hereto intend to propose a statutory plan of arrangement under the CBCA pursuant to which Parent will cause Subco to, and Subco will, acquire all of the outstanding Shares for $3.25 per Share in cash on the terms set forth in the Plan of Arrangement;
WHEREAS
the board of directors of the Company (the "") desires to support and facilitate the Plan of Arrangement on the terms set forth in this Agreement and has unanimously concluded, after receiving financial and legal advice and following the receipt and review of recommendations from its special committee of the Board (the ""), that it is in the best interests of the Company and the Shareholders to enter into this Agreement; and
WHEREAS
Board
Special Committee
concurrently with the execution of this Agreement, and as a condition and inducement to Parent's willingness to enter into this Agreement, the Supporting Shareholders, holding an aggregate of 4,575,314 Shares (being approximately 24.0% of the issued and outstanding Shares) are each entering into a Support Agreement with Parent and Subco.
WHEREAS
that, in consideration of the mutual covenants and agreements hereinafter set forth and for other good and valuable consideration, the receipt and sufficiency of which are hereby acknowledged by each Party, the Parties hereby covenant and agree as follows:
NOW THEREFORE THIS AGREEMENT WITNESSES
 
In this Agreement, unless there is something in the subject matter or context inconsistent therewith, the following terms have the meanings set forth below.
"" means, other than the transactions contemplated by this Agreement, (i) any take-over bid, merger, amalgamation, arrangement, business combination, consolidation, recapitalization, liquidation or winding-up in respect of the Company (excluding a bona fide internal reorganization) by a Person other than Parent or an Affiliate of Parent (or any Person acting jointly or in concert with Parent or
Acquisition Proposal
an Affiliate of Parent); (ii) any sale, lease, license, mortgage, hypothecation, pledge, transfer or other disposition of all or a material portion of the assets of the Company, whether in a single transaction or series of transactions to a Person other than Parent or an Affiliate of Parent (or any Person acting jointly or in concert with Parent or an Affiliate of Parent); (iii) any sale, acquisition or issuance of 20% or more of the Company's securities of any class or rights or interests therein or thereto in a single transaction or series of transactions; (iv) any similar business combination or transaction of or involving the Company, other than with Parent or an Affiliate of Parent (or any Person acting jointly or in concert with Parent or an Affiliate of Parent); (v) any other transaction, the consummation of which would reasonably be expected to impede, interfere with, prevent or materially delay the Arrangement, or (vi) any proposal or offer to, or public announcement of an intention to, do any of the foregoing from any Person, other than Parent or an Affiliate of Parent (or any Person acting jointly or in concert with Parent or an Affiliate of Parent).
"" means current liabilities, including bank indebtedness, but excluding the current portion of long term debt.
Adjusted Current Liabilities
"" has the meaning ascribed to the term "" in OSC Rule 61-501.
Affiliate
affiliated entity
"", "", "", "", and "" and similar expressions refer to this agreement, including the Schedule hereto, as the same may be amended or supplemented from time to time.
Agreement
this Agreement
herein
hereto
hereof
"" means the arrangement involving Subco, Parent and the Company under the provisions of section 192 of the CBCA on the terms and conditions set forth in this Agreement resulting, , in the direct acquisition by Subco, or any successor thereof, of all of the outstanding Shares all on such terms and subject to the conditions set out in this Agreement and as more particularly described in the Plan of Arrangement, subject to any amendments or variations thereto made in accordance with this Agreement or the Plan of Arrangement or made at the direction of the Court.
Arrangement
inter alia
"" means the special resolution of the Shareholders approving the Arrangement to be considered at the Company Meeting, substantially in the form of Exhibit B, and any amendments or variations thereto made in accordance with the provisions of this Agreement or made at the direction of the Court in the Interim Order or otherwise.
Arrangement Resolution
"" means the articles of arrangement of the Company to be filed with the Director in connection with the Arrangement.
Articles of Arrangement
"" has the meaning set forth in the recitals to this Agreement.
Board
"" means any day excepting a Saturday, Sunday or statutory holiday in Toronto, Ontario.
Business Day
"" means any Options (whether vested or unvested) that are outstanding immediately before the Effective Time.
Cashed-Out Options
"" means the , as amended.
CBCA
Canada Business Corporations Act
"" means the Certificate of Arrangement to be issued by the Director pursuant to section 192(7) of the CBCA in respect of the Articles of Arrangement.
Certificate of Arrangement
"" means (a) any action taken or any resolution or any agreement made to take any action by the Board, or any committee of the Board, to: (i) withdraw, amend, change, modify or qualify in a manner adverse to Parent or Subco, or propose publicly to withdraw, amend, change, modify or qualify in a manner adverse to Parent or Subco, the approval, recommendation or declaration of
Change of Recommendation
advisability by the Board or any such committee of this Agreement or the Arrangement; or (ii) recommend, or propose publicly to recommend, the approval or adoption of any Acquisition Proposal, or (b) any failure by the Board to reaffirm support of the Arrangement within five Business Days following an announcement made by a third party in respect of any Acquisition Proposal or any reasonable request to do so from Parent.
"" means articles and by-laws or similar constating documents, and shareholders' agreements, partnership agreements and declarations of trust in respect of a corporation, partnership, trust or bank, as applicable.
Charter Documents
"" means the notice of meeting and management information circular of the Company to be prepared and sent to Shareholders in connection with the Company Meeting, including the exhibits thereto.
Circular
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 2.12.
Closing
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 2.12.
Closing Date
"" means each contract or agreement with any trade union, council of trade unions or employee association, employee bargaining agent or affiliated bargaining agent in respect of the Company or any of its employees.
Collective Agreement
"" means the common shares in the capital of the Company.
Common Shares
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 6.3(c).
Company Expense Reimbursement
"" means all Intellectual Property that is used in the business of the Company as such business is currently conducted.
Company Intellectual Property
"" means the special meeting of the Shareholders (including any adjournments or postponements thereof) to be held to consider, , the Arrangement Resolution.
Company Meeting
inter alia
"" means all health, welfare, supplemental unemployment benefit, bonus, profit sharing, option, unit, insurance, incentive, incentive compensation, deferred compensation, share purchase, share compensation, disability, pension, retention or retirement plans and other employee or director compensation or benefit plans, policies or arrangements which are maintained by the Company.
Company Plans
"" means all documents filed by the Company after April 13, 2006 on the System for Electronic Document Analysis and Retrieval (SEDAR).
Company Public Disclosure
"" means the confidentiality agreement dated July 19, 2007 between Parent and the Company.
Confidentiality Agreement
"" means all consultants engaged by the Company on a full-time, part-time or temporary basis by the Company.
Consultants
"" means pollutants, substances of a deleterious, dangerous or hazardous nature or contaminants that are regulated under applicable Environmental Laws with respect to their presence, use, collection, storage, transportation, treatment or disposal.
Contaminant
"" means any contract, agreement, undertaking, licence, note, bond, mortgage, indenture, loan or deed of trust.
Contract
"" means the Ontario Superior Court of Justice (Commercial List).
Court
"" means the documents and information described in an index to the dataroom (the ""), as of 6:00 p.m. (Toronto time) on October 5, 2007, a copy of which is annexed to the Disclosure Letter of the Company.
Data Room Information
Data Room
"" means the registrar and transfer agent of the Company as of the date of this Agreement or any successor thereto.
Depositary
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 4.7.
Deferred Share Unit
"" means the Director appointed pursuant to the CBCA.
Director
"" means the letter of the Company dated the date of this Agreement and delivered by the Company to Parent concurrently herewith.
Disclosure Letter of the Company
"" means the rights of dissent in favour of registered Shareholders in respect of the Arrangement as described in the Interim Order and the Plan of Arrangement.
Dissent Rights
"" means a holder of Deferred Share Units.
DSU Holder
"" means the date upon which the Arrangement becomes effective as established by the date of issue shown on the Certificate of Arrangement.
Effective Date
"" means the time at which Articles of Arrangement are issued by the Director on the Effective Date.
Effective Time
"" means all Persons employed by the Company on a full-time, part-time or temporary basis including all such Persons on disability leave, parental leave or other absence from work.
Employees
"" means any pledge, lien, priority, security interest, hypothec, lease, title retention agreement, restriction, easement, right-of-way, title defect, option, adverse claim, trust or deemed trust or encumbrance of any kind or character whatsoever.
Encumbrances
"" means all applicable federal, state, provincial and municipal statutes, laws, ordinances, bylaws, rules, certificates, orders, injunctions, arbitral awards, grants, regulations and other authorizations of any Governmental Authority imposing liability or standards of conduct for or relating to the regulation of activities, materials, substances, wastes or Contaminants in connection with or for or to the protection of human health, safety, the environment or natural resources (including ambient air, surface water, groundwater, wetlands, land surface or subsurface strata, wildlife, aquatic species and vegetation) and under common law.
Environmental Laws
"" means the order of the Court approving the Arrangement as such order may be amended at any time prior to the Effective Date or, if appealed, then unless such appeal is withdrawn or dismissed, as affirmed or as amended on appeal.
Final Order
"" means the comparative audited consolidated financial statements of the Company prepared in accordance with GAAP for the fiscal year ended January 31, 2007 and 2006 including the notes thereto and auditor's report thereon and the comparative unaudited consolidated financial statements of the Company prepared in accordance with GAAP for the six month periods ended July 31, 2007 and July 31, 2006 including the notes thereto.
Financial Statements
"" means Canadian generally accepted accounting principles.
GAAP
"" means (i) any federal, provincial, territorial, state, regional, municipal, local, foreign or supranational regulatory authority or other government, or public department or agency, commission, ministry, office, court, tribunal, arbitral body, board, bureau, Crown corporation, stock exchange, whether foreign or domestic, and any other entity with the power to establish Laws having jurisdiction or claiming to have jurisdiction over any of the Parties, (ii) any subdivision, agent, commission, board or authority of any of the foregoing, or (iii) any quasi-governmental or private body exercising any regulatory, expropriation or taxing authority under or for the account of any of the foregoing, and includes the Securities Authorities.
Governmental Authority
"means the following laws or regulations relating to the regulation of the healthcare industry (as such laws are currently enforced or as interpreted as of the date hereof by existing, publicly available judicial and administrative decisions and regulations): (i) Sections 1877, 1128, 1128A or 1128B of the Social Security Act (the ""); (ii) the licensure, certification or registration requirements of healthcare facilities, services, medical devices, or equipment; (iii) any state or provincial certificate of need or similar law governing the establishment and regulation of healthcare facilities or services or the making of healthcare capital expenditures; (iv) any state or provincial law relating to billing, fee-splitting or the practice of medicine; (v) any state or provincial regulations defining professional misconduct, including physician self-referral prohibition or state anti-kickback law; (vi) any criminal or regulatory offense relating to the delivery of, or claim for payment for, a healthcare item or service under any federal, state or provincial healthcare program; and (vii) any federal, state or provincial law relating to the interference with or obstruction of any investigation into any criminal offense.
Healthcare Law"
SSA
"", "", "", "", "", "", "" have the meanings set forth in Section 2.14.
Holdco
Holdco Agreement
Holdco Alternative
Holdco Election
Holdco Election Deadline
Holdco Shareholders
Holdco Shares
"" means including without limitation, and "" and "" have a corresponding meaning.
including
include
includes
"" means all:
Intellectual Property
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
"" means the interim order of the Court made pursuant to the motion contemplated by Section 2.3.
Interim Order
"" means all applicable laws, statutes, by-laws, rules, regulations, orders, codes, policies, notices and directions and judicial, arbitral, administrative, ministerial or departmental judgments, awards, or other requirements of any Governmental Authority, court or other authority having jurisdiction over the applicable Party.
Laws
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 6.1(e).
Matching Period
"" means an effect, event, circumstance, fact or occurrence that, individually or in the aggregate with other such effects, events, circumstances, facts or occurrences, is or would reasonably be expected to (x) be material and adverse to the financial condition, business, assets, operations or the results of operations of the Company or (y) result in a material impairment on the ability of Parent and Subco to continue operating the business of the Company after the Effective Date in substantially the same manner as it was operated immediately prior to the date of this Agreement, except any such effect, event, circumstance, fact or occurrence resulting from or arising in connection with: (a) any change in GAAP; (b) any adoption, proposal, implementation or change in applicable Law or any interpretation thereof by any Governmental Authority that is affecting the Company; (c) any change in Canadian, United States or global political conditions (including the outbreak of war or acts of terrorism) or in general economic, business, regulatory, political or market conditions or in Canadian, United States or global financial or capital markets; (d) any change affecting any of the industries in which the Company operates; (e) any natural disaster; (f) the execution, announcement or performance of this Agreement or consummation of the transactions contemplated hereby, including, without limitation, any loss or threatened loss of, or adverse change or threatened adverse change in, the relationship of the Company with any of its customers, employees, financing sources, creditors or shareholders as a direct consequence of the foregoing; (g) any change in the market price or trading volume of any securities of the Company (it being understood that the causes underlying such change in market price may be taken into account in determining whether a Material Adverse Effect has occurred), or any general decline in the trading prices of, or any suspension of trading in, securities generally on any securities exchange on which any securities of the Company trade; (h) the failure of the Company in and of itself to meet any internal or public projections, forecasts or estimates of revenues or earnings (it being understood that the causes underlying such failure may be taken into account in determining whether a Material Adverse Effect has occurred); (i) any actions taken (or omitted to be taken) upon the request of Parent; (j) any fluctuations in domestic or foreign currency exchange rates; or (k) any action taken by the Company which is required pursuant to this Agreement; provided, however, that with respect to clauses (a), (b), (c), (d) and (e) such action does not have a materially disproportionate effect on the Company relative to other comparable companies and entities operating in the industries in which the Company operates, and unless expressly provided in any particular section of this Agreement, references in certain sections of this Agreement to dollar amounts are not intended to be, and shall not be deemed to be, illustrative or interpretive for purposes of determining whether a "Material Adverse Effect" has occurred.
Material Adverse Effect
"" means: (a) any Contract which, if terminated or modified or if it ceased to be in effect or could not be replaced on similar terms within a reasonable timeframe, would reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect; (b) any Contract under which indebtedness in excess of $100,000 is or may become outstanding; (c) any Contract providing for the sale or exchange of, or option to sell or exchange, any property or asset where the sale price or agreed value or fair market value of such property or asset is in excess of $250,000, or the purchase or exchange of, or option to purchase or exchange, any property or asset where the purchase price or agreed value or fair market value of such property or asset is in excess of $250,000, in either case entered into in the past 12 months or entered into more than 12 months prior to the date hereof in respect of which the applicable transaction has not yet been substantially consummated; (d) any Contract under which the Company is obligated to make or expect to receive payments on an annual basis in excess of $250,000 over the remaining term of the Contract; (e) any Contract that limits or otherwise restricts, in a manner material to the Company (i) the ability of the Company to compete in any material geographic area or material line of business or (ii) the scope of Persons to whom the Company may sell products or deliver services; (f) any Contract granting
Material Contract
"most favoured nation" pricing, exclusive sales, distribution, marketing or other exclusive rights, rights of refusal, rights of first negotiation or similar rights and/or terms to any Person; (g) all contracts involving the payment of royalties or other amounts calculated based upon the revenues or income of the Company or any Subsidiary or income or revenues related to any product of the Company or any Subsidiary to which the Company or any Subsidiary is a party; (h) all joint venture, partnership, strategic alliance and business acquisition or divestiture agreements; (i) all material agreements between the Company, any Subsidiary or any affiliate of the Company or any Subsidiary, on the one hand, and the Company, any Subsidiary or any affiliate of the Company or any Subsidiary, on the other hand; (j) any material license, technology transfer, franchise or other Contract in respect of any Intellectual Property that is used in the business of the Company as currently conducted (other than standard off-the-shelf software or other software readily available on standard commercial terms); (k) all material licenses, sublicenses and other Contracts as to which the Company is a party and pursuant to which any Person is authorized to use any of the Company Intellectual Property; (l) any material Contract providing for the development of any software, content or technology, independently or jointly, by or for the Company; (m) all licenses, sublicenses and other Contracts pursuant to which the Company has agreed to any restriction on the right of the Company to use or enforce any of the Company Intellectual Property, or pursuant to which the Company has agreed to encumber, transfer or sell rights in or with respect to any of the Company Intellectual Property; (n) any Contract to license or authorize any third party to manufacture or reproduce any of Company's products; (o) any material settlement agreement; or (p) any material Contract with any Governmental Authority.
"" has the meaning ascribed thereto in the Securities Act.
Misrepresentation
"" means the sum of the current portion of long term debt and (without duplication) the long term debt including the capitalized lease obligations.
Net Debt
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 6.1(e).
Notice Date
"" means any obligations or liabilities of the Company to pay any amount to its officers and/or directors and/or Consultants (other than for salary, bonuses, benefits, consultancy fees and directors' fees in the ordinary course in each case in amounts consistent with past practice) and, without limiting the generality of the foregoing, Officer Obligations shall include the obligations of the Company to officers and/or directors and/or Consultants for severance or termination payments on a change of control of the Company pursuant to any employment agreements, consulting agreements or otherwise in existence on the date hereof.
Officer Obligations
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 4.7.
Option
"" means a holder of one or more Options.
Optionholder
"" means Ontario Securities Commission Rule 61-501.
OSC Rule 61-501
Insider Bids, Issuer Bids, Business Combinations and Related Party Transactions
"" means 90 days from the date of this Agreement, subject to the right of either Parent or the Company to postpone the Outside Date for up to an additional 30 days (in increments of 15 days) if the Regulatory Approvals have not been obtained and have not been denied by a non-appealable decision of a Governmental Authority, by giving written notice to the other Parties to such effect no later than 5:00 p.m. (Toronto time) on the date that is ten days (or such shorter period as is practical in the circumstances) prior to the original Outside Date (and any subsequent Outside Date), or such later date as may be agreed to in writing by Parent and the Company.
Outside Date
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 6.3(b).
Parent Expense Reimbursement
"" means, collectively, Parent, Subco and the Company and "" means either of them.
Parties
Party
"" means the Encumbrances listed in the Disclosure Letter of the Company.
Permitted Encumbrances
"" means any individual, sole proprietorship, partnership, firm, entity, unincorporated association, unincorporated syndicate, unincorporated organization, trust, corporation, limited liability company, unlimited liability company, governmental, regulatory or court authority, and a natural person in such person's capacity as trustee, executor, administrator or other legal representative.
Person
"" means, in relation to the Arrangement, the plan of arrangement in the form and having the content of Exhibit A and any amendments or variations thereto made in accordance with the provisions hereof or made at the direction of the Court in the Final Order.
Plan of Arrangement
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 6.8(a).
Pre-Acquisition Reorganization
"" means the lands municipally known as 2568 Bristol Circle, Oakville, Ontario, and the buildings, fixtures and other premises located thereon.
Property
"" means Purple Knights Development Inc.
Purple
"" means: (a) all approvals and/or filings that are necessary or desirable under the Securities Laws (if any); (b) the Interim Order; (c) the Final Order; and (d) all Canadian and foreign government or regulatory approvals, waivers, permits, consents, reviews, orders, rulings, decisions and exemptions (including, without limitation, those of applicable Securities Authorities) that in Parent's reasonable judgment are necessary or desirable to complete the Arrangement.
Regulatory Approvals
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 6.8(b).
Reorganization Resolution
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 6.1(a).
Representatives
"" means the consents, waivers, approvals or authorizations of, or declarations, filings or notices to, Governmental Authorities or other third parties necessary for the consummation of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement to be obtained by the Company, as set forth in Section 4.6 of the Disclosure Letter of the Company, including, for greater certainty, the Regulatory Approvals and Shareholder Approval.
Required Consents and Approvals of the Company
"" means the consents, waivers, approvals or authorizations of, or declarations, filings or notices to, Governmental Authorities or other third parties necessary for the consummation of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement to be obtained by Parent and/or Subco (if any).
Required Consents and Approvals of Parent and Subco
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 6.2(a)(ii).
Response Period
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 6.9.
Restrictive Covenants
"" means the (Ontario) and the published rules and regulations made thereunder, as now in effect and as they may be amended from time to time.
Securities Act
Securities Act
"" means the TSX and the appropriate securities commissions or similar regulatory authorities in each of the provinces of Canada.
Securities Authorities
"" means applicable Canadian provincial securities Laws.
Securities Laws
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 2.13(a).
Share Consideration
"" means approval of the Arrangement Resolution by not less than two-thirds of the votes cast by Shareholders who are represented at the Company Meeting, in accordance with applicable Law and the Interim Order.
Shareholder Approval
"" means the holders of Shares.
Shareholders
"" means the Common Shares.
Shares
"" has the meaning set forth in the recitals to this Agreement.
Special Committee
"" has the meaning ascribed to the term "" in OSC Rule 61-501.
Subsidiary
subsidiary entity
"" means a Acquisition Proposal that was not solicited in contravention of Section 6.1 hereof, made by a third party in writing after the date hereof with whom the Company deals at arm's length (as such term is interpreted for the purposes of the Tax Act): (i) to purchase or otherwise acquire directly or indirectly by means of a takeover bid, merger, amalgamation, plan of arrangement, business combination, consolidation, recapitalization, liquidation or winding-up or similar transaction, all of the Shares or all or substantially all of the assets of the Company on a consolidated basis; (ii) that is made available on substantially the same terms and conditions to all Shareholders of the Company and offers or makes available the same consideration in form and amount per Share to be purchased or otherwise acquired, (iii) that, taking into account to the extent considered appropriate by the Board, all financial, legal, regulatory and other aspects of such proposal and the Person making such proposal, is reasonably capable of being completed without undue delay in accordance with its terms; (iv) which is not subject to a financing condition and the Board is reasonably satisfied that the Person has or will have the funds to complete the Acquisition Proposal, (v) which is not subject to a due diligence and/or access condition which would allow access to the books, records, personnel or properties of the Company or its representatives beyond 5:00 p.m. (Eastern Standard Time) on the tenth day after which access is afforded to the third party making the Acquisition Proposal (provided, however, that the foregoing shall not restrict the ability of such third party to continue to review information provided to it by the Company during such ten-day period); and (vi) that the Board determines, in its good faith judgment, after receiving the advice of its outside legal and financial advisors and after taking into account all the terms and conditions of the Acquisition Proposal, is on terms and conditions that are more favourable from a financial point of view to the Shareholders than those contemplated by this Agreement.
Superior Proposal
bona fide
"" means the support agreements between Parent, Subco and the Supporting Shareholders executed and delivered concurrently with this Agreement pursuant to which the Supporting Shareholders have agreed, , to vote all Common Shares held by them in favour of the Arrangement Resolution and to otherwise support the transactions contemplated by this Agreement subject to the terms of such agreements.
Support Agreements
inter alia
"" means each director and officer of the Company that owns (of record or beneficially), or has voting or dispositive power with respect to, Shares and/or Options, John Mumford, Regina Mumford and any trust or other entity controlled by any such director, officer, John Mumford or Regina Mumford.
Supporting Shareholders
"" means the (Canada), as amended.
Tax Act
Income Tax Act
"" means all taxes, duties, fees, premiums, assessments, levies and other fees of any kind whatsoever levied by any Governmental Authority or to be paid under any tax laws (including but not limited to income tax, property tax, corporate tax, withholding tax, tax on capital, sales tax, goods and services tax, customs duties and transfer fees) and payroll, employment, health, social services, worker compensation or similar contributions, premiums or surtaxes, other government pension plan premiums or contributions, and including any interest, penalties or fines in respect thereof.
Taxes
"" means all returns, reports, declarations, elections, notices, filings, information returns and statements (whether in tangible, electronic or other form) and including any amendments, schedules, attachments, appendices and exhibits thereto, filed or required to be filed by Laws in respect of Taxes.
Tax Returns
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 6.3(a).
Termination Fee
"" means the Toronto Stock Exchange.
TSX
"" means current assets minus Adjusted Current Liabilities, in each case determined in accordance with GAAP applied on a basis consistent with the Financial Statements.
Working Capital
 
In this Agreement, words importing the singular number include the plural and vice versa and words importing gender include the masculine, feminine and neuter genders.
 
Unless otherwise expressly stated, all references to currency herein shall be deemed to be references to Canadian currency.
 
The division of this Agreement into Articles, Sections, Paragraphs, Subparagraphs and Schedules, the provision of a table of contents hereto and the insertion of the recitals and headings are for convenience of reference only and shall not affect the construction or interpretation of this Agreement and, unless otherwise stated, all references in this Agreement or in the Schedules hereto to Articles, Sections, Paragraphs, Subparagraphs, Schedules and Exhibits refer to Articles, Sections, Paragraphs, Subparagraphs, Schedules and Exhibits of and to this Agreement or of the Schedules or Exhibits in which such reference is made, as applicable.
 
In the event that any date on which any action is required to be taken hereunder by any of the Parties is not a Business Day, such action shall be required to be taken on the next succeeding day that is a Business Day.
 
This Agreement shall be governed, including as to validity, interpretation and effect, by the laws of the Province of Ontario and the laws of Canada applicable therein, and shall be construed and treated in all respects as a Ontario contract. Each of the Parties hereby irrevocably attorns to the non-exclusive jurisdiction of the Courts of the Province of Ontario in respect of all matters arising under and in relation to this Agreement and the Arrangement.
 
In this Agreement, unless otherwise stated, references to "" the Company means to the knowledge, information and belief of Mr. John Mumford and Mr. Peter Kastelic after due enquiry and shall include any matter that would be expected to be known by an officer holding a similar position in a public company of similar size and scope. Nothing in this section shall give rise to or be construed as giving rise to any personal liability on the part of Mr. John Mumford or Mr. Peter Kastelic.
the knowledge of
The Exhibits attached hereto and described below shall, for all purposes hereof, form an integral part of this Agreement.
 
 
The Parties agree, on the terms and subject to the conditions of this Agreement, to carry out the Arrangement in accordance with this Agreement on the terms set out in the Plan of Arrangement, subject to such changes as may be mutually agreed to by the parties in accordance with this Agreement.
 
The Company covenants in favour of Subco and Parent that the Company shall:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
except, in either case, as contemplated hereby or with Parent's prior consent, such consent not to be unreasonably withheld or delayed.
 
The notice of motion for the motion for the Interim Order referred to in Section 2.2(b) shall request that the Interim Order provide:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
The Articles of Arrangement shall, upon the endorsement of a certificate thereon by the Director under section 192(7) of the CBCA, with such other matters as are necessary to effect the Arrangement and subject to the provisions of the Plan of Arrangement, consummate the Plan of Arrangement. The Articles of Arrangement shall be in form satisfactory to Parent.
 
As promptly as practicable after the execution and delivery of this Agreement, the Company, in consultation with Parent, will prepare and complete the Circular together with any other documents required by the CBCA or other applicable Law in connection with the Arrangement and the Company Meeting. The Circular and such other documents, together with any amendments thereto, shall be in form
and substance satisfactory to Parent acting reasonably. The Company will file the Circular and any other documentation required to be filed under the Interim Order and applicable Law in all jurisdictions where the Circular is required to be filed by the Company and mail or cause to be mailed the Circular and any other documentation required to be mailed under the Interim Order and applicable Law to Shareholders, the directors of the Company, the auditors of the Company and any other required Persons on or before November 9, 2007, all in accordance with the terms of the Interim Order and applicable Law. In a timely and expeditious manner, the Company shall prepare (in consultation with Parent) and file amendments or supplements to the Circular (which amendments or supplements shall be in a form satisfactory to Parent, acting reasonably) required by applicable Law or as otherwise agreed between the Company and Parent with respect to the Company Meeting and mail or otherwise disseminate such amendments or supplements, as required by the Interim Order and in accordance with all applicable Law, to such persons and in all jurisdictions where such amendments or supplements are required to be mailed or disseminated, complying in all material respects with all applicable Law on the date of the mailing or dissemination thereof.
 
 
 
 
 
 
The Plan of Arrangement shall provide that registered Shareholders may exercise Dissent Rights with respect to their Shares in connection with the Arrangement pursuant to the Interim Order and the Plan of Arrangement and in the manner set forth in section 190 of the CBCA as modified by the Interim Order and the Plan of Arrangement. The Company shall give Parent prompt notice of any written notice of a dissent, withdrawal of such notice, and any other instruments served pursuant to such Dissent Rights and received by the Company. The Company shall not make any payment or settlement offer prior to the Effective Time with respect to any such notice of dissent unless Parent shall have given its prior written consent to such payment or settlement offer.
 
This Agreement may, at any time and from time to time before and after the holding of the Company Meeting, but not later than the Effective Time, be amended by mutual written agreement of the parties hereto, without, subject to applicable Law, further notice to or authorization on the part of the Shareholders, and any such amendment may, without limitation:
 
 
 
 
provided, however, that after receipt of approval of the Arrangement Resolution by the Shareholders, there shall be no amendment that by applicable Law requires further approval by the Shareholders without further approval of such Shareholders.
 
At the reasonable request of Parent from time to time, the Company shall provide Parent with a list (in both written and electronic form) of the registered Shareholders, together with their addresses and respective holdings of Shares, with a list of the names and addresses and holdings of all Persons having rights issued by the Company to acquire Shares (including Optionholders) and a list of non-objecting beneficial owners of Shares, together with their addresses and respective holdings of Shares. The Company shall from time to time require that its registrar and transfer agent furnish Parent with such additional information, including updated or additional lists of Shareholders and lists of holdings and other assistance as Parent may reasonably request.
 
The Company, Parent, Subco, one or more other Subsidiaries of Parent or the Depositary, as the case may be, shall be entitled to directly or indirectly deduct and withhold from any amount otherwise payable pursuant to this Agreement or the Plan of Arrangement to any Shareholder, Optionholder or DSU Holder such amounts as are entitled or required to be deducted and withheld with respect to the making of
such payment under the Tax Act or any other provision of domestic or foreign (whether national, federal, provincial, state, local or otherwise) applicable Law relating to Taxes. To the extent that amounts are so deducted and withheld and paid to the appropriate Governmental Authority directly or indirectly by the Company, Parent, Subco or one or more Subsidiaries of Parent or the Depositary, as the case may be, such deducted and withheld amounts shall be treated for all purposes of this Agreement and the Plan of Arrangement as having been paid to the Shareholders, Optionholders or DSU Holders, as the case may be, in respect of which such deduction and withholding was made by the Company, Parent, Subco, one or more Subsidiaries of Parent or the Depositary, as the case may be, provided that such withheld amounts are actually remitted to the appropriate Governmental Authority within the time required and in accordance with the Tax Act or any other provision of domestic or foreign (whether national, federal, provincial, state, local or otherwise) applicable Law relating to Taxes.
 
At the request of Parent, the Company shall use commercially reasonable efforts to assist Parent to successfully implement and complete any alternative transaction structure that: (a) does not have negative financial consequences to the Company and its Subsidiaries in any material respect, would provide Shareholders, Optionholders and DSU Holders with cash consideration not less than the cash consideration per security receivable under Section 2.13 and would provide for the acquisition of all of the outstanding Shares, Options and Deferred Share Units; (b) would reasonably be expected to be completed prior to the Outside Date; and (c) is otherwise on terms and conditions no more onerous in any material respect than the Arrangement and this Agreement. In the event that the transaction structure is so modified, the relevant provisions of this Agreement shall be modified as necessary in order that they shall apply with full force and effect, , but with the adjustments necessary to reflect the revised transaction structure, and the parties hereto shall execute and deliver an agreement in writing giving effect to and evidencing such amendments as may be reasonably required as a result of such modifications and adjustments.
mutatis mutandis
 
The closing of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement (the "") shall take place at the offices of Osler, Hoskin & Harcourt LLP, 1 First Canadian Place, Toronto, Ontario, M5X 1B8, as soon as possible, but in any event no later than two Business Days after satisfaction or waiver of the conditions set forth in Article 9 (other than those conditions that by their nature are to be satisfied at the Closing, but subject to the satisfaction or waiver of those conditions at the Closing), or on such other date or at such other place as Parent and the Company may mutually agree (the "").
Closing
Closing Date
 
The Articles of Arrangement shall provide that the Shareholders, Optionholders and holders of Deferred Share Units shall receive the following consideration:
 
 
 
Any Options and Deferred Share Units outstanding as of the Effective Time will be cancelled in accordance with the terms of the Plan of Arrangement.
If between the date of this Agreement and the Effective Time, the outstanding Shares shall have been changed into a different number of shares or a different class, by reason of any stock dividend, subdivision, reclassification, recapitalization, split, combination or exchange of shares or any similar event, the Share Consideration and any other amounts payable pursuant to this Agreement shall be correspondingly adjusted to the extent appropriate to reflect such stock dividend, subdivision, reclassification, recapitalization, split, combination or exchange of shares or similar event.
 
 
 
 
 
 
The Parties acknowledge that the Company and Parent have previously entered into the Confidentiality Agreement, which shall continue in full force and effect in accordance with its terms except for the standstill provisions included therein from which Parent and Subco are hereby released; provided that, if this Agreement is terminated pursuant to Section 10.1 (other than pursuant to Section 10.1(c), 10.1(d) or 10.1(e)), such standstill provisions shall be immediately reinstated.
 
The Company agrees to permit the registrar and transfer agent for the Company to act as depositary in connection with the Plan of Arrangement and instruct that registrar and transfer agent to furnish to Parent (and such Persons as it may designate) at such times as it may request such information and provide to Parent (and such Persons as it may designate) such other assistance in each case as it may reasonably request in connection with the implementation and completion of the transactions contemplated hereunder.
Parent and Subco hereby acknowledge that the Company is relying upon each of the following representations and warranties in connection with the entering into of this Agreement.
 
Parent is a corporation duly incorporated, organized and validly existing under the laws of the State of Delaware and has the requisite corporate power and authority to own the assets it currently owns and to carry on its business as it is now being conducted. Subco is a corporation duly incorporated, organized and validly existing under the laws of Canada and has the requisite corporate power and authority to own the assets it currently owns and to carry on its business as it is now being conducted. Since the date of its incorporation, Subco has not engaged in any activities other than in connection with or as contemplated by this Agreement.
 
Each of Parent and Subco has the requisite corporate power and authority to enter into this Agreement and to carry out its obligations hereunder. The execution and delivery of this Agreement and
the consummation by each of Parent and Subco of the transactions contemplated hereby have been duly authorized by Parent and Subco and no other proceedings need to be completed or consents need to be obtained by Parent or Subco which are or will be necessary to authorize this Agreement and the transactions contemplated hereby. This Agreement has been duly executed and delivered by each of Parent and Subco and constitutes a legal, valid and binding obligation of each of them enforceable against Parent and Subco in accordance with its terms, except as may be limited by bankruptcy and insolvency and other laws affecting the enforcement of creditors' rights generally and subject to the qualification that equitable remedies may only be granted in the discretion of a court of competent jurisdiction.
 
 
 
 
 
 
The information with respect to Parent and any of its Subsidiaries (including Subco) that Parent furnishes to the Company in writing specifically for use in the Circular or any amendment or supplement thereto will not contain any Misrepresentation at: (i) the time such Circular or any amendment or supplement thereto is first mailed to Shareholders; and (ii) at the time the Shareholders vote on the Arrangement.
 
Parent has sufficient funds available, or adequate arrangements for financing are in place, to ensure that it will have sufficient funds to pay the aggregate Share Consideration contemplated by Section 2.13.
 
Neither Parent nor any of its Affiliates beneficially owns any Common Shares or securities convertible or exchangeable for Common Shares except as previously disclosed in writing to the Company.
As of the date of this Agreement, Parent has no knowledge of any fact or circumstance not contemplated herein that would adversely affect the ability of Parent to fulfil its obligations hereunder.
 
Parent has no arrangements or agreements with any director or officer of the Company or any of the Affiliates, other than the Support Agreements.
The Company represents and warrants to Parent as set forth below and acknowledges that Parent is relying upon these representations and warranties in connection with the entering into of this Agreement.
 
The Company is a corporation duly organized and validly existing under the laws of Canada and has full power and authority to own or lease the property and assets it currently owns or leases and to carry on its business as it is now being conducted. The Company is duly registered to do business and is in good standing in each jurisdiction in which the character of its properties, owned or leased, or the nature of its activities makes such qualification necessary, except when the absence of such registration or lack of good standing would not constitute a Material Adverse Effect. The copy of the Charter Documents heretofore made available to Parent in the Data Room Information is accurate and complete as of the date hereof and has not been amended or superseded, and the Company has not taken any action to amend or supersede such document. The Charter Documents are in full force and effect. No proceedings have been taken or authorized by the Company in respect of the bankruptcy, insolvency, liquidation, dissolution or winding up of the Company and, to the knowledge of the Company, no such proceedings are contemplated or threatened against the Company.
 
The Company has no subsidiaries except for Excel-Tech Ltd. USA, a wholly-owned subsidiary of the Company which has no assets or liabilities, other than nominal assets and liabilities, and has been inactive since its incorporation in the State of Delaware on May 31, 2001. This subsidiary shall remain inactive.
 
The Company has the requisite corporate power and authority to enter into this Agreement and to perform and carry out its obligations hereunder. The execution and delivery of this Agreement by the Company and the completion by the Company of the transactions contemplated hereby have been duly authorized by the Board and no other proceedings need to be completed or consents need to be obtained by the Company which are or will be necessary to authorize this Agreement and the transactions contemplated hereby. This Agreement has been duly executed and delivered by the Company and constitutes a legal, valid and binding obligation of the Company enforceable against the Company in accordance with its terms, except as may be limited by bankruptcy, insolvency and other laws affecting the enforcement of creditors' rights generally and subject to the qualification that equitable remedies may only be granted in the discretion of a court of competent jurisdiction.
 
 
 
 
 
The Circular, and any amendments or supplements thereto, will when filed, distributed or disseminated, as applicable, comply as to form in all material respects with the applicable requirements of applicable Law. The Circular and any amendment or supplement thereto, at: (i) the time such Circular or any such amendment or supplement is first mailed to the Shareholders; and (ii) the time the Shareholders vote on adoption of this Agreement, will not contain any Misrepresentation; provided that the representations and warranties contained in this Section 4.5 will not apply to statements or omissions included in the Circular based upon information furnished to the Company by or on behalf of Parent or Subco specifically for use therein.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
The authorized capital stock of the Company consists of an unlimited number of Common Shares and an unlimited number of preferred shares, issuable in series. As of the date of this Agreement:
 
 
 
 
Except as set forth in this Section 4.7, there are no options, warrants or other rights, agreements, arrangements or commitments of any character relating to the issued or unissued share capital of the Company or any Subsidiary of the Company or obligating the Company or any Subsidiary of the Company to issue or sell any shares or other equity interests in, the Company or any Subsidiary of the Company.
Section 4.7 of the Disclosure Letter of the Company sets forth the following information with respect to each Option outstanding on the date of this Agreement:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Section 4.7 of the Disclosure Letter of the Company sets forth the following information with respect to each deferred share unit issued pursuant to the Company's deferred share unit plan adopted June 13, 2006 (each, a "") issued and outstanding by the Company on the date of this Agreement:
Deferred Share Unit
 
 
 
 
 
Except as set out in the Disclosure Letter of the Company, there are no commitments or agreements of any character to which the Company is bound obligating the Company to accelerate the vesting of any Option or Deferred Share Unit as a result of the transactions contemplated by the Agreement. No options to purchase Common Shares from the Company are outstanding other than the Options. The Company has made available to Parent accurate and complete copies of all Company stock option plans and deferred share unit plans. All Common Shares subject to issuance as aforesaid, upon issuance on the terms and conditions specified in the instruments pursuant to which they are issuable, will be duly authorized, validly issued, fully paid and nonassessable.
There are no outstanding contractual obligations of the Company or any Subsidiary of the Company to repurchase, redeem or otherwise acquire any Common Shares or any share capital of any Subsidiary of the Company or to provide funds to, or make any investment (in the form of a loan, capital contribution or otherwise) in, any Subsidiary of the Company or any other person.
All outstanding Common Shares, all outstanding Options and all outstanding shares of capital stock of each Subsidiary of the Company have been issued and granted in compliance with (i) all applicable securities laws and other applicable Law and (ii) all requirements set forth in applicable contracts.
Each outstanding share of capital stock of each Subsidiary of the Company is duly authorized, validly issued, fully paid and nonassessable, and each such share is owned by the Company or another Subsidiary of the Company free and clear of all security interests, liens, claims, pledges, options, rights of first refusal, agreements, limitations on the Company's or any of its Subsidiary's voting rights, charges and other encumbrances of any nature whatsoever.
 
Since January 31, 2007, there has not been any Material Adverse Effect.
 
The Company has not retained nor will it retain any financial advisor, broker, agent or finder or has not paid or agreed to pay any financial advisor, broker, agent or finder on account of this Agreement or any transaction contemplated hereby, other than RBC Capital Markets Corporation that has been retained as the Company's financial advisor in connection with certain matters including the transactions contemplated hereby pursuant to the agreements disclosed in the Disclosure Letter of the Company.
 
Since January 31, 2007, the Company has carried on its business in the ordinary course consistent with past practice and, except to the extent disclosed in the Disclosure Letter of the Company, the Company has not:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
and the Company has no present intention to undertake any of the foregoing actions.
 
The Company holds all permits, licences, approvals, certificates and other rights, qualifications and authorizations of or from Governmental Authorities necessary for the conduct of its business as presently conducted except where the failure to hold such permits, licences, approvals, certificates, other rights, qualifications or authorizations would not reasonably be expected to cause a Material Adverse Effect. Other than the Required Consents and Approvals of the Company, there are no material consents required under such permits, licences, approvals, certificates and other rights, qualifications and authorizations in connection with the consummation of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement. Section 4.11 of the Disclosure Letter of the Company lists all material permits, licenses, approvals, certificates and other material rights, qualifications and authorizations of or from Governmental Authorities necessary for the conduct of the Company's business as presently conducted.
 
 
 
 
The Company is not in default or breach of, nor has the Company received any notice of default or breach of, or termination under, any Material Contract, and, to the knowledge of the Company, there exists no state of facts which after notice or lapse of time or both would constitute a default or breach of such Material Contract, or that would give any Person the right to (i) declare a default, seek damages or exercise any other remedy under any such Material Contract, (ii) accelerate the maturity or performance of any such Material Contract or (iii) cancel, terminate or modify in a manner materially adverse to the interests of the Company any such Material Contract. All Material Contracts are identified in the Disclosure Letter of the Company. Except as disclosed in the Disclosure Letter of the Company, copies of all Material Contracts have been included in the Data Room Information and all such Material Contracts are accurate and complete in all material respects as of the date hereof and have not been amended or superseded and the Company has not taken any action to amend or supersede such Material Contracts. Other than the Required Consents and Approvals of the Company, there are no material third party consents required under the Material Contracts in connection with the consummation of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement.
 
Except as set out in the Disclosure Letter of the Company, there are no actions, arbitrations, claims, suits, proceedings or investigations commenced or, to the knowledge of the Company, contemplated or threatened against or by the Company or any of its Consultants, directors or officers
before or by any Governmental Authority, nor to the knowledge of the Company are there any existing facts or conditions which may reasonably be expected to be a proper basis for any such actions, suits, proceedings or investigations. None of the actions, claims, suits, proceedings or investigations disclosed in the Disclosure Letter of the Company, considered individually or in the aggregate, are material to the Company.
 
Except as set out in the Disclosure Letter of the Company, no Officer Obligations will become payable upon completion of the Arrangement.
 
The Company is a reporting issuer or its equivalent under, and is in compliance in all material respects with, the Securities Laws of each of the Provinces of Canada and is in compliance in all material respects with the rules and regulations of the TSX. No delisting, suspension of trading in or cease trading order with respect to the Common Shares or to the knowledge of the Company, no inquiry, review or investigation (formal or informal) of any Securities Authority is in effect or ongoing or expected to be implemented or undertaken, other than any future continuous disclosure reviews to be conducted in the ordinary course by Securities Authorities.
 
The operations of the Company are conducted in compliance with all Laws of each jurisdiction in which the Company carries on its business and the Company has not received any notice of any violation of any such Laws, except for any such non-compliance or violations which would not reasonably be expected to cause a Material Adverse Effect.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
The Company has policies of insurance in force as of the date hereof naming the Company as an insured which, having regard to the nature of such risk and the relative cost of obtaining insurance, the Company believes are reasonable.
 
Except to the extent reflected or reserved in the Financial Statements or incurred in the ordinary course since January 31, 2007, the Company has no outstanding indebtedness or any liabilities or obligations (whether accrued, absolute, contingent or otherwise).
 
As at the Effective Time, the Company will have outstanding Net Debt in an aggregate amount not exceeding $1,885,000, representing the Net Debt publicly disclosed in the Company's consolidated balance sheet as at July 31, 2007. It is understood that any permitted capital expenditures shall be funded using Working Capital.
 
There is no agreement, judgement, injunction, order or decree binding upon the Company, that purports to have, has or could reasonably be expected to have or (including following the transactions contemplated by this Agreement), the effect of prohibiting, restricting or impairing: (a) any material business practice of the Company or any Affiliate of the Company; (b) any acquisition of any business or property by the Company or any Affiliate of the Company; (c) the ability of the Company to solicit or engage any customers, suppliers or employees, including any most favoured nations clauses; (d) the nature of the business which may be conducted by the Company, any Affiliate of the Company or the manner or geographic area in which all or a material portion of the business of the Company or any Affiliate of the Company may be conducted by the Company or any Affiliate of the Company.
The Company has no outstanding material disputes with any licensee, customer, supplier, distributor or sales representative, and has not received any notice that any such licensee, customer, supplier, distributor or sales representative intends to cancel, terminate, renegotiate or otherwise modify or not renew its relationship with the Company, and, to the knowledge of the Company, no such action has been threatened, which in either case individually or in the aggregate, would reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect.
 
The Company has no shareholder rights plan or similar plan contemplated to be put in place by the Company.
 
Except as disclosed in the notes to the Financial Statements, all Contracts of the Company have been entered into on an arm's length basis (within the meaning of the Tax Act) and there has been no forgiveness or similar release or, except in the ordinary course of business, repayment of debt owed by or to a Person not at arm's length.
 
No property or asset of the Company has been taken or expropriated by any Governmental Authority nor has any notice or proceeding in respect thereof been given or commenced nor, to the knowledge of the Company, is there any intent or proposal to give any such notice or to commence any such proceeding.
 
To the knowledge of the Company, the Company has not omitted to disclose to Parent any information about facts or circumstances related to the Company which could reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect.
 
(a) To the knowledge of the Company, none of the Company, its Subsidiaries, or any of their key employees has been, or is being investigated with respect to, any activity that constitutes or could constitute, a material violation of any Healthcare Law.
(b) The Company and its Subsidiaries have not, and, to the knowledge of the Company, none of their managing key employees during his or her employment or association with the Company or its Subsidiaries has, engaged in any activity that constitutes a material violation of any Healthcare Law. There have been no complaints or findings made or charges laid against the Company, its Subsidiaries or any key managing employees during his or her employment or association with the Company or its Subsidiaries that, if proven true pursuant to legal process, would constitute a material violation of any Healthcare Law.
(c) Neither the Company nor any of its Subsidiaries have: (i) had a material civil monetary penalty assessed against it under Section 1128A of the SSA or any regulations promulgated thereunder; or (ii) been convicted (as that term is defined in 42 C.F.R. Section 1001.2) of any of the following categories of offenses as described in SSA Section 1128(A) and (b)(1), (2), (3), or any regulations promulgated thereunder: (A) criminal offenses relating to the delivery of an item or service under any state or federal
healthcare program; (B) criminal offenses under federal or state law for misconduct in connection with the delivery of a healthcare item or service or with respect to any act or omission in a program operated by or financed in whole or in part by any federal, state or local government agency; or (C) violations of federal or state laws relating to the interference with or obstruction of any investigation into any criminal offense described in this paragraph (c).
(d) Except as set out in the Disclosure Letter of the Company, since January 31, 2007, neither the Company nor any of its Subsidiaries have received or been subject to: (i) any United States Food and Drug Administration ("") Form 483's or any similar Canadian Department of Health ("") report including any inspection observation report, investigation report or other similar audit or deficiency report relating to any product manufactured, sold, leased or delivered by the Company or any Subsidiary; (ii) any FDA Notices of Adverse Findings or similar regulatory notice, warning letter or other correspondence from Health Canada setting forth adverse findings or non-compliance with applicable Law, regulations, rules or guidelines relating to any product manufactured, sold, leased or delivered by the Company or any Subsidiary; or (iii) any warning letters or other written correspondence from any Governmental Authority concerning any product manufactured, sold, leased or delivered by the Company or any Subsidiary in which any Governmental Authority asserted that the operations of the Company or any Subsidiary were not in compliance with applicable Law, regulations, rules or guidelines with respect to any product manufactured, sold, leased or delivered by the Company or any Subsidiary.
FDA
Health Canada
 
No related party of the Company (within the meaning of OSC Rule 61-501) will receive a "collateral benefit" (within the meaning of such rule) as a consequence of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement.
 
None of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries is engaged in any of the activities described in section 14.1(5) of the (Canada).
Investment Canada Act
 
Each of the representations and warranties of the Company set forth in Sections 4.1 to 4.34 inclusive is qualified by and is made subject to the disclosures made in the corresponding sections of the Disclosure Letter of the Company. No investigation by or on behalf of Parent will mitigate, diminish or affect the representations or warranties made by the Company in this Agreement.
 
The Company covenants and agrees that, during the period from the date of this Agreement until the earlier of the Effective Time or the date that this Agreement is terminated by its terms, unless Parent shall otherwise agree in writing, and except (i) as otherwise expressly permitted or specifically contemplated by this Agreement, including the Holdco Election, (ii) as otherwise required by applicable Law, and (iii) as otherwise disclosed in the Disclosure Letter of the Company:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
provided that the Company shall not, and shall not allow its Representatives to, disclose any non-public information to such Person without having entered into a confidentiality agreement with such Person that contains provisions that are no less favourable in the aggregate to the Company and that are not individually or in the aggregate materially more favourable to such Person than those contained in the Confidentiality Agreement, and provided that such confidentiality agreement may not include any provision calling for an exclusive right to negotiate with the Company and may not restrict the Company from complying with this Section 6.1, and will promptly provide to Parent any non-public information concerning the Company provided to such other Person which was not previously provided to Parent. Notwithstanding the foregoing, the Company shall not provide any commercially sensitive non-public information to any of its competitors that might be considering an Acquisition Proposal except in a manner consistent with the Company's past practice in dealing with the disclosure of such information to competitors.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
then the Company shall pay to Parent, within five Business Days of the first to occur of (i), (ii) (iii) or (iv) above, the amount of $2.75 million (the "") in immediately available funds to an account designated by Parent; provided that in the case of (ii) or (iv), where this Agreement had been terminated by Parent pursuant to Section 10.1(c)(B) or 10.1(d), the amount payable pursuant to this Section 6.3(a) shall be the amount equal to the Termination Fee less the Parent Expense Reimbursement paid or owing pursuant to Section 6.3(b).
Termination Fee
 
 
Nothing contained herein shall preclude a Party from seeking injunctive relief to restrain any breach or threatened breach of the covenants or agreements set forth in this Agreement or the Confidentiality Agreement or otherwise to obtain specific performance of any of such acts, covenants or agreements, without the necessity of posting a bond or security in connection therewith.
 
Immediately prior to the Effective Time, the Board shall be reconstituted through the resignation of some or all, as applicable, of incumbent directors (upon receipt of a full discharge from the Company regarding their duties as directors and confirmation satisfactory to the directors, acting reasonably, that the Company has purchased insurance coverage as contemplated by Section 7.2) and the appointment of nominees of Parent in their stead. The Company shall, in accordance with the foregoing and subject to the provisions of the Charter Documents and the CBCA, assist Parent to secure the resignations of such directors to be effective at such time as may be required by Parent and to use reasonable efforts to cause the election or appointment of Parent's nominees to fill some or all (at the discretion of Parent) of the vacancies so created in order to effect the foregoing without the necessity of a Shareholders meeting.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
The Company covenants and agrees solely on its own behalf that at all times until the Effective Time, that the Company shall not intentionally take any action, or fail to take any action, which would reasonably be expected to result in the representations and warranties set out in Article 4 being untrue at any time until the Effective Time.
 
 
 
 
The Company shall, on or before the Effective Date, either: (a) discharge from title to the Property all restrictive covenants registered in favour of Purple (the "") and provide evidence of such discharge satisfactory to Parent, acting reasonably; or (b) (i) obtain from Purple a waiver in form and substance satisfactory to Parent, acting reasonably, wherein Purple waives all of its rights under the Restrictive Covenants in favour of the Company, its corporate successors and successors in title to the Property, mortgagees of the Property and any entity designated thereby, and all tenants and other occupants of the Property from time to time; and (ii) register such waiver on title to the Property.
Restrictive Covenants
 
Parent covenants and agrees solely on its own behalf and on behalf of Subco that at all times until the Effective Time, that Parent shall not intentionally take any action, or fail to take any action, or cause Subco to take any action, or fail to take any action, which would reasonably be expected to result in the representations and warranties set out in Article 3 being untrue at any time until the Effective Time.
 
 
 
 
 
 
Parent acknowledges that the acquisition of Common Shares pursuant to the Arrangement shall constitute a change-of-control transaction under certain of the Company employment agreements and consulting agreements, as disclosed in Section 4.13 of the Disclosure Letter of the Company, and that following the Effective Time Parent shall cause the Company to honour its obligations thereunder, as further described in Section 7.3 of the Disclosure Letter of the Company.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Subject to the terms and conditions herein provided, each of the Parties agrees to use its reasonable efforts to take, or cause to be taken, all reasonable actions and to do, or cause to be done, all things reasonably necessary, proper or advisable to consummate and make effective as promptly as practicable the transactions contemplated by this Agreement and to cooperate with each other in connection with the foregoing, including using reasonable best efforts:
 
 
 
 
 
 
Upon reasonable notice, the Company shall afford to Parent and its respective officers, employees, counsel, accountants, lenders and other authorized representatives and financial and legal advisors reasonable access, during normal business hours and at such other time or times as Parent may reasonably request, from the date hereof and until the earlier of the Effective Time or the termination of this Agreement, to the Company's properties, books, contracts and records, as well as to its management personnel (who shall be instructed to cooperate) and, during this period, the Company shall furnish promptly to the other party all information concerning its businesses, properties and personnel as Parent may reasonably request. The Parties acknowledge that the information provided to them under this Section 8.3 will be non-public and/or proprietary in nature and will be subject to the terms of the Confidentiality Agreement.
 
Parent and the Company agree to make a joint press release with respect to this Agreement and the transactions contemplated herein as soon as practicable after the date hereof. Except to the extent necessary to comply with Laws, Parent, Subco and the Company further agree that, from the date hereof until the earlier of the completion of the Arrangement and the termination of this Agreement, neither Parent, Subco nor the Company shall make any public announcement or statement with respect to the Arrangement or this Agreement without the approval of the other party, such approval not to be unreasonably withheld or delayed. Moreover, in any event, each Party agrees to give prior notice to the other Parties of any public announcement relating to the Arrangement or this Agreement and agrees to consult with the other Parties, and acting reasonably and in good faith, to consider comments provided by the other Parties, prior to issuing each such public announcement.
 
The obligations of Parent, Subco and the Company to consummate the Arrangement are subject to the satisfaction (or, to the extent permissible, waiver) on or prior to the Effective Date of the following conditions:
 
 
 
The obligations of Parent and Subco to consummate the Arrangement are subject to the satisfaction (or waiver by Parent in its sole discretion) of the following further conditions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
The obligation of the Company to consummate the Arrangement is subject to the satisfaction (or waiver by the Company in its sole discretion) of the following further conditions:
 
 
 
This Agreement may be terminated and the Arrangement abandoned at any time prior to the Effective Time (with any termination by Parent also being an effective termination by Subco):
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
This Agreement may be amended by mutual agreement between the Parties; provided that Section 7.2 may not be amended without the consent of the persons entitled to the benefit of that section. It may not be amended except by an instrument in writing signed on behalf of each of the Parties hereto.
 
Each of Parent, on the one hand, and the Company, on the other hand, may:
 
 
 
provided, however, that any such extension or waiver shall be valid only if set forth in an instrument in writing signed on behalf of such party.
 
Any notice, consent, waiver, direction or other communication required or permitted to be given under this Agreement by a Party shall be in writing and may be given by delivering same or sending same by facsimile transmission or by delivery addressed to the Party to which the notice is to be given at its address for service herein. Any notice, consent, waiver, direction or other communication aforesaid shall, if delivered, be deemed to have been given and received on the date on which it was delivered to the address provided herein (if a Business Day, if not, then the next succeeding Business Day, in the place of receipt) and if sent by facsimile transmission be deemed to have been given and received at the time of receipt (if a Business Day, if not, then the next succeeding Business Day) unless actually received after 5:00 p.m. (local time in the place of receipt) at the point of receipt in which case it shall be deemed to have been given and received on the next Business Day.
The address for service for each of the Parties hereto shall be as follows:
 
Excel-Tech Ltd.
2568 Bristol Circle
Oakville, Ontario
L6H 5S1
Attention:          John Mumford, President and Chief Executive Officer
Facsimile No.    (905) 829-5304
Attention:          Peter Kastelic, Chief Financial Officer
Facsimile No.    (905) 829-5304
with a copy (which shall not be deemed notice) to:
Gowling Lafleur Henderson LLP
1 First Canadian Place
Suite 1600
100 King Street West
Toronto, Ontario
M5X 1G5
Attention:          Harold Chataway and Jason Saltzman
Facsimile No.    (416) 863-3495 and (416) 862-7661
 
Natus Medical Incorporated
1501 Industrial Road
San Carlos, CA 94070
Attention:          Jim Hawkins, President and Chief Executive Officer
Facsimile No.:   (650) 802-0401
with a copy (which shall not be deemed notice) to:
Fenwick & West LLP
Silicon Valley Center
801 California Street
Mountain View, California 94041
Attention:          Daniel J. Winnike
Facsimile:          (650) 938-5200
With a required copy (which shall not be deemed notice) to:
Osler, Hoskin & Harcourt LLP
Suite 1500
50 O'Connor Street
Ottawa, Ontario K1P 6L2
Attention:          Craig Wright
Facsimile:         (613) 235-2867
This Agreement:
 
 
 
The Parties shall be entitled to rely upon delivery of an executed facsimile copy of the Agreement, and such facsimile copy shall be legally effective to create a valid and binding agreement among the Parties.
 
Except as expressly permitted by the terms hereof, neither this Agreement nor any of the rights, interests or obligations hereunder shall be assigned by any of the Parties without the prior express written consent of the other Parties, except that Parent, without the prior written consent of the other Parties, may assign this Agreement to any of its Affiliates provided that (i) such assignment shall not relieve the assigning party from any of its obligations under this Agreement; (ii) such assignment shall not unduly delay or hinder the obtaining or completion of the Regulatory Approvals; and (iii) such assignee covenants and agrees to be bound by all of the same obligations, covenants, liabilities and guarantees of the assignor provided for in this Agreement and the assignor acknowledges it guarantees all of the assignee's obligations hereunder. If not providing a guarantee pursuant to this Section 11.3, upon the completion of such assignment, the assignor completing such assignment shall be released from its obligations under this Agreement and the Company shall acknowledge such release in writing.
 
Except as provided in Sections 6.3 and 10.2, all fees, costs and expenses incurred in connection with this Agreement and the transactions contemplated hereby shall be paid by the Party incurring such fee, cost or expense, whether or not the Arrangement is consummated.
 
 
 
Subject to Section 10.2, the representations and warranties of the Company and Parent contained in this Agreement shall not survive the Effective Time or the termination of this Agreement, and shall expire and be terminated on the earlier of the Effective Time or the termination of this Agreement in accordance with its terms. Sections 6.3, 7.3, 10.2 and 11.4 shall survive the Effective Time and the termination of this Agreement. Section 7.2 shall survive the Effective Time.
 
This Agreement may be executed by facsimile or other electronic means and in any number of counterparts, each of which shall be deemed to be an original but all of which together shall constitute one and the same agreement.
, the Parties have caused this Agreement to be executed as of the date first written above by their respective representatives thereunto duly authorized.
IN WITNESS WHEREOF
 

Exhibit 99.1
Natus Medical to Acquire Excel-Tech Ltd.
Acquisition Expands Neurology Product Lines and Adds Growth Opportunities
(Nasdaq:BABY) and ("XLTEK") (TSX:NRV.TO) today announced that the companies have entered into a definitive agreement for Natus to acquire XLTEK. Canadian based XLTEK develops and markets computer-based electro diagnostic systems and disposable supplies used by medical practitioners to aid in the detection, diagnosis, and monitoring of neurologic and sleep disorders.
SAN CARLOS, Calif. & OAKVILLE, Ontario, Canada, (October 10, 2007)  Natus Medical Incorporated
Excel-Tech Ltd.
The acquisition is to be completed by way of a statutory plan of arrangement in Canada under which Natus will acquire all of the outstanding common shares of XLTEK at a cash price of C$3.25 per share. In addition, each share subject to an XLTEK stock option will convert into an amount equal to the excess of C$3.25 over the exercise price of the option. The transaction is valued at approximately C$62.5 (U.S. $63.6) million based on approximately 19.4 million XLTEK shares outstanding on a diluted basis. XLTEK reported revenue of C$32.5 million in the twelve months ended July 31, 2007, cash and cash equivalents of C$16.4 million as of July 31, 2007, and owns the land and building housing their corporate facility in Oakville.
Natus believes the acquisition will be immediately accretive to earnings, excluding associated one-time charges.
"This acquisition affirms our position as the market leader in neurology and brings Natus one-step closer to achieving our stated goal of growing revenue to a $250 million annual run-rate by the end of 2008," said Jim Hawkins, President and Chief Executive Officer of Natus. "XLTEK adds to our growth opportunities by broadening our product offerings in neurology, including XLTEK's products for the diagnosis of peripheral nervous system dysfunction."
"XLTEK's full line of products for the neurology clinician expands our current product offerings with products that include a high-end long-term EEG patient monitoring system for the diagnosis of epilepsy, electromyography systems, or EMG systems, used in the diagnosis of neuropathies and myopathies, and intra-operative monitoring systems, or IOM systems, used during surgical procedures in the operating room," added Hawkins. "XLTEK also has a history of strong product innovation in the neurology and sleep market segments, where we expect to see the fruits of their research and development efforts within the next 12 to 18 months."
"In addition, we plan to leverage our combined direct sales channels in the United States and Canada, and provide new distribution for XLTEK products through the Natus international distribution organization, now operating in over 80 countries," added Hawkins.
John Mumford, President and Chief Executive Officer of XLTEK said: "We are pleased to become a part of the growing Natus team and I believe the expanded opportunities provided through this acquisition will accelerate sales of our technologies into the growing global marketplace."
In addition to available cash on hand, Natus intends to finance a portion of the purchase price through a commitment secured from Wells Fargo Bank N.A., subject to customary closing conditions, to provide $35 million in new senior term and revolving credit facilities. The acquisition is not subject to any financing condition on the part of Natus.
The transaction is expected to close by the first week in December 2007, subject to XLTEK shareholder approval, customary regulatory approvals, and other closing conditions. Directors and officers of XLTEK, owning in the aggregate approximately 24% of XLTEK's outstanding common shares, have entered into support agreements with Natus by which they agree to vote their shares in favor of the transaction.
Natus intends to release its 2007 third quarter financial results on November 1, 2007 and will host a conference call the same day to discuss those results and the XLTEK acquisition. Natus expects to provide 2008 annual revenue and earnings guidance after the acquisition is completed.
Cowen and Company, LLC served as financial advisor to Natus, and RBC Capital Markets served as financial advisor to XLTEK.
About Natus Medical
Natus is a leading provider of healthcare products used for the screening, detection, treatment, monitoring and tracking of common medical ailments such as hearing impairment, neurological dysfunction, epilepsy, sleep disorders, and newborn care. Product offerings include computerized neurodiagnostic systems for audiology, neurology, polysomnography, and neonatology, as well as newborn care products such as hearing screening systems, phototherapy devices for the treatment of newborn jaundice, head-cooling products for the treatment of brain injury in newborns, and software systems for managing and tracking disorders and diseases for public health laboratories.
Additional information about Natus Medical can be found at .
www.natus.com
About XLTEK
XLTEK is a medical technology company that designs, develops and sells proprietary medical devices. XLTEK's core business consists of its neuro diagnostic equipment, used by neurology specialists to assist in the diagnosis and monitoring of the central and peripheral nervous systems. These core products, marketed since 1997, are sold into three main markets: the epilepsy market, the sleep disorders market, and the neurophysiology market, including myopathy, neuropathy and surgical monitoring.
XLTEK is headquartered in Oakville, a suburb of Toronto, Ontario, Canada. The Company's common shares trade on the Toronto Stock Exchange (Symbol: NRV.TO). Additional information about XLTEK and its products may be found at .
www.xltek.com
Cautionary Information Regarding Forward-Looking StatementsNatus
This press release contains forward-looking statements as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, particularly statements regarding the expectations, beliefs, plans, intentions and strategies of Natus. These forward-looking statements include, but are not limited to, statements regarding the benefits of the acquisition of XLTEK by Natus, including the expected accretive impact of the acquisition on the earnings of Natus and the future benefit of XLTEK research and development efforts, and Natus' expectations of reaching a $250 million annual revenue run rate by the end of 2008. These statements relate to future events or Natus' future financial performance or results, and involve known and unknown risks, uncertainties and other factors that may cause actual results, levels of activity, performance, or achievements to differ materially from those expressed or implied by the forward-looking statements. Forward-looking statements are only predictions and the actual events or results may differ materially. Natus cannot provide any assurance that its future results or the results implied by the forward-looking statements will meet expectations. The future results of Natus could differ materially due to a number of factors, including the effects of competition, challenges incurred in integrating acquired companies, the
demand for products and services, the ability to expand sales in international markets, the ability to maintain current sales levels in a mature domestic market, the ability to control costs, and risks associated with bringing new products to market. Natus disclaims any obligation to update information contained in any forward-looking statement.
More information about potential risk factors that could affect the business and financial results of Natus is included in Natus' annual report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2006, and its quarterly reports on Form 10-Q, and in other reports filed from time to time by Natus with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission.
Cautionary Information Regarding Forward-Looking StatementsXLTEK
Certain statements contained in this release containing words like "believe", "intend", "may", "expect" and other similar expressions, are forward-looking statements that involve a number of risks and uncertainties. Factors that could cause actual results to differ materially from those projected in the Company's forward-looking statements include the following: market acceptance of our technologies and products; our ability to obtain financing; our financial and technical resources relative to those of our competitors; our ability to keep up with rapid technological change; government regulation of our technologies; our ability to enforce our intellectual property rights and protect our proprietary technologies; the ability to obtain and develop partnership opportunities; the timing of commercial product launches; the ability to achieve key technical milestones in key products and other risk factors identified from time to time in the Company's filings.
More information about potential risk factors that could affect the business and financial results of XLTEK can be found in XLTEK's SEDAR filings, which can be accessed through XLTEK's web site at
www.xltek.com
COMPANY CONTACTS:
Natus Medical Incorporated
Steven J. Murphy
Chief Financial Officer
(650) 802-0400
InvestorRelations@Natus.com
Excel-Tech Ltd.
Peter Kastelic
Chief Financial Officer
(905) 829-5300 or (800) 387-7516
pkastelic@xltek.com


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BABY/BABY-8K-20071101061049.txt.gz
TIME:20071101061049
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION Washington, D.C. 20549 FORM 8-K CURRENT REPORT Pursuant to Section 13 OR 15(d) of The Securities Exchange Act of 1934 Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported) November 1, 2007 Natus Medical Incorporated - -------------------------------------------------------------------------------- (Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter) Delaware 000-33001 77-0154833 - -------------------------------------------------------------------------------- (State or other (Commission (IRS Employer jurisdiction File Number) Identification No.) of incorporation) - -------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 1501 Industrial Road, San Carlos, California 94070 - -------------------------------------------------------------------------------- (Address of principal executive offices) (Zip Code) Registrant's telephone number, including area code: (650) 802-0400 --------------------------- Not applicable - -------------------------------------------------------------------------------- (Former name or former address, if changed since last report) Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below): [ ] Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [ ] Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [ ] Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [ ] Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
- -------------------------------------------------------------------------------- ITEM 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition. On November 1, 2007, Natus Medical Incorporated (the "Company") is issuing a press release and holding a conference call regarding its financial results for the third quarter of fiscal 2007 ended September 30, 2007 and other financial information. A copy of the press release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 to this Form 8-K. The information in this Form 8-K and the exhibit attached hereto shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act") or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that Section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing. ITEM 9.01. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS, PRO FORMA FINANCIAL INFORMATION AND EXHIBITS. (d) Exhibits. Exhibit No. Description ----------- ----------- 99.1 Press release of Natus Medical Incorporated dated November 1, 2007 describing the Company's results for its third fiscal quarter ended September 30, 2007 and other financial information. - --------------------------------------------------------------------------------
SIGNATURES Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized. NATUS MEDICAL INCORPORATED Date: November 1, 2007 By: /s/ Steven J. Murphy ------------------------------------------ Steven J. Murphy Vice President Finance and Chief Financial Officer
Index to Exhibits Exhibit No. Description ----------- ----------- 99.1 Press release of Natus Medical Incorporated dated November 1, 2007 describing the Company's results for its third fiscal quarter ended September 30, 2007 and other financial information.

Exhibit 99.1 Natus Medical Announces Record 2007 Third Quarter Financial Results -- Company Reports Record Third Quarter Revenue and Earnings -- Gross Profit Improves to 65% SAN CARLOS, Calif.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--Nov. 1, 2007--Natus Medical Incorporated (Nasdaq:BABY) today announced financial results for the three and nine months ended September 30, 2007. For the third quarter ended September 30, 2007, Natus reported revenue of $28.8 million, representing a 32% increase from $21.8 million in the comparable quarter of the previous year. The Company reported net income of $3.2 million, or $0.14 per diluted share, for the third quarter of 2007, compared with net income of $1.9 million, or $0.09 per diluted share, for the third quarter of 2006. The earnings per share for the three months ended September 30, 2007 reflects a 53% increase over the amount reported in the 2006 period. For the nine months ended September 30, 2007, the Company reported net income of $7.0 million, or $0.31 per diluted share, compared to a loss of $1.4 million, or $(0.08) per share, for the comparable period in 2006. The results for the 2006 period include a charge for in-process research and development associated with the acquisition of Bio-logic Systems Corp. in January 2006. Excluding this charge, non-GAAP earnings for the nine months ended September 30, 2006 were $4.5 million, or $0.24 per diluted share. The results for the first nine months of 2007 reflect increases in net income and earnings per share of 57% and 30%, respectively, compared to the non-GAAP results in 2006. Jim Hawkins, President and Chief Executive Officer of the Company, said, "I am pleased with our record results for the third quarter. The quarter was led by continued strong growth in our hearing screening business, both domestic and international, as well as our newborn care products, which where driven by our acquisition of Olympic Medical last year. I am also proud of our gross profit improvement to 65% for the quarter. This is a long standing goal of Natus and I am pleased to have achieved this result earlier than planned." "As we previously discussed, in transitioning production of the Olympic Cool-Cap from clinical units to commercial units, we updated some of the components used in the device. Because the Cool-Cap is a FDA Class III medical device, these component updates require FDA pre-market approval. Consequently, in June we put a hold on shipments of Cool-Cap units. We believe we are in the final stages of working with the FDA on these changes, and we are hopeful that we will resume shipments of the Cool-Cap in the fourth quarter," Hawkins added. In a separate matter, the Company also disclosed that on October 15, 2007 it received a warning letter from the FDA related to the Company's Olympic Medical manufacturing facility in Seattle, Washington. The letter focused on process deficiencies that were identified during an FDA inspection in April. "We take this matter seriously and are working to address the findings identified by the FDA. We currently expect to resolve the FDA's issues in the fourth quarter," said Hawkins. On October 10, 2007, Natus announced it had entered into a definitive agreement to acquire Excel-Tech Ltd. ("XLTEK"). XLTEK develops and markets computer-based electro diagnostic systems and disposable supplies used by medical practitioners to aid in the detection, diagnosis, and monitoring of neurologic and sleep disorders. The transaction is now expected to close by the end of November. Natus believes the acquisition will be immediately accretive to earnings, excluding associated one-time charges. During 2006 the Company completed the acquisitions of Bio-logic Systems, Deltamed, and Olympic Medical, in January, September, and October, respectively. The acquisitions of Deltamed and Olympic contributed to the reported revenue growth in the three and nine months ended September 30, 2007. As of September 30, 2007 the Company had cash and cash equivalents of $22.4 million, stockholders' equity of $112 million, working capital of $45 million, and no long-term debt. Financial Guidance Natus increased its previously announced revenue guidance for the fourth quarter of 2007. For the fourth quarter of 2007, the Company now expects revenue to range from $33.3 million to $33.8 million. The Company had previously said revenue would range from $32.9 million to $33.4 million. The Company reiterated its earnings per share guidance, which it expects to range from $0.19 to $0.21. This compares to revenue of $28.8 million and earnings per share of $0.02 reported in the fourth quarter of 2006. For the full year 2007, the Company now expects revenue to range from $117.5 million to $118.5 million. The Company had previously said revenue would range from $118.3 million to $119.3 million. The Company reiterated its earnings per share guidance, which it expects to range from $0.49 to $0.52 per share. The Company's revised fourth quarter revenue guidance assumes no revenue from the Cool-Cap. The Company expects that it will utilize tax net operating loss carryforwards to significantly reduce its taxable income in 2007, such that it will pay taxes at a rate of approximately 12% to 15% for the year. The Company's annual 2007 guidance is on a GAAP basis, including the impact of expensing employee equity-based compensation, which the Company expects to be approximately $2.3 million for the full year 2007. The Company's fourth quarter guidance does not include the impact of any restructuring related charges or one-time acquisition costs. All earnings per share amounts are on a diluted basis. Natus expects to provide 2008 annual revenue and earnings guidance in December after the acquisition of XLTEK is completed. Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures In addition to disclosing financial results calculated in accordance with GAAP, this release contains non-GAAP financial measures that exclude the effects of costs associated with the January 5, 2006 acquisition of Bio-logic Systems Corp. The Company believes that the presentation of results excluding this acquisition-related charge provides meaningful supplemental information to both management and investors that is indicative of the Company's core operating results. The Company also believes the in-process research and development charge is not indicative of resources devoted to ongoing research and development efforts. Therefore, the Company believes the non-GAAP financial measures facilitate comparison of operating results across reporting periods. A reconciliation between the Company's results of operations on a GAAP and non-GAAP basis for the periods reported is included as part of the condensed consolidated statements of operations at the end of the Company's financial results release. The Company believes that both management and investors benefit from referring to these non-GAAP financial measures in assessing the Company's performance and when planning, forecasting, and analyzing future periods. The non-GAAP financial measures also facilitate management's internal comparisons to the Company's historical performance. The non-GAAP financial measures disclosed by the Company should not be considered a substitute for or superior to financial measures calculated in accordance with GAAP, and the financial results calculated in accordance with GAAP and reconciliations to those financial statements should be carefully evaluated. Conference Call Natus has scheduled an investment-community conference call to discuss this announcement beginning at 11:00 a.m. Eastern Time today (8:00 a.m. Pacific Time). Individuals interested in listening to the conference call may do so by dialing (866) 578-5747 for domestic callers, or (617) 213-8054 for international callers, and entering reservation code 37593392. A telephone replay will be available for 48 hours following the conclusion of the call by dialing (888) 286-8010 for domestic callers, or (617) 801-6888 for international callers, and entering reservation code 80585392. The conference call also will be available real-time via the Internet at http://investor.natus.com, and a recording of the call will be available on the Company's Web site for 90 days following the completion of the call. About Natus Medical Incorporated Natus is a leading provider of healthcare products used for the screening, detection, treatment, monitoring and tracking of common medical ailments such as hearing impairment, neurological dysfunction, epilepsy, sleep disorders, and newborn care. Product offerings include computerized neurodiagnostic systems for audiology, neurology, polysomnography, and neonatology, as well as newborn care products such as hearing screening systems, phototherapy devices for the treatment of newborn jaundice, head-cooling products for the treatment of brain injury in newborns, and software systems for managing and tracking disorders and diseases for public health laboratories. Additional information about Natus Medical can be found at www.natus.com. This press release contains forward-looking statements as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, particularly statements regarding the expectations, beliefs, plans, intentions and strategies of Natus. These forward-looking statements include, but are not limited to, statements regarding future revenue and expenses; anticipated revenue, profitability, and cash tax rates for the fourth quarter and full year 2007; and the timing for resumption of shipment of Cool-Cap units. These statements relate to future events or Natus' future financial performance or results, and involve known and unknown risks, uncertainties and other factors that may cause actual results, levels of activity, performance, or achievements to differ materially from those expressed or implied by the forward-looking statements. Forward-looking statements are only predictions and the actual events or results may differ materially. Natus cannot provide any assurance that its future results or the results implied by the forward-looking statements will meet expectations. Our future results could differ materially due to a number of factors, including the effects of competition, challenges incurred in integrating acquired companies, the demand for our products and services, our ability to expand our sales in international markets, our ability to maintain current sales levels in a mature domestic market, our ability to control costs, and risks associated with bringing new products to market and integrating acquired businesses. Natus disclaims any obligation to update information contained in any forward-looking statement. More information about potential risk factors that could affect the business and financial results of Natus is included in Natus' annual report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2006, and its quarterly reports on Form 10-Q, and in other reports filed from time to time by Natus with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission. NATUS MEDICAL INCORPORATED AND SUBSIDIARIES UNAUDITED CONDENSED CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF OPERATIONS (in thousands, except per share amounts) Three Months Ended Nine Months Ended September September September September 2007 2006 2007 2006 --------- --------- --------- --------- Revenue $ 28,830 $ 21,806 $ 84,140 $ 61,156 Cost of revenue 10,129 8,299 30,454 22,809 --------- -------- --------- -------- Gross profit 18,701 13,507 53,686 38,347 --------- -------- --------- -------- Operating expenses: Marketing and selling 6,752 4,809 20,147 14,965 Research and development 3,879 2,438 12,076 7,387 General and administrative 3,662 2,994 11,359 7,928 Acquired IPR&D - - - 5,900 --------- -------- --------- -------- Total operating expenses 14,293 10,241 43,582 36,180 --------- -------- --------- -------- Income from operations 4,408 3,266 10,104 2,167 --------- -------- --------- -------- Other income/(expense): Interest income 182 247 552 491 Interest expense - (160) - (498) Other income, net 31 59 136 23 --------- -------- --------- -------- Total other income/(expense) 213 146 688 16 --------- -------- --------- -------- Income before provision for income tax 4,621 3,412 10,792 2,183 Provision for income tax 1,465 1,543 3,791 3,622 --------- -------- --------- -------- Net income (loss) $ 3,156 $ 1,869 $ 7,001 $ (1,439) ========= ======== ========= ======== Earnings (loss) per share: Basic $ 0.15 $ 0.09 $ 0.32 $ (0.08) Diluted $ 0.14 $ 0.09 $ 0.31 $ (0.08) Weighted-average shares used to compute Basic earnings per share 21,646 19,749 21,568 18,541 Diluted earnings per share 22,965 20,860 22,798 18,541 NATUS MEDICAL INCORPORATED AND SUBSIDIARIES RECONCILIATION OF NON-GAAP ADJUSTMENTS (UNAUDITED) (in thousands, except per share amounts) Three Months Ended Six Months Ended June June June June 2007 2006 2007 2006 --------- -------- ------- -------- GAAP based results: Net Income (loss) $ 3,156 $ 1,869 $ 7,001 $(1,439) Non-GAAP adjustments: Acquired in-process research and development (see note) - - - 5,900 (a) --------- -------- ------- ------- Non-GAAP net income $ 3,156 $ 1,869 $ 7,001 $ 4,461 ========= ======== ======= ======= Earnings per share: Basic $ 0.15 $ 0.09 $ 0.32 $ 0.24 Diluted $ 0.14 $ 0.09 $ 0.31 $ 0.24 Weighted-average shares used to compute Basic earnings per share 21,646 19,749 21,568 18,541 Diluted earnings per share 22,965 20,860 22,798 18,949 (a) Charges for acquired in-process research and development expense of $5,900 related to the acquisition of Bio-logic Systems Corp. on January 5, 2006. Management believes that excluding this charges facilitates comparisons of Natus' core operating results across multiple reporting periods. Since the IPR&D charge is not expected to be tax deductible, reversal of this charge has no impact on the tax provision. CONTACT: Natus Medical Incorporated Steven J. Murphy, Chief Financial Officer, 650-802-0400 InvestorRelations@Natus.com


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BABY/BABY-8K-20071203170507.txt.gz
TIME:20071203170507
EVENTS:	Completion of Acquisition or Disposition of Assets	Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Completion of Acquisition or Disposition of Assets
ITEM: Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
Acquisition of Xltek.
On November 29, 2007, the Company completed the acquisition of Excel-Tech, Ltd. ("Xltek"), based in Oakville, Ontario, Canada, pursuant to an Arrangement Agreement dated as of October 9, 2007 by and among the Company, Xltek and 4437713 Canada, Inc., a wholly-owned subsidiary of the Company ("Merger Sub").
Pursuant to the terms of the Arrangement Agreement, Merger Sub acquired all of the outstanding common shares of Xltek for a price of C$3.25 in cash for each Xltek common share. In addition, all options that were outstanding immediately before the effective date of the Arrangement were cancelled in return for a cash payment of an amount equal to the excess of C$3.25 per share over the applicable option price per share. In addition, all deferred share units that were outstanding immediately before the effective date of the Arrangement were cancelled by the Company in exchange for a payment from the Company to the holder in cash equal to the product of the number of shares underlying such deferred share units and C$3.25. The total aggregate payment by the Company to the former stockholders, option holders, and deferred share unit holders of Xltek was approximately USD $63.5 million, exclusive of direct costs associated with the acquisition, which cannot be reasonably determined at this time.
This description of the acquisition and the Arrangement Agreement does not purport to be complete and is qualified in its entirety by reference to the Arrangement Agreement, a copy of which was attached as Exhibit 10.1 to the Company's Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on October 12, 2007.
On November 29, 2007, the Company issued a press release announcing the completion of the acquisition, a copy of which is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1.
 
Credit Agreement with Wells Fargo Bank
On November 28, 2007, Natus Medical Incorporated (the "Company") entered into an Amended and Restated Credit Agreement (the "Credit Agreement") by and between the Company and Wells Fargo Bank, National Association ("Wells Fargo") and a Security Agreement in favor of Wells Fargo, (the "Security Agreement"), together with the Credit Agreement, the ("Credit Facility Documents"). The Credit Agreement restates and supercedes the credit agreement that the Company entered into with Wells Fargo on November 8, 2006. The Company paid to Wells Fargo a commitment fee for the credit facilities provided under the Credit Agreement in the amount of $350,000.
Pursuant to the terms of the Credit Facility Documents, a Term Loan in the amount of $25 million shall be used for working capital and general corporate purposes, and to finance a portion of the Company's acquisition of Xltek. The outstanding principal balance under the Term Loan is payable over twelve quarterly periods, payable in equal successive principal installments commencing February 29, 2008, with a final installment consisting of all remaining unpaid principal due and payable in full on February 29, 2012.
Pursuant to the terms of the Credit Facility Documents, a Revolving Line of Credit in the amount of $13 million was established and shall be used for working capital and general corporate purposes, and to finance a portion of the acquisition of Xltek. On November 28, 2007, the Company borrowed $10 million under the Revolving Line of Credit. The maximum principal amount available under the Revolving Line of Credit will be reduced automatically after June 30, 2008 to $10 million.
Any outstanding principal balance under the Term Loan or the Revolving Line of Credit will bear interest equal to Wells Fargo's prime rate or the adjusted LIBOR rate, at the election of the Company. The adjusted LIBOR rate equals the current LIBOR rate plus a spread of 1.75% or 2.0%, depending on the Company's consolidated leverage ratio as defined in the Credit Agreement. For any outstanding principal for which the Company elects a LIBOR rate option, the rate will be fixed for 1, 2, 3, or 6 month periods, at the election of the Company. Unused borrowing on the Revolving Line of Credit will bear an unused quarterly commitment fee payable in arrears. The rate on the unused borrowing will be 0.2% or 0.3% (twenty basis points or thirty basis points) depending on the consolidated leverage ratio as determined on a quarterly basis.
The Company may prepay the outstanding principal on the Term Loan or Revolving Line of Credit in a minimum amount of $1 million if a prime rate election is in effect, or $5 million if a LIBOR rate election is in effect, in each case without premium or penalty.
The Credit Agreement contains financial covenants, including covenants relating to financial reporting and notification, compliance with laws, maintenance of books and records, maintenance of properties and insurance, and limitations on guaranties, investments, issuance of debt, lease obligations and capital expenditures. The Credit Agreement also provides for events of default, including failure to pay any principal or interest when due, failure to perform or observe covenants, bankruptcy or insolvency events and the occurrence of a material adverse effect. Under the Security Agreement, the Company has granted Wells Fargo a security interest in all of the assets of the Company.
The foregoing description of the Credit Facility Documents does not purport to be complete and is qualified in its entirety by reference to the copies of the Credit Agreement and the Security Agreement attached hereto as Exhibit 10.1 and Exhibit 10.2, respectively.
 
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 

E 10.1
XHIBIT
 
 
 
 
 
T A R C A (this ) is entered into as of November 28, 2007, by and between N M I, a Delaware corporation (), and W F B, N A ().
HIS
MENDED
AND
ESTATED
REDIT
GREEMENT
"Agreement"
ATUS
EDICAL
NCORPORATED
"Borrower"
ELLS
ARGO
ANK
ATIONAL
SSOCIATION
"Bank"
W, Borrower and Bank are party to that certain Credit Agreement, dated as of November 8, 2006 (as amended, restated, modified and/or supplemented prior to the date hereof, the ).
HEREAS
"Existing Agreement"
W, Borrower has requested that Bank (i) amend and restate the Existing Agreement and (ii) extend or continue credit to Borrower as described below, and Bank has agreed to provide such credit to Borrower on the terms and conditions contained herein.
HEREAS
N, T, for valuable consideration, the receipt and sufficiency of which are hereby acknowledged, Bank and Borrower hereby agree as follows:
OW
HEREFORE
S 1.1. C D T.
ECTION
ERTAIN
EFINED
ERMS
As used in this Agreement, the following terms shall have the meaning set forth below:
shall mean a corporation incorporated under the laws of Canada and wholly-owned by Borrower which was formed for the purpose of entering into the Arrangement Agreement by and among Borrower, 4437713 CANADA INC., and Excel-Tech and pursuant to the Arrangement Agreement and an amalgamation under Canadian law, 4437713 CANADA INC. shall cease to exist and Excel-Tech shall become a wholly-owned subsidiary of Borrower.
"4437713 CANADA INC."
has the meaning ascribed to such term in Section 9.12(b) hereof.
"AAA"
has the meaning ascribed to such term in the introductory paragraph hereof.
"Agreement"
"" means, from time to time, with respect to any Base Rate Loan or LIBOR Loan, or with respect to the Unused Commitment Fees payable pursuant to Section 2.7(a), as the case may be, the applicable rate per annum set forth below (expressed in basis points) under the caption "LIBOR Spread," "Base Rate Spread" or "Unused Commitment Fee Rate," as the case may be, based upon, subject to Section 2.6(d), the Leverage Ratio as set forth in the most recent Compliance Certificate received by Bank pursuant to Section 5.1(b)(vii) or Section 6.3(d), as applicable:
Applicable Rate
 
 
means that certain Arrangement Agreement, dated as of October 9, 2007, by and among Borrower, Excel-Tech and 4437713 CANADA INC.
"Arrangement Agreement"
means, on any date of determination: (a) in respect of any capital lease of any Person, the capitalized amount thereof that would appear on a balance sheet of such Person prepared as of such date in accordance with GAAP; and (b) in respect of any Synthetic Lease Obligation, the capitalized amount of the remaining lease payments under the relevant lease that would appear on a balance sheet of such Person prepared as of such date in accordance with GAAP if such lease were accounted for as a capital lease.
"Attributable Indebtedness"
"" means the period from the Closing Date to the earlier of (i) the Revolving Credit Maturity Date and (ii) the date that Bank's commitment to make Revolving Credit Loans terminates pursuant to Section 8.2.
Availability Period
has the meaning ascribed to such term in the introductory paragraph hereof.
"Bank"
means the Bankruptcy Reform Act, Title 11 of the United States Code.
"Bankruptcy Code"
"" means, collectively: (a) the Bankruptcy Code; and (b) all other liquidation, conservatorship, bankruptcy, assignment for the benefit of creditors, moratorium, rearrangement, receivership, insolvency, reorganization, or similar debtor relief laws of the United States or other applicable jurisdictions from time to time in effect and affecting the rights of creditors generally.
Bankruptcy Laws
means the rate per annum for United States dollar deposits quoted by Bank as the Inter-Bank Market Offered Rate, with the understanding that such rate is quoted by Bank for the purpose of calculating effective rates of interest for loans making reference thereto, on the first day of an Interest Period for delivery of funds on said date for a period of time approximately equal to the number of days in such Interest Period and in an amount approximately equal to the principal amount to which such Interest Period applies. Borrower understands and agrees that Bank may base its quotation of the Inter-Bank Market Offered Rate upon such offers or other market indicators of the Inter-Bank Market as Bank in its discretion deems appropriate including, but not limited to, the rate offered for Dollar deposits on the London Inter-Bank Market.
"Base LIBOR"
"" means, for any day, a fluctuating rate per annum equal to the higher of: (a) the Federal Funds Rate one-half of one percent per annum; and (b) the per annum rate of
Base Rate
plus
 
interest in effect for such day as publicly announced from time to time by Bank as its "," such rate being the rate of interest most recently announced within Bank at its principal office as its "," with the understanding that Bank's "" is one of Bank's base rates and serves as the basis upon which effective rates of interest are calculated for those loans making reference thereto, and is evidenced by the recording thereof after its announcement in such internal publication or publications as Bank may designate. Any change in Bank's "" as announced by Bank shall take effect at the opening of business on the day specified in the public announcement of such change.
Prime Rate
Prime Rate
Prime Rate
Prime Rate
"" means a Loan that bears interest based upon the Base Rate.
Base Rate Loan
has the meaning ascribed to such term in the introductory paragraph hereof.
"Borrower"
"" means a Revolving Credit Borrowing or the Term Borrowing, as the context may require.
Borrowing
"" means any day except a Saturday, Sunday or any other day on which commercial banks in California are authorized or required by law to close; that, if any such day relates to LIBOR or any LIBOR Loan, such day must also be a day on which dealings in Dollar deposits are conducted by and between banks in the London interbank offered market.
Business Day
provided
"" means the occurrence, after the date of this Agreement, of: (a) the adoption or taking effect of any law, rule, regulation or treaty; (b) any change in any law, rule, regulation or treaty or in the administration, interpretation or application thereof by any Governmental Authority; or (c) the making or issuance of any request, guideline or directive (whether or not having the force of law) by any Governmental Authority.
Change in Law
"" means an event or series of events by which any "person" or "group" (as such terms are used in Sections 13(d) and 14(d) of the Exchange Act, but excluding any employee benefit plan of such person or its subsidiaries, and any person or entity acting in its capacity as trustee, agent or other fiduciary or administrator of any such plan) becomes the "beneficial owner" (as defined in Rules 13d-3 and 13d-5 under the Exchange Act), directly or indirectly, of thirty percent or more of the Equity Interests of Borrower entitled to vote for members of the board of directors or equivalent governing body of Borrower on a fully-diluted basis (and taking into account all such securities that such person or group has the right to acquire pursuant to any option right).
Change of Control
means November 28, 2007.
"Closing Date"
"" means the Internal Revenue Code of 1986.
Code
"" means a certificate substantially in the form of .
Compliance Certificate
Exhibit D
means all non-public, confidential and/or proprietary information of Borrower, its Subsidiaries or any Subsidiary thereof, now or at any time hereafter provided to Bank by Borrower, or any of Borrower's officers, employees, agents or
"Confidential Information"
 
representatives, in connection with Bank's evaluation of Borrower's credit request and/or Bank's ongoing credit accommodations to Borrower, and shall include, without limitation, any and all financial, technical and/or business information relating to Borrower, its Subsidiaries or any Subsidiary thereof, including trade secrets, research and development test results, marketing or business plans and strategies, forecasts, budgets, projections, customer and supplier information, and any other analyses, computations or studies prepared by or for Borrower, any of its Subsidiaries or any Subsidiary thereof.
means, for any period, for Borrower and its Subsidiaries on a consolidated basis, an amount equal to Consolidated Net Income for such period (a) the following to the extent deducted in calculating such Consolidated Net Income: (i) Consolidated Interest Expense for such period, (ii) the provision for Federal, state, local and foreign income taxes payable by Borrower and its Subsidiaries for such period, (iii) depreciation and amortization expense, (iv) all non-cash expenses related to stock-based compensation deducted to arrive at Consolidated Net Income, (v) other non-recurring expenses of Borrower and its Subsidiaries reducing such Consolidated Net Income which do not represent a cash item in such period or any future period, and (vi) cash based restructuring charges, as defined under GAAP, for Excel-Tech ( that the aggregate amount added to Consolidated Net Income for all periods pursuant to this clause (vi) shall not exceed $5,000,000) and (b) the following to the extent included in calculating such Consolidated Net Income: (i) interest income (ii) extraordinary or non-recurring non-cash income or gains, (iii) Federal, state, local and foreign income tax credits of Borrower and its Subsidiaries for such period and (iv) all non-cash items increasing Consolidated Net Income for such period.
"Consolidated EBITDA"
plus
provided
minus
means, as of any date of determination, for Borrower and its Subsidiaries on a consolidated basis, the sum of (a) the outstanding principal amount of all obligations, whether current or long-term, for borrowed money (including obligations hereunder) and all obligations evidenced by bonds, debentures, notes, loan agreements or other similar instruments, (b) all purchase money indebtedness, (c) all direct obligations arising under letters of credit (including standby and commercial), reimbursement agreements, bankers' acceptances, bank guaranties, surety bonds and similar instruments, (d) all obligations in respect of the deferred purchase price of property or services (other than trade accounts payable in the ordinary course of business), (e) Attributable Indebtedness in respect of capital leases and Synthetic Lease Obligations, (f) without duplication, all guarantees with respect to outstanding indebtedness of the types specified in clauses (a) through (e) above of Persons other than Borrower or any Subsidiary, and (g) all indebtedness of the types referred to in clauses (a) through (f) above of any partnership or joint venture (other than a joint venture that is itself a corporation or limited liability company) in which Borrower or a Subsidiary is a general partner or joint venturer, unless such indebtedness is expressly made non-recourse to Borrower or such Subsidiary.
"Consolidated Funded Indebtedness"
means, for any period, for Borrower and its Subsidiaries on a consolidated basis, an amount equal to the sum of all interest charges (including imputed interest charges with respect to capitalized lease obligations and all amortization of debt discount and expense) of such Persons for such period.
"Consolidated Interest Expense"
 
means, for any period, for Borrower and its Subsidiaries on a consolidated basis, the net income of Borrower and its Subsidiaries from continuing operations (excluding gains or losses from dispositions of assets) for such period.
"Consolidated Net Income"
"" means any event or condition that constitutes an Event of Default or that, with the giving of notice, the passage of time, or both, would constitute an Event of Default.
Default
"" means a per annum interest rate equal to the sum of: (i) the Base Rate; (ii) the Applicable Rate, if any, applicable to Base Rate Loans; (iii) four hundred basis points per annum; that, with respect to a LIBOR Loan, the Default Rate shall be a per annum interest rate equal to the sum of: (A) the interest rate (including any Applicable Rate) otherwise applicable to such Loan; (B) four hundred basis points per annum.
Default Rate
plus
plus
provided
plus
"" and "" mean lawful money of the United States.
Dollar
$
means any Subsidiary that is not a Foreign Subsidiary.
"Domestic Subsidiary"
"" means all claims, however asserted, by any Governmental Authority or other Person alleging Environmental Liabilities.
Environmental Claims
"" means any and all Federal, state, local, and foreign statutes, laws, regulations, ordinances, rules, judgments, orders, decrees, permits, concessions, grants, franchises, licenses, agreements or governmental restrictions relating to pollution and the protection of the environment or the release of any materials into the environment, including those related to hazardous substances or wastes, air emissions and discharges to waste or public systems.
Environmental Laws
"" means any liability, contingent or otherwise (including any liability for damages, costs of environmental remediation, fines, penalties or indemnities), of Borrower, any Guarantor or any of their respective Subsidiaries directly or indirectly resulting from or based upon: (a) violation of any Environmental Law; (b) the generation, use, handling, transportation, storage, treatment or disposal of any Hazardous Materials; (c) exposure to any Hazardous Materials; (d) the release or threatened release of any Hazardous Materials into the environment; or (e) any contract, agreement or other consensual arrangement pursuant to which liability is assumed or imposed with respect to any of the foregoing.
Environmental Liability
"" means, with respect to any Person, all of the shares of capital stock of (or other ownership or profit interests in) such Person, all of the warrants, options or other rights for the purchase or acquisition from such Person of shares of capital stock of (or other ownership or profit interests in) such Person, all of the securities convertible into or exchangeable for shares of capital stock of (or other ownership or profit interests in) such Person or warrants, rights or options for the purchase or acquisition from such Person of such shares (or such other interests), and all of the other ownership or profit interests in such Person (including partnership, member or trust interests therein), whether voting or nonvoting, and whether or not such shares, warrants, options, rights or other interests are outstanding on any date of determination.
Equity Interests
 
means the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974.
"ERISA"
"" means any trade or business (whether or not incorporated) under common control with Borrower or any Subsidiary thereof within the meaning of Section 414(b) or (c) of the Code (and Sections 414(m) and (o) of the Code for purposes of provisions relating to Section 412 of the Code).
ERISA Affiliate
"" means any of the following: (a) a Reportable Event with respect to a Pension Plan; (b) a withdrawal by Borrower or any ERISA Affiliate from a Pension Plan subject to Section 4063 of ERISA during a plan year in which it was a substantial employer (as defined in Section 4001(a)(2) of ERISA) or a cessation of operations that is treated as such a withdrawal under Section 4062(e) of ERISA; (c) a complete or partial withdrawal by Borrower or any ERISA Affiliate from a Multiemployer Plan or notification that a Multiemployer Plan is in reorganization; (d) the filing of a notice of intent to terminate, the treatment of a Plan amendment as a termination under Sections 4041 or 4041A of ERISA, or the commencement of proceedings by the PBGC to terminate a Pension Plan or Multiemployer Plan; (e) an event or condition that constitutes grounds under Section 4042 of ERISA for the termination of, or the appointment of a trustee to administer, any Pension Plan or Multiemployer Plan; or (f) the imposition of any liability under Title IV of ERISA, other than for PBGC premiums due but not delinquent under Section 4007 of ERISA, upon Borrower or any ERISA Affiliate.
ERISA Event
has the meaning ascribed to such term in Article VIII hereof.
"Event of Default"
means Excel-Tech Ltd., a corporation incorporated under the laws of Canada all of whose shares are to be acquired by Borrower pursuant to the Arrangement Agreement.
"Excel-Tech"
"" means the Securities Exchange Act of 1934.
Exchange Act
"" means, for any day, the rate per annum equal to the weighted average of the rates on overnight Federal funds transactions with members of the Federal Reserve System arranged by Federal funds brokers on such day, as published by the Federal Reserve Bank of New York on the Business Day next succeeding such day; that: (a) if such day is not a Business Day, then the Federal Funds Rate for such day shall be such rate on such transactions on the next preceding Business Day as so published on the next succeeding Business Day; and (b) if no such rate is so published on such next succeeding Business Day, then the Federal Funds Rate for such day shall be the average rate (rounded upward, if necessary, to a whole multiple of one-hundredth of one percent) charged to Bank on such day on such transactions as determined by Bank.
Federal Funds Rate
provided
means the letter agreement, dated October 1, 2007, between Borrower and Bank regarding certain fees to be paid by Borrower in connection with the transactions contemplated by the Loan Documents.
"Fee Letter"
"" means the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System of the United States.
FRB
 
means any Subsidiary organized under the laws of a country (or political subdivision thereof) other than the United States (or political subdivision thereof). Each of Natus Neonatal, a company organized under the laws of the United Kingdom, Fischer-Zoth Diagnosesysteme GmbH, a company organized under the laws of Germany, Fischer-Zoth GmbH, a company organized under the laws of Austria, DeltaMed SA, a socit anonyme organized under the laws of France, Natus Medical Ireland Ltd., a company organized under the laws of Ireland, and Excel-Tech are Foreign Subsidiaries of Borrower.
"Foreign Subsidiary"
means generally accepted accounting principles applicable in the United States set forth in the opinions and pronouncements of the Accounting Principles Board and the American Institute of Certified Public Accountants and statements and pronouncements of the Financial Accounting Standards Board or such other principles as may be approved by a significant segment of the accounting profession in the United States, that are applicable to the circumstances as of the date of determination, consistently applied.
"GAAP"
"" means the government of the United States or any other nation, or of any political subdivision thereof, whether state or local, and any agency, authority, instrumentality, regulatory body, court, central bank or other entity exercising executive, legislative, judicial, taxing, regulatory or administrative powers or functions of or pertaining to government (including any supra-national bodies such as the European Union or the European Central Bank).
Governmental Authority
or have the meanings ascribed to such terms in Section 2.11 hereof.
"Guarantor"
"Guarantors"
or have the meanings ascribed to such terms in Section 2.11 hereof.
"Guaranty"
"Guaranties"
"" means all explosive or radioactive substances or wastes and all hazardous or toxic substances, wastes or other pollutants, including petroleum or petroleum distillates, asbestos or asbestos-containing materials, polychlorinated biphenyls, radon gas, infectious or medical wastes and all other substances or wastes of any nature regulated pursuant to any Environmental Law.
Hazardous Materials
"" has the meaning ascribed thereto in Section 9.3(b).
Indemnitees
"" means: (a) with respect to: (i) a LIBOR Loan, the last day of each Interest Period applicable thereto; that, if any such Interest Period exceeds three months, the date that falls three months after the beginning of such Interest Period shall also be an Interest Payment Date; and (ii) a Base Rate Loan, the last Business Day of each calendar month; and (b) in the case of Revolving Credit Loans, the Revolving Credit Maturity Date, and (c) in the case of Term Loan, the Term Maturity Date.
Interest Payment Date
provided
"" means, as to each LIBOR Loan, the period commencing on the date such LIBOR Loan is disbursed or converted to or continued as a LIBOR Loan and ending on the date one, two, three or six months thereafter, as selected by Borrower in its related Loan Notice;
Interest Period
 
that: (a) any Interest Period that would otherwise end on a day that is not a Business Day shall be extended to the next succeeding Business Day unless such Business Day falls in another calendar month, in which case such Interest Period shall end on the next preceding Business Day; (b) any Interest Period that begins on the last Business Day of a calendar month (or on a day for which there is no numerically corresponding day in the calendar month at the end of such Interest Period) shall end on the last Business Day of the calendar month at the end of such Interest Period; and (c) no Interest Period for: (i) any Revolving Credit Loan shall extend beyond the Revolving Credit Maturity Date; and (ii) the Term Loan shall extend beyond the Term Maturity Date.
provided
"" means, as to any Person, any direct or indirect acquisition or investment by such Person, whether by means of (a) the purchase or other acquisition of capital stock or other securities of another Person, (b) a loan, advance or capital contribution to, guarantee or assumption of debt of, or purchase or other acquisition of any other debt or equity participation or interest in, another Person, including any partnership or joint venture interest in such other Person and any arrangement pursuant to which the investor guarantees Indebtedness of such other Person, or (c) the purchase or other acquisition (in one transaction or a series of transactions) of assets of another Person that constitute a business unit. For purposes of covenant compliance, the amount of any Investment shall be the amount actually invested, without adjustment for subsequent increases or decreases in the value of such Investment.
Investment
means, as of any date of determination, for Borrower and its Subsidiaries on a consolidated basis, the ratio of: (a) Consolidated Funded Indebtedness as of such date to (b) Consolidated EBITDA for the four consecutive fiscal quarters ending on such date.
"Leverage Ratio"
means the rate per annum (rounded upward, if necessary, to the nearest whole 1/16 of 1%) and determined pursuant to the following formula:
"LIBOR"
 
means a Loan that bears interest based upon LIBOR.
"LIBOR Loan"
means the reserve percentage prescribed by the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System (or any successor) for (as defined in Regulation D of the Federal Reserve Board, as amended), adjusted by Bank for expected changes in such reserve percentage during the applicable Interest Period.
"LIBOR Reserve Percentage"
"Eurocurrency Liabilities"
"" means any Revolving Credit Loan or the Term Loan.
Loan
"" means this Agreement, the Revolving Line of Credit Note, the Term Note, the Security Agreement, the Guaranties, and each other contract, instrument and document required by or delivered to Bank in connection with this Agreement.
Loan Documents
 
"" means a notice, pursuant to Section 2.4(a), of: (a) a borrowing of Loans; (b) a conversion of Loans from one Type to the other; or (c) a continuation of LIBOR Loans; which, if in writing, shall be substantially in the form of .
Loan Notice
Exhibit C
means a material adverse effect on (i) the business operations or financial condition of Borrower and its Subsidiaries taken as a whole, (ii) the ability of Borrower to repay all debt, principal, interest, expenses and other amounts owed to Bank by Borrower pursuant to this Agreement, the Revolving Line of Credit Note, the Term Note and the other Loan Documents, or to otherwise perform its material obligations under the Loan Documents, or (iii) Borrower's interest in, or the value, perfection or priority of Bank's security interest or lien in, the collateral described in Section 2.10 hereof.
"Material Adverse Effect"
"" means any employee benefit plan of the type described in Section 4001(a)(3) of ERISA to which Borrower or any ERISA Affiliate makes or is obligated to make contributions, or during the preceding five plan years, has made or been obligated to make contributions.
Multiemployer Plan
or means one or more of the Revolving Line of Credit Note and/or the Term Note, as the context shall require.
"Note"
"Notes"
"" means all advances, debts, liabilities, obligations, covenants and duties of Borrower or any Guarantor under any Loan Document or otherwise, whether with respect to any Loan or otherwise, whether direct or indirect (including those acquired by assumption), absolute or contingent, due or to become due, now existing or hereafter arising and including interest and fees that accrue after the commencement by or against Borrower or any Guarantor or any affiliate thereof of any proceeding under any Bankruptcy Law naming such Person as the debtor in such proceeding, regardless of whether such interest and fees are allowed claims in such proceeding.
Obligations
"" means the Pension Benefit Guaranty Corporation.
PBGC
"" means any "employee pension benefit plan" (as that term is defined in Section 3(2) of ERISA), other than a Multiemployer Plan, that is subject to Title IV of ERISA and is sponsored or maintained by Borrower or any ERISA Affiliate or to which Borrower or any ERISA Affiliate contributes or has an obligation to contribute, or in the case of a multiple employer or other plan described in Section 4064(a) of ERISA, has made contributions at any time during the immediately preceding five plan years.
Pension Plan
means:
"Permitted Indebtedness"
(a) the liabilities of Borrower to Bank under this Agreement and the other Loan Documents;
(b) any other liabilities of Borrower existing as of the Closing Date and listed on ;
Schedule 1.1-A
 
(c) unsecured indebtedness to trade creditors incurred in the ordinary course of business;
(d) guaranty obligations of Borrower with respect to indebtedness of Subsidiaries of Borrower permitted under Section 7.6;
(e) indebtedness secured by Permitted Liens identified in paragraphs (d), (e), (f), (g) (but solely with respect to Permitted Liens permitted under such paragraph (g) that are related to extensions, renewals or refinancings of indebtedness secured by liens identified in paragraph (d) of the definition of Permitted Liens) and (j) of the definition of Permitted Liens; and
(f) extensions, refinancings, modifications, amendments and restatements of any items of Permitted Indebtedness identified in (a) through (d) above, that the principal amount is not increased nor the terms modified to impose more burdensome terms upon Borrower or its Subsidiaries, as the case may be.
provided
"" means:
Permitted Investments
(a) Investments by Borrower existing as of the Closing Date and listed on ;
Schedule 1.1-B
(b) Investments by Borrower in (i) marketable direct obligations issued or unconditionally guaranteed by the United States or any agency or any state thereof maturing within one year from the date of acquisition thereof, (ii) commercial paper maturing no more than one year from the date of creation thereof and currently having rating of at least A-2 or P-2 from either Standard & Poor's Corporation or Moody's Investors Service, (iii) Bank's certificates of deposit maturing no more than one year from the date of investment therein, and (iv) Bank's money market accounts;
(c) Investments by Borrower consisting of the endorsement of negotiable instruments for deposit or collection or similar transactions in the ordinary course of business of Borrower;
(d) Investments by Borrower consisting of deposit accounts in which Bank has a first priority perfected security interest;
(e) Investments, in the aggregate not to exceed $10,000,000.00, by Borrower (i) in Subsidiaries formed or acquired after the Closing Date, so long as Borrower has 100% control of such Subsidiary immediately following the effectiveness of such acquisition, and/or (ii) constituting the purchase or other acquisition (in one transaction or a series of transactions) of assets of another Person that constitute a business unit;
(f) Investments by Borrower not to exceed at any time $250,000.00 in the aggregate consisting of (i) travel advances and employee relocation loans and other employee loans and advances in the ordinary course of business, and (ii) loans to employees, officers or directors relating to the purchase of equity securities of Borrower pursuant to employee stock purchase plans or agreements approved by Borrower's board of directors;
 
(g) Investments (including debt obligations) by Borrower not to exceed $50,000.00 in the aggregate outstanding at any time received in connection with the bankruptcy or reorganization of customers or suppliers and in settlement of delinquent obligations of, and other disputes with, customers or suppliers arising in the ordinary course of business;
(h) Investments held by Borrower in conformance with Borrower's "Investment Policy," as in effect on the Closing Date, a copy of which has previously been provided to Bank; and
(i) Investments by Borrower not to exceed $50,000.00 in the aggregate outstanding at any time consisting of notes receivable of, or prepaid royalties and other credit extensions to, customers and suppliers who are not affiliates, in the ordinary course of business; that this paragraph (h) shall not apply to investments of Borrower in any Subsidiary.
provided
"" means:
Permitted Liens
(a) liens and security interests in favor of Bank created under any Loan Document;
(b) liens and security interests existing as of the Closing Date and listed on ;
Schedule 1.1-C
(c) liens for taxes, fees, assessments or other government charges or levies, either not delinquent or being contested in good faith by appropriate proceedings promptly instituted and diligently conducted and for which Borrower maintains adequate reserves in accordance with GAAP;
(d) purchase money liens not to exceed $500,000.00 in the aggregate (i) on equipment acquired or held by Borrower incurred for financing the acquisition of such equipment, or (ii) existing on equipment when acquired, if the lien is confined to the property so acquired and improvements thereon, and the proceeds of such equipment;
(e) statutory liens arising in the ordinary course of business and not overdue for a period of more than thirty days or being contested in good faith by appropriate proceedings promptly instituted and diligently conducted and for which Borrower maintains adequate reserves in accordance with GAAP, not to exceed $500,000.00 in the aggregate, securing claims or demands of materialmen, mechanics, carriers, warehousemen, landlords and other persons imposed without action of such parties;
 
(f) liens to secure payment of workers' compensation, employment insurance, old-age pensions, social security and other like obligations incurred in the ordinary course of business not delinquent or being contested in good faith by appropriate proceedings promptly instituted and diligently conducted and for which Borrower maintains adequate reserves in accordance with GAAP;
(g) liens incurred in the extension, renewal or refinancing of the indebtedness secured by liens identified in paragraphs (b) and (d) of this definition, so long as such indebtedness is Permitted Indebtedness, that any extension, renewal or replacement lien shall be limited to the property encumbered by the existing lien and the principal amount of the indebtedness being extended, renewed or refinanced does not increase;
provided
(h) leases or subleases of real property entered into as sublessee or lessee in the ordinary course of business, and leases; and subleases, non-exclusive licenses or sublicenses of property (other than real property or intellectual property) entered into as licensee or sublicensee in the ordinary course of Borrower's business;
(i) non-exclusive licenses of intellectual property entered into as licensee with third parties in the ordinary course of business; and
(j) liens in favor of financial institutions other than Bank arising in connection with Borrower's deposit and/or securities accounts held at such institutions, that (i) Bank has a first priority perfected security interest in the amounts held in such deposit and/or securities accounts (excluding liens identified in the following clause (ii)) and (ii) such liens secure Borrower's payment of normal fees and charges related to the maintenance of such deposit and/or securities accounts and not indebtedness related to credit extended by such financial institutions to Borrower.
provided
" means any natural person, corporation, limited liability company, trust, joint venture, association, company, partnership, Governmental Authority or other entity.
"Person
"" means any "employee benefit plan" (as such term is defined in Section 3(3) of ERISA) established by Borrower or, with respect to any such plan that is subject to Section 412 of the Code or Title IV of ERISA, any ERISA Affiliate.
Plan
means, as of any date of determination, for Borrower and its Subsidiaries on a consolidated basis, the ratio of: (a) the sum of (i) unrestricted cash (ii) unrestricted short-term marketable securities (iii) net accounts receivable to (b) current liabilities.
"Quick Ratio"
plus
plus
"" means any of the events set forth in Section 4043(c) of ERISA, other than events for which the thirty-day notice period has been waived.
Reportable Event
means the chief executive officer, the president, the chief financial officer, any vice president, the general counsel and/or secretary, the assistant secretary, the controller of Borrower, the director of finance of Borrower, or any other officer of Borrower having substantially the same authority and responsibility as any of the foregoing.
"Responsible Officer"
 
"" means a borrowing of a Revolving Credit Loan of a particular Type.
Revolving Credit Borrowing
"" has the meaning ascribed thereto in Section 2.1(a).
Revolving Credit Loan
"" means November 27, 2009.
Revolving Credit Maturity Date
has the meaning ascribed to such term in Section 2.1(a).
"Revolving Line of Credit"
has the meaning ascribed to such term in Section 2.1(a).
"Revolving Line of Credit Note"
has the meaning ascribed to such term in Section 9.12(b) hereof.
"Rules"
means that certain Security Agreement, dated as of November 28, 2007, executed by Borrower and each Domestic Subsidiary in favor of Bank.
"Security Agreement"
means payments made by Borrower (A) pursuant to the Asset Purchase Agreement, dated as of September 11, 2006, between the "Seller," as named therein, and Borrower, as presented to, and found to be satisfactory to, Bank, in amounts not to exceed $225,000 per year for each of the three years immediately following the date of effectiveness of such transaction, and (B) pursuant to the Stock Purchase Agreement, dated as of October 16, 2006, by and between the "Stockholders," as named therein, and Borrower, as presented to, and found to be satisfactory to, Bank, in an aggregate amount not to exceed $2,622,848 during the period commencing November 8, 2006 and ending March 22, 2010.
"Specified Earn-out Payments"
of a Person means a corporation, partnership, joint venture, limited liability company or other business entity of which a majority of the shares of securities or other interests having ordinary voting power for the election of directors or other governing body (other than securities or interests having such power only by reason of the happening of a contingency) are at the time beneficially owned, or the management of which is otherwise controlled, directly, or indirectly through one or more intermediaries, or both, by such Person. Unless otherwise specified, all references herein to a "" or to "" shall refer to a Subsidiary or Subsidiaries of Borrower.
"Subsidiary"
Subsidiary
Subsidiaries
means the monetary obligation of a Person under either: (a) a so-called synthetic, off-balance sheet or tax retention lease; or (b) an agreement for the use or possession of property creating obligations that do not appear on the balance sheet of such Person but which, upon the insolvency or bankruptcy of such Person, would be characterized as the indebtedness of such Person (without regard to accounting treatment).
"Synthetic Lease Obligation"
"" means the borrowing of the Term Loan.
Term Borrowing
has the meaning ascribed to such term in Section 2.3 hereof.
"Term Loan"
 
"" means November 27, 2010.
Term Maturity Date
has the meaning ascribed to such term in Section 2.3 hereof.
"Term Note"
has the meaning ascribed to such term in Section 8.1(d) hereof.
"Third Party Obligor"
"" means, with respect to any Loan, its character as a Base Rate Loan or a LIBOR Loan.
Type
S 1.2. C R C .
ECTION
ERTAIN
ULES
OF
ONSTRUCTION
(a) Unless the context requires otherwise, the meaning of a defined term is applicable equally to the singular and plural forms thereof.
(b) The words "," "," "" and similar words refer to this Agreement as a whole and not to any particular provision of this Agreement; and, unless otherwise specified, Article, Section, subsection, clause, Schedule and Exhibit references are to this Agreement.
hereof
herein
hereunder
(c)    (i) The term "" includes instruments, documents, agreements, certificates, indentures, notices and other writings, however evidenced.
documents
(ii) The terms "" and "" are not limiting.
include
including
(iii) In the computation of periods of time from a specified date to a later specified date, the word "" means ""; the words "" and "" each mean "" and the word "" means "."
from
from and including
to
until
to but excluding
through
to and including
(iv) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the terms "," "," "" and "" refer to both personal property (whether tangible or intangible) and real property.
property
properties
asset
assets
(d) Unless otherwise expressly provided herein: (i) references to documents (including this Agreement) shall be deemed to include all subsequent amendments and other modifications thereto, but only to the extent such amendments and other modifications are not prohibited by the terms of any Loan Document; and (ii) references to any statute or regulation are to be construed as including all statutory and regulatory provisions consolidating, amending, replacing, supplementing or interpreting the statute or regulation.
(e) Unless otherwise specified, all references herein to times of day shall be references to Pacific time (daylight or standard, as applicable).
(f) The captions and headings of this Agreement are for convenience of reference only and shall not affect the interpretation of this Agreement.
 
(g) This Agreement and the other Loan Documents may use several different limitations, tests or measurements to regulate the same or similar matters. All such limitations, tests and measurements are cumulative and shall be performed in accordance with their respective terms.
(h) This Agreement and the other Loan Documents are the result of negotiations among, and have been reviewed by counsel to, Borrower, the Guarantors and Bank and are the products of all parties. Accordingly, they shall not be construed against Bank merely because of the involvement of any or all of the preceding Persons in their preparation.
(i) Unless the context otherwise clearly requires, all accounting terms not expressly defined herein shall be construed, and all financial computations required under this Agreement shall be made, in accordance with GAAP. If at any time any change in GAAP would affect the computation of any financial ratio or requirement set forth in any Loan Document, and Bank shall so request, Bank and Borrower shall negotiate in good faith to amend such ratio or requirement to preserve the original intent thereof in light of such change in GAAP; that, until so amended: (i) such ratio or requirement shall continue to be computed in accordance with GAAP prior to such change therein; and (ii) Borrower shall provide to Bank financial statements and other documents required under this Agreement or as reasonably requested hereunder setting forth a reconciliation between calculations of such ratio or requirement made before and after giving effect to such change in GAAP.
provided
(j) References herein to "" refer to the fiscal year of Borrower.
fiscal year
(k) Any financial ratios required to be maintained by Borrower pursuant to the Loan Documents shall be calculated by dividing the appropriate component by the other component, carrying the result to one place more than the number of places by which such ratio is expressed herein and rounding the result up or down to the nearest number using the common  or symmetric arithmetic  method of rounding (in other words, rounding-up if there is no nearest number).
S 2.1. R L C.
ECTION
EVOLVING
INE
OF
REDIT
(a) Subject to the terms and conditions of this Agreement, Bank hereby agrees to make loans (each such loan, a "") to Borrower from time to time on any Business Day during the Availability Period, not to exceed at any time the aggregate principal amount of Thirteen Million Dollars ($13,000,000.00) (the ), the proceeds of which shall be used for working capital and general corporate purposes and to provide financing for Borrower's acquisition of Excel-Tech. Borrower's obligation to repay advances under the Revolving Line of Credit shall be evidenced by a promissory note dated as of November 28, 2007 (the ), in the form attached hereto as , all terms of which are incorporated herein by this reference.
Revolving Line of Credit.
Revolving Credit Loan
"Revolving Line of Credit"
"Revolving Line of Credit Note"
Exhibit A
 
(b) . Notwithstanding the principal amount set forth in Section 2.1(a) above, the maximum principal amount available under the Revolving Line of Credit shall be reduced automatically and without further notice from and after June 30, 2008 by the amount of Three Million Dollars ($3,000,000.00). If the outstanding principal balance of the Revolving Line of Credit on such date is greater than the new maximum principal amount then available hereunder, Borrower shall make a principal reduction on the Revolving Line of Credit on such date in an amount sufficient to reduce the then outstanding principal balance thereof to an amount not greater than such new maximum principal amount.
Reductions in Availability
(c) Borrower may from time to time during the Availability Period, partially or wholly repay its outstanding borrowings under the Revolving Line of Credit, and reborrow, subject to all of the limitations, terms and conditions contained herein; that, the total outstanding borrowings under the Revolving Line of Credit shall not at any time exceed the maximum principal amount available thereunder, as set forth above. On the Revolving Credit Maturity Date, Borrower shall repay to Bank in full the aggregate outstanding principal balance of all Revolving Credit Loans, together with all accrued and unpaid interest due thereon.
Borrowing and Repayment.
provided
S 2.2. I O.
ECTION
NTENTIONALLY
MITTED
S 2.3. T L . Subject to the terms and conditions of this Agreement, Bank hereby agrees to make a loan to Borrower in the principal amount of Twenty-Five Million Dollars ($25,000,000.00) (the ), the proceeds of which shall be used for working capital and general corporate purposes and to finance Borrower's acquisition of Excel-Tech. Borrower's obligation to repay the Term Loan shall be evidenced by a promissory note dated as of November 28, 2007 (the ), in the form attached hereto as , all terms of which are incorporated herein by this reference. The full amount of the Term Loan shall be advanced to Borrower on the Closing Date. On the Term Maturity Date, Borrower shall repay to Bank in full the aggregate outstanding principal balance of the Term Loan, together with all accrued and unpaid interest due thereon.
ECTION
ERM
OAN
"Term Loan"
"Term Note"
Exhibit B
S 2.4. P F B.
ECTION
ROCEDURES
OR
ORROWING
(a) Each Borrowing, each conversion of Loans from one Type to the other and each continuation of LIBOR Loans shall be made upon Borrower's irrevocable notice to Bank, which may be given by telephone or by approved electronic communications. Each such notice must be received by Bank not later than 11:00 a.m. on the requested date of any Borrowing, conversion or continuation. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained herein, any telephonic notice or other electronic communication by Borrower pursuant to this Section 2.4(a) may be given by an individual who has been authorized in writing to do so by an appropriate Responsible Officer of Borrower. Each such telephonic notice or other electronic communication must be confirmed promptly by delivery to Bank of a written Loan Notice, appropriately completed and signed by an appropriate Responsible Officer of Borrower.
 
(b) Each Borrowing of, conversion to or continuation of LIBOR Loans shall be in a principal amount of $1,000,000 or a whole multiple of $100,000 in excess thereof. Each Borrowing of or conversion to Base Rate Loans shall be in a principal amount of $1,000,000 or a whole multiple of $100,000 in excess thereof.
(c) Each Loan Notice (whether telephonic or written) shall specify: (i) whether Borrower is requesting: (A) a Revolving Credit Borrowing or the Term Borrowing; (B) a conversion of outstanding Loans from one Type to the other; or (C) a continuation of LIBOR Loans; (ii) the requested date of such Borrowing, conversion or continuation, as the case may be (which shall be a Business Day); (iii) the principal amount of the Loans to be borrowed, converted or continued; (iv) the Type of Loans to be borrowed or to which existing Loans are to be converted; and (v) if applicable, the duration of the Interest Period with respect thereto. If Borrower fails to specify a Type of Loan in a Loan Notice or if Borrower fails to give a timely notice requesting a conversion or continuation, then the applicable Loan(s) shall be made as, or converted to, Base Rate Loans. Any such automatic conversion to Base Rate Loans shall be effective as of the last day of the Interest Period then in effect with respect to the applicable LIBOR Loans. If Borrower requests a Borrowing of, conversion to, or continuation of LIBOR Loans in any such Loan Notice, but fails to specify an Interest Period, it will be deemed to have specified an Interest Period of one month.
(d) Except as otherwise provided herein, a LIBOR Loan may be continued or converted only on the last day of an Interest Period for such LIBOR Loan. During the existence of an Event of Default: (i) no Loans may be requested as, converted to or continued as LIBOR Loans without the consent of Bank; and (ii) Bank may demand that any or all of the then outstanding Revolving Credit Loans that are LIBOR Loans be converted immediately to Base Rate Loans, whereupon Borrower shall pay any amounts due under Section 3.4 in accordance with the terms thereof due to any such conversion.
(e) Bank shall promptly notify Borrower of the interest rate applicable to any Interest Period for LIBOR Loans upon determination of such interest rate.
(f) After giving effect to all Borrowings, all conversions of Loans from one Type to the other, and all continuations of Loans as the same Type, there shall not be more than: (i) five Interest Periods in effect with respect to Revolving Credit Loans; and (ii) five Interest Periods in effect with respect to the Term Loan.
S 2.5. P P P.
ECTION
RINCIPAL
AYMENTS
AND
REPAYMENTS
(a) . The outstanding principal balance of the Term Loan shall be amortized over twelve (12) quarterly periods, payable on the last day of each quarter in equal successive principal installments over such amortization term, commencing February 29, 2008 and continuing up to and including the Term Maturity Date, on which date Borrower shall pay a final installment consisting of all remaining unpaid principal under the Term Loan.
Scheduled Payments
(b) . Borrower may, upon notice to Bank, at any time or from time to time voluntarily prepay Loans in whole or in part without premium or penalty;
Voluntary Prepayments
provided
 
that: (A) such notice must be received by Bank not later than 11:00 a.m.: (1) three Business Days prior to any date of prepayment of Loans that are LIBOR Loans; and (2) one Business Day prior to the date of prepayment of Loans that are Base Rate Loans; and (B) any prepayment of any Loans that are: (1) LIBOR Loans shall be in a principal amount of $5,000,000 or a whole multiple of $1,000,000 in excess thereof, or, if less, the entire principal amount thereof then outstanding; and (2) Base Rate Loans shall be in a principal amount of $1,000,000 or a whole multiple of $1,000,000 in excess thereof, or, if less, the entire principal amount thereof then outstanding. Each such notice shall specify the date and amount of such prepayment and the Type(s) of Loans to be prepaid. If Borrower gives such notice, then Borrower's prepayment obligation shall be irrevocable, and Borrower shall make such prepayment and the payment amount specified in such notice shall be due and payable on the date specified therein. Any prepayment of a Loan that is a LIBOR Loan shall be accompanied by all accrued interest on the amount prepaid, together with any additional amounts required pursuant to Section 3.4.
(c) Application of Certain Payments.
(i) Prepayments of the Term Loan shall be applied, , to prepay any portion of the Term Loan constituting Base Rate Loans or matured LIBOR Loans, as selected by Borrower, and , to prepay any portion of the Term Loan constituting LIBOR Loans (in the order of the maturity of their Interest Periods).
first
second
(ii) Any prepayments of the Term Loan shall be applied first to the most remote principal installment or installments then unpaid.
S 2.6. I/A R.
ECTION
NTEREST
PPLICABLE
ATES
(a) Subject to the provisions of subsection Section 2.6(b): (i) each LIBOR Loan shall bear interest on the outstanding principal amount thereof for each Interest Period at a rate per annum equal to LIBOR for such Interest Period the Applicable Rate; and (ii) each Base Rate Loan shall bear interest on the outstanding principal amount thereof from the applicable borrowing date at a rate per annum equal to the Base Rate the Applicable Rate.
plus
plus
(b)    (i) If any amount of principal of any Loan is not paid when due (without regard to any applicable grace periods), whether at stated maturity, by acceleration or otherwise, such amount shall thereafter bear interest at a fluctuating interest rate per annum at all times equal to the Default Rate to the fullest extent permitted by applicable laws.
(ii) If any amount (other than principal of any Loan) payable by Borrower under any Loan Document is not paid when due (without regard to any applicable grace periods), whether at stated maturity, by acceleration or otherwise, then such amount shall thereafter bear interest at a fluctuating interest rate per annum at all times equal to the Default Rate to the fullest extent permitted by applicable laws.
(iii) While any Event of Default exists, Borrower shall pay interest on the principal amount of all outstanding Obligations hereunder at a fluctuating interest rate per annum at all times equal to the Default Rate to the fullest extent permitted by applicable laws.
 
(iv) Accrued and unpaid interest on past due amounts (including interest on past due interest) shall be due and payable upon demand.
(c) Interest on each Loan shall be due and payable in arrears on each Interest Payment Date applicable thereto and at such other times as may be specified herein. Interest hereunder shall be due and payable in accordance with the terms hereof before and after judgment, and before and after the commencement of any proceeding under any Bankruptcy Law.
(d) Any increase or decrease in any Applicable Rate resulting from a change in the Leverage Ratio shall become effective as of the first day of the month immediately following the month in which Borrower is required to deliver a Compliance Certificate in accordance with Section 6.3(d) for a given period (each such date, a ""); that the Applicable Rate in effect from the Closing Date to the first day of the month immediately following receipt by Bank of a timely delivered Compliance Certificate with respect to the fiscal quarter ending December 31, 2007 shall be determined based upon Tier 1 (as indicated in the definition of ); that, if any Compliance Certificate required to be delivered in accordance with Section 6.3(d) for any given period is not delivered to Bank on or before the related calculation date, then Tier 1 (as indicated in the definition of ) shall apply, effective on the related calculation date until two Business Days after such Compliance Certificate is actually received by Bank.
calculation date
provided
"Applicable Rate"
provided further
"Applicable Rate"
Notwithstanding the foregoing and for the avoidance of doubt, if for any period and for any reason, the actual Leverage Ratio is higher than that reported in the Compliance Certificate, Borrower shall immediately, without the requirement of notice or demand from any Person, pay to Bank an amount equal to the excess of: (A) the amount of interest or fees that would have accrued had the Applicable Rates for the relevant period been based upon the actual Leverage Ratio for the prior period rather than the Leverage Ratio reported in the Compliance Certificate delivered for such prior period; (B) the amount of interest or fees that was actually paid by Borrower based upon the Leverage Ratio reported in the Compliance Certificate delivered for such period.
over
S 2.7. F.
ECTION
EES
(a) . Borrower shall pay to Bank unused commitment fees (each, an ) equal to the Applicable Rate the average daily unused amount of the Revolving Line of Credit. Unused Commitment Fees shall accrue at all times during Prior to the Revolving Credit Maturity Date, and shall be due and payable quarterly in arrears on the last Business Day of each March, June, September and December, commencing with the first such date to occur after the Closing Date, and on the Revolving Credit Maturity Date. Unused Commitment Fees shall be calculated quarterly in arrears, and if there is any change in the Applicable Rate during any quarter, the actual daily amount shall be computed and the Applicable Rate separately for each period during such quarter that such Applicable Rate was in effect.
Unused Commitment Fee
"Unused Commitment Fee"
multiplied by
multiplied by
 
(b) . Borrower shall pay to Bank a non-refundable upfront fee for the credit facilities provided hereunder equal to $350,000. Prior to the Closing Date, Borrower made a non-refundable payment to Bank of a portion of such fee in the amount of $175,000. The remaining unpaid portion of such fee in the amount of $175,000 shall be due and payable in full on the Closing Date.
Upfront Fee
S 2.8. C I F.
ECTION
OMPUTATIONS
OF
NTEREST
AND
EES
All computations of interest for Base Rate Loans shall be made on the basis of a year of 365 or 366 days, as the case may be, and actual days elapsed. All other computations of interest and fees hereunder shall be made on the basis of a year of 360 days and actual days elapsed. Interest shall accrue on each Loan for the day on which the Loan is made, and shall not accrue on a Loan, or any portion thereof, for the day on which the Loan or such portion is paid, that any Loan that is repaid on the same day on which it is made shall bear interest for one day. Each determination by Bank of an interest rate or fee hereunder shall be conclusive and binding for all purposes, absent manifest error.
provided
S 2.9. P G; C P.
ECTION
AYMENTS
ENERALLY
OLLECTION
OF
AYMENTS
(a) . All payments to be made by Borrower shall be made without condition or deduction for any counterclaim, defense, recoupment or setoff. Except as otherwise expressly provided herein, all payments by Borrower hereunder shall be made to Bank in Dollars and in immediately available funds not later than 4:00 p.m. on the date specified herein. All payments received by Bank after 4:00 p.m. shall be deemed received on the next succeeding Business Day and any applicable interest or fee shall continue to accrue. If any payment to be made by Borrower shall come due on a day other than a Business Day, payment shall be made on the next following Business Day, and such extension of time shall be reflected in computing interest or fees, as the case may be.
General
(b) . Borrower authorizes Bank to collect all principal, interest and fees due under each credit created by the Loan Documents by charging Borrower's deposit account number 4121261853 with Bank, or any other deposit account maintained by Borrower with Bank, for the full amount thereof. Should there be insufficient funds in any such deposit account to pay all such sums when due, the full amount of such deficiency shall be immediately due and payable by Borrower.
Collection of Payments
S 2.10. C.
ECTION
OLLATERAL
As security for all indebtedness of Borrower to Bank created by the Loan Documents, Borrower hereby grants to Bank security interests of first priority (except for Permitted Liens that are senior to Bank's security interests), and shall cause each Domestic Subsidiary to grant to Bank security interests of first priority, in all of Borrower's and each such Domestic Subsidiary's personal property (including, without limitation, all of Borrower's ownership interests in Subsidiaries, accounts receivable, inventory, equipment and intellectual property now owned or hereafter acquired), but excluding interests as a lessee under real property and personal property leases and shares of voting stock of each Foreign Subsidiary that represent more than 65% of the voting stock of such Foreign Subsidiary.
 
As additional security for all indebtedness of Borrower to Bank created by the Loan Documents, Borrower shall cause each Domestic Subsidiary to grant to Bank security interests of first priority in all such Domestic Subsidiary's ownership interest in any other Domestic Subsidiary or Foreign Subsidiary, but excluding shares of voting stock of each Foreign Subsidiary that represent more than 65% of the voting stock of such Foreign Subsidiary and, with respect to each Foreign Subsidiary, subject to the time frames established in Section 6.12(b) hereof.
All of the foregoing shall be evidenced by and subject to the terms of such security agreements, financing statements, deeds or mortgages, and other documents as Bank shall reasonably require, all in form and substance satisfactory to Bank. Borrower shall reimburse Bank immediately upon demand for all costs and expenses incurred by Bank in connection with any of the foregoing security, including without limitation, filing and recording fees and costs of appraisals, audits and title insurance.
S 2.11. G . Subject to the time frames established in Section 6.12(a) hereof, all Obligations shall be guaranteed jointly and severally by each Domestic Subsidiary (each a and, collectively, the ), as evidenced by and subject to the terms of guaranties (each a and, collectively, the ) in form and substance satisfactory to Bank.
ECTION
UARANTIES
"Guarantor"
"Guarantors"
"Guaranty"
"Guaranties"
S 3.1. I.
ECTION
LLEGALITY
If Bank, in its reasonable judgment, determines that any law has made it unlawful, or that any Governmental Authority has asserted that it is unlawful, for Bank to make, maintain or fund LIBOR Loans, or to determine or charge interest rates based upon LIBOR, or any Governmental Authority has imposed material restrictions on the authority of Bank to purchase or sell, or to take deposits of, Dollars in the London interbank offered market, then, on notice thereof by Bank to Borrower, any obligation of Bank to make or continue LIBOR Loans or to convert Revolving Credit Loans that are Base Rate Loans to LIBOR Loans shall be suspended until Bank notifies Borrower that the circumstances giving rise to such determination no longer exist, which notification Bank shall give to Borrower promptly after Bank, it its reasonable judgment, makes such determination. Upon receipt of such first notice, Borrower shall, upon demand from Bank, prepay or, if applicable, convert all LIBOR Loans to Base Rate Loans, either on the last day of the Interest Period therefor, if Bank may lawfully continue to maintain such LIBOR Loans to such day, or immediately, if Bank may not lawfully continue to maintain such LIBOR Loans. Upon any such prepayment or conversion, Borrower shall also pay accrued interest on the amount so prepaid or converted and all amounts due under Section 3.4 in accordance with the terms thereof due to such prepayment or conversion.
 
S 3.2. I D R.
ECTION
NABILITY
TO
ETERMINE
ATES
If Bank determines in connection with any request for a LIBOR Loan or a conversion to or continuation thereof that (a) Dollar deposits are not being offered to banks in the London interbank offered market for the applicable amount and Interest Period of such LIBOR Loan, (b) adequate and reasonable means do not exist for determining LIBOR for any requested Interest Period with respect to a proposed LIBOR Loan, or (c) LIBOR for any requested Interest Period with respect to a proposed LIBOR Loan does not adequately and fairly reflect the cost to Bank of funding such Loan, then Bank will promptly so notify Borrower. Thereafter, the obligation of Bank to make or maintain LIBOR Loans shall be suspended until Bank revokes such notice. Upon receipt of such notice, Borrower may revoke any pending request for a Borrowing of, conversion to or continuation of LIBOR Loans or, failing that, will be deemed to have converted such request into a request for a Revolving Credit Borrowing consisting of Base Rate Loans in the amount specified therein.
S 3.3. I C.
ECTION
NCREASED
OSTS
(a) . If any Change in Law shall:
Increased Costs Generally
(i) impose, modify or deem applicable any reserve, special deposit, compulsory loan, insurance charge or similar requirement against assets of, deposits with or for the account of, or credit extended or participated in by, Bank (except any reserve requirement reflected in LIBOR);
(ii) subject Bank to any tax of any kind whatsoever with respect to this Agreement or any LIBOR Loan made by it, or change the basis of taxation of payments to Bank in respect thereof (except for taxes covered by paragraph (c) below); or
(iii) impose on Bank or the London interbank market any other condition, cost or expense affecting this Agreement or LIBOR Loans made by Bank;
and the result of any of the foregoing shall be to increase the cost to Bank of making or maintaining any LIBOR Loan (or of maintaining its obligation to make any such Loan), or to reduce the amount of any sum received or receivable by Bank hereunder (whether of principal, interest or any other amount), then, upon request of Bank, Borrower will pay to Bank such additional amount or amounts as will compensate Bank for such additional costs incurred or reduction suffered.
(b) . If Bank determines that any Change in Law affecting Bank or Bank's holding company, if any, regarding capital requirements has or would have the effect of reducing the rate of return on Bank's capital or on the capital of Bank's holding company, if any, as a consequence of this Agreement or the Loans made by Bank, to a level below that which Bank or Bank's holding company could have achieved but for such Change in Law (taking into consideration Bank's policies and the policies of Bank's holding company with respect to capital adequacy), then from time to time Borrower will pay to Bank such additional amount or amounts as will compensate Bank or Bank's holding company for any such reduction suffered.
Capital Requirements
 
(c) . Borrower shall pay to Bank immediately upon demand, in addition to any other amounts due or to become due hereunder, any and all withholdings, interest equalization taxes, stamp taxes or other taxes (except income and franchise taxes) imposed by any domestic or foreign governmental authority and related in any manner to LIBOR. In determining which of the foregoing are attributable to any LIBOR option available to Borrower hereunder, any reasonable allocation made by Bank among its operations shall be conclusive and binding upon Borrower.
Taxes
(d) . A certificate of Bank setting forth the amount or amounts necessary to compensate Bank or its holding company, as the case may be, as specified in subsection (a), (b) or (c) of this Section, as well as a reasonably detailed description of the computation of such amount and the basis for determining such amount or amounts, and delivered to Borrower shall be conclusive absent manifest error. Borrower shall pay Bank the amount shown as due on any such certificate within ten days after receipt thereof.
Certificates for Reimbursement
(e) . Failure or delay on the part of Bank to demand compensation pursuant to the foregoing provisions of this Section shall not constitute a waiver of Bank's right to demand such compensation, provided that Borrower shall not be required to compensate Bank pursuant to the foregoing provisions of this Section for any increased costs incurred or reductions suffered more than six months prior to the date that Bank notifies Borrower of the Change in Law giving rise to such increased costs or reductions and of Bank's intention to claim compensation therefor (except that, if the Change in Law giving rise to such increased costs or reductions is retroactive, then the six-month period referred to in this subsection shall be extended to include the period of retroactive effect thereof).
Delay in Requests
S 3.4. C L.
ECTION
OMPENSATION
FOR
OSSES
Upon demand of Bank from time to time, Borrower shall promptly compensate Bank for and hold Bank harmless from any loss, cost or expense incurred by it as a result of:
(a) any continuation, conversion, payment or prepayment of any Loan other than a Base Rate Loan on a day other than the last day of the Interest Period for such Loan (whether voluntary, mandatory, automatic, by reason of acceleration, or otherwise); or
(b) any failure by Borrower (for a reason other than the failure of Bank to make a Loan) to prepay, borrow, continue or convert any Loan other than a Base Rate Loan on the date or in the amount notified by Borrower;
including any loss of anticipated profits and any loss or expense arising from the liquidation or reemployment of funds obtained by it to maintain such Loan or from fees payable to terminate the deposits from which such funds were obtained. Borrower shall also pay any customary administrative fees charged by Bank in connection with the foregoing. For purposes of calculating amounts payable by Borrower to Bank under this Section 3.4, Bank shall be deemed to have funded each LIBOR Loan made by it by a matching deposit or other borrowing in the London interbank offered market for a comparable amount and for a comparable period, whether or not such LIBOR Loan was in fact so funded.
 
S 3.5. S.
ECTION
URVIVAL
All obligations of Borrower under this Article III shall survive repayment, satisfaction or discharge of all the Obligations.
Borrower makes the following representations and warranties to Bank, which representations and warranties shall survive the execution of this Agreement and shall continue in full force and effect until the full and final payment, and satisfaction and discharge, of all obligations of Borrower to Bank created by the Loan Documents.
S 4.1. L S. Borrower and each of its Subsidiaries, and each Subsidiary of a Subsidiary, is a corporation, partnership or limited liability company , duly organized and existing and in good standing under the laws of the jurisdiction of its incorporation, organization or formation, and is qualified or licensed to do business (and is in good standing as a foreign entity, if applicable) in all jurisdictions in which such qualification or licensing is required or in which the failure to so qualify or to be so licensed would reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect. All of the Subsidiaries of Borrower in existence as of the Closing Date are listed on hereto.
ECTION
EGAL
TATUS
Schedule 4.1
S 4.2. A V. This Agreement and each of the Loan Documents have been duly authorized, and upon their execution and delivery in accordance with the provisions hereof will constitute legal, valid and binding agreements and obligations of Borrower or the party which executes the same, enforceable in accordance with their respective terms.
ECTION
UTHORIZATION
AND
ALIDITY
S 4.3. N V. The execution, delivery and performance by Borrower and the Guarantors of each of the Loan Documents do not violate any provision of any law or regulation, or contravene any provision of such Person's organizational documents, or result in any breach of or default under any contract, obligation, indenture or other instrument to which any such Person is a party or may be bound which violation contravention, breach or default would individually or in the aggregate reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect.
ECTION
O
IOLATION
S 4.4. L. There are no pending, or to the best of Borrower's knowledge threatened, actions, claims, investigations, suits or proceedings by or before any governmental authority, arbitrator, court or administrative agency, against Borrower, any Subsidiary, or any Subsidiary of a Subsidiary, which would reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect, other than those disclosed on .
ECTION
ITIGATION
Schedule 4.4
S 4.5. C F S. The consolidated financial statement of Borrower dated September 30, 2007, a true copy of which has been delivered by Borrower to Bank prior to the date hereof, (a) is complete and correct and presents fairly the financial condition of Borrower, (b) discloses all liabilities of Borrower that are required to be reflected or reserved against under GAAP, whether liquidated or unliquidated, fixed or
ECTION
ORRECTNESS
OF
INANCIAL
TATEMENT
 
contingent, and (c) has been prepared in accordance with GAAP. Since the date of such financial statement there has been no material adverse change in the financial condition of Borrower, nor (exclusive of Permitted Liens) has Borrower mortgaged, pledged, granted a security interest in or otherwise encumbered any of its assets or properties except in favor of Bank or as otherwise permitted by Bank in writing.
S 4.6. I T R. Borrower has no knowledge of any pending assessments or adjustments of its income tax payable with respect to any year.
ECTION
NCOME
AX
ETURNS
S 4.7. N S. There is no agreement, indenture, contract or instrument to which Borrower is a party or by which Borrower may be bound that requires the subordination in right of payment of any of Borrower's or any Guarantor's obligations created by the Loan Documents to any other obligation of Borrower or such Guarantor.
ECTION
O
UBORDINATION
S 4.8. P, F. Borrower and each of its Subsidiaries, and each Subsidiary of a Subsidiary, possess, and will hereafter possess, all permits, consents, approvals, franchises and licenses required and rights to all trademarks, trade names, patents, and fictitious names, if any, necessary to enable it to conduct the business in which it is now engaged in compliance with applicable law.
ECTION
ERMITS
RANCHISES
S 4.9. E C. As of the Closing Date: (a) each Plan is in compliance with the applicable provisions of ERISA, the Code and other federal or state law. Each Plan which is intended to qualify under subsection 401(a) of the Code has received a favorable determination letter from the Internal Revenue Service and nothing has occurred that would cause the loss of such qualification. As of the Closing Date, Borrower and each ERISA Affiliate have made all required contributions to any Plan subject to Section 412 of the Code, and no application for a funding waiver or an extension of any amortization period pursuant to Section 412 of the Code has been made with respect to any Plan; (b) there are no pending or, to the best knowledge of Borrower, threatened claims, actions or lawsuits, or action by any Governmental Authority. As of the Closing Date, there has been no prohibited transaction or violation of the fiduciary responsibility rules with respect to any Plan; and (c) (i) no ERISA Event has occurred or is reasonably expected to occur; and (ii) no event or circumstance has occurred or exists that, if such event or circumstance had occurred or arisen after the Closing Date, would create an Event of Default under Section 8.1(j).
ECTION
RISA
OMPLIANCE
S 4.10. O O. None of Borrower or any Subsidiary (including any Subsidiary of a Subsidiary) is in default on any obligation for borrowed money, any purchase money obligation or any other material lease, commitment, contract, instrument or obligation.
ECTION
THER
BLIGATIONS
S 4.11. E M. Except as disclosed on , Borrower is in compliance in all material respects with all applicable federal or state environmental, hazardous waste, health and safety statutes, and any rules or regulations adopted pursuant thereto, which govern or affect any of Borrower's operations and/or properties, including without limitation, the Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation and Liability Act of 1980, the Superfund Amendments and Reauthorization Act of 1986, the Federal Resource Conservation and Recovery Act of 1976, and the Federal Toxic Substances Control
ECTION
NVIRONMENTAL
ATTERS
Schedule 4.11
 
Act, as any of the same may be amended, modified or supplemented from time to time. None of the operations of Borrower is the subject of any federal or state investigation evaluating whether any remedial action involving a material expenditure is needed to respond to a release of any toxic or hazardous waste or substance into the environment. Borrower has no material contingent liability in connection with any release of any toxic or hazardous waste or substance into the environment.
S 5.1. C I E C. The obligation of Bank to extend any credit contemplated by this Agreement is subject to the fulfillment to Bank's satisfaction of all of the following conditions:
ECTION
ONDITIONS
OF
NITIAL
XTENSION
OF
REDIT
(a) . All legal matters incidental to the extension of credit by Bank shall be satisfactory to Bank's counsel.
Approval of Bank Counsel
(b) . Bank shall have received, in form and substance satisfactory to Bank, each of the following, duly executed:
Documentation
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
(c) . There shall have been no material adverse change, as determined by Bank, in the financial condition or business of Borrower and its Subsidiaries, nor any material decline, as determined by Bank, in the market value of any collateral required hereunder or a substantial or material portion of the assets of Borrower.
Financial Condition
 
(d) . Borrower shall have delivered to Bank evidence of insurance coverage on all Borrower's property, in form, substance, amounts, covering risks and issued by companies satisfactory to Bank, and where required by Bank, with loss payable endorsements in favor of Bank.
Insurance
S 5.2. C E E C. The obligation of Bank to make each extension of credit requested by Borrower hereunder shall be subject to the fulfillment to Bank's satisfaction of each of the following conditions:
ECTION
ONDITIONS
OF
ACH
XTENSION
OF
REDIT
(a) . The representations and warranties contained herein and in each of the other Loan Documents shall be true on and as of the date of the signing of this Agreement and on the date of each extension of credit by Bank pursuant hereto, with the same effect as though such representations and warranties had been made on and as of each such date, and on each such date, no Event of Default as defined herein, and no condition, event or act which with the giving of notice or the passage of time or both would constitute such an Event of Default, shall have occurred and be continuing or shall exist.
Compliance
(b) . Bank shall have received all additional documents which may be required in connection with such extension of credit.
Documentation
Borrower covenants that so long as Bank remains committed to extend credit to Borrower pursuant hereto, or any liabilities (other than contingent indemnification obligations under Section 9.3) of Borrower to Bank under any of the Loan Documents remain outstanding, and until payment in full of all obligations of Borrower created by the Loan Documents, Borrower shall, and shall (except in the case of the covenants set forth in Section 6.3 and Section 6.10) cause each of its Subsidiaries (including Subsidiaries of Subsidiaries) to, unless Bank otherwise consents in writing:
S 6.1. P P. Punctually pay all principal, interest, fees or other liabilities due under any of the Loan Documents at the times and place and in the manner specified therein.
ECTION
UNCTUAL
AYMENTS
S 6.2. A R; O-T C E. Maintain adequate books and records in accordance with GAAP, and permit any representative of Bank, at any reasonable time, to inspect, audit and examine such books and records, to make copies of the same, and to inspect its properties. From time to time, as Bank shall require in the exercise of its reasonable discretion, permit Bank, or its employees, accountants, attorneys or agents, to conduct, with respect to each such Person, examinations and inspections of any collateral required hereby or any other property of Borrower or such Subsidiary, as applicable. Such examination and inspection shall be conducted during ordinary business hours and upon one Business Day's advance notice (unless an Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing, in which case no notice shall be required).
ECTION
CCOUNTING
ECORDS
NE
IME
OLLATERAL
XAMS
 
S 6.3. F S. Provide to Bank all of the following, in form and detail satisfactory to Bank:
ECTION
INANCIAL
TATEMENTS
(a) not later than 90 days after and as of the end of each fiscal year, audited annual consolidated and consolidating financial statements of Borrower examined by, and with the unqualified opinion of, independent certified public accountants selected by Borrower and acceptable to Bank, which financial statements shall include Borrower's balance sheet as of the end of such fiscal year and the related statements of Borrower's income, reconciliation of retained earnings and cash flows for the fiscal year then ended, all in reasonable detail and prepared in accordance with GAAP;
(b) promptly after the sending or filing thereof, but in no event later than 45 days after the end of each fiscal quarter of Borrower, copies of each Form 10-Q report filed by Borrower with the United States Securities and Exchange Commission or any successor agency;
(c) not later than 15 days after the beginning of each fiscal year, projected consolidated and consolidating balance sheets and income statements for each quarter of such year for Borrower, each in reasonable detail, representing Borrower's good faith projections and certified by the chief financial officer of Borrower as being Borrower's good faith projections and identical to the projections to be used by Borrower for internal planning purposes, together with a statement of underlying assumptions and such supporting schedules and information as Bank may in its discretion require;
(d) concurrently with the delivery of the financial statements referred to in subsections (a) and (b) of this Section a duly completed Compliance Certificate signed by an appropriate Responsible Officer of Borrower; and
,
(e) from time to time such other information as Bank may reasonably request.
S 6.4. C. Preserve and maintain all licenses, permits, governmental approvals, rights, privileges and franchises necessary for the conduct of its business; and comply with the provisions of all documents pursuant to which it is organized and/or which govern its continued existence and with the requirements of all laws, rules, regulations and orders of any governmental authority applicable to it and/or its business.
ECTION
OMPLIANCE
S 6.5. I. Maintain and keep in force insurance of the types and in amounts customarily carried in lines of business similar to that of such Person, including but not limited to fire, extended coverage, public liability, flood, property damage and workers' compensation, with all such insurance carried with companies and in amounts satisfactory to Bank, and deliver to Bank from time to time at Bank's request schedules setting forth all insurance then in effect.
ECTION
NSURANCE
S 6.6. F. Keep all properties useful or necessary to such Person's business in good repair and condition, and from time to time make necessary repairs, renewals and replacements thereto so that such properties shall be fully and efficiently preserved and maintained.
ECTION
ACILITIES
 
S 6.7. T O L. Pay and discharge when due any and all indebtedness, obligations, assessments and taxes, both real or personal, including without limitation federal and state income taxes and state and local property taxes and assessments, except such (a) as such Person may in good faith contest or as to which a bona fide dispute may arise, and (b) for which such Person has made provision, to Bank's satisfaction, for eventual payment thereof in the event such Person is obligated to make such payment.
ECTION
AXES
AND
THER
IABILITIES
S 6.8. L. Promptly give notice in writing to Bank of any litigation pending or threatened against Borrower or any of its Subsidiaries with a claim in excess of $250,000.00.
ECTION
ITIGATION
S 6.9. F C. Maintain Borrower's financial condition as follows using GAAP (except to the extent modified by the definitions herein):
ECTION
INANCIAL
ONDITION
(a) As of each fiscal quarter end of Borrower, Consolidated EBITDA not less than the amount set forth below:
 
(b) Commencing with Borrower's fiscal quarter ending December 31, 2007, Quick Ratio not less than: (i) as of each fiscal quarter end ending on or before September 30, 2008, 0.90 to 1.00, and (ii) as of each fiscal quarter end ending after September 30, 2008, 1.00 to 1.00.
(c) Leverage Ratio not greater than 1.50 to 1.00, measured as of each fiscal quarter end of Borrower.
S 6.10. N B. Promptly (but in no event more than five (5) business days after a Responsible Officer becomes, or should become, aware of the occurrence of each such event or matter) give written notice to Bank in reasonable detail of: (a) the occurrence of any Event of Default, or any condition, event or act which with the giving of notice or the passage of time or both would constitute an Event of Default; (b) any change in the name or the organizational structure of Borrower; (c) the occurrence and nature of any Reportable Event or Prohibited Transaction, each as defined in ERISA, or any funding deficiency with respect to any Plan; or (d) any termination or cancellation of any insurance policy which Borrower is required to maintain, or any uninsured or partially uninsured loss through liability or property damage, or through fire, theft or any other cause affecting Borrower's property in excess of an aggregate of $250,000.00.
ECTION
OTICE
TO
ANK
 
S 6.11. M A B. At all times maintain its primary depository accounts with Bank pursuant to account agreements and terms mutually acceptable to such Person and Bank.
ECTION
AINTENANCE
OF
CCOUNTS
WITH
ANK
S 6.12. S.
ECTION
UBSIDIARIES
(a) . By not later than (i) with respect to each Domestic Subsidiary in existence as of the Closing Date, the Closing Date, and (ii) with respect to each Domestic Subsidiary formed or acquired on or after the Closing Date, twenty (20) calendar days after the formation or acquisition of such Domestic Subsidiary, cause such Domestic Subsidiary to execute and deliver to Bank (X) a Guaranty in satisfaction of the requirements of Section 2.11 hereof, (Y) a security agreement in satisfaction of the requirements of Section 2.10 hereof and (Z) such other documents as Bank shall reasonably request, in form and substance satisfactory to Bank, evidencing the authority of such Domestic Subsidiary to execute and deliver such Guaranty and security agreement, and the incumbency of the Persons executing such Guaranty and security agreement on behalf of such Domestic Subsidiary.
Domestic Subsidiaries
(b) . By not later than (i) with respect to each Foreign Subsidiary (other than Excel-Tech) in existence as of the Closing Date, the Closing Date, (ii) with respect to Excel-Tech, ten (10) calendar days after the Closing Date, and (iii) with respect to each Foreign Subsidiary formed or acquired on or after the Closing Date, forty-five (45) calendar days after the formation or acquisition of such Foreign Subsidiary, execute, or cause to be executed, such further agreements, documents or instruments, or take such other actions, as Bank reasonably deems necessary in order to effectuate the pledge to Bank of security interests in Borrower's, and/or Borrower's Subsidiaries', ownership interest in such Foreign Subsidiary (such pledge exclusive of shares of voting stock of such Foreign Subsidiary that represent more than 65% of the voting stock of such Foreign Subsidiary, as described in Section 2.10 hereof), including, without limitation, (A) executing and delivering to each such Foreign Subsidiary, a notice of the pledge of Borrower's and/or Borrower's Subsidiaries' interests therein to Bank, and (B) causing such Foreign Subsidiary to execute and deliver to Bank an acknowledgment of pledge related to Borrower's and/or such Subsidiaries' pledge of its or their interest in such Foreign Subsidiary, in each case, in form in substance satisfactory to Bank.
Foreign Subsidiaries
(c) Upon the request of Bank, with respect to Borrower's ownership interests in Subsidiaries pledged to Bank as collateral under the Loan Documents, Borrower shall promptly deliver stock certificates (or other comparable certificates) for all certificated securities now or at any time constituting such collateral, duly endorsed in blank for transfer or accompanied by an appropriate assignment or assignments or an appropriate undated stock power or powers, in every case sufficient to transfer title thereto.
 
Borrower further covenants that so long as Bank remains committed to extend credit to Borrower pursuant hereto, or any liabilities (other than contingent indemnification obligations under Section 9.3) of Borrower to Bank under any of the Loan Documents remain outstanding, and until payment in full of all obligations of Borrower created by the Loan Documents, Borrower will not, and will not permit any Subsidiary (including Subsidiaries of Subsidiaries) of Borrower to, without Bank's prior written consent:
S 7.1. U F. Use any of the proceeds of any credit extended hereunder except for the purposes stated in Article II hereof.
ECTION
SE
OF
UNDS
S 7.2. C E. Make any additional investment in fixed assets in any fiscal year such that, after giving effect to such investment, the aggregate investments in fixed assets in such year made by Borrower and all Subsidiaries would exceed $5,000,000.00.
ECTION
APITAL
XPENDITURES
S 7.3. L E. Incur operating lease expense in any fiscal year such that, after giving effect to such operating lease expense, the aggregate operating lease expense incurred by Borrower and all Subsidiaries in such year is in excess of $4,000,000.00.
ECTION
EASE
XPENDITURES
S 7.4. O I. Create, incur, assume or permit to exist any indebtedness resulting from borrowings, loans or advances, whether secured or unsecured, matured or unmatured, liquidated or unliquidated, joint or several, other than Permitted Indebtedness.
ECTION
THER
NDEBTEDNESS
S 7.5. M, C, T A. Merge into or consolidate with any other entity, other than pursuant to a Permitted Investment; make any substantial change in the nature of such Person's business as conducted as of the date hereof; acquire all or substantially all of the assets of any other entity, other than pursuant to a Permitted Investment; nor sell, lease, transfer or otherwise dispose of all or a substantial or material portion of such Person's assets except in the ordinary course of its business; that Borrower or any Subsidiary may sell, lease or transfer assets to Borrower or any wholly-owned Domestic Subsidiary of Borrower that is a Guarantor.
ECTION
ERGER
ONSOLIDATION
RANSFER
OF
SSETS
provided
S 7.6. G. Guarantee or become liable in any way as surety, endorser (other than as endorser of negotiable instruments for deposit or collection in the ordinary course of business), accommodation endorser or otherwise for, nor pledge or hypothecate any assets of such Person as security for, any liabilities or obligations of any other person or entity, except any of the foregoing in favor of Bank and guaranties by Borrower of real property lease obligations of its Subsidiaries not exceeding in the aggregate $500,000.00 outstanding at any time.
ECTION
UARANTIES
S 7.7. L, A, I. Make any loans or advances to or investments in any person or entity, other than Permitted Investments; that, so long as no Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing, Borrower shall not be prohibited from making Specified Earn-out Payments.
ECTION
OANS
DVANCES
NVESTMENTS
provided
 
S 7.8. D, D. Declare or pay any dividend or distribution either in cash, stock or any other property on such Person's stock now or hereafter outstanding, nor redeem, retire, repurchase or otherwise acquire any shares of any class of such Person's stock now or hereafter outstanding; that each Subsidiary may declare or pay dividends or distributions to Borrower or any wholly-owned Domestic Subsidiary of Borrower that is a Guarantor.
ECTION
IVIDENDS
ISTRIBUTIONS
provided
S 7.9. P A. Mortgage, pledge, grant or permit to exist a security interest in, or lien upon, all or any portion of such Person's assets now owned or hereafter acquired, other than Permitted Liens.
ECTION
LEDGE
OF
SSETS
S 7.10. S L. Enter into any arrangement, directly or indirectly, with any other Person whereby Borrower or such Subsidiary, as applicable, shall sell or transfer any real or personal property, whether now owned or hereafter acquired, and then or thereafter rent or lease as lessee such property or any part thereof or any other property which Borrower or such Subsidiary, as applicable, intends to use for substantially the same purpose or purposes as the property being sold or transferred.
ECTION
ALE
AND
EASEBACKS
S 7.11. T A. Enter into any transaction of any kind with any affiliate of Borrower, irrespective of whether in the ordinary course of business, other than on fair and reasonable terms substantially as favorable to Borrower or a Subsidiary of Borrower as would be obtainable by such Person at the time in a comparable arm's-length transaction with a Person other than an affiliate, that the foregoing restriction shall not apply to transactions between or among Borrower and any Guarantor or between or among Guarantors.
ECTION
RANSACTIONS
WITH
FFILIATES
provided
S 8.1. E D. The occurrence of any of the following shall constitute an under this Agreement:
ECTION
VENTS
OF
EFAULT
"Event of Default"
(a) Borrower shall fail to pay when due any principal, interest, fees or other amounts payable under any of the Loan Documents; or
(b) Any financial statement or certificate furnished to Bank in connection with, or any representation or warranty made by Borrower, any Subsidiary or any other party under this Agreement or any other Loan Document, shall prove to be incorrect, false or misleading in any material respect when furnished or made; or
(c) Any default in the performance of or compliance with any obligation, agreement or other provision contained herein or in any other Loan Document (other than those referred to in subsections (a) and (b) above), and with respect to any such default which by its nature can be cured, such default shall continue for a period of twenty (20) days from the date Borrower receives notice thereof or any Responsible Officer of Borrower becomes aware thereof; that if the default cannot by its nature be cured within the twenty (20) day period or cannot after
provided
 
diligent attempts by Borrower be cured within such twenty (20) day period, and such default is likely to be cured within a reasonable time, then Borrower shall have an additional reasonable period (which shall not in any case exceed twenty (20) days) to attempt to cure such default; that during such additional reasonable time period the failure to have cured such default shall not be deemed an Event of Default, however, no further advances under the Revolving Line of Credit will be made; or
provided, further,
(d) Any default in the payment or performance of any material obligation, or any defined event of default, under the terms of any contract or instrument (other than any of the Loan Documents) pursuant to which Borrower, any Subsidiary of Borrower or any general partner or joint venturer in any Borrower or Subsidiary of Borrower which is a partnership or joint venture (with each such Subsidiary, general partner and/or joint venturer referred to herein as a ) has incurred any debt or other material liability to any person or entity, including Bank, and such default or event shall continue for a period of time without cure sufficient to permit the acceleration of the maturity of any such indebtedness or the enforcement of remedies with respect to such liability; or
"Third Party Obligor"
(e) The filing of a notice of judgment lien against Borrower or any Third Party Obligor; or the recording of any abstract of judgment against Borrower or any Third Party Obligor in any county in which Borrower or such Third Party Obligor has an interest in real property; or the service of a notice of levy and/or of a writ of attachment or execution, or other like process, against the assets of Borrower or any Third Party Obligor; or the entry of a judgment against Borrower or any Third Party Obligor; and, in any such case, the same shall remain unsatisfied, unvacated and unstayed pending appeal for a period of twenty (20) days after the entry thereof; or
(f) Borrower or any Third Party Obligor shall become insolvent, or shall suffer or consent to or apply for the appointment of a receiver, trustee, custodian or liquidator of itself or any of its property, or shall generally fail to pay its debts as they become due, or shall make a general assignment for the benefit of creditors; Borrower or any Third Party Obligor shall file a voluntary petition in bankruptcy, or seeking reorganization, in order to effect a plan or other arrangement with creditors or any other relief under the Bankruptcy Code, or under any state or federal law granting relief to debtors, whether now or hereafter in effect; or any involuntary petition or proceeding pursuant to the Bankruptcy Code or any other applicable state or federal law relating to bankruptcy, reorganization or other relief for debtors is filed or commenced against Borrower or any Third Party Obligor and is not dismissed within 45 days after its filing, or Borrower or any Third Party Obligor shall file an answer admitting the jurisdiction of the court and the material allegations of any involuntary petition; or Borrower or any Third Party Obligor shall be adjudicated a bankrupt, or an order for relief shall be entered against Borrower or any Third Party Obligor by any court of competent jurisdiction under the Bankruptcy Code or any other applicable state or federal law relating to bankruptcy, reorganization or other relief for debtors; or
(g) There shall exist or occur any event or condition which Bank in good faith believes would reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect; or
 
(h) The dissolution or liquidation of any Borrower or Third Party Obligor which is a corporation, partnership, joint venture or other type of entity; or Borrower or any such Third Party Obligor, or any of its directors, stockholders or members, shall take action seeking to effect the dissolution or liquidation of such Borrower or Third Party Obligor; or
(i) There shall exist a material deficiency in any collateral required hereunder, as identified by Bank pursuant to one or more of the collateral examinations and inspections referenced in Section 6.2 hereof; or
(j) (i) An ERISA Event occurs with respect to a Pension Plan or Multiemployer Plan which has resulted or could reasonably be expected to result in liability of Borrower under Title IV of ERISA to the Pension Plan, Multiemployer Plan or the PBGC in an aggregate amount in excess of $1,000,000; or (ii) Borrower or any ERISA Affiliate fails to pay when due, after the expiration of any applicable grace period, any installment payment with respect to its withdrawal liability under Section 4201 of ERISA under a Multiemployer Plan in an aggregate amount in excess of $1,000,000; or
(k) Any Loan Document or any provision thereof, at any time after its execution and delivery and for any reason other than as expressly permitted hereunder or thereunder or satisfaction in full of all the Obligations, ceases to be in full force and effect; or Borrower or any Subsidiary contests in any manner the validity or enforceability of any Loan Document or any provision thereof; or Borrower or any Subsidiary denies that it has any or further liability or obligation under any Loan Document, or purports to revoke, terminate or rescind any Loan Document or any provision thereof; or
(l) There occurs a Change of Control.
S 8.2. R. Upon the occurrence of any Event of Default: (a) all indebtedness of Borrower under each of the Loan Documents, any term thereof to the contrary notwithstanding, shall at Bank's option and without notice become immediately due and payable without presentment, demand, protest or notice of dishonor, all of which are hereby expressly waived by each Borrower; (b) the obligation, if any, of Bank to extend any further credit under any of the Loan Documents shall immediately cease and terminate; and (c) Bank shall have all rights, powers and remedies available under each of the Loan Documents, or accorded by law, including without limitation the right to resort to any or all security for any credit created by the Loan Documents and to exercise any or all of the rights of a beneficiary or secured party pursuant to applicable law. All rights, powers and remedies of Bank may be exercised at any time by Bank and from time to time after the occurrence of an Event of Default, are cumulative and not exclusive, and shall be in addition to any other rights, powers or remedies provided by law or equity.
ECTION
EMEDIES
S 9.1. N W. No delay, failure or discontinuance of Bank in exercising any right, power or remedy under any of the Loan Documents shall affect or operate as a waiver of
ECTION
O
AIVER
 
such right, power or remedy; nor shall any single or partial exercise of any such right, power or remedy preclude, waive or otherwise affect any other or further exercise thereof or the exercise of any other right, power or remedy. Any waiver, permit, consent or approval of any kind by Bank of any breach of or default under any of the Loan Documents must be in writing and shall be effective only to the extent set forth in such writing.
S 9.2. N. All notices, requests and demands which any party is required or may desire to give to any other party under any provision of this Agreement must be in writing delivered to each party at the following address:
ECTION
OTICES
 
or to such other address as any party may designate by written notice to all other parties. Each such notice, request and demand shall be deemed given or made as follows: (a) if sent by hand delivery, upon delivery; (b) if sent by mail, upon the earlier of the date of receipt or three (3) days after deposit in the U.S. mail, first class and postage prepaid; and (c) if sent by telecopy, upon receipt.
S 9.3. E; I; D W.
ECTION
XPENSES
NDEMNITY
AMAGE
AIVER
(a) Borrower shall pay to Bank immediately upon demand the full amount of all payments, advances, charges, costs and expenses, including reasonable attorneys' fees (to include outside counsel fees and all allocated costs of Bank's in-house counsel), expended or incurred by Bank in connection with (i) the negotiation and preparation of this Agreement and the other Loan Documents, Bank's continued administration hereof and thereof, and the preparation of any amendments and waivers hereto and thereto, (ii) the enforcement of Bank's rights and/or the collection of any amounts which become due to Bank under any of the Loan Documents, and (iii) the prosecution or defense of any action in any way related to any of the Loan Documents, including without limitation, any action for declaratory relief, whether incurred at the trial or appellate level, in an arbitration proceeding or otherwise, and including any of the foregoing incurred in connection with any bankruptcy proceeding (including without limitation, any adversary proceeding, contested matter or motion brought by Bank or any other person) relating to any Borrower or any other person or entity.
(b) Borrower shall indemnify Bank and Bank's affiliates and the partners, members, directors, officers, employees, agents and advisors of Bank and Bank's affiliates (each such Person being called an "") against, and hold each Indemnitee harmless from, any and all losses, claims, damages, liabilities and related expenses (including the fees, charges and
Indemnitee
 
disbursements of any counsel for any Indemnitee), and shall indemnify and hold harmless each Indemnitee from all fees and time charges and disbursements for attorneys, who may be employees of any Indemnitee, incurred by any Indemnitee or asserted against any Indemnitee by any third party or by Borrower or any Guarantor, or any Subsidiary of Borrower or any Guarantor, arising out of, in connection with, or as a result of: (i) the execution or delivery of this Agreement, any other Loan Document or any document contemplated hereby or thereby, the performance by the parties hereto of their respective obligations hereunder or thereunder or the consummation of the transactions contemplated hereby or thereby; (ii) any Loan or the use or proposed use of the proceeds therefrom; (iii) any actual or alleged presence or release of Hazardous Materials on or from any property owned or operated by Borrower, any Guarantor or any Subsidiary of Borrower or any Guarantor, or any Environmental Claim or Environmental Liability related in any way to Borrower, any Guarantor or any Subsidiary of Borrower or any Guarantor; or (iv) any actual or prospective claim, litigation, investigation or proceeding relating to any of the foregoing, whether based on contract, tort or any other theory, whether brought by a third party or by Borrower, any Guarantor or any Subsidiary of Borrower or any Guarantor, and regardless of whether any Indemnitee is a party thereto, in all cases, whether or not caused by or arising, in whole or in part, out of the comparative, contributory or sole negligence of the Indemnitee; that such indemnity shall not, as to any Indemnitee, be available to the extent that such losses, claims, damages, liabilities or related expenses result from the gross negligence or willful misconduct of such Indemnitee.
provided
(c) To the fullest extent permitted by applicable law, Borrower shall not assert, and hereby waives, any claim against any Indemnitee, on any theory of liability, for special, indirect, consequential or punitive damages (as opposed to direct or actual damages) arising out of, in connection with, or as a result of, this Agreement, any other Loan Document or any document contemplated hereby, the transactions contemplated hereby or thereby, any Loan or the use of the proceeds thereof. No Indemnitee referred to in Section 9.3(b) shall be liable for any damages arising from the use by unintended recipients of any information or other materials distributed by it through telecommunications, electronic or other information transmission systems in connection with this Agreement or the other Loan Documents or the transactions contemplated hereby or thereby.
(d) The agreements in this Section 9.3 shall survive the termination of Bank's commitment to make Loans and the repayment, satisfaction or discharge of all other Obligations.
S 9.4. S, A. This Agreement shall be binding upon and inure to the benefit of the heirs, executors, administrators, legal representatives, successors and assigns of the parties; that Borrower may not assign or transfer its interest hereunder without Bank's prior written consent. Bank reserves the right to sell, assign, transfer, negotiate or grant participations in all or any part of, or any interest in, Bank's rights and benefits under each of the Loan Documents.
ECTION
UCCESSORS
SSIGNMENT
provided
S 9.5. C. The Confidential Information will be used by Bank solely for the purpose of evaluating Borrower's credit request and/or Bank's ongoing credit accommodations to Borrower. Bank will keep all the Confidential Information confidential, and will not disclose any of the Confidential Information to any person or entity, except disclosures:
ECTION
ONFIDENTIALITY
 
(a) to federal and state bank examiners, and other regulatory officials having jurisdictions over Bank; (b) to Bank's legal counsel and auditors; (c) to other professional advisors to Bank; (d) to Bank's representatives (which shall include, without limitation, all other banks and companies affiliated with Wells Fargo & Company) who need to know the Confidential Information for the purpose of evaluating Borrower's credit request and/or Bank's ongoing credit accommodations to Borrower, it being expressly understood and agreed that such representatives shall be informed of the confidential nature of the Confidential Information, and shall be required by Bank to treat the Confidential Information as confidential in accordance with the terms and conditions hereof; (e) as otherwise required by law or legal process; or (f) as otherwise authorized by Borrower in writing. In the event that Bank or any of its representatives becomes legally compelled to disclose any of the Confidential Information pursuant to clause (e) of the preceding sentence, then Bank, except as otherwise required by law, will provide notice thereof to Borrower so that Borrower, at its sole option (but without obligation to do so), may attempt to seek a protective order or other appropriate remedy and/or waive compliance with the provisions of this Agreement. The confidentiality requirement set forth herein shall not extend to any portion of the Confidential Information that: (x) is or becomes generally available to the public other than as a result of a disclosure by Bank or its representatives; (y) is or becomes available to Bank on a non-confidential basis by Borrower or any officer, employee, agent or representative of Borrower prior to its disclosure by Bank; or (z) is or becomes available to Bank on a non-confidential basis from a source other than Borrower.
S 9.6. E A; A. This Agreement and the other Loan Documents constitute the entire agreement between Borrower and Bank with respect to each credit created by the Loan Documents and supersede all prior negotiations, communications, discussions and correspondence concerning the subject matter hereof. This Agreement may be amended or modified only in writing signed by each party hereto.
ECTION
NTIRE
GREEMENT
MENDMENT
S 9.7. N T P B. This Agreement is made and entered into for the sole protection and benefit of the parties hereto and their respective permitted successors and assigns, and no other person or entity shall be a third party beneficiary of, or have any direct or indirect cause of action or claim in connection with, this Agreement or any other of the Loan Documents to which it is not a party.
ECTION
O
HIRD
ARTY
ENEFICIARIES
S 9.8. T. Time is of the essence of each and every provision of this Agreement and each other of the Loan Documents.
ECTION
IME
S 9.9. S P. If any provision of this Agreement shall be prohibited by or invalid under applicable law, such provision shall be ineffective only to the extent of such prohibition or invalidity without invalidating the remainder of such provision or any remaining provisions of this Agreement.
ECTION
EVERABILITY
OF
ROVISIONS
S 9.10. C. This Agreement may be executed in any number of counterparts, each of which when executed and delivered shall be deemed to be an original, and all of which when taken together shall constitute one and the same Agreement.
ECTION
OUNTERPARTS
 
S 9.11. G L. This Agreement shall be governed by and construed in accordance with the laws of the State of California.
ECTION
OVERNING
AW
S 9.12. A.
ECTION
RBITRATION
(a) . The parties hereto agree, upon demand by any party, to submit to binding arbitration all claims, disputes and controversies between or among them (and their respective employees, officers, directors, attorneys, and other agents), whether in tort, contract or otherwise in any way arising out of or relating to (i) any credit subject hereto, or any of the Loan Documents, and their negotiation, execution, collateralization, administration, repayment, modification, extension, substitution, formation, inducement, enforcement, default or termination; or (ii) requests for additional credit.
Arbitration
(b) . Any arbitration proceeding will (i) proceed in a location in California selected by the American Arbitration Association (); (ii) be governed by the Federal Arbitration Act (Title 9 of the United States Code), notwithstanding any conflicting choice of law provision in any of the documents between the parties; and (iii) be conducted by the AAA, or such other administrator as the parties shall mutually agree upon, in accordance with the AAA's commercial dispute resolution procedures, unless the claim or counterclaim is at least $1,000,000.00 exclusive of claimed interest, arbitration fees and costs in which case the arbitration shall be conducted in accordance with the AAA's optional procedures for large, complex commercial disputes (the commercial dispute resolution procedures or the optional procedures for large, complex commercial disputes to be referred to herein, as applicable, as the ). If there is any inconsistency between the terms hereof and the Rules, the terms and procedures set forth herein shall control. Any party who fails or refuses to submit to arbitration following a demand by any other party shall bear all costs and expenses incurred by such other party in compelling arbitration of any dispute. Nothing contained herein shall be deemed to be a waiver by any party that is a bank of the protections afforded to it under 12 U.S.C. 91 or any similar applicable state law.
Governing Rules
"AAA"
"Rules"
(c) . The arbitration requirement does not limit the right of any party to (i) foreclose against real or personal property collateral; (ii) exercise self-help remedies relating to collateral or proceeds of collateral such as setoff or repossession; or (iii) obtain provisional or ancillary remedies such as replevin, injunctive relief, attachment or the appointment of a receiver, before during or after the pendency of any arbitration proceeding. This exclusion does not constitute a waiver of the right or obligation of any party to submit any dispute to arbitration or reference hereunder, including those arising from the exercise of the actions detailed in sections (i), (ii) and (iii) of this paragraph.
No Waiver of Provisional Remedies, Self-Help and Foreclosure
(d) . Any arbitration proceeding in which the amount in controversy is $5,000,000.00 or less will be decided by a single arbitrator selected according to the Rules, and who shall not render an award of greater than $5,000,000.00. Any dispute in which the amount in controversy exceeds $5,000,000.00 shall be decided by majority vote of a panel of three arbitrators; that all three arbitrators must actively participate in all hearings and deliberations. The arbitrator will be a neutral attorney licensed in
Arbitrator Qualifications and Powers
provided, however,
 
the State of California or a neutral retired judge of the state or federal judiciary of California, in either case with a minimum of ten years experience in the substantive law applicable to the subject matter of the dispute to be arbitrated. The arbitrator will determine whether or not an issue is arbitratable and will give effect to the statutes of limitation in determining any claim. In any arbitration proceeding the arbitrator will decide (by documents only or with a hearing at the arbitrator's discretion) any pre-hearing motions which are similar to motions to dismiss for failure to state a claim or motions for summary adjudication. The arbitrator shall resolve all disputes in accordance with the substantive law of California and may grant any remedy or relief that a court of such state could order or grant within the scope hereof and such ancillary relief as is necessary to make effective any award. The arbitrator shall also have the power to award recovery of all costs and fees, to impose sanctions and to take such other action as the arbitrator deems necessary to the same extent a judge could pursuant to the Federal Rules of Civil Procedure, the California Rules of Civil Procedure or other applicable law. Judgment upon the award rendered by the arbitrator may be entered in any court having jurisdiction. The institution and maintenance of an action for judicial relief or pursuit of a provisional or ancillary remedy shall not constitute a waiver of the right of any party, including the plaintiff, to submit the controversy or claim to arbitration if any other party contests such action for judicial relief.
(e) . In any arbitration proceeding discovery will be permitted in accordance with the Rules. All discovery shall be expressly limited to matters directly relevant to the dispute being arbitrated and must be completed no later than 20 days before the hearing date. Any requests for an extension of the discovery periods, or any discovery disputes, will be subject to final determination by the arbitrator upon a showing that the request for discovery is essential for the party's presentation and that no alternative means for obtaining information is available.
Discovery
(f) . No party hereto shall be entitled to join or consolidate disputes by or against others in any arbitration, except parties who have executed any Loan Document, or to include in any arbitration any dispute as a representative or member of a class, or to act in any arbitration in the interest of the general public or in a private attorney general capacity.
Class Proceedings and Consolidations
(g) . The arbitrator shall award all costs and expenses of the arbitration proceeding.
Payment Of Arbitration Costs And Fees
(h) . Notwithstanding anything herein to the contrary, no dispute shall be submitted to arbitration if the dispute concerns indebtedness secured directly or indirectly, in whole or in part, by any real property unless (i) the holder of the mortgage, lien or security interest specifically elects in writing to proceed with the arbitration, or (ii) all parties to the arbitration waive any rights or benefits that might accrue to them by virtue of the single action rule statute of California, thereby agreeing that all indebtedness and obligations of the parties, and all mortgages, liens and security interests securing such indebtedness and obligations, shall remain fully valid and enforceable. If any such dispute is not submitted to arbitration, the dispute shall be referred to a referee in accordance with California Code of Civil Procedure Section 638 et seq., and this general reference agreement is intended to be specifically enforceable in accordance with said Section 638. A referee with the qualifications required herein for arbitrators shall be selected pursuant to the AAA's selection procedures. Judgment upon the decision rendered by a referee shall be entered in the court in which such proceeding was commenced in accordance with California Code of Civil Procedure Sections 644 and 645.
Real Property Collateral; Judicial Reference
 
(i) . To the maximum extent practicable, the AAA, the arbitrators and the parties shall take all action required to conclude any arbitration proceeding within 180 days of the filing of the dispute with the AAA. No arbitrator or other party to an arbitration proceeding may disclose the existence, content or results thereof, except for disclosures of information by a party required in the ordinary course of its business or by applicable law or regulation. If more than one agreement for arbitration by or between the parties potentially applies to a dispute, the arbitration provision most directly related to the Loan Documents or the subject matter of the dispute shall control. This arbitration provision shall survive termination, amendment or expiration of any of the Loan Documents or any relationship between the parties.
Miscellaneous
(j) . Notwithstanding anything herein to the contrary, each party retains the right to pursue in Small Claims Court any dispute within that court's jurisdiction. Further, this arbitration provision shall apply only to disputes in which either party seeks to recover an amount of money (excluding attorneys' fees and costs) that exceeds the jurisdictional limit of the Small Claims Court.
Small Claims Court
S 9.13. N N . This Agreement amends and restates the Existing Agreement in its entirety, effective as of the Closing Date, and is not intended to constitute a novation of the obligations thereunder. Nothing contained herein shall terminate any security interests, liens, guaranties or subordinations in favor of Bank and all such security interests, guaranties and subordinations shall continue in full force and effect.
ECTION
O
OVATION
S 9.14. T A . This Agreement shall terminate (other than with respect to contingent indemnification obligations under Section 9.3) when all monetary Obligations (including, without limitation, the repayment of all Loans) have been satisfied in full and Bank has no further commitment to make credit extensions or accommodations under this Agreement.
ECTION
ERMINATION
OF
GREEMENT
 
I W W, the parties hereto have caused this Amended and Restated Credit Agreement to be executed as of the day and year first written above.
N
ITNESS
HEREOF
 

E 10.2
XHIBIT
T S A (this "") is entered into as of November 28, 2007, by N M I, a Delaware corporation ("" or the ""), in favor of W F B, N A ("").
HIS
ECURITY
GREEMENT
Agreement
ATUS
EDICAL
NCORPORATED
Debtor
Company
ELLS
ARGO
ANK
ATIONAL
SSOCIATION
Secured Party
A. The Company has requested that Secured Party provide the Company with certain financial accommodations as evidenced by one or more promissory notes or other instruments executed and delivered by the Company to Secured Party and other agreements entered into from time to time between the Company and Secured Party, including, without limitation, that certain Amended and Restated Credit Agreement, dated as of the date hereof (the ) (together with this Agreement, the Revolving Line of Credit Note, in the original amount of U.S. $13,000,000.00, executed by the Company in favor of Secured Party, the Term Note, in the original amount of U.S. $25,000,000.00, executed by the Company in favor of Secured Party, and any and all documents or agreements executed by Debtor in connection with any of foregoing, as any of them may be amended, modified or extended from time to time, collectively, the ".
"Loan Agreement"
Loan Documents")
B. In order to induce Secured Party to provide financial accommodations to the Company under the Loan Agreement and to enter into the Loan Documents to which it is a party, the Debtor wishes and has agreed to secure its obligations to Secured Party under Loan Documents by granting to Secured Party a first priority security interest in the Collateral (as defined below).
C. All capitalized terms used but not otherwise defined herein shall have the meanings assigned to them in the Loan Agreement.
NOW, THEREFORE, in consideration of the premises and the mutual covenants and conditions contained herein, and for other good and valuable consideration, the receipt and sufficiency of which are hereby specifically acknowledged, Secured Party and Debtor agree as follows:
1. G S I. To secure the prompt and complete payment, observance and performance of each covenant, condition or obligation of whatsoever nature to be performed or observed by the Company under the Loan Documents, including repayment of all future loans extended by and reimbursement obligations owing to Secured Party (the ""), the Company hereby grants Secured Party a first priority security interest (except for Permitted Liens that are senior to Bank's security interest) in and to all assets of the Company whether now existing or hereafter arising or acquired, including without limitation the following (collectively, the ""):
RANT
OF
ECURITY
NTEREST
Secured Obligations
Collateral
(a) all accounts, deposit accounts, contract rights, chattel paper, (whether electronic or tangible) instruments, promissory notes, documents, general intangibles, payment intangibles, software, letter of credit rights, health-care insurance receivables and other rights to payment of every kind now existing or at any time hereafter arising;
(b) all inventory, goods held for sale or lease or to be furnished under contracts for service, or goods so leased or furnished, raw materials, component parts, work in process and other materials used or consumed in Debtor's business, now or at any time hereafter owned or acquired by Debtor, wherever located, and all products thereof, whether in the possession of Debtor, any warehousemen, any bailee or any other person, or in process of delivery, and whether located at Debtor's places of business or elsewhere;
(c) all warehouse receipts, bills of sale, bills of lading and other documents of every kind (whether or not negotiable) in which Debtor now has or at any time hereafter acquires any interest, and all additions and accessions thereto, whether in the possession or custody of Debtor, any bailee or any other person for any purpose;
(d) all money and property heretofore, now or hereafter delivered to or deposited with Secured Party or otherwise coming into the possession, custody or control of Secured Party (or any agent or bailee of Secured Party) in any manner or for any purpose whatsoever during the existence of this Agreement and whether held in a general or special account or deposit for safekeeping or otherwise;
(e) all right, title and interest of Debtor under licenses, guaranties, warranties, management agreements, marketing or sales agreements, escrow contracts, indemnity agreements, insurance policies, service or maintenance agreements, supporting obligations and other similar contracts of every kind in which Debtor now has or at any time hereafter shall have an interest;
(f) all goods, tools, machinery, furnishings, furniture and other equipment and fixtures of every kind now existing or hereafter acquired, and all improvements, replacements, accessions and additions thereto and embedded software included therein, whether located on any property owned or leased by Debtor or elsewhere, including without limitation, any of the foregoing now or at any time hereafter located at or installed on the land or in the improvements at any of the real property owned or leased by Debtor, and all such goods after they have been severed and removed from any of said real property;
(g) all motor vehicles, trailers, mobile homes, manufactured homes, boats, other rolling stock and related equipment of every kind now existing or hereafter acquired and all additions and accessories thereto, whether located on any property owned or leased by Debtor or elsewhere;
(h) all of the following (collectively, ""):
Intellectual Property Collateral
(i) all patents and patent applications and all patent rights with respect thereto throughout the world, including without limitation all license royalties, foreign filing rights, and rights to extend such patents and patent rights, and all rights in all patentable inventions, and to file applications for patent under federal patent law or under the laws or regulations of any foreign country (collectively, the "");
Patents
 
(ii) all copyrights (whether or not registered with the United States Copyright Office), and all applications for copyright registration (including without limitation, applications for copyright registrations of derivative works and compilations), all license royalties, foreign filing rights, and extension rights (collectively, the "");
Copyrights
(iii) all trademarks and rights and interests which are capable of being protected as trademarks (including without limitation trademarks, service marks, designs, logos, indicia, tradenames, corporate names, company names, business names, fictitious business names, trade styles, and other source or business identifiers, and the goodwill related thereto and represented thereby, and applications pertaining thereto, and all rights to register trademark claims under any state or federal trademark law or regulation of any foreign country, and to apply for, renew, and extend trademark registrations and trademark rights (collectively, "" );
Trademarks
(iv) all computer programs, software, source codes, object codes, data bases, processes and trade secrets and all other intellectual property in which Debtor now has or hereafter creates or acquires any interest; and
(v) all applications for any of the foregoing and all licenses with respect to any of the foregoing;
(i) all commercial tort claims in existence on the date of this Agreement or at any time hereafter arising and identified by the Debtor to Secured Party;
together with whatever is receivable or received when any of the foregoing or the proceeds thereof are sold, leased, collected, exchanged or otherwise disposed of, whether such disposition is voluntary or involuntary, including without limitation, all rights to payment, including returned premiums, with respect to any insurance relating to any of the foregoing, any infringement claims or causes of action and all rights to payment with respect to any claim or cause of action affecting or relating to any of the foregoing.
Notwithstanding the foregoing, the Collateral shall not include: (a) interests as a lessee under real property and personal property leases, (b) more than 65% of the voting securities of any Foreign Subsidiary of Debtor; or (c) equipment and related software encumbered by a Permitted Lien covered by paragraph (d) of the definition of Permitted Liens, and any rights of Debtor as licensee, to the extent the granting of a security interest in such equipment or license rights (A) is prohibited by the terms of or would constitute a default under any agreement or document governing such equipment or license right (but only to the extent such prohibition is enforceable under applicable law), or (B) is contrary to applicable law; that, upon the cessation of any such restriction or prohibition, such equipment and/or license rights shall automatically become part of the Collateral; and that the provisions of this Section 1 shall in no case exclude from the definition of Collateral any accounts receivables, other rights to payment, general intangibles or proceeds of the disposition of any property. Except as disclosed to Secured Party in writing prior to the date hereof, Debtor represents and warrants to Secured Party that it is not presently a party to, nor is it bound by, any material
provided
provided further
 
license, contract or agreement which prohibits Debtor from granting a security interest therein (to the extent such prohibition is enforceable under applicable law). Debtor shall not, hereafter, without Secured Party's prior written consent, enter into any material license which prohibits Debtor from granting a security interest therein to Secured Party (to the extent such prohibition is enforceable under applicable law), unless Debtor uses commercially reasonable efforts to have such prohibition removed, and in the event Debtor is not successful in having such prohibition removed, Debtor shall give prompt written notice thereof to Secured Party.
Debtor agrees that this Agreement shall create a continuing security interest in the Collateral which shall remain in effect until the payment and performance in full of all of the Secured Obligations.
2. D' R, W C. Debtor represents, warrants and covenants as follows:
EBTOR
S
EPRESENTATIONS
ARRANTIES
AND
OVENANTS
(a) . Debtor has rights in and good title to all of the Collateral. Other than any of the Intellectual Property Collateral for which Debtor is a licensee, Debtor is and will continue to be the sole and exclusive owner of the Collateral, free and clear of all security interests, liens or encumbrances or other rights or claims of third parties (""), other than Permitted Liens. For any of the Intellectual Property Collateral for which Debtor is a licensee, each such license or licensing agreement is in full force and effect and Debtor is not in default of any of its material obligations thereunder.
Permitted Liens
Liens
(b) . Debtor is a registered organization (as that term is used in Division 9 of the Uniform Commercial Code (the "")) under the laws of the State of Delaware. Debtor will notify Secured Party prior to changing either its form or jurisdiction of organization.
Organization
UCC
(c) . Set forth in (i)  is a true and complete list of all registered Copyrights and applications for registrations of Copyrights in which as of the date hereof Debtor holds any interest, (ii)  is a true and complete list of all existing patents and letters patent of the U.S. or any other country, all registrations and recordings thereof, and all applications for letters patent, in which as of the date hereof Debtor holds any interest, (iii)  is a true and complete list of all registered trademarks, service marks, trade names, corporate names, company names, business names, fictitious business names and domain names, in which as of the date hereof Debtor holds any interest, and (iv)  is a is a true and complete list of all claims arising in tort in which Debtor is a claimant existing as of the date hereof.
True and Complete List
Exhibit A
Exhibit B
Exhibit C
Exhibit D
(d) . Debtor has taken and will continue to take all reasonable steps to protect the secrecy of and preserve it rights and interests in and to all of its material trade secrets and other material proprietary rights and interests.
Trade Secrets
(e) . To the best of Debtor's knowledge, no material infringement or unauthorized use presently is being made of any of the Intellectual Property Collateral, by any person or entity, and, to the best of Debtor's knowledge, Debtor's use of the Intellectual Property Collateral does not and will not infringe upon the rights or interests of any other person or entity.
No Infringement
 
(f) . The person signing below on behalf of Debtor is authorized to sign this Agreement on behalf of Debtor and to bind Debtor to the terms of this Agreement, and all corporate action necessary for the execution of this Agreement has been properly taken by Debtor.
Authorization
(g) . Debtor appoints Secured Party, and any officer, employee or agent of Secured Party, with full power of substitution, as Debtor's true and lawful attorney-in-fact, effective as of the date hereof, with power, in its own name or in the name of Debtor, (i) during the continuance of an Event of Default (as defined below), to endorse any notes, checks, drafts, money orders, or other instruments of payment in respect of the Collateral that may come into Secured Party's possession, (ii) during the continuance of an Event of Default, to sign and endorse any drafts against debtors, assignments, verifications and notices in connection with accounts, and other documents relating to Collateral, (iii) to pay or discharge taxes or liens at any time levied or placed on or threatened against the Collateral, (iv) during the continuance of an Event of Default, to demand, collect, issue receipt for, compromise, settle and sue for monies due in respect of the Collateral, (v) during the continuance of an Event of Default, to notify parties obligated with respect to the Collateral to make payments directly to Secured Party, and (vi) generally, to do, at Secured Party's option and at Debtor's expense, at any time, or from time to time, all acts and things which Secured Party deems reasonably necessary to protect, preserve and realize upon the Collateral and Secured Party's security interest therein, all as fully and effectually as Debtor might or could do; and Debtor hereby ratifies all that said attorney shall lawfully do or cause to be done by virtue hereof. This power of attorney is coupled with an interest and shall be irrevocable as long as any of the Secured Obligations are outstanding.
Attorney-in-Fact
(h) . Debtor will at all times keep in a manner reasonably satisfactory to Secured Party accurate and complete records of the Collateral and will keep such Collateral insured to the extent similarly situated companies insure their assets. Secured Party shall be entitled, at reasonable times and intervals after reasonable notice to Debtor, to enter Debtor's premises for purposes of inspecting the Collateral and Debtor's books and records relating thereto.
Books and Records; Insurance
(i) . Debtor shall not use the Collateral in any manner that is or would result in any material violation of any applicable statute, ordinance, law or regulation or in material violation of any insurance policy maintained by Debtor with respect to the Collateral.
Compliance with Laws
(j) . Other than financing statements, security agreements, assignments and other agreements or instruments executed, delivered, filed or recorded for the purpose of granting or perfecting any Lien (collectively, "") existing as of the date hereof and disclosed to Secured Party on hereto or arising after the date hereof in connection with any Permitted Lien and Financing Statements in favor of Secured Party, no effective Financing Statement naming Debtor as debtor, assignor, Debtor, mortgagor, pledgor or the like and covering all or any part of the Collateral is on file in any filing or recording office in any jurisdiction.
Financing Statements
Financing Statements
Exhibit E
 
(k) . Debtor will (i) notify Secured Party of any material claim made or asserted against the Collateral by any person or entity and of any change in the composition of the Collateral or other event which could materially adversely affect the value of the Collateral or Secured Party's Lien thereon; (ii) furnish to Secured Party such statements and schedules further identifying and describing the Collateral and such other reports and other information in connection with the Collateral as Secured Party may reasonably request, all in reasonable detail; (iii) upon request of Secured Party make such demands and requests for information and reports as Debtor is entitled to make in respect of the Collateral; and (iv) at Debtor's sole expense take such action and cause to be made such filings and recordations as Secured Party may reasonably request in order to perfect and protect the security interest and the first priority of Secured Party in and to any and all of the Collateral, including such filings and recordations as may be necessary or prudent (as determined by Secured Party) in the United States Copyright Office and the United States Patent and Trademark Office.
Notices, Reports and Information
(l) . Debtor will not surrender or lose possession of (other than to Secured Party), sell, lease, rent, or otherwise dispose of or transfer, any of the Collateral or any right or interest therein, except to the extent permitted by the Loan Documents, or dispositions of inventory in the ordinary course of Debtor's business. Debtor will maintain the Collateral and will not incur or suffer to exist any Liens against the Collateral other than Permitted Liens.
Disposition of Collateral
(m) . Debtor will promptly notify the Security Party of the existence of and information regarding any commercial tort claim arising hereafter in a document authenticated by Debtor and confirming the grant of the security interest under this Agreement in such commercial tort claim.
Commercial Tort Claims
3. E D. The failure of Debtor to pay when due any of the Secured Obligations, or to perform any of its other obligations under any of the Loan Documents, in each case after any period of grace as provided in the Loan Documents, or any material misrepresentation by Debtor in or made in connection with any Loan Document, or the occurrence of any other "Event of Default" as defined in any of the Loan Documents, shall constitute an "Event of Default" hereunder.
VENTS
OF
EFAULT
4. R. Upon the occurrence of an Event of Default, Secured Party may declare all of the Secured Obligations to be immediately due and payable, and Secured Party may exercise any and all rights and remedies hereunder or under applicable law; , if any Event of Default occurs as a consequence of the commencement of a bankruptcy or other insolvency proceeding by or against Debtor, all of the Secured Obligations shall be automatically and immediately due and payable without further action or demand. Without limiting the foregoing, Secured Party shall have the right, itself or through any of its agents, with or without notice to Debtor, as to any or all of the Collateral, by any available judicial procedure, or without judicial process (, that it is in compliance with applicable law), to exercise any and all rights afforded to a secured party under the UCC or other applicable law, to sell or otherwise dispose of all or any part of the Collateral, either at public or private sale, in lots or in
EMEDIES
provided, however
provided, however
 
bulk, for cash or for credit, with or without warranties or representations, and upon such terms and conditions, all as Secured Party, in its sole discretion, may deem advisable, and it shall have the right to purchase at any such sale. Debtor agrees that a notice sent at least ten (10) days before the time of any intended public sale or of the time after which any private sale or other disposition of the Collateral is to be made shall be reasonable notice of such sale or other disposition. The proceeds of any such sale, or other Collateral disposition shall be applied first to the expenses of retaking, holding, storing, processing and preparing for sale, selling, and the like, and to attorneys' fees and legal expenses of Secured Party, and then to the Secured Obligations and to the payment of any other amounts required by applicable law, after which Secured Party shall account to Debtor for any surplus proceeds. The rights and remedies with respect to Debtor and the Collateral, whether established hereby or by any other agreements, instruments or documents or by law, shall be cumulative and may be exercised singly or concurrently, and are not exclusive of any other rights or remedies provided under any other agreement, instrument or document to which Debtor is a party or by which it or any of the Collateral is bound or by law or equity.
5. L. Debtor grants to Secured Party, to the fullest extent permitted under applicable law, a fully paid and royalty free license, exercisable only upon the occurrence and during the continuance of an Event of Default, to use any and all of the Intellectual Property Collateral as may be reasonably necessary to permit the exercise of any of Secured Party's rights or remedies with respect to any of the Collateral.
ICENSE
6. F A. Debtor will upon request promptly execute and deliver all further instruments and documents, and take all further action that Secured Party may reasonably request in order to perfect, protect and maintain the priority of the security interest granted by this Agreement and to enable Secured Party to exercise and enforce its rights and remedies under this Agreement.
URTHER
SSURANCES
7. W. Debtor hereby waives (a) the right to require Secured Party to proceed against any other person or against any other collateral it may hold; (b) presentment, protest and notice of protest, demand and notice of nonpayment, demand of performance, notice of sale, and advertisement of sale, (c) following an Event of Default, any right to the benefit of or to direct the application of any of the Collateral until the obligations of Debtor shall have been paid in full, and (d) any defenses which may arise by reason of, or be based on, lack of diligence in collection.
AIVERS
8. A' F. Debtor agrees to pay the costs and expenses, including reasonable attorneys' fees, which may be incurred by Secured Party in connection with the negotiation, administration and enforcement of this Agreement and the protection of a Secured Party's rights hereunder, whether or not legal action is instituted or filed.
TTORNEYS
EES
9. N W. Any acceptance of partial or delinquent payments or failure of Secured Party to exercise any right shall not waive any obligation of Debtor or right of Secured Party or modify this Agreement or waive any similar default.
O
AIVER
10. A. Secured Party may assign its rights under this Agreement and in the Collateral to anyone at any time. This Agreement shall be binding on Debtor and its successors and assigns, and shall benefit Secured Party and its successors and assigns.
SSIGNABILITY
 
11. E A. This Agreement and the other agreements referenced herein and therein contain the entire security agreement between Secured Party and Debtor. This Agreement may only be amended, waived, discharged or terminated by a written instrument signed by the Company and Secured Party.
NTIRE
GREEMENT
12. C L. This Agreement shall be governed by and construed in accordance with the laws of the State of California, without giving effect to conflicts of law principles.
HOICE
OF
AW
13. N. Except as otherwise provided, all notices and other communications required or permitted hereunder shall be in writing, shall be effective when given, and shall in any event be deemed to be given upon receipt or, if earlier, (i) five (5) days after deposit with the U.S. postal service or other applicable postal service, if delivered by first class mail, postage prepaid, (ii) upon delivery, if delivered by hand, (iii) one (1) business day after the day of deposit with Federal Express or similar overnight courier, freight prepaid, if delivered by overnight courier or (iv) one (1) business day after the day of facsimile transmission, if delivered by facsimile transmission with copy by first class mail, postage prepaid, and shall be addressed, (a) if to Secured Party, at Secured Party's address set forth below its signature, or (b) if to Debtor, at its address as set forth below, or at such other address of Debtor or Secured Party as such party shall have furnished the other in writing:
OTICES
14. I. Debtor hereby indemnifies Secured Party, its principals and agents (the ") for, and agrees to protect and hold each of them harmless from and against, any and all liabilities, obligations, losses, damages, costs and expenses (including, without limitation, reasonable attorneys' fees), causes of action, suits, claims, demands and judgments of any nature or description whatsoever, which may at any time be imposed upon, incurred by or awarded against any Indemnified Party (other than as a result of such Indemnified Party's own gross negligence or willful misconduct) as a result of the occurrence of any one or more of the following: (a) the grant to Secured Party of any interest in or to any of the Collateral, and (b) any infringement or claim of infringement by any person or entity with respect to any of the Intellectual Property Collateral, or any claim that any of the Intellectual Property Collateral misappropriates any patent, copyright, trade secret, trademark or other intellectual property right of any third party, or breaches any agreement of Debtor with any third party.
NDEMNITY
Indemnified Parties"
15. S. If any provision or provisions of this Agreement shall be deemed to be contrary to public policy or shall for any reason be held to be invalid, then such provision or provisions shall be deemed to be separable from the remaining provisions of this Agreement, and shall in no way affect the validity of any of the remaining provisions of this Agreement.
EVERABILITY
16. H. Captions and headings in this Agreement are for convenience only and are not to be deemed part of this Agreement.
EADINGS
17. C. This Agreement may be executed in counterparts, which when taken together shall constitute one document.
OUNTERPARTS
 
I W W, Debtor has executed and delivered this Agreement in favor of Secured Party as of the day and year first above written.
N
ITNESS
HEREOF
 
 
 

E 99.1
XHIBIT
Natus Medical Completes Acquisition of Excel-Tech Ltd.
(Nasdaq:BABY) today announced that it has completed its acquisition of Excel-Tech Ltd. ("Xltek"), based in Oakville, Ontario, Canada.
SAN CARLOS, Calif. (November 29, 2007)  Natus Medical Incorporated
Jim Hawkins, President and Chief Executive Officer of Natus, commented, "We are very pleased to have acquired Xltek, as it affirms our position as a market leader in neurology and brings Natus one step closer to achieving our stated goal of growing revenue to a $250 million annual run-rate by the end of 2008."
"This acquisition adds to our growth opportunities by broadening our product offerings in neurology, including Xltek's products for the diagnosis of peripheral nervous system dysfunction," added Hawkins. "Xltek's full line of products for the neurology clinician expands our current product offerings with products that include a high-end long-term EEG patient monitoring system for the diagnosis of epilepsy, electromyography systems, or EMG systems, used in the diagnosis of neuropathies and myopathies, and intra-operative monitoring systems, or IOM systems, used during surgical procedures in the operating room."
"In addition, we plan to leverage our combined direct sales channels in the United States and Canada, and provide new distribution for Xltek products through the Natus international distribution organization, now operating in over 80 countries," added Hawkins.
Natus completed the acquisition by way of a statutory plan of arrangement in Canada under which Natus acquired all of the outstanding common shares of Xltek at a cash price of C$3.25 per share. The transaction is valued at approximately USD $63.5 million.
Natus believes the acquisition will be immediately accretive to earnings, excluding associated one-time charges.
Xltek reported revenue of C$32.5 million in the twelve months ended July 31, 2007 and cash and cash equivalents of C$16.4 million as of July 31, 2007, and owns the land and building housing their corporate facility in Oakville, a suburb of Toronto, Ontario, Canada.
In addition to available cash on hand, Natus financed $35 million of the purchase price through new senior term and revolving credit facilities with Wells Fargo Bank N.A.
Cowen and Company, LLC served as financial advisor to Natus, and RBC Capital Markets served as financial advisor to Xltek.
Financial Guidance
Natus also announced that it plans to issue 2008 financial guidance during the latter half of December 2007.
About Natus Medical Incorporated
Natus is a leading provider of healthcare products used for the screening, detection, treatment, monitoring and tracking of common medical ailments such as hearing impairment, neurological dysfunction, epilepsy, sleep disorders, and newborn care. Product offerings include computerized neurodiagnostic systems for audiology, neurology, polysomnography, and neonatology, as well as newborn care products such as hearing screening systems, phototherapy devices for the treatment of newborn jaundice, head-cooling products for the treatment of brain injury in newborns, and software systems for managing and tracking disorders and diseases for public health laboratories.
Additional information about Natus Medical can be found at www.natus.com.
Cautionary Information Regarding Forward-Looking Statements
This press release contains forward-looking statements as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, particularly statements regarding the expectations, beliefs, plans, intentions and strategies of Natus. These forward-looking statements include, but are not limited to, statements regarding the benefits of the acquisition of Xltek by Natus, including the expected accretive impact of the acquisition on the earnings of Natus and Natus' expectations of reaching a $250 million annual revenue run rate by the end of 2008. These statements relate to future events or Natus' future financial performance or results, and involve known and unknown risks, uncertainties and other factors that may cause actual results, levels of activity, performance, or achievements to differ materially from those expressed or implied by the forward-looking statements. Forward-looking statements are only predictions and the actual events or results may differ materially. Natus cannot provide any assurance that its future results or the results implied by the forward-looking statements will meet expectations. The future results of Natus could differ materially due to a number of factors, including the effects of competition, challenges incurred in integrating acquired companies, the demand for products and services, the ability to expand sales in international markets, the ability to maintain current sales levels in a mature domestic market, the ability to control costs, and risks associated with bringing new products to market. Natus disclaims any obligation to update information contained in any forward-looking statement.
More information about potential risk factors that could affect the business and financial results of Natus is included in Natus' annual report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2006, and its quarterly reports on Form 10-Q, and in other reports filed from time to time by Natus with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission.
COMPANY CONTACT:
Natus Medical Incorporated
Steven J. Murphy
Chief Financial Officer
(650) 802-0400
InvestorRelations@Natus.com


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BABY/BABY-8K-20071221144040.txt.gz
TIME:20071221144040
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers	Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
ITEM: Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
At its December 18, 2007 meeting, the Compensation Committee of the Board of Directors of Natus Medical Incorporated (the "Company") approved the base salaries and bonus program for the Company's executive officers for the period beginning January 1, 2008 and ending December 31, 2008.
The Compensation Committee approved the base salary amounts set forth on the table below based on a review of the Company's performance and competitive market data:
 
The Compensation Committee approved a cash bonus plan for executive officers of the Company based on the Company achieving its budgeted pre-tax profit for 2008. The cash bonuses may range from 50% to a maximum of 150% of the target amount (based on the amount of actual pre-tax profit relative to the budgeted amount). The target bonus for Mr. Hawkins is 75% of 2008 base salary and for each of Messrs. Mince, Murphy and Dr. Chung is 40% of 2008 base salary. Mr. Traverso's compensation is comprised of (i) his base salary as set forth above, (ii) payments made pursuant to a sales commission plan that is paid on a regular basis to a maximum of $87,500, and (iii) a bonus for which the terms are the same as the other executive officers of the company, except that his target bonus is 27% of 2008 base salary. The payment of bonuses pursuant to this plan is at the discretion of the Board of Directors.
 
On December 19, 2007, the Board of Directors (the "Board") of the Company approved an amendment to the Company's Bylaws to be effective immediately. The amendment, which consolidated Article 6, Sections 6.1 and 6.2 into an amended section 6.1, and renumbered Sections 6.3, 6.4 and 6.5 as Sections 6.2, 6.3 and 6.4, respectively, provides that (i) the Board may provide that some or all of the Company's stock shall be evidenced by uncertificated shares and (ii) any resolution by the Board providing for uncertificated shares will not apply to shares represented by a certificate until the certificate is surrendered to the Company, and also makes related changes.
A copy of the amended Bylaws are attached as Exhibit 3.1 to this Current Report.
 
(d) Exhibits
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 3.1
 
Section 1.1. . The registered office of the Corporation which is required by the state of Delaware to be maintained in the state of Delaware shall be the registered office named in the charter documents of the Corporation, or such other office as may be designated from time to time by the Board of Directors in the manner provided by law.
Registered Office
Section 1.2. . The Corporation may also have offices at such other places both within and without the state of Delaware as the Board of Directors may from time to time determine or the business of the Corporation may require.
Other Offices
 
Section 2.1. Place of Meetings. All meetings of the stockholders shall be held at the principal office of the Corporation, or at such other place within or without the state of Delaware as shall be specified or fixed in the notices or waivers of notice thereof.
Section 2.2. Quorum; Adjournment of Meetings. Unless otherwise required by law or provided in the charter documents of the Corporation or these Bylaws, (i) the holders of a majority of the stock issued and outstanding and entitled to vote thereat, present in person or represented by proxy, shall constitute a quorum at any meeting of stockholders for the transaction of business, (ii) in all matters other than election of directors, the affirmative vote of the holders of a majority of such stock so present or represented at any meeting of stockholders at which a quorum is present shall constitute the act of the stockholders, and (iii) where a separate vote by a class or classes is required, a majority of the outstanding shares of such class or classes, present in person or represented by proxy shall constitute a quorum entitled to take action with respect to that vote on that matter and the affirmative vote of the majority of the shares of such class or classes present in person or represented by proxy at the meeting shall be the act of such class. The stockholders present at a duly organized meeting may continue to transact business until adjournment, notwithstanding the withdrawal of enough stockholders to leave less than a quorum, subject to the provisions of clauses (ii) and (iii) above. Directors shall be elected by a plurality of the votes of the shares present in person or represented by proxy at the meeting and entitled to vote on the election of directors.
Notwithstanding the other provisions of the charter documents of the Corporation or these Bylaws, the chairman of the meeting or the holders of a majority of the issued and outstanding stock, present in person or represented by proxy and entitled to vote thereat, at any meeting of stockholders, whether or not a quorum is present, shall have the power to adjourn such meeting from time to time, without any notice other than announcement at the meeting of the time and place of the holding of the adjourned meeting. If the adjournment is for more than thirty (30) days, or if after the adjournment a new record date is fixed for the adjourned meeting, a notice of the adjourned meeting shall be given to each stockholder of record entitled to vote at such meeting. At such adjourned meeting at which a quorum shall be present or represented any business may be transacted which might have been transacted at the meeting as originally called.
Section 2.3. Annual Meeting. (a) An annual meeting of the stockholders, for the election of directors to succeed those whose terms expire and for the transaction of such other business as may properly come before the meeting, shall be held at such place (within or without the state of Delaware), on such date, and at such time as the Board of Directors shall fix and set forth in the notice of the meeting, which date shall be within thirteen (13) months subsequent to the last annual meeting of stockholders.
(b) At an annual meeting of stockholders, only such business shall be conducted as shall have been properly brought before the meeting. To be properly brought before an annual meeting, business must be: (A) specified in the notice of meeting (or any supplement thereto) given by or at the direction of the Board of Directors, (B) otherwise properly brought before the
meeting by or at the direction of the Board of Directors, or (C) otherwise properly brought before the meeting by a stockholder. For business to be properly brought before an annual meeting by a stockholder, the stockholder must have given timely notice thereof in writing to the Secretary of the Corporation. To be timely, a stockholder's notice must be delivered to or mailed and received at the principal executive offices of the Corporation not less than sixty (60) calendar days in advance of the date specified in the Corporation's proxy statement released to stockholders in connection with the previous year's annual meeting of stockholders; provided, however, that in the event that no annual meeting was held in the previous year or the date of the annual meeting has been changed by more than thirty (30) days from the date contemplated at the time of the previous year's proxy statement, notice by the stockholder to be timely must be so received a reasonable time before the solicitation is made. A stockholder's notice to the Secretary shall set forth as to each matter the stockholder proposes to bring before the annual meeting: (i) a brief description of the business desired to be brought before the annual meeting and the reasons for conducting such business at the annual meeting, (ii) the name and address, as they appear on the Corporation's books, of the stockholder proposing such business, (iii) the class and number of shares of the Corporation which are beneficially owned by the stockholder, (iv) any material interest of the stockholder in such business and (v) any other information that is required to be provided by the stockholder pursuant to Regulation 14A under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (the "1934 Act"), in his capacity as a proponent to a stockholder proposal. Notwithstanding the foregoing, in order to include information with respect to a stockholder proposal in the proxy statement and form of proxy for a stockholder's meeting, stockholders must provide notice as required by the regulations promulgated under the 1934 Act. Notwithstanding anything in these Bylaws to the contrary, no business shall be conducted at any annual meeting except in accordance with the procedures set forth in this paragraph (b). The chairman of the annual meeting shall, if the facts warrant, determine and declare at the meeting that business was not properly brought before the meeting and in accordance with the provisions of this paragraph (b), and, if he should so determine, he shall so declare at the meeting that any such business not properly brought before the meeting shall not be transacted.
(c) Only persons who are nominated in accordance with the procedures set forth in this paragraph (c) shall be eligible for election as Directors. Nominations of persons for election to the Board of Directors of the Corporation may be made at a meeting of stockholders by or at the direction of the Board of Directors or by any stockholder of the Corporation entitled to vote in the election of Directors at the meeting who complies with the notice procedures set forth in this paragraph (c). Such nominations, other than those made by or at the direction of the Board of Directors, shall be made pursuant to timely notice in writing to the Secretary of the Corporation in accordance with the provisions of paragraph (b) of this Section 2.2. Such stockholder's notice shall set forth (i) as to each person, if any, whom the stockholder proposes to nominate for election or re-election as a Director: (A) the name, age, business address and residence address of such person, (B) the principal occupation or employment of such person, (C) the class and number of shares of the Corporation which are beneficially owned by such person, (D) a description of all arrangements or understandings between the stockholder and each nominee and any other person or persons (naming such person or persons) pursuant to which the nominations are to be made by the stockholder, and (E) any other information relating to such person that is required to be disclosed in solicitations of proxies for elections of Directors, or is otherwise required, in each case pursuant to Regulation 14A under the 1934 Act (including without limitation such person's written consent to being named in the proxy statement, if any, as a nominee and to serving as a Director if elected); and (ii) as to such stockholder giving notice, the information required to be provided pursuant to paragraph (b) of this Section 2.2. At the request of the Board of Directors, any person nominated by a stockholder for election as a Director shall furnish to the Secretary of the Corporation that information required to be set forth in the stockholder's notice of nomination, which pertains to the nominee. No person shall be eligible for election as a Director of the Corporation unless nominated in accordance with the procedures set forth in this paragraph (c). The chairman of the meeting shall, if the facts warrants, determine and declare at the meeting that a nomination was not made in accordance with the procedures prescribed by these Bylaws, and if he should so determine, he shall so declare at the meeting, and the defective nomination shall be disregarded.
Section 2.4. Special Meetings. Special meetings of stockholders may be called at any time by a majority of the Board of Directors, by the Chairman of the Board, the Chief Executive Officer or by the holders of at least 10% of the shares of the Corporation's capital stock entitled to vote at such meeting, but such special meetings may not be called by any other person or persons; provided, however, that effective upon closing of the Corporation's initial public offering pursuant to an effective registration statement under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, covering the offer and sale of shares of its Common Stock for the account of the Corporation to the public (the "IPO") and the Corporation is no longer subject to Section 2115 of the California Corporation Code, special meetings of stockholders may be called at any time by a majority of the Board of Directors, by the Chairman of the Board, by the Chief Executive Officer or by the holders of at least 30% of the shares of the Corporation's capital stock entitled to vote at such meeting, but such special meetings may not be called by any other person or persons.
Section 2.5. Record Date. For the purpose of determining stockholders entitled to notice of or to vote at any meeting of stockholders, or any adjournment thereof, or entitled to receive payment of any dividend or other distribution or allotment of any rights, or entitled to exercise any rights in respect of any change, conversion or exchange of stock or for the purpose of any other lawful action, the Board of Directors of the Corporation may fix a date as the record date for any such of stockholders, which record date shall not precede the date on which the resolutions fixing the record date are adopted and which record date shall not be more than sixty (60) days nor less than ten (10) days before the date of such meeting of stockholders, nor more than sixty (60) days prior to any other action to which such record date relates.
If the Board of Directors does not fix a record date for any meeting of the stockholders, the record date for determining stockholders entitled to notice of or to vote at such meeting shall be at the close of business on the day next preceding the day on which notice is given, or, in accordance with Article 7, Section 7.3 of these Bylaws notice is waived, at the close of business on the day next preceding the day on which the meeting is held. The record date for determining stockholders for any other purpose (other than the consenting to corporate action in writing without a meeting) shall be at the close of business on the day on which the Board of Directors adopts the resolution relating thereto. A determination of stockholders of record entitled to notice of or to vote at a meeting of stockholders shall apply to any adjournment of the meeting; provided, however, that the Board of Directors may fix a new record date for the adjourned meeting.
For the purpose of determining the stockholders entitled to consent to corporate action in writing without a meeting, the Board of Directors may fix a record date, which record date shall not precede the date upon which the resolution fixing the record date is adopted by the Board of Directors, and which date shall not be more than ten (10) days after the date upon which the resolution fixing the record date is adopted by the Board of Directors. If the Board of Directors does not fix the record date, the record date for determining stockholders entitled to consent to corporate action in writing without a meeting, when no prior action by the Board of Directors is necessary, shall be the first date on which a signed written consent setting forth the action taken or proposed to be taken is delivered to the Corporation at its registered office in the state of incorporation of the Corporation or at its principal place of business. If the Board of Directors does not fix the record date, and prior action by the Board of Directors is necessary, the record date for determining stockholders entitled to consent to corporate action in writing without a meeting shall be at the close of business on the day on which the Board of Directors adopts the resolution taking such prior action.
Section 2.6. Notice of Meetings. Written notice of the place, date and hour of all meetings, and, in case of a special meeting, the purpose or purposes for which the meeting is called, shall be given by or at the direction of the President, the Secretary or the other person(s) calling the meeting to each stockholder entitled to vote thereat not less than ten (10) nor more than sixty (60) days before the date of the meeting. Such notice may be delivered either personally or by mail.
If mailed, notice is given when deposited in the United States mail, postage prepaid, directed to the stockholder at such stockholder's address as it appears on the records of the Corporation.
Section 2.7. Stockholder List. A complete list of stockholders entitled to vote at any meeting of stockholders, arranged in alphabetical order for each class of stock and showing the address of each such stockholder and the number of shares registered in the name of such stockholder, shall be open to the examination of any stockholder, for any purpose germane to the meeting, during ordinary business hours, for a period of at least ten (10) days prior to the meeting, either at a place within the city where the meeting is to be held, which place shall be specified in the notice of the meeting, or, if not so specified, at the place where the meeting is to be held. The stockholder list shall also be produced and kept at the time and place of the meeting during the whole time thereof, and may be inspected by any stockholder who is present.
Section 2.8. Proxies. Each stockholder entitled to vote at a meeting of stockholders or to express consent or dissent to a corporate action in writing without a meeting may authorize another person or persons to act for him by proxy. Proxies for use at any meeting of stockholders shall be filed with the Secretary, or such other officer as the Board of Directors may from time to time determine by resolution, before or at the time of the meeting. All proxies shall be received and taken charge of and all ballots shall be received and canvassed by the secretary of the meeting, who shall decide all questions touching upon the qualification of voters, the validity of the proxies, and the acceptance or rejection of votes, unless an inspector or inspectors shall have been appointed by the chairman of the meeting, in which event such inspector or inspectors shall decide all such questions.
No proxy shall be valid after three (3) years from its date, unless the proxy provides for a longer period. Each proxy shall be revocable unless expressly provided therein to be irrevocable and coupled with an interest sufficient in law to support an irrevocable power.
Should a proxy designate two or more persons to act as proxies, unless such instrument shall provide the contrary, a majority of such persons present at any meeting at which their powers thereunder are to be exercised shall have and may exercise all the powers of voting or giving consents thereby conferred, or if only one be present, then such powers may be exercised by that one; or, if an even number attend and a majority do not agree on any particular issue, each proxy so attending shall be entitled to exercise such powers in respect of such portion of the shares as is equal to the reciprocal of the fraction equal to the number of proxies representing such shares divided by the total number of shares represented by such proxies.
Section 2.9. Voting; Election; Inspectors. Unless otherwise required by law or provided for in the charter documents of the Corporation, each stockholder shall on each matter submitted to a vote at a meeting of stockholders have one vote for each share of the stock entitled to vote which is registered in his name on the record date for the meeting. For the purposes hereof, each election to fill a directorship shall constitute a separate matter. Shares registered in the name of another corporation, domestic or foreign, may be voted by such officer, agent or proxy as the bylaws (or comparable body) of such corporation may determine. Shares registered in the name of a deceased person may be voted by the executor or administrator of such person's estate, either in person or by proxy.
All voting, except as required by the charter documents of the Corporation or where otherwise required by law, may be by a voice vote; provided, however, upon request of the chairman of the meeting or upon demand therefor by stockholders holding a majority of the issued and outstanding stock present in person or by proxy at any meeting a stock vote shall be taken. Every stock vote shall be taken by written ballots, each of which shall state the name of the stockholder or proxy voting and such other information as may be required under the procedure established for the meeting. The directors of the Corporation need not be elected by written ballot unless a stockholder demands election by written ballot at the meeting and before voting begins, or unless the Bylaws so provide.
At any meeting at which a vote is taken by written ballots, the chairman of the meeting may appoint one or more inspectors; each of whom shall subscribe an oath or affirmation to execute faithfully the duties of inspector at such meeting with strict impartiality and according to the best of such inspector's ability. Such inspector shall receive the written ballots, count the votes, and make and sign a certificate of the result thereof. The chairman of the meeting may appoint any person to serve as inspector, except no candidate for the office of director shall be appointed as an inspector.
Each holder of voting stock or of any class or series thereof shall be entitled to cumulative voting rights as to the directors to be elected by each series or class or the combined classes in accordance with the provisions of Section 214 of the Delaware General Corporation Law.
Section 2.10 Conduct of Meetings. The meetings of the stockholders shall be presided over by the President, or, if the President is not present, by a chairman elected at the meeting. The Secretary of the Corporation, if present, shall act as secretary of such meetings, or, if the Secretary is not present, an Assistant Secretary shall so act; if neither the Secretary of or Assistant Secretary is present, then a secretary shall be appointed by the chairman of the meeting.
.
The chairman of any meeting of stockholders shall determine the order of business and the procedure at the meeting, including such regulation of the manner of voting and the conduct of discussion as seem to the chairman in order.
Section 2.11. Treasury Stock. The Corporation shall not vote, directly or indirectly, shares of its own stock owned by it and such shares shall not be counted for quorum purposes. Nothing in this Section 2.11 shall be construed as limiting the right of the Corporation to vote stock, including but not limited to its own stock, held by it in a fiduciary capacity.
Section 2.12. Action Without Meeting. Unless otherwise provided in the Certificate of Incorporation, any action which may be taken at any annual or special meeting of stockholders may be taken without a meeting and without prior notice, if a consent in writing, setting forth the action so taken, is signed by the holders of outstanding shares having not less than the minimum number of votes that would be necessary to authorize or take that action at a meeting at which all shares entitled to vote on that action were present and voted.
Prompt notice of the taking of the corporate action without a meeting by less than unanimous written consent shall be given to those stockholders who have not consented in writing. If the action which is consented to is such as would have required the filing of a certificate under any section of the General Corporation Law of Delaware if such action had been voted on by stockholders at a meeting thereof, then the certificate filed under such section shall state, in lieu of any statement required by such section concerning any vote of stockholders, that written notice and written consent have been given as provided in Section 228 of the General Corporation Law of Delaware.
Effective upon the closing of the Corporation's IPO and the date that the Corporation is no longer subject to Section 2115 of the California Corporations Code, no action of stockholders shall be taken by the stockholders except at an annual or special meeting of stockholders called in accordance with the notice requirements of Section 2.6 above and no action of the stockholders shall be taken by written consent.
 
Section 3.1. Power; Number; Term of Office. The business and affairs of the Corporation shall be managed by or under the direction of the Board of Directors, and, subject to the restrictions imposed by law or the charter documents of the Corporation, the Board of Directors may exercise all the powers of the Corporation.
Notwithstanding anything contained in these Bylaws to the contrary, at any time that a valid agreement among the stockholders is in force with respect to the nomination, election and removal of directors or similar matters, such agreement is hereby recognized and directors shall be nominated, elected and removed in accordance therewith.
The number of directors which shall constitute the whole Board of Directors shall be determined from time to time by the Board of Directors (provided that no decrease in the number of directors which would have the effect of shortening the term of an incumbent director may be made by the Board of Directors). Each director shall hold office for the term for which such director is elected, and until such director's successor shall have been elected and qualified or until such director's earlier death, resignation or removal.
Unless otherwise provided in the charter documents of the Corporation, directors need not be stockholders nor resident of the state of Delaware.
Section 3.2. Classes of Directors. Effective upon the closing of the Corporation's IPO and the date that the Corporation is no longer subject to Section 2115 of the California Corporations Code, the Directors shall be divided into three classes designated as Class I, Class II and Class III, respectively. Directors shall be assigned to each class in accordance with a resolution or resolutions adopted by the Board of Directors. At the first annual meeting of stockholders following the closing of the IPO, the term of office of the Class I Directors shall expire and Class I Directors shall be elected for a full term of three years. At the second annual meeting of stockholders following the closing of the IPO, the term of office of the Class II Directors shall expire and Class II Directors shall be elected for a full term of three years. At the third annual meeting of stockholders following the closing of the Initial Public Offering, the term of office of the Class III Directors shall expire and Class III Directors shall be elected for a full term of three years. At each succeeding annual meeting of stockholders, Directors shall be elected for a full term of three years to succeed the Directors of the class whose terms expire at such annual meeting.
Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions of this Article, each Director shall serve until his successor is duly elected and qualified or until his earlier death, resignation or removal. No decrease in the number of Directors constituting the Board of Directors shall shorten the term of any incumbent Director.
Section 3.3. Quorum; Voting. Unless otherwise provided in the charter documents of the Corporation, a majority of the number of directors then in office shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business of the Board of Directors and the vote of a majority of the directors present at a meeting at which a quorum is present shall be the act of the Board of Directors.
Section 3.4. Place of Meetings; Order of Business. The directors may hold their meetings and may have an office and keep the books of the Corporation, except as otherwise provided by law, in such place or places, within or without the state of incorporation of the Corporation, as the Board of Directors may from time to time determine. At all meetings of the Board of Directors business shall be transacted in such order as shall from time to time be determined by the President or by the Board of Directors.
Section 3.5. First Meeting. Each newly elected Board of Directors may hold its first meeting for the purpose of organization and the transaction of business, if a quorum is present, immediately after and at the same place as the annual meeting of the stockholders. Notice of such meeting shall not be required. At the first meeting of the Board of Directors in each year at which a quorum shall be present, held after the annual meeting of stockholders, the Board of Directors shall elect the officers of the Corporation.
Section 3.6 Regular Meetings. Regular meetings of the Board of Directors shall be held at such times and places as shall be designated from time to time by the President, or in the President's absence, by another officer of the Corporation. Notice of such regular meetings shall not be required.
.
Section 3.7. Special Meetings. Special meetings of the Board of Directors may be called by the President, or on the written request of any director, by the Secretary, in each case on at least twenty-four (24) hours' personal, written, telegraphic, cable or wireless notice to each director. Such notice, or any waiver thereof pursuant to Article 7, Section 7.3 hereof, need not state the purpose or purposes of such meeting, except as may otherwise be required by law or provided for in the charter documents of the Corporation or these Bylaws. Meetings may be held at any time without notice if all the directors are present or if those not present waive notice of the meeting in writing.
Section 3.8. Removal. Any director or the entire Board of Directors may be removed as set forth in the Certificate of Incorporation of the Corporation, as amended from time to time.
Section 3.9. Vacancies; Increases in the Number of Directors. Any director may resign effective on giving written notice to the chairman of the board, the president, the secretary or the board of directors, unless the notice specifies a later time for that resignation to become effective. If the resignation of a director is effective at a future time, the board of directors may elect a successor to take office when the resignation becomes effective.
Unless otherwise provided in the Certificate of Incorporation or these bylaws, vacancies in the board of directors may be filled by a majority of the remaining directors, even if less than a quorum, or by a sole remaining director; however, a vacancy created by the removal of a director by the vote or written consent of the stockholders or by court order may be filled only by the affirmative vote of a majority of the shares represented and voting at a duly held meeting at which a quorum is present (which shares voting affirmatively also constitute a majority of the required quorum), or by the unanimous written consent of all shares entitled to vote thereon. Each director so elected shall hold office until the next annual meeting of the stockholders and until a successor has been elected and qualified. Notwithstanding the foregoing, however, effective upon the closing of the Corporation's IPO and the date that the Corporation is no longer subject to Section 2115 of the California Corporations Code, the number of directors which shall constitute the whole Board of Directors shall be fixed exclusively by one or more resolutions adopted from time to time by the Board of Directors.
Unless otherwise provided in the Certificate of Incorporation or these bylaws:
(i) Vacancies and newly created directorships resulting from any increase in the authorized number of directors elected by all of the stockholders having the right to vote as a single class may be filled by a majority of the directors then in office, although less than a quorum, or by a sole remaining director.
(ii) Whenever the holders of any class or classes of stock or series thereof are entitled to elect one or more directors by the provisions of the certificate of incorporation, vacancies and newly created directorships of such class or classes or series may be filled by a majority of the directors elected by such class or classes or series thereof then in office, or by a sole remaining director so elected.
If at any time, by reason of death or resignation or other cause, the Corporation should have no directors in office, then any officer or any stockholder or an executor, administrator, trustee or guardian of a stockholder, or other fiduciary entrusted with like responsibility for the person or estate of a stockholder, may call a special meeting of stockholders in accordance with the provisions of the certificate of incorporation or these bylaws, or may apply to the Court of Chancery for a decree summarily ordering an election as provided in Section 211 of the General Corporation Law of Delaware.
If, at the time of filling any vacancy or any newly created directorship, the directors then in office constitute less than a majority of the whole board (as constituted immediately prior to any such increase), then the Court of Chancery may, upon application of any stockholder or stockholders holding at least ten (10) percent of the total number of the shares at the time outstanding having the right to vote for such directors, summarily order an election to be held to fill any such vacancies or newly created directorships, or to replace the directors chosen by the directors then in office as aforesaid, which election shall be governed by the provisions of Section 211 of the General Corporation Law of Delaware as far as applicable.
Section 3.10. Compensation. Directors and members of standing committees may receive such compensation as the Board of Directors from time to time shall determine to be appropriate, and shall be reimbursed for all reasonable expenses incurred in attending and returning from meetings of the board of Directors.
Section 3.11. Action Without a Meeting: Telephone Conference Meeting. Unless otherwise restricted by the charter documents of the Corporation, any action required or permitted to be taken at any of the Board of Directors or any committee designated by the Board of Directors may be taken without a meeting if all members of the Board of Directors or committee, as the case may be, consent thereto in writing, and the writing or writings are filed with the minutes of proceedings of the Board of Directors or committee. Such consent shall have the same force and effect as a unanimous vote at a meeting, and may be stated as such in any document or instrument filed with the Secretary of State of the state of incorporation of the Corporation.
Unless otherwise restricted by the charter documents of the Corporation, subject to the requirement for notice of meetings, members of the Board of Directors, or members of any committee designated by the Board of Directors, may participate in a meeting of such Board of Directors or committee, as the case may be, by means of a conference telephone connection or similar communications equipment by means of which all persons participating in the meeting can hear each other, and participation in such a meeting shall constitute presence in person at such meeting, except where a person participates in the meeting for the express purpose of objecting to the transaction of any business on the ground that the meeting is not lawfully called or convened.
Section 3.12. Approval or Ratification of Acts or Contracts by Stockholders. The Board of Directors in its discretion may submit any act or contract for approval or ratification at any annual meeting of the stockholders, or at any special meeting of the stockholders called for the purpose of considering any such act or contract, and any act or contract that shall be approved or be ratified by the vote of the stockholders holding a majority of the issued and outstanding shares of stock of the Corporation entitled to vote and present in person or by proxy at such meeting (provided that a quorum is present) shall be as valid and as binding upon the Corporation and upon all the stockholders as if it has been approved or ratified by every stockholder of the Corporation. In addition, any such act or contract may be approved or ratified by the written consent of stockholders holding a majority of the issued and outstanding shares of capital stock of the Corporation entitled to vote, and such consent shall be as valid and binding upon the Corporation and upon all the stockholders as if it had been approved or ratified by every stockholder of the Corporation.
 
Section 4.1. Designation; Powers. The Board of Directors may, by resolution passed by a majority of the board, designate one or more committees, including, if they shall so determine, an executive committee and a compensation committee, with each such committee to consist of one or more of the directors of the Corporation. Any such designated committee shall have and may exercise such of the powers and authority of the Board of Directors in the management of the business and affairs of the Corporation as may be provided in such resolution, except that no such committee shall have the power or authority of the Board of Directors in reference of amending the charter documents of the Corporation, adopting an agreement of merger or consolidation, recommending to the stockholders the sale, lease or exchange of all or substantially all of the Corporation's property and assets, recommending to the stockholders a dissolution of the Corporation or a revocation of a dissolution of the Corporation, or amending, altering or repealing these Bylaws or adopting new bylaws for the Corporation. Any such designated committee may authorize the seal of the Corporation to be affixed to all papers, which may require it. In addition to the above, such committee or committees shall have such other powers and limitations of authority as may be determined from time to time by the Board of Directors.
Section 4.2. Procedure; Meetings; Quorum. Any committee designated pursuant to this Article 4 shall keep regular minutes of its actions and proceedings in a book provided for that purpose and report the same to the Board of Directors at its meeting next succeeding such action, shall fix its own rules or procedures, and shall meet at such times and at such place or places as may be provided by such rules, or by such committee or the board of Directors. Should a committee fail to fix its own rules, the provisions of these Bylaws, pertaining to the calling of meetings and conduct of business by the Board of Directors, shall apply as nearly as may be possible. At every meeting of any such committee, the presence of a majority of all the members thereof shall constitute a quorum, except as provided in Section 4.3 of this Article 4 and the affirmative vote of a majority of the members present shall be necessary for the adoption by it of any resolution.
Section 4.3. Substitution and Removal of Members: Vacancies. The Board of Directors may designate one or more directors as alternate members of any committee, who may replace any absent or disqualified member at any meeting of such committee. In the absence or disqualification of a member of a committee, the member or members present at any meeting and not disqualified from voting, whether or not constituting a quorum, may unanimously appoint another member of the Board of Directors to act at the meeting in the place of the absent or disqualified member. The Board of Directors shall have the power at any time to remove any member(s) of a committee and to appoint other directors in lieu of the person(s) so removed and shall also have the power to fill vacancies in a committee.
 
Section 5.1. Number, Titles, and Term of Office. The officers of the Corporation shall be a President, Treasurer, a Secretary, and such other officers as the Board of Directors may from time to time elect or appoint (including, but not limited to, a Chairman of the Board, and or more Vice Presidents, (anyone or more of whom may be designated Executive Vice President or Senior Vice President) Vice Chairman of the Board, one or more Assistant Secretaries and one or more Assistant Treasurers). Each officer shall hold office until such officer's successor shall be duly elected and shall qualify or until such officer's death or until such officer shall resign or shall have been removed. Any number of offices may be held by the same person, unless the Articles of Incorporation of the Corporation provide otherwise. Except for the Chairman of the Board and the Vice Chairman of the Board, no officer need be a director.
Section 5.2. Powers and Duties of the President. The President shall be the chief executive officer of the Corporation. Subject to the control of the Board of Directors and the Executive Committee (if any), the President shall have general executive charge, management and control of the properties, business and operations of the Corporation with all such powers as may be reasonably incident to such responsibilities; may agree upon and execute all leases, contracts, evidences of indebtedness and other obligations in the name of the Corporation and may sign all certificates for shares of capital stock of the Corporation; and shall have such other powers and duties as designated in accordance with these Bylaws and as from time to time may be assigned to the President by the Board of Directors. The President shall preside at all meetings of the stockholders and of the Board of Directors.
Section 5.3. Vice Presidents. Each Vice President shall at all times possess power to sign all certificates, contracts and other instruments of the Corporation, except as otherwise limited in writing by the Chairman of the Board, the President or the Vice Chairman of the Board of the Corporation. Each Vice President shall have such other powers and duties as from time to time may be assigned to such Vice President by the Board of Directors, the Chairman of the Board, the President or the Vice Chairman of the Board.
Section 5.4. Secretary. The Secretary shall keep the minutes of all meetings of the Board of Directors, committees of the Board of Directors and the stockholders, in books provided for that purpose; shall attend to the giving and serving of all notices; may in the name of the Corporation affix the seal of the Corporation to all contracts and attest the affixation of the seal of the Corporation thereto; may sign with the other appointed officers all certificates for shares of capital stock of the Corporation; shall have charge of the certificate books, transfer books and stock ledgers, and such other books and papers as the Board of Directors may direct, all of which shall at all reasonable times be open to inspection of any director upon application at the office of the Corporation during business hours; shall have such other powers and duties as designated in these Bylaws and as from time to time may be assigned to the Secretary by the Board of Directors, the Chairman of the Board, the President or the Vice Chairman of the Board; and shall in general perform all acts incident of the office of Secretary, subject to the control of the Board of Directors, the Chairman of the Board, the President or the Vice Chairman of the Board.
Section 5.5. Assistant Secretaries. Each Assistant Secretary shall have the usual powers and duties pertaining to such offices, together with such other powers and duties as designated in these Bylaws and as from time to time may be assigned to an Assistant Secretary by the board of directors, the President, or the Secretary. The Assistant Secretaries shall exercise the powers of the Secretary during that officer's absence or inability or refusal to act.
Section 5.6. Treasurer. The Treasurer shall have responsibility for the custody and control of all the funds and securities of the Corporation, and shall have such other powers and duties as designated in these Bylaws and as from time to time may be assigned to the Treasurer by the Board of Directors or the President. The Treasurer shall perform all acts incident to the position of Treasurer, subject to the control of the Board of Directors or the President; and the Treasurer shall, if required by the Board of Directors, give such bond for the faithful discharge of the Treasurer's duties in such form as the Board of Directors may require.
Section 5.7. Assistant Treasurers. Each Assistant Treasurer shall have the usual powers and duties pertaining to such office, together with such other powers and duties as designated in these Bylaws and as from time to time may be assigned to each Assistant Treasurer by the Board of Directors, the President, or the Treasurer. The Assistant Treasurers shall exercise the powers of the Treasurer during that officer's absence or inability or refusal to act.
Section 5.8. Action with Respect to Securities of Other Corporations. Unless otherwise directed by the Board of Directors, the President, together with the Secretary or any Assistant Secretary shall have power to vote and otherwise act on behalf of the Corporation, in person or by proxy, at any meeting of security holders of or with respect to any action of security holders of any other corporation in which this Corporation may hold securities and otherwise to exercise any and all rights and powers which this Corporation may possess by reason of its ownership of securities in such other corporation.
Section 5.9. Delegation. For any reason that the Board of Directors may deem sufficient, the Board of Directors may, except where otherwise provided by statute, delegate the powers or duties of any officer to any other person, and may authorize any officer to delegate specified duties of such office to any other person. Any such delegation or authorization by the Board shall be effected from time to time by resolution of the Board of Directors.
 
Section 6.1. Certificates of Stock. The certificates for shares of the capital stock of the Corporation shall be in such form, not inconsistent with that required by law and the charter documents of the Corporation, as shall be approved by the Board of Directors. Every holder of stock represented by certificates shall be entitled to have a certificate signed by or in the name of the Corporation by the President or a Vice President and the Secretary or an Assistant Secretary or the Treasurer or an Assistant Treasurer of the Corporation representing the number of shares (and, if the stock of the Corporation shall be divided into classes or series, certifying the class and series of such shares) owned by such stockholder which are registered in certified form; provided, however, that any of or all the signatures on the certificate may be facsimile. The stock record books and the blank stock certificate books shall be kept by the Secretary or at the office of such transfer agent or transfer agents as the Board of Directors may from time to time determine. In case any officer, transfer agent or registrar who shall have signed or whose facsimile signature or signatures shall have been placed upon any such certificate or certificates shall have ceased to be such officer, transfer agent or registrar before such certificate is issued by the Corporation, such certificate may nevertheless be issued by the Corporation with the same effect as if such person were such officer, transfer agent or registrar at the date of issue. The stock certificates shall be consecutively numbered and shall be entered in the books of the Corporation as they are issued and shall exhibit the holder's name and number of shares.
Section 6.2. Transfer of Shares. The shares of stock of the Corporation shall be transferable only on the books of the Corporation by the holders thereof in person or by their duly authorized attorneys or legal representatives upon surrender and cancellation of certificates for a like number of shares. Upon surrender to the Corporation or a transfer agent of the Corporation of a certificate for shares duly endorsed or accompanied by proper evidence of succession, assignment or authority to transfer, it shall be the duty of the Corporation to issue a new certificate to the person entitled thereto, cancel the old certificate and record the transaction upon its books.
Section 6.3. Ownership of Shares. The Corporation shall be entitled to treat the holder of record of any share or shares of capital stock of the Corporation as the holder in fact thereof and, accordingly, shall not be bound to recognize any equitable or other claim to or interest in such share or shares on the part of any other person, whether or not it shall have express or other notice thereof, except as otherwise provided by the laws of the state of Delaware.
Section 6.4. Regulations Regarding Certificates. The Board of Directors shall have the power and authority to make all such rules and regulations as they may deem expedient concerning the issue, transfer and registration or the replacement of certificates for shares of capital stock of the Corporation.
Section 6.5. Lost or Destroyed Certificates. The Board of Directors may determine the conditions upon which the Corporation may issue a new certificate of stock in place of a certificate theretofore issued by it which is alleged to have been lost, stolen or destroyed and may require the owner of such certificate or such owner's legal representative to give bond, with surety sufficient to indemnify the Corporation and each transfer agent and registrar against any and all losses or claims which may arise by reason of the alleged loss, theft or destruction of any such certificate or the issuance of such new certificate in the place of the one so lost, stolen destroyed.
 
Section 7.1. Fiscal Year. The fiscal year of the Corporation shall begin on the first day of January of each year.
Section 7.2. Corporate Seal. The corporate seal shall be circular in form and shall have inscribed thereon the name of the Corporation and the state of it incorporation, which seal shall be in the charge of the Secretary and shall be affixed to certificates of stock, debentures, bonds and other documents, in accordance with the direction of the Board of Directors or a committee thereof, and as may be required by law; however, the Secretary may, if the Secretary deems it expedient, have a facsimile of the corporate seal inscribed on any such certificates of stock, debentures, bonds, contract or other documents. Duplicates of the seal may be kept for use by any Assistant Secretary.
Section 7.3. Notice and Waiver of Notice. Whenever any notice is required to be given by law, the charter documents of the Corporation or under the provisions of these Bylaws, said notice shall be deemed to be sufficient if given (i) by telegraphic, cable or wireless transmission (including by telecopy or facsimile transmission) or (ii) by deposit of the same in a post office box or by delivery to an overnight courier service company in a sealed prepaid wrapper addressed to the person entitled thereto at such person's post office address, as it appears on the records of the Corporation, and such notice shall be deemed to have been given on the day of such transmission or mailing or delivery to courier, as the case may be.
Whenever notice is required to be given by law, the charter documents of the Corporation or under any of the provisions of these Bylaws, a written waiver thereof, signed by the person entitled to notice, whether before or after the time stated therein, shall be deemed equivalent to notice. Attendance of a person, including without limitation a director, at meeting shall constitute a waiver of notice of such meeting, except when the person attends a meeting for the express purpose of objecting, at the beginning of the meeting, to the transaction of any business because the meeting is not lawfully called or convened. Neither the business to be transacted at, nor the purpose of, any regular or special meeting of the stockholders, directors, or members of a committee of directors need be specified in any written waiver of notice unless so required by the charter documents of the Corporation or these Bylaws.
Section 7.4. Facsimile Signature. In addition to the provisions for the use of facsimile signatures elsewhere specifically authorized in these Bylaws, facsimile signatures of any officer or officers of the Corporation may be used whenever and as authorized by the Board of Directors.
Section 7.5. Reliance upon Books, Reports and Records. A member of the Board of Directors, or a member of any committee designated by the Board of Directors, shall, in the performance of such person's duties, be protected to the fullest extent permitted by law in relying upon the records of the Corporation and upon information, opinion, reports or statements presented to the Corporation.
Section 7.6. Application of Bylaws. In the event that any provisions of these Bylaws is or may be in conflict with any law of the United States, of the state of Delaware, or of any other governmental body or power having jurisdiction over this Corporation, or over the subject matter to which such provision of these Bylaws applies, or may apply, such provision of these Bylaws shall be inoperative to the extent only that the operation thereof unavoidably conflicts with such law, and shall in all other respects be in full force and effect.
 
Section 8.1. Indemnification. The Corporation shall, to the maximum extent and in the manner permitted by the General Corporation Law of Delaware, indemnify each of its directors and officers against expenses (including attorneys' fees), judgments, fines, settlements and other amounts actually and reasonably incurred in connection with any proceeding, arising by reason of the fact that such person is or was an agent of the Corporation. For purposes of this Section 6.1, a "director" or "officer" of the Corporation includes any person (i) who is or was a director or officer of the Corporation, (ii) who is or was serving at the request of the Corporation as a director or officer of another corporation, partnership, joint venture, trust or other enterprise, or (iii) who was a director or officer of a corporation which was a predecessor corporation of the Corporation or of another enterprise at the request of such predecessor corporation.
Section 8.2. Indemnification of Others. The Corporation shall have the power, to the maximum extent and in the manner permitted by the General Corporation Law of Delaware, to indemnify each of its employees and agents (other than directors and officers) against expenses (including attorneys' fees), judgments, fines, settlements and other amounts actually and reasonably incurred in connection with any proceeding, arising by reason of the fact that such person is or was an agent of the Corporation. For purposes of this Section 6.2, an "employee" or "agent" of the Corporation (other than a director or officer)
includes any person (i) who is or was an employee or agent of the Corporation, (ii) who is or was serving at the request of the Corporation as an employee or agent of another corporation, partnership, joint venture, trust or other enterprise, or (iii) who was an employee or agent of a corporation which was a predecessor corporation of the Corporation or of another enterprise at the request of such predecessor corporation.
Section 8.3. Insurance. The Corporation may purchase and maintain insurance on behalf of any person who is or was a director, officer, employee or agent of the Corporation, or is or was serving at the request of the Corporation as a director, officer, employee or agent of another corporation, partnership, joint venture, trust or other enterprise against any liability asserted against him or her and incurred by him or her in any such capacity, or arising out of his or her status as such, whether or not the Corporation would have the power to indemnify him or her against such liability under the provisions of the General Corporation Law of Delaware.
 
Section 9.1. Amendments. The Board of Directors shall have the power to adopt, amend and repeal from time to time Bylaws of the Corporation, subject to the right of the stockholders entitled to vote with respect thereto to amend or repeal such Bylaws as adopted or amended by the Board of Directors.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BABY/BABY-8K-20080211071531.txt.gz
TIME:20080211071531
EVENTS:	Cost Associated with Exit or Disposal Activities	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Cost Associated with Exit or Disposal Activities
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549
Form 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
PURSUANT TO SECTION 13 OR 15 (D) OF THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934
Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported):
February 6, 2008
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
Natus Medical Incorporated
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 - 
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 - 
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 - 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 - 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Costs Associated with Exit or Disposal Activities.
Item 2.05     
On February 6, 2008, Natus Medical Incorporated (the "Company") adopted an integration and restructuring plan (together, the "Plan") that is designed to eliminate redundant costs resulting from prior acquisitions and to improve efficiencies in operations. Under the plan, the company will centralize the research and development activities supporting each of the Companys three main product families.
In addition, the Company will eliminate redundancies in North American field sales and service personnel resulting from the acquisition of Xltek. Finally, the Company will eliminate certain production resources as it continues to outsource assemblies to contract manufacturers. In addition to the termination of employees in some facilities, the Plan provides for the hiring of new employees in others to staff up the required functions.
These actions will be phased in during the first nine months of 2008. The Company expects these actions to be essentially cost neutral in 2008, as savings will be offset by the personnel cost of existing employees during the transition, severance costs for those employees, and a temporary duplication of personnel costs caused by the hiring of new employees in the locations where functions will be consolidated.
The Plan will result in a net staff reduction of approximately 45 employees for which Natus will record approximately $800,000 of severance and other integration charges ratably during the transition period. The combined workforce of the Company is expected to be approximately 400 employees once the Plan is completed.
To the extent severance and integration costs relate to the Xltek business and meet certain criteria, an amount will be recorded on the opening balance sheet in purchase accounting in accordance with Emerging Issues Task Force ("EITF") Issue No. 95-3, . Consequently, to the extent severance and integration costs of Xltek meet the criteria of EITF 95-03 they will not impact earnings.
Recognition of Liabilities in Connection with a Purchase Business Combination
A copy of the press release announcing the Plan is attached as Exhibit 99.1 hereto.
In addition to historical information, this Current Report on Form 8-K contains forward-looking statements as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, particularly statements regarding the expectations, beliefs, plans, intentions and strategies of Natus. These forward-looking statements include, but are not limited to, statements regarding the cost of the Plan, revenue and profitability of the Company in 2008 and the reduction in annual operating costs in 2009. These statements relate to future events or Natus' future financial performance or results, and involve known and unknown risks, uncertainties and other factors that may cause actual results, levels of activity, performance, or achievements to differ materially from those expressed or implied by the forward-looking statements. Forward-looking statements are only predictions and the actual events or results may differ materially. Natus cannot provide any assurance that the future results or the results implied by the forward-looking statements will meet expectations. The results could differ materially due to a number of factors, including the effects of competition, challenges incurred in integrating acquired companies, the demand for products and services, the ability to expand sales in international markets, the ability to maintain current sales levels in a mature domestic market, the ability to control costs, and risks associate with bringing new products to market. Natus disclaims any obligation to update information contained in any forward-looking statement.
More information about potential risk factors that could affect the business and financial results of Natus is included in Natus' annual report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2006, and its quarterly reports on Form 10-Q, and in other reports filed from time to time by Natus with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission.
Item 9.01     Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d)  The following exhibits are filed herewith:
Exhibits.  
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.

Exhibit 99.1
Natus Medical Announces Integration and Restructuring
Plan Expected to Result in an Operating Cost Reduction of $2.4 Million in 2009
SAN CARLOS, Calif.--(BUSINESS WIRE)-- (Nasdaq:BABY) today announced that it has adopted an integration and restructuring plan that is designed to eliminate redundant costs resulting from prior acquisitions and to improve efficiencies in operations. Under the plan, the company will centralize the research and development activities supporting each of the companys three main product families, as follows:
Natus Medical Incorporated
Activities associated with North American diagnostic neurology product lines will be consolidated at the Xltek facility in Oakville, Ontario, Canada;
Activities associated with newborn hearing screening and diagnostic hearing product lines will be consolidated at the Bio-logic facility in Mundelein, Illinois; and
Activities associated with other newborn care products will be consolidated at the Olympic Medical facility in Seattle, Washington.
In addition, the Company will eliminate redundancies in North American field sales and service personnel resulting from the acquisition of Xltek. Finally, the company will eliminate certain production resources as it continues to outsource assemblies to contract manufacturers. In addition to the termination of employees in some facilities, the plan provides for the hiring of new employees in others to staff up the required functions.
These actions will be phased in during the first nine months of 2008. The Company expects these actions to be essentially cost neutral in 2008, as savings during the year will be largely offset by severance costs, which the company expects to total approximately $800,000. The plan is expected to result in a net cost reduction before tax of approximately $2.4 million in 2009.
Jim Hawkins, President and Chief Executive Officer of the Company commented, We believe that with the recent Xltek acquisition, Natus has now achieved a critical mass that enables it to effect this strategic consolidation and realize the economic benefits that should flow from it. We will eliminate duplicate functions and streamline our operations allowing us to deliver new products to the market in an even more efficient manner. We expect this integration and restructuring will also position us to further increase productivity, promote more efficient sales support, and strengthen a superior customer experience, all in line with our strategic plan.
This plan should also enable us to reduce our research and development costs to approximately nine percent of revenue, in line with the target we have referenced for more than a year, added Hawkins.
Financial Guidance
On December 18, 2007, the Company communicated its financial guidance for the full year and first quarter 2008. In light of the nominal cost benefit of the plan in 2008, the Company is not changing that guidance. For the first quarter ending March 31, 2008, the Company expects revenue to range from $34.5 million to $36.0 million and earnings per share to range from $0.09 to $0.10. For the full year, the Company expects to report revenue of approximately $160 million and earnings per share of $0.68 to $0.70. The Companys revenue and earnings guidance for the first quarter and year presumes that the Company receives clearance from the FDA to ship the Olympic Cool-Cap System in the United States. In the December 18, 2007 release, the Company also announced certain cost savings it expected to achieve from synergies associated with the Xltek acquisition, and incorporated those savings into its projections for 2008.
About Natus Medical Incorporated
Natus is a leading provider of healthcare products used for the screening, detection, treatment, monitoring and tracking of common medical ailments such as hearing impairment, neurological dysfunction, epilepsy, sleep disorders, and newborn care. Product offerings include computerized neurodiagnostic systems for audiology, neurology, polysomnography, and neonatology, as well as newborn care products such as hearing screening systems, phototherapy devices for the treatment of newborn jaundice, head-cooling products for the treatment of brain injury in newborns, and software systems for managing and tracking disorders and diseases for public health laboratories.
Additional information about Natus Medical can be found at www.natus.com.
Cautionary Information Regarding Forward-Looking Statements
This press release contains forward-looking statements as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, particularly statements regarding the expectations, beliefs, plans, intentions and strategies of Natus. These forward-looking statements include, but are not limited to, statements regarding severance costs, revenue and profitability of the Company in 2008, the reduction in annual operating costs in 2009, and the benefits of the integration and restructuring plan. These statements relate to future events or Natus future financial performance or results, and involve known and unknown risks, uncertainties and other factors that may cause actual results, levels of activity, performance, or achievements to differ materially from those expressed or implied by the forward-looking statements. Forward-looking statements are only predictions and the actual events or results may differ materially. Natus cannot provide any assurance that its future results or the results implied by the forward-looking statements will meet expectations. The future results of Natus could differ materially due to a number of factors, including the effects of competition, challenges incurred in integrating acquired companies, the demand for products and services, the ability to expand sales in international markets, the ability to maintain current sales levels in a mature domestic market, the ability to control costs, and risks associated with bringing new products to market. Natus disclaims any obligation to update information contained in any forward-looking statement.
More information about potential risk factors that could affect the business and financial results of Natus is included in Natus annual report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2006, and its quarterly reports on Form 10-Q, and in other reports filed from time to time by Natus with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission.
CONTACT: Natus Medical Incorporated Steven J. Murphy, 650-802-0400 Chief Financial Officer InvestorRelations@Natus.com


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BABY/BABY-8K-20080212160532.txt.gz
TIME:20080212160532
EVENTS:	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On December 3, 2007, Natus Medical Incorporated (the "Company") filed a Current Report on Form 8-K to report that it had completed the acquisition of Excel-Tech Ltd. ("Xltek"), based in Oakville, Ontario, Canada, pursuant to an Arrangement Agreement dated as of October 9, 2007 by and among the Company, Xltek and 4437713 Canada, Inc., a wholly-owned subsidiary of the Company. The Merger closed and became effective on November 29, 2007. This Form 8-K/A is being filed to provide the financial statements described under Item 9.01 below. These financial statements are filed as Exhibits 99.1, 99.2, and 99.3 to this Form 8-K/A.
 
(a) Financial Statements of Business Acquired
The required financial statements of Excel-Tech Ltd. as of January 31, 2007 and 2006, and for the years ended January 31, 2007, 2006 and 2005 are attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1 and are incorporated in their entirety herein by reference.
The required financial statements of Excel-Tech Ltd. as of July 31, 2007 and January 31, 2007, and for the six months ended July 31, 2007 and 2006 are attached hereto as Exhibit 99.2 and are incorporated in their entirety herein by reference.
(b) Pro Forma Financial Information
The required pro forma financial information as of and for the nine months ended September 30, 2007, and for the twelve months ended December 31, 2006 is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.3 and is incorporated in its entirety herein by reference.
(d) Exhibits
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
Exhibit Index

EXHIBIT 23.1
We consent to the incorporation by reference in Registration Statements Nos. 333-65584 and 333-133657 on Form S-8 and Registration Statement No. 333-133480 on Form S-3 of Natus Medical Incorporated of our report dated March 30, 2007, except as to Note 18, which is as of February 4, 2008, with respect to the consolidated balance sheets of Excel-Tech Ltd. as of January 31, 2007 and 2006 and the related consolidated statements of operations and deficit and cash flows for each of the years in the three-year period ended January 31, 2007, which reports appear in the Form 8-K/A of Natus Medical Incorporated dated February 12, 2008.

Exhibit 99.1
Consolidated Financial Statements
Excel-Tech Ltd.
January 31, 2007
To the Shareholders of
Excel-Tech Ltd.
We have audited the accompanying consolidated balance sheets of Excel-Tech Ltd. as at January 31, 2007 and 2006 and the related consolidated statements of operations and deficit and cash flows for each of the years in the three-year period ended January 31, 2007. These financial statements are the responsibility of the Company's management. Our responsibility is to express an opinion on these financial statements based on our audits.
We conducted our audits in accordance with Canadian generally accepted auditing standards and with auditing standards generally accepted in the United States of America. Those standards require that we plan and perform an audit to obtain reasonable assurance whether the financial statements are free of material misstatement. We were not engaged to perform an audit of the Company's internal control over financial reporting. Our audits included consideration of internal control over financial reporting as a basis for designing audit procedures that are appropriate in the circumstances, but not for the purpose of expressing an opinion on the effectiveness of the Company's internal control over financial reporting. Accordingly, we express no such opinion. An audit also includes assessing the accounting principles used and significant estimates made by management, as well as evaluating the overall financial statement presentation.
In our opinion, these consolidated financial statements present fairly, in all material respects, the financial position of the Company as at January 31, 2007 and 2006 and the results of its operations and its cash flows for each of the years in the three-year period ended January 31, 2007, in conformity with Canadian generally accepted accounting principles.
 
Excel-Tech Ltd.
 
See accompanying notes
On behalf of the Board:
 
Excel-Tech Ltd
 
See accompanying notes
Excel-Tech Ltd.
 
 
See accompanying notes
1. NATURE OF OPERATIONS
Excel-Tech Ltd. [the "Company"] was incorporated as a Canada Business Corporation on May 29, 1981. The Company is a medical technology company focused on the design, development and marketing of products that are used in the monitoring of the nervous system and the diagnosis and treatment of related disorders. These products are primarily sold to healthcare professionals, hospitals and healthcare centres, the great majority of which are located in North America.
On May 31, 2001, Excel-Tech Ltd. USA was incorporated in the State of Delaware. This corporation is a wholly-owned subsidiary of the Company and has been inactive since its incorporation.
2. SUMMARY OF SIGNIFICANT ACCOUNTING POLICIES
The consolidated financial statements have been prepared by management in accordance with Canadian generally accepted accounting principles. The significant accounting policies are summarized as follows:
Cash
Cash includes cash on hand, balances with banks and demand deposits.
Short-term investments
The Company is subject to investment risk on investments that it makes with excess cash. Investment risk is mitigated by restricting investments to investment grade quality instruments of AA or better, with no more than 10% of the total investment value invested in any one investment of a quality less than AAA. There exists modest income exposure to a decline in interest rates due to a potential change in interest rates.
Short-term investments include investments with maturities greater than 90 days and less than one year at the time of the investment, as well as investments with maturities greater than one year that can be promptly liquidated. The yield on these investments ranges between 4.14% and 4.17% [2006 - between 2.8% and 3.4%] with a weighted average yield thereon of 4.15% [2006 - 3.0%]. Investments are carried at the lower of cost plus accrued income and quoted market value. Short-term investments have realizable values that approximate the carrying values.
 
1
Government assistance
Government assistance is available to the Company through income tax investment and innovation tax credits.
Investment and innovation tax credits are recognized as qualifying expenditures are made. They are accounted for using the cost reduction method and, accordingly, are deducted from either the cost of property, plant and equipment or research and development expenditures, as applicable, provided that there is reasonable assurance the credits will be recovered.
Inventories
Raw materials and supplies are valued at the lower of cost and replacement cost. Finished goods are valued at the lower of cost and net realizable value. Cost is determined on a first-in, first-out basis and includes direct material, as well as labour costs and an allocation of overhead for finished goods and work-in-process. Inventories also include demonstration units, which are valued at the lower of cost and net realizable value.
Corporate transaction costs
The corporate transaction costs of obtaining debt financing are deferred and amortized on a straight-line basis over the term of the related debt, as further described in note 6[i].
The corporate transaction costs incurred in connection with the proposed initial public offering of common shares, as further described in note 7 and totaling $584 during the year ended January 31, 2006, were fully deferred and have been charged against the equity raised on the closing of the offering during the year ended January 31, 2007, as further described in note 7.
Property, plant and equipment
Property, plant and equipment are stated at cost less accumulated amortization. The property, plant and equipment are amortized on a declining balance basis over their estimated useful lives at the following rates:
 
 
2
 
Deferred revenue
Deferred revenue consists of amounts received or receivable with respect to sales contracts for medical devices and ongoing support, where the Company is not yet in a position to recognize the revenue from those contracts. Revenue recognition will take place according to the accounting policies described under revenue recognition.
Use of estimates
The preparation of consolidated financial statements in conformity with Canadian generally accepted accounting principles requires management to make estimates and assumptions that affect the reported amounts of assets and liabilities, disclosure of contingent assets and liabilities at the date of the consolidated financial statements and the reported amounts of revenue and expenses during the reporting period. Actual results could differ from those estimates.
Financial instruments and risk management
The fair values of cash, short-term investments, accounts receivable, investment tax credits receivable, and accounts payable and accrued liabilities approximate their carrying values due to the short-term nature of these financial instruments. The fair value of long-term debt approximates its carrying values as the debt bears interest at floating rates or at rates comparable to current market rates.
The Company is exposed to interest rate risk on a portion of its long-term debt.
The Company earns revenue and incurs expenses denominated in U.S. dollars and is exposed to foreign exchange risk from fluctuations in foreign currency rates on U.S. dollar monetary working capital balances. The Company engages in forward exchange contracts to reduce the impact of fluctuations in foreign currency exchange rates on its operating results and cash flows. Foreign exchange gains and losses on these forward exchange contracts are recorded in the consolidated statements of operations and deficit. The Company is exposed to losses should any counterparty to its forward exchange contracts fail to fulfill its obligations. The Company has sought to minimize potential counterparty risk and losses by conducting such transactions with Canadian chartered banks.
The Company is exposed to credit risk from customers in the normal course of business. However, the risk is reduced by the nature of the Company's client base and by credit policies that include regular monitoring of the debtor's payment history and performance.
Foreign currency translation
Monetary assets and liabilities denominated in foreign currencies are translated into Canadian dollars at the exchange rates prevailing at the consolidated balance sheet dates. Non-monetary assets and liabilities are translated at historical exchange rates. Revenue and expenses are translated at the approximate rate of exchange prevailing at the date of the transaction. All gains and losses are included in the consolidated statements of operations and deficit as they arise.
 
3
 
Income taxes
The Company follows the liability method of accounting for income taxes. Under this method, future income tax assets and liabilities are determined based on differences between the financial reporting and tax bases of assets and liabilities and are measured using the substantively enacted tax rates and laws expected to be in effect when the differences are expected to reverse. A valuation allowance is recorded against any future income tax asset if it is more likely than not that the asset will not be realized.
Revenue recognition
The Company's revenue is primarily derived from the sale of medical devices, product installations, accessories and extended warranty and support. Revenue from the sale of medical devices is recognized upon shipment or implementation; when there is persuasive evidence of an arrangement [including a purchase order or similar written agreement that establishes the principal terms and conditions of the sale arrangement]; when the Company has no remaining significant performance requirements related to the sale, such as installation or in-service training, when required; the price is fixed or determinable; and collection is reasonably assured. Revenue from the sale of accessories is recognized upon delivery, when the price is fixed or determinable, and collection is reasonably assured. Revenue for ongoing support under extended warranty agreements is recognized ratably over the term of the contract. Provisions are established for estimated product returns at the time revenue is recognized.
The Company also enters into revenue arrangements with multiple deliverables, consisting of medical devices and extended warranty. The Company has established vendor specific objective evidence of the fair value of extended warranty and uses the residual method to determine the fair value of the delivered medical devices. For these arrangements, the Company has separated the deliverables into units of accounting, and recognized the individual units based on the respective revenue recognition policy as noted above.
The Company also enters into arrangements that provide for the delivery of medical devices, future replacements and/or unspecified upgrades of such medical devices, and extended warranty. The Company accounts for these arrangements on a subscription basis whereby all arrangement revenues are recognized ratably over the term of the arrangement, generally having an initial term of 4 or 5 years, beginning with the delivery of the first product or service under the arrangement.
Research and development costs
Research costs are expensed in the year in which they are incurred. Development costs that meet the generally accepted criteria for deferral are deferred and amortized over their useful lives. No development costs have been deferred to date.
 
4
 
Stock-based compensation plan
Effective February 1, 2003, the Company adopted prospectively the recommendations of The Canadian Institute of Chartered Accountants' Handbook Section 3870, "Stock-Based Compensation and Other Stock-Based Payments" ["CICA 3870"]. The new recommendations are generally applicable only to awards granted after the date of adoption. In accordance with the recommendations, the fair value method is used and stock-based awards granted to employees are expensed over the vesting period with a corresponding credit to contributed surplus. The Company's stock-based compensation plan is further described in note 8.
Earnings per share
Basic earnings per share are calculated using the weighted average number of common shares that are outstanding during the year. Diluted earnings per share are calculated using the weighted average number of common and potential common shares outstanding during the year. Potential common shares consist of the incremental common shares issuable upon the exercise of stock options using the treasury stock method, and conversion of the Series A preferred shares and convertible subordinated loans using the as if converted method. The treasury stock method assumes that the proceeds from the issuance of potential common shares are used to repurchase common shares at the average share price during the year. The Company determined the potential dilutive impact of outstanding stock options to be nil, and of Series A preferred shares to be anti-dilutive.
Impairment of long-lived assets
The Company reviews long-lived assets such as property, plant and equipment, patents and trademarks and license technology for impairment whenever events or changes in circumstance indicate that the carrying amount may not be recoverable. When indicators of impairment of the carrying value of long-lived assets exist, and the carrying value is greater than the net recoverable value, an impairment loss is recognized to the extent that the fair value is below the carrying value.
Hedging relationships
Effective February 1, 2004, the Company adopted Accounting Guideline 13 ["AcG-13"], "Hedging Relationships", and Emerging Issues Committee decision 128 ["EIC-128"], "Accounting for Trading, Speculative or Non-Hedging Derivative Financial Instruments". Derivative instruments that do not qualify as a hedge under AcG-13, or are not designated as a hedge, are recorded in the consolidated balance sheet as either an asset or liability, with changes in fair value recognized in the consolidated statement of operations and deficit. The Company has elected not to designate any of its foreign exchange forward contracts as accounting hedges under AcG-13 and, accordingly, has accounted for all these derivative financial instruments on a mark to market valuation basis. For the year ended January 31, 2007, as a result of applying EIC-128, the Company recognized a derivative financial instrument liability and a loss of $126 [2006 - asset and a gain of $171], which is included in foreign exchange loss (gain).
The Company does not utilize derivative financial instruments for trading or speculative purposes.
 
5
 
3. INVENTORIES
Inventories consist of the following:
 
4. PROPERTY, PLANT AND EQUIPMENT
Property, plant and equipment consist of the following:
 
 
6
 
 
The amount charged for amortization of property, plant and equipment, and the consolidated statements of operations caption within which the amortization expense is included, is as follows:
 
5. CREDIT FACILITY
In December 2006, the Company renegotiated its credit facility with a chartered bank. The credit facility is repayable on demand and is collateralized by an Authority to Hold Funds in the amount of $1,000. As at January 31, 2007, this amount has been invested according to the Company's investment policy and was earning interest at an annual rate of 3.95%. Due to the investment being utilized as collateral, the amount has been classified on the consolidated balance sheets as restricted short-term investments.
The credit facility is an operating demand loan, for $1,000, with interest rates payable as follows:
 
The Company is in compliance with all covenants of this credit facility.
Prior to renegotiation of the credit facility in December 2006, the Company's short-term credit facility was repayable on demand, collateralized by various assets, and governed by certain restrictive financial covenants. The credit facility was as follows:
 
7
 
During the year ended January 31, 2007, prior to renegotiation, the Company did not comply with a financial covenant that required positive EBITDA for the rolling four quarters ended April 30, July 31, and October 31, 2006. At the end of the first quarter of this fiscal year, the bank waived compliance with this covenant for the three quarters.
During the year ended January 31, 2006, the Company did not comply with a financial covenant that required positive EBITDA for the rolling three-month periods ended March 31, 2005 and July 31, 2005. This covenant was amended in August 2005 and the Company was in compliance with the amended covenant as at January 31, 2006.
As at January 31, 2007 and 2006, the Company had not utilized any of the available operating demand loan.
The interest charge for the year ended January 31, 2007 on the operating demand loan is $15 [2006 - $37; 2005 - $33]. The interest income recognized on cash and cash equivalents and short-term investments for the year ended January 31, 2007 is $496 [2006 - $151; 2005 - $202].
 
8
 
6. LONG-TERM DEBT
Long-term debt consists of the following:
 
 
During the year ended January 31, 2007, the Company repaid the $2,000 principal amount which was Deployed funds plus accrued interest thereon and repaid the $3,000 principal amount which was Not Deployed funds plus accrued interest thereon. Pursuant to the provisions of a conversion/purchase option make-whole agreement [the "Make-Whole Agreement"] between the Company and each convertible subordinated loan lender dated as of February 15, 2006, the Company agreed to pay an aggregate of $500 to the lenders in consideration for the elimination of the conversion and repurchase rights available to the lenders under the convertible subordinated loan. The $500 payment has been charged as an expense to the consolidated statements of operations and deficit during the year ended January 31, 2007.
Associated with this loan was $7 in corporate transaction costs that was deferred as at January 31, 2006 and which has been charged within general and administrative expenses during the year ended January 31, 2007 [2006 - $30; 2005 - $32].
 
9
 
Included in financial expenses for the year ended January 31, 2007 is $253 [2006 - $552; 2005 - $474] of interest on long-term debt. The long-term debt is subject to certain covenants and undertakings by the Company.
The principal repayments on the long-term debt over the next five years and thereafter are as follows for the years ending January 31:
 
7. SHARE CAPITAL
As at January 31, 2007, the authorized share capital of the Company consists of unlimited, no par value, common shares. The following is the changes in the issued share capital of the Company during the year ended January 31, 2007:
 
 
10
 
Under the terms of an underwriting agreement dated April 13, 2006, the Company agreed to issue 4,500,000 common shares for a total amount of $22,500. Closing of the offering occurred on April 25, 2006. The net proceeds of this issue were $19,190 net of issue expenses and underwriters' fees in the aggregate amounting to $3,310.
Prior to the closing of the issue of common shares, the Company consolidated its existing common shares and Series A preferred shares on a 2.5 for 1 basis [which has been reflected retroactively in these consolidated financial statements] and holders of the Series A preferred shares converted all of their Series A preferred shares into 9,443,964 common shares, based on a conversion rate of 5.8 common shares for each Series A preferred share.
8. STOCK-BASED COMPENSATION
On October 19, 2000, the Board of Directors approved the creation of an employee stock option plan [the "Former Plan"]. The Former Plan was amended by a Board of Directors' resolution on April 16, 2001 to authorize the reservation of up to 900,000 common shares of the Company for issuance under the Former Plan. During fiscal 2006, the options granted under the Former Plan were surrendered for cancellation by the holders and the Former Plan was repealed on January 30, 2006. As a result, during the fourth quarter of fiscal 2006 the Company incurred a charge to the consolidated statements of operations and deficit of $491, representing the unamortized grant date fair value of the options cancelled, with a corresponding increase to contributed surplus.
The Company determined compensation expense relating to the Former Plan based on the fair values at the grant dates of the stock options granted subsequent to January 31, 2003, consistent with the fair value method, and consequently charged $690, including the charge of $491 on repeal of the Former Plan, to the consolidated statements of operations and deficit during fiscal 2006 [2005 - $115]. The estimated fair value at the date of grant for options granted for the year ended January 31, 2006 was $2.43 per option [2005 - $2.15].
Had the Company determined compensation expense based on the fair values at the grant dates of the stock options granted prior to January 31, 2003, the Company's pro forma net loss for those stock options issued before the adoption of CICA 3870 would be as follows:
 
On April 25, 2006 the Board of Directors approved the creation of a new employee stock option plan [the "Option Plan"]. The number of common shares which may be reserved and set aside for issuance under the Option Plan was fixed by the Board of Directors at a maximum of 1,902,497 common shares. Under the terms of the Option Plan, the options vest evenly over a period of three
 
11
 
years on each anniversary date. The life of any option shall not exceed five years from the date of grant. The Company charged $252 to the consolidated statements of operations and deficit during the year ended January 31, 2007.
For the purposes of calculating the stock-based compensation expense, the estimated fair value of the options is amortized and expensed over the options' vesting period on a straight-line basis. The fair value of options granted was estimated using the Black-Scholes option pricing model with the following assumptions:
 
The Black-Scholes option pricing model used by the Company to determine fair values was developed for use in estimating the fair value of freely traded options that are fully transferable and have no vesting restrictions. This model requires the use of highly subjective assumptions, including future stock price volatility and expected time until exercise. Because the Company's outstanding stock options have characteristics that are significantly different from those of traded options, and because changes in any of these assumptions can materially affect the fair value estimate, in management's opinion, the existing models may not provide a reliable single measure of the fair value of its stock options.
 
12
 
A summary of the status of the Company's Option Plan and the changes during the periods is presented below:
 
There were no options exercisable as at January 31, 2007. The remaining contractual life of the outstanding options as at January 31, 2007 was approximately 4.3 years. As a result of the repeal of the Former Plan, there were no outstanding options as at January 31, 2006 related to the Former Plan.
On May 16, 2006, the Board of Directors approved the creation of a Deferred Share Unit Plan [the "DSU Plan"] for eligible directors. Under the DSU Plan, each eligible director is required to receive fifty percent of his annual remuneration in the form of deferred share units, and may elect to receive the full remuneration in deferred share units. The number of deferred share units is determined by dividing the amount of remuneration by a price which is no less than the five day weighted average closing price per common share immediately preceding the grant date as such price may be determined by the Board of Directors. Following termination of Board service, the eligible director must provide written notice to the Company to redeem, on no more than two dates [each such date a "Redemption Date"] specified by the eligible director, occurring on or after the date of the notice and no later than December 1 of the first calendar year commencing after the time of such termination of Board service. The deferred share units may be redeemed on the Redemption Date for an amount equal to the number of deferred share units multiplied by the five-day weighted average closing price per common share immediately preceding the Redemption Date, less any applicable deductions and withholdings. At the sole discretion of the Company, the redemption amount can be paid in the form of either a lump sum cash payment, the issuance from treasury of common shares equal to the number of deferred share units redeemed in such manner, or by way of a combination of both forms of payment, provided that the number of common shares that may be reserved for issuance and issued does not exceed 200,000 common shares. As at January 31, 2007, there were 35,432 deferred share units granted to directors, in respect of which the Company charged $102 to the consolidated statements of operations and deficit during the year ended January 31, 2007 with a corresponding increase to contributed surplus.
 
13
 
9. SHARE PURCHASE LOAN
This amount represents an advance to a shareholder of the Company to facilitate the purchase of the Company's common shares. The advance is non-interest bearing and has no repayment terms. Accordingly, the amount has been presented within shareholders' equity.
10. RESEARCH AND DEVELOPMENT
Research and development is presented net of investment and innovation tax credits as follows:
 
11. INCOME TAXES
Significant components of the Company's future tax assets and liabilities are as follows:
 
As at January 31, 2007, the Company has accumulated tax losses for federal and provincial purposes in Canada and unclaimed Canadian scientific research and development investment tax credits. As at January 31, 2007, the Company has $5,208 in non-capital losses which expire in 2027 and investment tax credits which expire as follows:
 
14
 
As at January 31, 2007, the scientific research and experimental development pool of $10,466 and $18,555 are also available to be carried forward indefinitely for federal and Ontario tax purposes respectively. The benefits of these deductions have not been reflected in the consolidated financial statements.
 
15
 
Provision for (recovery of) income taxes
The following is a reconciliation of the provision for (recovery of) income taxes between those that are expected, based on substantively enacted rates, to those currently reported:
 
12. NET CHANGE IN NON-CASH WORKING CAPITAL BALANCES
The net change in non-cash working capital balances related to operations consists of the following:
 
 
16
 
13. COMMITMENTS AND CONTINGENCIES
Commitments
The Company, in the normal course of business, uses forward foreign exchange contracts to fix the exchange rate on a portion of its expected revenue from foreign customers.
The Company has a forward foreign exchange line of credit for which as at January 31, 2007, there were ten contracts outstanding with expiry dates ranging from February 2007 to October 2007 to sell a total of U.S.$4,600 at rates ranging from 1.1145 to 1.1711 [average rate of 1.1448]. The fair market value of these contracts as at January 31, 2007 was a loss of $126.
As at January 31, 2006, there were ten contracts outstanding with expiry dates ranging from February 2006 to June 2006 to sell a total of U.S.$5,000 at rates ranging from 1.1577 to 1.1795 [average rate of 1.1712]. The fair market value of these contracts as at January 31, 2006 was a gain of $171.
As at January 31, 2005, there were six contracts outstanding with expiry dates ranging from February 24, 2005 to July 26, 2005 to sell a total of U.S.$4,500 at rates ranging from 1.2013 to 1.2406 [average rate of 1.2204]. The fair market value of these contracts as at January 31, 2005 was a loss of $90.
The U.S. dollar exchange rate as at January 31, 2007 was 1.1770 [2006 - 1.1390; 2005 - 1.2412].
Contingencies
An action was commenced on November 30, 2004 in the Superior Court of the State of California against the Company and a customer of the Company, by a plaintiff seeking reimbursement of monies spent in connection with her participation in a medical study, the records of which were allegedly lost by the defendants. It is alleged that data recording the results of the study was deleted while the Company was installing software at the customer's facility. The plaintiff is seeking to be a representative of a class of persons with a similar claim. The plaintiff's claims are for unspecified general and special damages and reimbursement of monies, which she and other members of the potential class have paid to the Company's customer. The Company has denied liability and is being defended by its liability insurer. The proceedings in this matter are ongoing and it is not possible to determine the outcome at this time.
During the ordinary course of business activities, the Company may be contingently liable for other litigation and become a party to claims. Management believes that adequate provisions have been made in the accounts where required. Although it is not possible to estimate the extent of potential costs and losses, if any, management believes that the ultimate resolution of such contingencies will not have a material adverse effect on the financial position of the Company.
 
17
 
14. RELATED PARTY TRANSACTIONS
The Company incurred legal expenses with a law firm which has a partner who was also a member of the Board of Directors of the Company until April 25, 2006 and an officer of the Company thereafter. During fiscal 2007, the total of these expenses included on the consolidated statements of operations and deficit was $183 [2006 - $99; 2005 - $364]. As at January 31, 2007, $25 [2006 - $376] remains in accounts payable and accrued liabilities and nil [2006 - $382] remains deferred within corporate transaction costs.
15. SEGMENTED INFORMATION
The Company operates in a single reportable segment focused on the design, development, assembly and distribution of medical systems and components for use in the healthcare field.
The Company sells to customers throughout the world. The following table represents the geographic distribution of the Company's revenues:
 
No single customer accounted for more than 10% of consolidated revenues for the years ended January 31, 2007, 2006 and 2005.
The Company manufactures out of its facilities in Canada, and consequently the geographic location of the Company's net book value of property, plant and equipment is located in Canada.
16. RESTRUCTURING
In the fourth quarter ended January 31, 2007, due primarily to recent Local Coverage Determinations trends related to restrictions on reimbursement by Medicare to physicians for automatic nerve conduction testing for the initial identification of peripheral neuropathy, the Company took actions to reduce its NeuroPATH sales and marketing staff and to cut costs. As a result of these actions, the Company incurred a charge in the fourth quarter of $1,405, largely attributable to severance, write-down of excess inventory, provisions for product returns, and contract termination costs, of which $431 remains in accounts payable and accrued liabilities as at January 31, 2007. Of the total charge, $193 was included within revenues, $562 was included within cost of sales, $418 was included within selling expenses and $232 was included within research and development expenses.
17. COMPARATIVE CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
The comparative consolidated financial statements have been reclassified from statements previously presented to conform to the presentation of the 2007 consolidated financial statements.
 
18
 
18. CANADIAN AND UNITED STATES ACCOUNTING POLICY DIFFERENCES
The consolidated financial statements have been prepared in accordance with Canadian GAAP. The principles adopted in these financial statements conform in all material respects to those of U.S. GAAP, except as summarized below. Significant differences between Canadian and U.S. GAAP would have the following effect on net income of the Company:
 
The following table indicates the differences between the amounts of certain consolidated balance sheet items determined in accordance with Canadian and U.S. GAAP:
 
 
23
 
 
Comprehensive Loss
The Company's comprehensive loss is equal to its reported net loss for all periods presented.
Recent U.S. GAAP Accounting Pronouncements:
In December 2004, the Financial Accounting Standards Board ("FASB") issued Statement of Financial Accounting Standard Number ("SFAS") No. 123R, . On March 29, 2005, the Securities and Exchange Commission issued Staff Accounting Bulletin Number ("SAB") No. 107, which provides guidance regarding the adoption of SFAS No. 123R. These pronouncements require all share-based payments to employees, including grants of employee stock options, to be recognized as compensation expense in the consolidated financial statements based on their fair values. Since the Company previously elected to expense employee stock-based compensation using the fair value method prospectively for all awards granted on or after February 1, 2003 in accordance with Canadian GAAP, which is consistent with SFAS No. 123, management has determined that there would not be a GAAP difference.
Share-Based Payment
In March 2006, FASB Emerging Issues Task Force ("EITF") issued EITF 06-03, . A consensus was reached that entities may adopt a policy of presenting sales taxes in the income statement on either a gross or net basis. If taxes are significant, an entity should disclose its policy of presenting taxes. The Company adopted EITF 06-03 on February 1, 2007. The Company presents sales net of sales taxes, and as such, EITF 06-03 will have no impact on our method for recording sales taxes in the consolidated financial statements.
How Sales Taxes Collected From Customers and Remitted to Governmental Authorities Should Be Presented in the Income Statement
In June 2006, the FASB issued Interpretation ("FIN") No. 48, . FIN No. 48 is an interpretation of FASB Statement No. 109, . This Interpretation clarifies the accounting for uncertainty in income taxes recognized in an entity's financial statements in accordance with SFAS No. 109. The interpretation describes a recognition threshold and measurement attribute for the financial statement disclosure of tax positions taken or expected to be taken. It also provides for guidance on derecognition, classification, interest and penalties, accounting in interim periods, disclosures, and transition. FIN No. 48 is effective for fiscal
Accounting for Uncertainty in Income Taxes
Accounting for Income Taxes
 
20
 
years beginning after December 15, 2006, with the cumulative effect of the change in accounting principle recorded as an adjustment to the beginning balance of retained earnings in the period of adoption. The adoption of SFAS No. 148 did not have a material impact on the Company's results of operations or financial position.
In September 2006, the SEC issued SAB 108, which provides guidance on how prior year misstatements should be taken into consideration when quantifying misstatements in current year financial statements for purposes of determining whether the current year's financial statements are materially misstated. SAB 108 permits registrants to record the cumulative effect of initial adoption by recording the necessary "correcting" adjustments to the carrying values of assets and liabilities as of the beginning of that year with the offsetting adjustment recorded to the opening balance of retained earnings only if material under the dual method. SAB 108 is effective for fiscal years ending on or after November 15, 2006. The adoption of SAB 108 did not have a material impact on the Company's results of operations or financial position.
 
21

Exhibit 99.2
Interim Consolidated Financial Statements
Excel-Tech Ltd.
July 31, 2007
 
 
See accompanying notes
 
See accompanying notes
 
See accompanying notes
1. NATURE OF OPERATIONS
Excel-Tech Ltd. [the "Company"] was incorporated as a Canada Business Corporation on May 29, 1981. The Company is a medical technology company focused on the design, development and marketing of products that are used in the monitoring of the nervous system and the diagnosis and treatment of related disorders. These products are primarily sold to healthcare professionals, hospitals and healthcare centres, the great majority of which are located in North America.
On May 31, 2001, Excel-Tech Ltd. USA was incorporated in the State of Delaware. This corporation is a wholly-owned subsidiary of the Company and has been inactive since its incorporation.
2. INTERIM CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND SIGNIFICANT ACCOUNTING POLICIES
The unaudited interim consolidated financial statements have been prepared by management in accordance with Canadian generally accepted accounting principles ["GAAP"] applicable to interim financial statements and follow the same accounting policies and methods of their application as the most recent audited consolidated financial statements for the year ended January 31, 2007, except as noted below. These unaudited interim consolidated financial statements do not contain all disclosures required by Canadian GAAP for annual financial statements, and accordingly, should be read together with the audited consolidated financial statements and accompanying notes for the year ended January 31, 2007.
On February 1, 2007, the Company adopted The Canadian Institute of Chartered Accountants ["CICA"] Handbook Sections 1530, "Comprehensive Income", 3855, "Financial Instruments  Recognition and Measurement", and 3865, "Hedges". These standards require that fair value, not historical cost, is the appropriate method for measuring certain financial instruments. The adoption of the new standards resulted in changes in the accounting of financial instruments as well as the recognition of certain adjustments as described below. During the six months ended July 31, 2007, the overall impact on net income as a result of the adoption was an increase of $82 in net income, which did not effect earnings per share. Prior periods have not been restated.
On February 1, 2007, the following adjustments were made to the consolidated balance sheet to adopt the new requirements:
 
The principal changes in the accounting for financial instruments and hedges are described below:
[a] Comprehensive income
 
Comprehensive income is comprised of the Company's net income and other comprehensive income. During the six months ended July 31, 2007, the Company did not have any items that meet the criteria for recognition as comprehensive income and as a result, a statement of comprehensive income is not shown.
[b] Hedges and derivatives
The new accounting rules require that hedging derivatives be recorded at fair value on the consolidated balance sheets. The Company earns revenue and incurs expenses denominated in U.S. dollars and is exposed to foreign exchange risk from fluctuations in foreign currency rates on U.S. dollar monetary working capital balances. The Company engages in forward exchange contracts to reduce the impact of fluctuations in foreign currency exchange rates on its operating results and cash flows. Effective February 1, 2004, the Company adopted Accounting Guideline 13 ["AcG-13"], "Hedging Relationships", and Emerging Issues Committee decision 128 ["EIC-128"], "Accounting for Trading, Speculative or Non-Hedging Derivative Financial Instruments". Derivative instruments that do not qualify as a hedge under AcG-13, or are not designated as a hedge, are recorded in the consolidated balance sheets as either an asset or liability, with changes in fair value recognized in the consolidated statements of operations and deficit. The Company had elected not to designate any of its foreign exchange forward contracts as accounting hedges under AcG-13 and, accordingly, had previously accounted for all these derivative financial instruments on a mark to market valuation basis. Foreign exchange gains and losses on these foreign exchange forward contracts were recorded in the consolidated statements of operations and deficit. The Company continues to elect not to designate any of its foreign exchange forward contracts as accounting hedges. As a result, there is no impact of this change in accounting policy on the interim consolidated financial statements.
The Company also has purchase and sales contracts denominated in a foreign currency, other than the functional currency of one of the substantial parties of the contract. The Company has determined that these contracts contain an embedded derivative. As a result of the change in accounting policy, the embedded foreign currency derivative must be bifurcated from the host purchase or sale contract and recorded on the consolidated balance sheets at fair value. As of July 31, 2007, the Company has recorded an asset of $55 related to these contracts. For the six months ended July 31, 2007, a recovery of $71 was recorded in the consolidated statements of operations and deficit related to the net change in the fair value of the embedded foreign currency derivatives.
[c] Net investment in foreign operations
Gains and losses resulting from the translation of self-sustaining foreign operations are now recognized in other comprehensive income. On May 31, 2001, Excel-Tech Ltd. USA was incorporated in the State of Delaware. This corporation is a wholly-owned subsidiary of the Company and has been inactive since its incorporation. As a result, there is no impact of this change in accounting policy on the interim consolidated financial statements.
[d] Short-term investments
The Company has short-term investments which include investments with maturities greater than 90 days and less than one year at the time of the investment, as well as investments with maturities greater than one year that can be promptly liquidated. As at January 31, 2007,
 
investments were carried at the lower of cost plus accrued income and quoted market value. Due to this change in accounting policy, as at July 31, 2007, financial instruments held for trading are recorded at fair value with unrealized gains and losses included in net income. For the six months ended July 31, 2007, as a result of this change, there was an unrealized gain of $11 recorded in investment income in the consolidated statements of operations and deficit.
3. INVENTORIES
Inventories consist of the following:
 
4. PROPERTY, PLANT AND EQUIPMENT
Property, plant and equipment consist of the following:
 
 
5. CREDIT FACILITY
In December 2006, the Company renegotiated its credit facility with a chartered bank. The credit facility is repayable on demand and is collateralized by an Authority to Hold Funds in the amount of $1,000. As at July 31, 2007 and January 31, 2007, this amount has been invested according to the Company's investment policy and was earning interest at an annual rate of 3.95%. Due to the investment being utilized as collateral, the amount has been classified on the consolidated balance sheets as restricted short-term investments.
The credit facility is an operating demand loan, for $1,000, with interest rates payable as follows:
 
The Company is in compliance with all covenants of this credit facility.
Prior to renegotiation of the credit facility in December 2006, the Company's short-term credit facility was repayable on demand, collateralized by various assets, and governed by certain restrictive financial covenants. The credit facility was as follows:
An operating demand loan, for the lesser of [i] $3,000 and [ii] 80% of eligible accounts receivable plus 50% of eligible raw materials and supplies and finished goods inventory, is available by way of:
 
During the year ended January 31, 2007, prior to renegotiation, the Company did not comply with a financial covenant that required positive EBITDA for the rolling four quarters ended April 30, July 31 and October 31, 2006. At the end of the first quarter of fiscal 2007, the bank waived compliance with this covenant for the three quarters.
As at July 31 and January 31, 2007, the Company had not utilized any of the available operating demand loan.
The interest charge for the six months ended July 31, 2007 on the operating demand loan is $6 [six months ended July 31, 2006 - $7]. The investment income recognized on cash and short-term investments for the six months ended July 31, 2007 is $302 [six months ended July 31, 2006 - $225].
 
6. LONG-TERM DEBT
Long-term debt consists of the following:
 
Included in financial expenses for the six months ended July 31, 2007 is $71 [six months ended July 31, 2006 - 174] of interest on long-term debt. The long-term debt is subject to certain covenants and undertakings by the Company.
The principal repayments on the long-term debt are as follows for the periods indicated below:
 
 
7. SHARE CAPITAL
As at July 31, 2007 and January 31, 2007, the authorized share capital of the Company consists of unlimited, no par value, common shares, as follows:
 
8. STOCK-BASED COMPENSATION
On April 25, 2006, the Board of Directors approved the creation of a new employee stock option plan [the "Option Plan"]. The number of common shares which may be reserved and set aside for issuance under the Option Plan was fixed by the Board of Directors at a maximum of 1,902,497 common shares. Under the terms of the Option Plan, the options vest evenly over a period of three years on each anniversary date. The life of any option shall not exceed five years from the date of grant. During the six months ended July 31, 2007, the Company charged $159 to the consolidated statements of operations and deficit [six months ended July 31, 2006 - $92].
A summary of the status of the Company's Option Plan and the changes during the periods is presented below:
 
As at July 31, 2007, there were 132,667 options exercisable [January 31, 2007 - nil]. The remaining contractual life of the outstanding options as at July 31, 2007 was approximately 4.1 years [January 31, 2007 - 4.3 years].
On May 16, 2006, the Board of Directors approved the creation of a Deferred Share Unit Plan [the "DSU Plan"] for eligible directors. Under the DSU Plan, each eligible director is required to receive fifty percent of his annual remuneration in the form of deferred share units, and may elect to receive the full remuneration in deferred share units. The number of deferred share units is determined by dividing the amount of remuneration by a price which is no less than the five-day weighted average closing price per common share immediately preceding the grant date as such price may be determined by the Board of Directors. Following termination of Board service, the eligible director must provide written notice to the Company to redeem, on no more than two dates
 
[each such date a "Redemption Date"] specified by the eligible director, occurring on or after the date of the notice and no later than December 1 of the first calendar year commencing after the time of such termination of Board service. The deferred share units may be redeemed on the Redemption Date for an amount equal to the number of deferred share units multiplied by the five-day weighted average closing price per common share immediately preceding the Redemption Date, less any applicable deductions and withholdings. At the sole discretion of the Company, the redemption amount can be paid in the form of either a lump sum cash payment, the issuance from treasury of common shares equal to the number of deferred share units redeemed in such manner, or by way of a combination of both forms of payment, provided that the number of common shares that may be reserved for issuance and issued does not exceed 200,000 common shares. As at July 31, 2007, there were 79,600 [January 31, 2007 - 35,432] deferred share units granted to directors, in respect of which the Company charged $68 to the consolidated statements of operations and deficit during the six months ended July 31, 2007 with a corresponding increase to contributed surplus [six months ended July 31, 2006 - nil].
9. RESEARCH AND DEVELOPMENT
On July 9, 2007, the Company entered into an agreement with the National Research Council of Canada as represented by its Industrial Research Assistance Program ("NRC"). Under the terms of the agreement, the NRC agrees to contribute up to a maximum of $500 for costs incurred in the direct performance relating to the development of the Company's SleepRite project during the period from July 9, 2007 to May 31, 2008. This government assistance is recognized as qualifying expenditures are made. It is accounted for using the cost reduction method and, accordingly, is deducted from research and development expenditures provided there is reasonable assurance that the amounts will be recovered. Research and development is presented net of investment and innovation tax credits and government assistance, as follows:
 
 
10. NET CHANGE IN NON-CASH WORKING CAPITAL BALANCES
The net change in non-cash working capital balances related to operations consists of the following:
 
11. COMMITMENTS AND CONTINGENCIES
Commitments
The Company, in the normal course of business, uses forward foreign exchange contracts to fix the exchange rate on a portion of its expected revenue from foreign customers.
The Company has a forward foreign exchange line of credit for which, as at July 31, 2007, there were five contracts outstanding with expiry dates ranging from August 2007 to December 2007 to sell a total of U.S.$2,500 at rates ranging from 1.0624 to 1.1711 [average rate of 1.1267]. The fair market value of these contracts as at July 31, 2007 was a gain of $153.
As at January 31, 2007, there were 10 contracts outstanding with expiry dates ranging from February 2007 to October 2007 to sell a total of U.S.$4,600 at rates ranging from 1.1145 to 1.1711 [average rate of 1.1448]. The fair market value of these contracts as at January 31, 2007 was a loss of $126.
The U.S. dollar exchange rate as at July 31, 2007 was 1.0668 [January 31, 20071.1770].
Contingencies
There has been no change to the status of an action commenced on November 30, 2004 in the Superior Court of the State of California against the Company and a customer of the Company that was described in note 13 to the most recent audited consolidated financial statements of the Company for the year ended January 31, 2007.
12. RELATED PARTY TRANSACTIONS
The Company incurred legal expenses with a law firm which has a partner who was also a member of the Board of Directors of the Company until April 25, 2006 and an officer of the
 
Company thereafter. During the six months ended July 31, 2007, the total of these expenses included on the consolidated statements of operations and deficit was $96 [six months ended July 31, 2006 - $123] and included in issue expenses relating to the initial public offering of common shares was nil [six months ended July 31, 2006 - $719]. As at July 31, 2007, $8 [January 31, 2007 - $25] remains in accounts payable and accrued liabilities.
13. SEGMENTED INFORMATION
The Company operates in a single reportable segment focused on the design, development, assembly and distribution of medical systems and components for use in the healthcare field.
The Company sells to customers throughout the world. The following table represents the geographic distribution of the Company's revenues:
 
No single customer accounted for more than 10% of consolidated revenues for the six months ended July 31, 2007 and 2006.
The Company manufactures out of its facilities in Canada, and consequently the geographic location of the Company's net book value of property, plant and equipment is Canada.
14. RESTRUCTURING
In the fourth quarter ended January 31, 2007, due primarily to Local Coverage Determinations trends related to restrictions on reimbursement by Medicare to physicians for automatic nerve conduction testing for the initial identification of peripheral neuropathy, the Company took actions to reduce its NeuroPATH sales and marketing staff and to cut costs. As a result of these actions, the Company incurred a charge in the fourth quarter of $1,405, largely attributable to severance, write-down of excess inventory, provisions for product returns, and contract termination costs, of which $56 remains in accounts payable and accrued liabilities as at July 31, 2007 [January 31, 2007 - $431].
In May 2007, the Company took further actions to reduce its staff. As a result of these actions, the Company incurred a severance charge in the three months ended July 31, 2007 of $210, of which $90 remains in accounts payable and accrued liabilities as at July 31, 2007.
 
15. CANADIAN AND UNITED STATES ACCOUNTING POLICY DIFFERENCES
The consolidated financial statements have been prepared in accordance with Canadian GAAP. The principles adopted in these financial statements conform in all material respects to those of U.S. GAAP, except as summarized below. Significant differences between Canadian and U.S. GAAP would have the following effect on net income of the Company:
 
The following table indicates the differences between the amounts of certain consolidated balance sheet items determined in accordance with Canadian and U.S. GAAP:
 
 
 
Comprehensive Loss
The Company's comprehensive loss is equal to its reported net loss for all periods presented.
Recent U.S. GAAP Accounting Pronouncements:
In March 2006, FASB Emerging Issues Task Force ("EITF") issued EITF 06-03, . A consensus was reached that entities may adopt a policy of presenting sales taxes in the income statement on either a gross or net basis. If taxes are significant, an entity should disclose its policy of presenting taxes. The Company adopted EITF 06-03 on February 1, 2007. The Company presents sales net of sales taxes, and as such, EITF 06-03 had no impact on our method for recording sales taxes in the consolidated financial statements.
How Sales Taxes Collected From Customers and Remitted to Governmental Authorities Should Be Presented in the Income Statement
In June 2006, the Financial Accounting Standards Board ("FASB") issued Interpretation ("FIN") No. 48, . FIN No. 48, establishes a single model to address accounting for uncertain tax positions. FIN No. 48 clarifies the accounting for income taxes by prescribing a minimum recognition threshold a tax position is required to meet before being recognized in the financial statements. FIN No. 48 also provides guidance on derecognition, measurement, classification, interest and penalties, accounting in interim periods, disclosure, and transition. The Company adopted FIN 48 on February 1, 2007.
Accounting for Uncertainty in Income Taxes  an interpretation of FASB Statement No. 109

Exhibit 99.3
On December 3, 2007, Natus Medical Incorporated ("Natus", the "Company") filed a Current Report on Form 8-K to report that it had completed the acquisition of Excel-Tech Ltd. ("Xltek"), based in Oakville, Ontario, Canada, pursuant to an arrangement agreement dated as of October 9, 2007 by and among the Company, Xltek, and 4437713 Canada, Inc., a wholly-owned subsidiary of the Company. Under the terms of the arrangement agreement, Natus, through its wholly-owned subsidiary, acquired Xltek by means of a court-approved plan of arrangement. The acquisition closed and became effective on November 29, 2007.
The Company acquired all of the outstanding common shares of Xltek for a price of $3.25 Canadian ("CAD") per share. All options (whether vested or unvested) outstanding on the effective date of the acquisition were acquired by the Company in return for a cash payment of an amount equal to CAD $3.25 per share issuable upon the exercise of such options less the applicable exercise price per share. In addition, all deferred share units granted and outstanding immediately prior to the effective date of the acquisition were redeemed by the holder thereof and cancelled by the Company in exchange for a payment from the Company to the holder in cash equal to the product of the number of shares underlying such deferred share units times CAD $3.25. The acquisition is valued at $63.8 million including direct costs and was funded with the Company's available cash, $14 million of Xltek cash, and $35 million of borrowing on the Company's credit facility with Wells Fargo Bank, National Association.
The unaudited pro forma condensed combined financial statements (the "Pro Forma Financial Statements") have been prepared to give effect to the acquisition as of the beginning of the period. The following unaudited pro forma condensed combined balance sheet as of September 30, 2007 and the unaudited pro forma condensed combined statements of operations for the nine months ended September 30, 2007 and the year ended December 31, 2006 are based on the historical financial statements of the Company and Xltek after giving effect to the acquisition using the purchase method of accounting and applying the assumptions and adjustments described in the accompanying notes to the Pro Forma Financial Statements.
The Pro Forma Financial Statements have been prepared by management for illustrative purposes only and are not necessarily indicative of the condensed consolidated financial position or results of operations in future periods or the results that actually would have been realized had Natus and Xltek been a combined company during the specified periods. The pro forma adjustments are based on the preliminary information available at the time of the preparation of this document. The Pro Forma Financial Statements, including the notes thereto, are qualified in their entirety by reference to, and should be read in conjunction with:
 
 
 
 
The Pro Forma Financial Statements reflect the application of the purchase method of accounting in accordance with Statement of Financial Accounting Standards ("SFAS") No. 141, for the acquisition. Under the purchase method of accounting, the total estimated purchase price, calculated as described in Note 2 to the Pro Forma Financial Statements, is allocated to the net tangible and intangible assets of Xltek acquired in connection with the acquisition, based on their estimated fair values. Management has made a preliminary allocation of the estimated purchase price to the tangible and intangible assets acquired and liabilities assumed based on various preliminary estimates. The amounts
Business Combinations,
allocated to acquired assets and liabilities in the Pro Forma Financial Statements are based on management's preliminary valuation estimates. Definitive allocations will be finalized based on certain valuations and other studies that are being performed by the Company. Accordingly, the purchase price allocation adjustments and related amortization reflected in the following Pro Forma Financial Statements are preliminary, have been made solely for the purpose of preparing these statements, and are subject to revision based on a final determination of fair value.
The unaudited pro forma condensed combined statements of operations also include certain purchase accounting adjustments, including items expected to have a continuing impact on the combined results, such as amortization expense on acquired intangible assets, interest expense on the Wells Fargo borrowing, and the amortization of debt issuance costs.
The unaudited pro forma condensed combined statements of operations do not include the impacts of any revenue, cost, or other operating synergies that may result from the acquisition or any related restructuring actions. Cost savings, if achieved, could result from the elimination of redundant costs including headcount and facilities. The Pro Forma Financial Statements do not reflect certain amounts resulting from the acquisition because the Company's management considers them to be of a non-recurring nature. Such amounts are comprised primarily of change-of-control and restructuring costs related to the integration of the Company and Xltek's businesses. To the extent these costs relate to the Xltek business and meet certain criteria, an amount will be recorded on the opening balance sheet in purchase accounting in accordance with Emerging Issues Task Force ("EITF") Issue No. 95-3, To the extent that such costs relate to the Company's businesses, they will not meet the criteria in EITF Issue No. 95-3, and will be recorded as expenses through the statement of operations.
"Recognition of Liabilities in Connection with a Purchase Business Combination."
 
 
 
 
1 - Basis of Pro Forma Presentation
The unaudited pro forma condensed combined balance sheet as of September, 2007 and the unaudited pro forma condensed combined statements of operations for the nine months ended September 30, 2007, and for the year ended December 31, 2006 are based on the historical financial statements of the Company and Xltek after giving effect to the acquisition using the purchase method of accounting and applying the assumptions and adjustments described in the accompanying notes to the unaudited Pro Forma Financial Statements. All dollar amounts are in U.S. Dollars unless noted otherwise.
Natus and Xltek have different fiscal year ends. Accordingly, the unaudited pro forma condensed combined balance sheet combines the historical condensed consolidated balance sheet of Natus as of September 30, 2007 with the historical condensed consolidated balance sheet of Xltek as of July 31, 2007, giving effect to the acquisition as if it had occurred on September 30, 2007. The unaudited pro forma condensed combined statement of operations for the nine months ended September 30, 2007 combines the historical results of operations of Natus for the nine months ended September 30, 2007, with the historical results of operations of Xltek for the nine months ended July 31, 2007, which for Xltek were derived by adding the results of operations of Xltek for its fourth fiscal quarter ended January 31, 2007 with the results for its first and second fiscal quarters ended May31, 2007 and July 31, 2007, respectively. The unaudited pro forma condensed combined statement of operations for the year ended December 31, 2006 combines the historical consolidated statement of operations of Natus for the year ended December 31, 2006, with the historical consolidated statements of operations of Xltek for the year ended January 31, 2007. As such, the aforementioned nine-month and twelve-month statements of operations both contain the results of operations of Xltek for its fourth fiscal quarter ended January 31, 2007.
Xltek financial statements have been prepared in accordance with accounting principles generally accepted in the United Sates of America and converted from Canadian Dollars to U.S. Dollars pursuant to SFAS No. 52, . For the unaudited pro forma condensed balance sheet, amounts were converted based on the exchange rate as of July 31, 2007 (the balance sheet date for Xltek), which was 0.9378 U.S. Dollars for each Canadian Dollar. For the unaudited pro forma condensed statement of operations for the nine months ended September 30, 2007, amounts were converted based on the average exchange rate for the period from November 1, 2006 to July 31, 2007 (the nine-month period for Xltek), which was 0.8881 U.S. Dollars for each Canadian Dollar. For the unaudited pro forma condensed statement of operations for the year ended December 31, 2006, amounts were converted based on the average exchange rate for the period from February 1, 2006 to January 31, 2007 (the fiscal year for Xltek), which was 0.8811 U.S. Dollars for each Canadian Dollar.
Foreign Currency Translation
2  The Acquisition
The preliminary estimated total purchase price of the acquisition is as follows (in thousands):
 
Under the purchase method of accounting, the total estimated purchase price as shown in the table above is allocated to the net tangible and intangible assets of Xltek based on their estimated fair values as of the date of the acquisition. Management has allocated the preliminary estimated purchase price based on preliminary estimates as described in the introduction to the unaudited pro forma condensed combined financial statements. The allocation of the purchase price is preliminary, pending the completion of various analyses and the finalization of estimates. The allocation of the preliminary purchase price is as follows (in thousands):
. A preliminary estimate of $19.5 million has been allocated to net tangible assets, including $14.4 million of cash acquired and approximately $6.4 million of real estate. The Company has not completed its analysis of the fair market value of other net tangible assets acquired and any adjustment to the fair value will be offset by a corresponding adjustment to goodwill.
Net tangible assets
. Acquired identifiable intangible assets include core technology, developed technology, customer-related, and tradenames. Core technology represents a combination of Xltek processes, patents, and trade secrets developed through years of experience in design and development of their products, which will be amortized over a useful life of 20 years. Developed technology relates to Xltek's products across all of their product lines that have reached technological feasibility, which shall be amortized over a useful life of 20 years. Customer related intangibles represent the value of the business attributable to repeat business from customers of Xltek at the time of the acquisition, and will be amortized over a period of seven years. Tradenames relate to the Xltek tradename and the tradenames of specific product lines. These tradenames have an indefinite life and will not be amortized.
Identifiable intangible assets
. Approximately $25.1 million has been allocated to goodwill. Goodwill represents the excess of the purchase price over the fair value of the underlying net tangible and intangible assets. In accordance with SFAS No. 142, , goodwill will not be amortized but instead will be tested for impairment at least annually (more frequently if certain indicators are present). In the event that management of the Company determines that the value of goodwill has become impaired, the Company will incur an accounting charge for the amount of impairment during the fiscal quarter in which the determination is made.
Goodwill
Goodwill and Other Intangible Assets
A preliminary estimate of $6.3 million has been allocated to current deferred tax assets, $10.6 million has been allocated to non-current deferred tax assets, and $7.7 million has been allocated to non-current deferred tax liabilities, which primarily results from amortizable intangible assets. The net deferred tax asset of $9.2 million has been offset by a valuation allowance of $9.2 million. The net deferred tax asset after valuation allowance is zero and as such excluded from the pro forma condensed combined balance sheet.
Deferred tax assets and liabilities / valuation allowance.
. A preliminary estimate of $.3 million has been allocated to in-process research and development and will be charged to expense in the quarter ended December 31, 2007. Due to its non-recurring nature, the in-process research and development expense has been excluded from the unaudited pro forma condensed combined statements of operations.
In-process research and development
Xltek is currently developing new products in several product areas that qualify as in-process research and development. Projects that qualify as in-process research and development represent those that have not yet reached technological feasibility. Technological feasibility is defined as being equivalent to completion of a beta-phase working prototype in which there is no remaining risk relating to the development. The Company believes there is a risk that these development efforts and enhancements will not achieve technological feasibility, or if they do, will not be competitive with other products using alternative technologies that offer comparable functionality.
The value assigned to in-process research and development was determined by considering the importance of each project to the overall development plan, estimating costs to develop the purchased
in-process research and development into commercially viable products, estimating the resulting net cash flows from the projects when completed, and discounting the net cash flows to their present value. The revenue estimates used to value the purchased in-process research and development were based on estimates of relevant market sizes and growth factors, expected trends in technology, and the nature and expected timing of new product introductions by Xltek and its competitors.
The estimates used in valuing in-process research and development are based upon assumptions believed to be reasonable but which are inherently uncertain and unpredictable. Assumptions may be incomplete or inaccurate, and unanticipated events and circumstances may occur. Accordingly, actual results may vary from the projected results.
On November 28, 2007, the Company entered into an Amended and Restated Credit Agreement and a Security Agreement by and between the Company and Wells Fargo Bank, National Association ("Wells Fargo") in favor of Wells Fargo (the "Credit Facility Documents"). Pursuant to the terms of the Credit Facility Documents, the Company borrowed from Wells Fargo $35 million in a combination of term and revolving credit facilities for working capital and general corporate purposes and to finance a portion of the Company's acquisition of Xltek. For purposes of the pro forma condensed combined statements of operations, interest expense was calculated on the debt outstanding based on the current prime rate as quoted by Wells Fargo.
Wells Fargo Loan.
3 - Pro Forma Adjustments
Pro forma adjustments are necessary to reflect the estimated purchase price, to reflect the estimated value of acquired tangible and identified intangible assets, to reflect goodwill, to reflect the amortization expense related to the estimated amortizable intangible assets, to reflect interest expense on the $35 million Wells Fargo borrowing, and to reflect the income tax effect related to the pro forma adjustments based on statutory rates in effect in the United States.
The Company utilized CAD $13.7 million of Xltek cash to fund the acquisition. There were no other significant intercompany balances and transactions between Natus and Xltek as of the dates and for the periods of these pro forma condensed combined financial statements.
The pro forma combined provision for income taxes does not necessarily reflect the amounts that would have resulted had Natus and Xltek filed consolidated income tax returns during the periods presented.
Following are the descriptions of the pro forma adjustments to the condensed combined balance sheet:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Following are the descriptions of the pro forma adjustments to the condensed combined statements of operations:
 
 
 
4  Integration Plan
Natus initiated an Integration Plan (the "Plan") subsequent to the acquisition of Xltek that has resulted to date in a reduction of sixteen Xltek employees. The Company expects that total employee severance costs related to these staff reductions will be approximately $2.0 million, including costs related to change of control provisions in the employment contracts of four executive officers of Xltek totaling $1.9 million. Such amount has been recorded as a liability on the pro forma balance sheet as of September 30, 2007.
The unaudited pro forma condensed combined financial statements do not include any adjustments for liabilities that may result from further integration activities, as management is in the process of making these assessments and estimates of these costs are not currently known. However, liabilities may ultimately be recorded related to integration activities, including additional costs related to the Plan. Any such adjustments to liabilities will be recorded as an adjustment to the purchase price and a corresponding offsetting adjustment to goodwill.
5 - Pro Forma Net Income (Loss) Per Share
Net income (loss) per share is computed in accordance with SFAS 128, . Basic net income (loss) per share is based upon the weighted average number of common shares outstanding during the year ended December 31, 2006 and the nine months ended September 30, 2007. Diluted net income (loss) per share is based upon the weighted average number of common shares outstanding and dilutive common stock equivalents outstanding during the same period. Common stock equivalents are options granted and shares of restricted stock issued under the Company's stock awards plans and are calculated under the treasury stock method. Common equivalent shares from unexercised stock options and restricted stock are excluded from the computation when there is a loss as their effect is anti-dilutive or if the exercise price of such options is greater than the average market price of the stock for the period.
Earnings per Share
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BABY/BABY-8K-20080226070534.txt.gz
TIME:20080226070534
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 OR 15(d) of
The Securities Exchange Act of 1934
Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported): February 26, 2008
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 - 
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 - 
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 - 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 - 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Item 2.02     Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On February 26, 2008, Natus Medical Incorporated (the "Company") is issuing a press release and holding a conference call regarding its financial results for the fourth quarter and year ended December 31, 2007 and other financial information. A copy of the press release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 to this Form 8-K.
The information in this Form 8-K and the exhibit attached hereto shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act") or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that Section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
Item 9.01     FINANCIAL STATEMENTS, PRO FORMA FINANCIAL INFORMATION AND EXHIBITS.
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Index to Exhibits

Exhibit 99.1
Natus Medical Announces Record 2007 Fourth Quarter and Year Results
Reiterates 2008 Financial Guidance Representing 50% Earnings Growth
SAN CARLOS, Calif.--(BUSINESS WIRE)-- (Nasdaq:BABY) today announced financial results for the three months and year ended December 31, 2007.
Natus Medical Incorporated
For the fourth quarter ended December 31, 2007, Natus reported revenue of $34.2 million, representing a 19% increase from $28.8 million in the comparable quarter of the previous year. The Company reported net income of $2.8 million, or $0.12 per diluted share, for the fourth quarter of 2007, compared with net income of $512,000, or $0.02 per diluted share, for the fourth quarter of 2006.
The Company completed the acquisition of Xltek on November 29, 2007. The acquisition contributed to revenue growth in 2007; however, the results of Xltek reduced fourth quarter and annual earnings by $0.01 per share. The Company expects the results of Xltek to be accretive to earnings throughout 2008.
Non-GAAP income before tax for the fourth quarter of 2007 was $6.6 million, representing an increase of 37% from $4.8 million reported in the fourth quarter of 2006. Non-GAAP net income for the fourth quarter of 2007 was $3.8 million, or $0.17 per diluted share. The non-GAAP results exclude acquisition-related charges.
For the year ended December 31, 2007, the Company reported record revenue of $118.4 million, an increase of 32% from $89.9 million for the year ended December 31, 2006. The Company reported net income of $9.8 million, or $0.43 per share, for the full year 2007, compared with a net loss of $927,000, or a loss of ($0.05) per share, for the year ended December 31, 2006.
Non-GAAP income before tax for 2007 was $17.4 million, representing an increase of 35% over $12.9 million reported in 2006. Non-GAAP net income for 2007 was $10.8 million, or $0.47 per share, compared to $7.3 million, or $0.35 per share, reported in 2006.
Jim Hawkins, President and Chief Executive Officer of the Company said, We are pleased with our financial results for the fourth quarter and full-year 2007. As we have stated throughout the year, one of our objectives for 2007 was to position Natus for continued revenue and earnings growth. We accomplished this objective by investing in infrastructure, initiating a restructuring of our operating divisions, and realigning our sales organization. We were able to do this and still achieve record sales and earning results throughout the year. Natus is now positioned for a successful 2008 in which our goal is to achieve earnings growth of approximately 50%.
Many of our accomplishments occurred during the fourth quarter led by the acquisition of Xltek and subsequent integration activities. We also submitted a PMA supplement on the Cool-Cap that was approved by the FDA in early February. And as I mentioned earlier, we realigned our direct sales force in the United States into two distinct organizations, Newborn Care and Neurology, added Hawkins. While these and other actions, including the voluntary shutdown at our Olympic facility in November, had a temporary disruptive effect in our fourth quarter, we were still able to achieve record revenue and report quarterly earnings growth of 36%.
The restructuring plan we recently announced to consolidate product development in our North American business units will result in even more streamlined and efficient operations and an additional $2.4 million annual cost reduction in 2009 and forward, stated Hawkins. With these events now behind us, I am very satisfied with our current organization and confident we will meet our goals for the year. We believe Natus is now positioned to continue our record as one of the fastest-growing, profitable medical device companies in the country.
The Companys results for the three months and year ended December 31 2007 include employee equity-based compensation expense of $637,000 and $2.1 million, respectively, and depreciation and amortization expense of $1.6 million and $5.0 million, respectively. For the same periods in 2006 the Company recorded equity-based compensation expense of $442,000 and $1.4 million, and depreciation and amortization expense of $1.0 million and $3.9 million.
As of December 31, 2007 the Company had cash, cash equivalents, and short-term investments of $11.9 million, revolving and term debt totaling $37.0 million, stockholders' equity of $115.7 million, and working capital of $19.9 million. During 2007 the Companys backlog increased by approximately $4.8 million, including $1.4 million of backlog from Xltek.
Financial Guidance
On December 18, 2007, the Company communicated its financial guidance for the full year and first quarter 2008. The Company reiterated that guidance today. For the first quarter ending March 31, 2008, the Company expects revenue to range from $34.5 million to $36.0 million and earnings per share to range from $0.09 to $0.10. For the full year, the Company expects to report revenue of approximately $160 million and earnings per share of $0.68 to $0.70.
On February 11, 2008, the Company announced that it adopted an integration and restructuring plan that is designed to eliminate redundant costs resulting from prior acquisitions and to improve efficiencies in operations. In light of the nominal cost benefit of the plan in 2008, the Company did not change its 2008 guidance.
The Companys 2008 guidance is on a GAAP basis, including the impact of expensing employee equity-based compensation. All earnings per share amounts are on a diluted basis.
Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures
In addition to disclosing financial results calculated in accordance with GAAP, this release contains non-GAAP financial measures that exclude the effects of costs associated with the November 29, 2007 acquisition of Xltek, including hedging losses associated with funding the acquisition and a charge for in-process research and development, as well as employee-severance charges incurred the fourth quarter of 2007. The Company believes that the presentation of results excluding these acquisition-related and severance charges provides meaningful supplemental information to both management and investors that is indicative of the Company's core operating results. The Company also believes the in-process research and development charge is not indicative of resources devoted to ongoing research and development efforts. Therefore, the Company believes the non-GAAP financial measures facilitate comparison of operating results across reporting periods. A reconciliation between the Company's results of operations on a GAAP and non-GAAP basis for the periods reported is included as part of the condensed consolidated statements of operations at the end of the Company's financial results release.
The Company believes that both management and investors benefit from referring to these non-GAAP financial measures in assessing the Company's performance and when planning, forecasting, and analyzing future periods. The non-GAAP financial measures also facilitate management's internal comparisons to the Company's historical performance. The non-GAAP financial measures disclosed by the Company should not be considered a substitute for or superior to financial measures calculated in accordance with GAAP, and the financial results calculated in accordance with GAAP and reconciliations to those financial statements should be carefully evaluated.
Conference Call
Natus has scheduled an investment-community conference call to discuss this announcement beginning at 11:00 a.m. Eastern Time today (8:00 a.m. Pacific Time). Individuals interested in listening to the conference call may do so by dialing (800) 798-2884 for domestic callers, or (617) 614-6207 for international callers, and entering reservation code 34366508. A telephone replay will be available for 48 hours following the conclusion of the call by dialing (888) 286-8010 for domestic callers, or (617) 801-6888 for international callers, and entering reservation code 16728526.
The conference call also will be available real-time via the Internet at http://investor.natus.com, and a recording of the call will be available on the Companys Web site for 90 days following the completion of the call.
About Natus Medical Incorporated
Natus is a leading provider of healthcare products used for the screening, detection, treatment, monitoring and tracking of common medical ailments such as hearing impairment, neurological dysfunction, epilepsy, sleep disorders, and newborn care. Product offerings include computerized neurodiagnostic systems for audiology, neurology, polysomnography, and neonatology, as well as newborn care products such as hearing screening systems, phototherapy devices for the treatment of newborn jaundice, head-cooling products for the treatment of brain injury in newborns, and software systems for managing and tracking disorders and diseases for public health laboratories.
Additional information about Natus Medical can be found at www.natus.com.
This press release contains forward-looking statements as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, particularly statements regarding the expectations, beliefs, plans, intentions and strategies of Natus. These forward-looking statements include, but are not limited to, statements regarding anticipated revenue and profitability for the full year and first quarter of 2008, earnings growth in 2008, and the benefits of restructuring activities. These statements relate to future events or Natus' future financial performance or results, and involve known and unknown risks, uncertainties and other factors that may cause actual results, levels of activity, performance, or achievements to differ materially from those expressed or implied by the forward-looking statements. Forward-looking statements are only predictions and the actual events or results may differ materially. Natus cannot provide any assurance that its future results or the results implied by the forward-looking statements will meet expectations. Our future results could differ materially due to a number of factors, including the effects of competition, the demand for our products and services, our ability to expand our sales in international markets, our ability to maintain current sales levels in a mature domestic market, our ability to control costs, and risks associated with bringing new products to market and integrating acquired businesses. Natus disclaims any obligation to update information contained in any forward-looking statement.
More information about potential risk factors that could affect the business and financial results of Natus is included in Natus' annual report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2006, and its quarterly reports on Form 10-Q, and in other reports filed from time to time by Natus with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission
.
CONTACT: Natus Medical Incorporated Steven J. Murphy, 650-802-0400 Chief Financial Officer InvestorRelations@Natus.com


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BABY/BABY-8K-20080404091525.txt.gz
TIME:20080404091525
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 1.01. Entry Into a Material Definitive Agreement.
On April 4, 2008, Natus Medical Incorporated ("Natus") entered into a common stock purchase agreement (the "Purchase Agreement") with Roth Capital Partners, LLC (the "Underwriter"). The Purchase Agreement provides for the sale of 770,000 shares of Natus common stock at a public offering price of $18.27 per share, which was the closing price of Natus stock on the NASDAQ Global Market on April 3, 2008, (the "Offering"). Natus will pay to the Underwriter an underwriting discount of 5%, or $0.9135 per share, on shares sold in the Offering, except for approximately 175,000 shares expected to be sold to the D3 Family Fund, L.P., D3 Family Bulldog Fund, L.P., D3 Family Canadian Fund, L.P. and DIII Offshore Fund, L.P., or affiliated individuals and investment funds (the "D3 Family Funds"), for which there will be no discount. Natus also granted the Underwriter an option to purchase up to 115,500 additional shares to cover over-allotments, if any. These shares are being offered and sold under a prospectus supplement filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission pursuant to Rule 424(b)(5) of the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, in connection with an offering pursuant to Natus' shelf registration statement on Form S-3 (Registration No. 333-133480) (the "Registration Statement").
The above description of the Purchase Agreement is qualified in its entirety by the Purchase Agreement, which is attached to this Report as Exhibit 1.01 and incorporated by reference into the Registration Statement.
In connection with the Offering, Natus also will enter into a Registration Rights Agreement with the D3 Family Funds. Under this agreement, at any time after October 9, 2008, the D3 Family Funds can request that Natus file a registration statement covering registrable securities held by them for a minimum of 500,000 to a maximum of 2 million shares of Natus common stock. In addition, once six months has elapsed from their initial demand registration request, the D3 Family Funds can request that Natus file a second registration statement covering registrable securities held by them for again a minimum of 500,000 to a maximum of 2 million shares. Once in a 12-month period, Natus may postpone the filing of a registration statement for up to 60 days if Natus determines that the filing would be detrimental to it and its stockholders. Natus will pay all expenses incurred in connection with each of the registrations described above, other than underwriting discounts and commissions and the fees of legal counsel for the D3 Family Funds in excess of $10,000, to the extent the registrations do not take the form of an underwritten offering. However, if any distribution of common stock under a demand registration is to be effected by means of an underwritten offering, then the D3 Family Funds will pay all expenses incurred in connection with such registration other than the fees of counsel to Natus. The registration rights will terminate to the extent the shares held by and issuable to the D3 Family Funds may be sold under Rule 144 of the Securities Act in any three-month period.
A copy of the press release announcing the Offering is attached to this Report as Exhibit 99.1 hereto.
Item 8.01. Other Events.
In connection with the Offering, Natus is filing a legal opinion and consent as Exhibit No. 5.01 and Exhibit No. 23.01 to this Report, which are incorporated by reference into the Registration Statement.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
The following exhibits are filed herewith:
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
Exhibit Index
 

Exhibit 1.01
April 4, 2008
ROTH CAPITAL PARTNERS, LLC
24 Corporate Plaza
Newport Beach, CA 92660
Ladies and Gentlemen:
Natus Medical Incorporated, a Delaware corporation (the ) proposes, subject to the terms and conditions stated herein, to issue and sell to Roth Capital Partners, LLC (the ) an aggregate of 770,000 authorized but unissued shares (the ) of Common Stock, $.001 par value per share (the ), of the Company.
"Company"
"Underwriter"
"Securities"
"Common Stock"
The Company and the Underwriter hereby confirm their agreement with respect to the purchase and sale of the Securities as follows:
The Company has prepared and filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the "Commission") a registration statement on Form S-3 (File No. 333-133480) under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended (the "Securities Act") and the rules and regulations (the "Rules and Regulations") of the Commission thereunder, and such amendments to such registration statement as may have been required to the date of this Agreement. Such registration statement has been declared effective by the Commission. Such registration statement, at any given time, including amendments thereto to such time, the exhibits and any schedules thereto at such time, the documents incorporated by reference therein pursuant to Item 12 of Form S-3 under the Securities Act at such time and the documents and information otherwise deemed to be a part thereof or included therein by Rule 430B under the Securities Act or otherwise pursuant to the Rules and Regulations at such time, is herein called the "Registration Statement." The Registration Statement at the time it originally became effective is herein called the "Original Registration Statement."
1. Registration Statement and Prospectus.
The Company is filing with the Commission pursuant to Rule 424 under the Securities Act a final prospectus supplement relating to the Securities to a form of prospectus included in the Registration Statement in the form heretofore delivered to the Underwriter. Such prospectus in the form in which it appears in the Registration Statement is hereinafter called the Such supplemental form of prospectus, in the form in which it shall be filed with the Commission pursuant to Rule 424(b) (including the Base Prospectus as so supplemented) is hereinafter called the Any reference herein to the Base Prospectus or the Prospectus shall be deemed to include the documents incorporated by reference therein pursuant to Item 12 of Form S-3 under the Securities Act as of the date of such prospectus.
"Base Prospectus."
"Prospectus."
For purposes of this Agreement, all references to the Registration Statement, the Base Prospectus, the Prospectus or any amendment or supplement to any of the foregoing shall be deemed to include the copy filed with the Commission pursuant to its Electronic Data Gathering, Analysis and Retrieval System (). All references in this Agreement to amendments or supplements to the Registration Statement, the Base Prospectus or the Prospectus shall be deemed to mean and include the subsequent filing of any document under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (the ) which is deemed to be incorporated therein by reference therein or otherwise deemed by the Rules and Regulations to be a part thereof.
"EDGAR"
"Exchange Act"
2. Representations and Warranties of the Company.
(a) The Company represents and warrants to, and agrees with, the Underwriter as follows:
(i) No order preventing or suspending the use of any Prospectus has been issued by the Commission and each Prospectus, at the time of filing or the time of first use within the meaning of the Rules and Regulations, complied in all material respects with the requirements of the Securities Act and the Rules and Regulations and did not contain an untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading; except that the foregoing shall not apply to statements in or omissions from any Prospectus in reliance upon, and in conformity with, written information furnished to the Company by the Underwriter specifically for use in the preparation thereof.
(ii) The Company has complied to the Commission's satisfaction with all requests of the Commission for additional or supplemental information. No stop order suspending the effectiveness of the Registration Statement is in effect and no proceedings for such purpose have been instituted or are pending or, to the best knowledge of the Company, are contemplated or threatened by the Commission.
(iii) Each part of the Registration Statement and any post-effective amendment thereto, at the time such part became effective (including each deemed effective date with respect to the Underwriter pursuant to Rule 430B under the Securities Act), at all other subsequent times until the expiration of the Prospectus Delivery Period (as defined below), and at the Closing Date (as hereinafter defined), and the Prospectus (or any amendment or supplement to the Prospectus), at the time of filing or the time of first use within the meaning of the Rules and Regulations, at all subsequent times until expiration of the Prospectus Delivery Period, and at the Closing Date complied and will comply in all material respects with the applicable requirements and provisions of the Securities Act, the Rules and Regulations and the Exchange Act and did not and will not contain any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading. The
 
Prospectus, as amended or supplemented, as of its date, or the time of first use within the meaning of the Rules and Regulations, at all subsequent times until the expiration of the Prospectus Delivery Period, and at the Closing Date, did not and will not contain any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading. The representations and warranties set forth in the two immediately preceding sentences do not apply to statements in or omissions from the Registration Statement or any post-effective amendment thereto, or the Prospectus, or any amendments or supplements thereto, made in reliance upon and in conformity with written information furnished to the Company by the Underwriter, specifically for use in the preparation thereof.
(iv) Neither (A) the Issuer General Free Writing Prospectus(es) issued at or prior to the Time of Sale, the Statutory Prospectus and the information set forth in Schedule IV to this Agreement, all considered together (collectively, the "Time of Sale Disclosure Package"), nor (B) any individual Issuer Limited-Use Free Writing Prospectus, when considered together with the Time of Sale Disclosure Package, included as of the Time of Sale any untrue statement of a material fact or omitted as of the Time of Sale to state any material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading. The preceding sentence does not apply to statements in or omissions from any Statutory Prospectus included in the Registration Statement or any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus based upon and in conformity with written information furnished to the Company by the Underwriter specifically for use therein. As used in this paragraph and elsewhere in this Agreement:
(1) means 7:00 pm (Eastern time) on the date of this Agreement.
"Time of Sale"
(2) as of any time means the Prospectus that is included in the Registration Statement immediately prior to that time. For purposes of this definition, information contained in a form of prospectus that is deemed retroactively to be a part of the Registration Statement pursuant to Rule 430B under the Securities Act shall be considered to be included in the Statutory Prospectus as of the actual time that form of prospectus is filed with the Commission pursuant to Rule 424(b) under the Securities Act.
"Statutory Prospectus"
(3) means any "issuer free writing prospectus," as defined in Rule 433 under the Securities Act, relating to the Securities that (A) is required to be filed with the Commission by the Company, or (B) is exempt from filing pursuant to Rule 433(d)(5)(i) under the Securities Act because it contains a description of the Securities or of the offering that does not reflect the final terms, in each case in the form filed or required to be filed with the Commission or, if not required to be filed, in the form retained in the Company's records pursuant to Rule 433(g) under the Securities Act.
"Issuer Free Writing Prospectus"
 
(4) means any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus that is intended for general distribution to prospective investors, as evidenced by its being specified in Schedule I to this Agreement.
"Issuer General Free Writing Prospectus"
(5) means any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus that is not an Issuer General Free Writing Prospectus.
"Issuer Limited-Use Free Writing Prospectus"
(v) (A) Each Issuer Free Writing Prospectus, as of its issue date and at all subsequent times through the Prospectus Delivery Period or until any earlier date that the Company notified or notifies the Underwriter as described in Section 4(a)(iii)(B), did not, does not and will not include any information that conflicted, conflicts or will conflict with the information contained in the Registration Statement, any Statutory Prospectus or the Prospectus. The foregoing sentence does not apply to statements in or omissions from any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus based upon and in conformity with written information furnished to the Company by the Underwriter specifically for use therein.
(B)(1) At the earliest time after the filing of the Registration Statement that the Company or another offering participant made a offer (within the meaning of Rule 164(h)(2) under the Securities Act) of the Securities and (2) at the date hereof, the Company was not and is not an "ineligible issuer," as defined in Rule 405 under the Securities Act, including the Company or any subsidiary in the preceding three years not having been convicted of a felony or misdemeanor or having been made the subject of a judicial or administrative decree or order as described in Rule 405 (without taking account of any determination by the Commission pursuant to Rule 405 that it is not necessary that the Company be considered an ineligible issuer), nor an "excluded issuer" as defined in Rule 164 under the Securities Act.
bona fide
(C) Each Issuer Free Writing Prospectus satisfied, as of its issue date and at all subsequent times through the Prospectus Delivery Period, all other conditions to use thereof as set forth in Rules 164 and 433 under the Securities Act.
(vi) The financial statements of the Company, together with the related notes, included or incorporated by reference in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Disclosure Package and the Prospectus comply in all material respects with the requirements of the Securities Act and the Exchange Act and fairly present the financial condition of the Company as of the dates indicated and the results of operations and changes in cash flows for the periods therein specified in conformity with generally accepted accounting principles consistently applied throughout the periods involved; and the supporting schedules included in the Registration Statement present fairly the information required to be stated therein. No other financial statements or schedules are required to be included in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Disclosure Package or the Prospectus. To the Company's knowledge, Deloitte & Touche, LLP, which has expressed its opinion with respect to the financial statements and schedules filed as a part of the Registration Statement and included in the Registration Statement,
 
the Time of Sale Disclosure Package and the Prospectus, is an independent public accounting firm within the meaning of the Securities Act and the Rules and Regulations and such accountants are not in violation of the auditor independence requirements of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002 (the "Sarbanes-Oxley Act").
(vii) Each of the Company and its subsidiaries has been duly organized and is validly existing as a corporation in good standing under the laws of its jurisdiction of incorporation. Each of the Company and its subsidiaries has the corporate power and authority to own its properties and conduct its business as currently being carried on and as described in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Disclosure Package and the Prospectus, and is duly qualified to do business as a foreign corporation in good standing in each jurisdiction in which it owns or leases real property or in which the conduct of its business makes such qualification necessary and in which the failure to so qualify would have a material adverse effect upon the business, prospects, properties, operations, condition (financial or otherwise) or results of operations of the Company and its subsidiaries, taken as a whole, or in its ability to perform its obligations under this Agreement ("Material Adverse Effect").
(viii) Except as contemplated in the Time of Sale Disclosure Package and in the Prospectus, subsequent to the respective dates as of which information is given in the Time of Sale Disclosure Package, neither the Company nor any of its subsidiaries has incurred any material liabilities or obligations, direct or contingent, or entered into any material transactions, or declared or paid any dividends or made any distribution of any kind with respect to its capital stock; and there has not been any change in the capital stock (other than a change in the number of outstanding shares of Common Stock due to the issuance of shares upon the exercise of outstanding options or warrants or to the issuance of restricted stock under the Company's existing stock awards plan), or any material change in the short-term or long-term debt, or any issuance of options, warrants, convertible securities or other rights to purchase the capital stock, of the Company or any of its subsidiaries (other than the issuance of options under the Company's existing stock awards plans), or any material adverse change in the financial condition, business, prospects, property, operations or results of operations of the Company and its subsidiaries, taken as a whole ("Material Adverse Change").
(ix) Except as set forth in the Time of Sale Disclosure Package and the Prospectus, there is not pending or, to the knowledge of the Company, threatened or contemplated, any action, suit or proceeding to which the Company or any of its subsidiaries is a party or of which any property or assets of the Company is the subject before or by any court or governmental agency, authority or body, or any arbitrator, which, individually or in the aggregate, might reasonably be expected to result in any Material Adverse Change.
(x) This Agreement has been duly authorized, executed and delivered by the Company, and constitutes a valid, legal and binding obligation of the Company, enforceable in accordance with its terms, except as rights to indemnity hereunder may be limited by federal or state securities laws and except as such enforceability may be limited by bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization or similar laws affecting the rights of
 
creditors generally and subject to general principles of equity. The execution, delivery and performance of this Agreement and the consummation of the transactions herein contemplated will not result in a breach or violation of any of the terms and provisions of, or constitute a default under, any statute, any agreement or instrument to which the Company is a party or by which it is bound or to which any of its property is subject, or any order, rule, regulation or decree of any court or governmental agency or body having jurisdiction over the Company or any of its properties except for violations and defaults which individually or in the aggregate would not reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect. The execution, delivery and performance of this Agreement and the consummation of the transactions herein contemplated will not result in a breach or violation of any of the terms and provisions of, or constitute a default under, the Company's charter or by-laws. No consent, approval, authorization or order of, or filing with, any court or governmental agency or body is required for the execution, delivery and performance of this Agreement or for the consummation of the transactions contemplated hereby, including the issuance or sale of the Securities by the Company, except such as may be required under the Securities Act or state securities or blue sky laws; and the Company has the power and authority to enter into this Agreement and to authorize, issue and sell the Securities as contemplated by this Agreement.
(xi) All of the issued and outstanding shares of capital stock of the Company, including the outstanding shares of Common Stock, are duly authorized and validly issued, fully paid and nonassessable, have been issued in compliance with all federal and state securities laws, were not issued in violation of or subject to any preemptive rights or other rights to subscribe for or purchase securities that have not been waived in writing (a copy of which has been delivered to counsel to the Underwriter); the Securities which may be sold hereunder by the Company have been duly authorized and, when issued, delivered and paid for in accordance with the terms of this Agreement, will have been validly issued and will be fully paid and nonassessable; and the capital stock of the Company, including the Common Stock, conforms to the description thereof in the Registration Statement, in the Time of Sale Disclosure Package and in the Prospectus. Except as otherwise stated in the Registration Statement, in the Time of Sale Disclosure Package or in the Prospectus, there are no preemptive rights or other rights to subscribe for or to purchase, or any restriction upon the voting or transfer of, any shares of Common Stock pursuant to the Company's charter, by-laws or any agreement or other instrument to which the Company is a party or by which the Company is bound. Neither the filing of the Registration Statement nor the offering or sale of the Securities as contemplated by this Agreement gives rise to any rights for or relating to the registration of any shares of Common Stock or other securities of the Company that have not been waived. All of the issued and outstanding shares of capital stock of each of the Company's subsidiaries have been duly and validly authorized and issued and are fully paid and nonassessable, and, except as otherwise described in the Registration Statement, in the Time of Sale Disclosure Package or in the Prospectus and except for any directors' qualifying shares, the Company owns of record and beneficially, free and clear of any security interests, claims, liens, proxies, equities or other encumbrances, all of the issued and outstanding shares of such stock, except such as are described in the Registration Statement, in the Time of Sale Disclosure Package or in the Prospectus. Except as described in the Registration Statement, in the Time of Sale Disclosure Package or in the
 
Prospectus, there are no options, warrants, agreements, contracts or other rights in existence to purchase or acquire from the Company or any subsidiary of the Company any shares of the capital stock of the Company or any subsidiary of the Company. The Company has an authorized and outstanding capitalization as set forth in the Registration Statement, in the Time of Sale Disclosure Package and in the Prospectus (except as outstanding capitalization may have changed as a result of the exercise of stock options subsequent thereto).
(xii) The Company and each of its subsidiaries holds, and is operating in compliance in all material respects with, all franchises, grants, authorizations, licenses, permits, easements, consents, certificates and orders of any governmental or self-regulatory body required for the conduct of its business, and all such franchises, grants, authorizations, licenses, permits, easements, consents, certifications and orders are valid and in full force and effect in all material respects; and the Company and each of its subsidiaries is in compliance in all material respects with all applicable federal, state, local and foreign laws, regulations, orders and decrees.
(xiii) The Company and its subsidiaries have good and marketable title to all property (whether real or personal) described in the Registration Statement, in the Time of Sale Disclosure Package and in the Prospectus as being owned by them which are material to the business of the Company, in each case free and clear of all liens, claims, security interests, other encumbrances or defects except such as are described in the Registration Statement, in the Time of Sale Disclosure Package or in the Prospectus. The property held under lease by the Company and its subsidiaries is held by them under valid, subsisting and enforceable leases with only such exceptions with respect to any particular lease as do not interfere in any material respect with the conduct of the business of the Company or its subsidiaries.
(xiv) The Company and each of its subsidiaries owns or possesses or has valid right to use all patents, patent applications, trademarks, service marks, tradenames, trademark registrations, service mark registrations, copyrights, licenses, inventions, trade secrets and rights necessary for the conduct of the business of the Company and its subsidiaries as currently carried on and as described in the Registration Statement, in the Time of Sale Disclosure Package and in the Prospectus; except as stated in the Registration Statement, in the Time of Sale Disclosure Package or in the Prospectus, to the knowledge of the Company, no name which the Company or any of its subsidiaries uses and no other aspect of the business of the Company or any of its subsidiaries will involve or give rise to any infringement of, or license or similar fees for, any patents, patent applications, trademarks, service marks, tradenames, trademark registrations, service mark registrations, copyrights, licenses, inventions, trade secrets or other similar rights of others material to the business or prospects of the Company and neither the Company nor any of its subsidiaries has received any notice alleging any such infringement or fee.
(xv) Neither the Company nor any of its subsidiaries is in violation of its respective charter or by-laws or in breach of or otherwise in default, and no event has occurred which, with notice or lapse of time or both, would constitute such a default, in
 
the performance of any material obligation, agreement or condition contained in any bond, debenture, note, indenture, loan agreement or any other material contract, lease or other instrument to which it is subject or by which any of them may be bound, or to which any of the material property or assets of the Company or any of its subsidiaries is subject.
(xvi) The Company and its subsidiaries have timely filed all federal, state and local income tax returns required to be filed and are not in default in the payment of any taxes which were payable pursuant to said returns or any assessments with respect thereto, other than any which the Company or any of its subsidiaries is contesting in good faith.
(xvii) The Company has not distributed and will not distribute any prospectus or other offering material in connection with the offering and sale of the Securities other than any Preliminary Prospectus, the Time of Sale Disclosure Package or the Prospectus or other materials permitted by the Securities Act to be distributed by the Company; provided, however, that, except as set forth on Schedule I, the Company has not made and will not make any offer relating to the Securities that would constitute a "free writing prospectus" as defined in Rule 405 under the Securities Act, except in accordance with the provisions of Section 4(a)(xiv) of this Agreement.
(xviii) The Common Stock is registered pursuant to Section 12(b) of the Exchange Act and is included or approved for inclusion on the Nasdaq Global Market and the Company has taken no action designed to, or likely to have the effect of, terminating the registration of the Common Stock under the Exchange Act or delisting the Common Stock from the Nasdaq Global Market (although the Company may choose to list its securities on the NYSE) nor has the Company received any notification that the Commission or the Nasdaq Global Market is contemplating terminating such registration or listing. The Company has complied in all material respects with the applicable requirements of the Nasdaq Global Market for maintenance of inclusion of the Common Stock thereon. The Company has, to the extent required, filed an application to include the Securities on the Nasdaq Global Market.
(xix) Other than the subsidiaries of the Company listed on hereto, the Company, directly or indirectly, owns no capital stock or other equity or ownership or proprietary interest in any corporation, partnership, association, trust or other entity.
Schedule III
(xx) The Company maintains a system of internal accounting controls sufficient to provide reasonable assurances that (A) transactions are executed in accordance with management's general or specific authorization; (B) transactions are recorded as necessary to permit preparation of financial statements in conformity with generally accepted accounting principles and to maintain accountability for assets; (C) access to assets is permitted only in accordance with management's general or specific authorization; and (D) the recorded accountability for assets is compared with existing assets at reasonable intervals and appropriate action is taken with respect to any differences. Except as described in the Registration Statement, in the Time of Sale
 
Disclosure Package or in the Prospectus, since December 31, 2007, there has been no change in the Company's internal control over financial reporting that has materially affected, or is reasonably likely to materially affect, the Company's internal control over financial reporting.
(xxi) Other than as contemplated by this Agreement, the Company has not incurred any liability for any finder's or broker's fee or agent's commission in connection with the execution and delivery of this Agreement or the consummation of the transactions contemplated hereby.
(xxii) The Company carries, or is covered by, insurance in such amounts and covering such risks as is adequate for the conduct of its business and the value of its properties and as is customary for companies engaged in similar businesses in similar industries.
(xxiii) The Company is not and, after giving effect to the offering and sale of the Securities, will not be an "investment company," as such term is defined in the Investment Company Act of 1940, as amended.
(xxiv) The conditions for use of Form S-3, set forth in the General Instructions thereto, have been satisfied. The Company also complies with the standards for using Form S-3 as in place prior to October 21, 1992, namely, as of a date within 30 days prior to the date of this Agreement, the aggregate market value of the voting and non-voting common equity of the Company held by non-affiliates of the Company exceeded $150,000,000 (as calculated by reference to the closing price of the Common Stock on the Nasdaq Global Market) and non-affiliates of the Company held more than 3,000,000 shares of the Common Stock on such date.
(xxv) The documents incorporated by reference in the Time of Sale Disclosure Package, the Registration Statement and in the Prospectus, when they became effective or were filed with the Commission, as the case may be, conformed in all material respects to the requirements of the Securities Act or the Exchange Act, as applicable, and were filed on a timely basis with the Commission and none of such documents contained an untrue statement of a material fact or omitted to state a material fact necessary to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading; any further documents so filed and incorporated by reference in the Time of Sale Disclosure Package, the Registration Statement or in the Prospectus, when such documents are filed with the Commission, will conform in all material respects to the requirements of the Exchange Act, and will not contain an untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact necessary to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading.
(xxvi) The Company is in substantial compliance with all applicable provisions of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act and the rules and regulations of the Commission thereunder that are effective with respect to the Company and its subsidiaries on the date
 
of this Agreement, except where such noncompliance would not have, individually or in the aggregate, a Material Adverse Effect.
(xxvii) The Company has established and maintains disclosure controls and procedures (as defined in Rules 13a-14 and 15d-14 under the Exchange Act) and such controls and procedures are effective in ensuring that material information relating to the Company, including its subsidiaries, is made known to the principal executive officer and the principal financial officer. The Company has utilized such controls and procedures in preparing and evaluating the disclosures in the Registration Statement, in the Time of Sale Disclosure Package and in the Prospectus.
(b) Any certificate signed by any officer of the Company and delivered to the Underwriter or to the Underwriter's Counsel shall be deemed a representation and warranty by the Company to the Underwriter as to the matters covered thereby.
3. Purchase, Sale and Delivery of Securities.
(a) On the basis of the representations, warranties and agreements herein contained, but subject to the terms and conditions herein set forth, the Company agrees to issue and sell the Securities to the Underwriter, and the Underwriter agrees to purchase from the Company the Securities as set forth opposite the name of such Underwriter below on the signature page hereof. The purchase price for each share of the Securities shall be $18.27 per share. The Company agrees to pay the Underwriter's compensation as set forth in Schedule IV hereto.
In addition, the Company hereby grants to the Underwriter the option to purchase an aggregate of up to 15% of the Securities purchased pursuant to this Agreement and, upon the basis of the warranties and representations and subject to the terms and conditions herein set forth, the Underwriter shall have the right to purchase, from the Company (subject to such adjustment as you shall determine to avoid fractional shares), all or a portion of additional shares ("Additional Shares") as may be necessary to cover over-allotments made in connection with the offering of the Securities, at the same purchase price per share to be paid by the Underwriter to the Company for the Securities. This option may be exercised by you at any time (but not more than once) on or before the thirtieth day following the date hereof, by written notice to the Company. Such notice shall set forth the aggregate number of Additional Shares as to which the option is being exercised, and the date and time when the Additional Shares are to be delivered (such date and time being herein referred to as the ""); , , that the Option Closing Date shall not be earlier than the Closing Date (as defined below) nor earlier than the second business day after the date on which the option shall have been exercised nor later than the fifth business day after the date on which the option shall have been exercised unless the Company and you otherwise agree.
Option Closing Date
provided
however
Payment of the purchase price and delivery for the Additional Shares shall be made at the Option Closing Date in the same manner and at the same office as the payment for the Securities as set forth in subparagraph (b) below. For the purpose of expediting the checking of the certificate for the Additional Shares by you, the Company agrees to make a form of such certificate available to you for such purpose at least one full business day preceding the Option Closing Date.
 
(b) The Securities will be delivered by the Company to the Underwriter against payment of the purchase price therefor by wire transfer of same day funds payable to the order of the Company, as appropriate, at the offices of Roth Capital Partners, LLC, 24 Corporate Plaza, Newport Beach, CA 92660, or such other location as may be mutually acceptable, at 9:00 a.m. PST or Central time, respectively, on the third (or if the Securities are priced, as contemplated by Rule 15c6-1(c) under the Exchange Act, after 4:30 p.m. Eastern time, the fourth) full business day following the date hereof, or at such other time and date as the Underwriter and the Company determine pursuant to Rule 15c6-1(a) under the Exchange Act, such time and date of delivery being herein referred to as the "Closing Date." If the Underwriter so elects, delivery of the Securities may be made by credit through full fast transfer to the account at The Depository Trust Company designated by the Underwriter. Certificates representing the Securities, in definitive form and in such denominations and registered in such names as the Underwriter may request upon at least two business days' prior notice to the Company, will be made available for checking and packaging not later than 10:30 a.m., PST or Central time, as applicable, on the business day next preceding the Closing Date at the above addresses, or such other location as may be mutually acceptable.
4. Covenants.
(a) The Company covenants and agrees with the Underwriter as follows:
(i) During the period beginning on the date hereof and ending on the later of the Closing Date or such date, as in the opinion of counsel for the Underwriter, the Prospectus is no longer required by law to be delivered (or in lieu thereof the notice referred to in Rule 173(a) under the Securities Act is no longer required to be provided), in connection with sales by an underwriter or dealer (the "Prospectus Delivery Period"), prior to amending or supplementing the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Disclosure Package or the Prospectus, the Company shall furnish to the Underwriter for review a copy of each such proposed amendment or supplement, and the Company shall not file any such proposed amendment or supplement to which the Underwriter reasonably object.
(ii) After the date of this Agreement, the Company shall promptly advise the Underwriter in writing (i) of the receipt of any comments of, or requests for additional or supplemental information from, the Commission, (ii) of the time and date of any filing of any post-effective amendment to the Registration Statement or any amendment or supplement to any Prospectus, the Time of Sale Disclosure Package or the Prospectus, (iii) of the time and date that any post-effective amendment to the Registration Statement becomes effective and (iv) of the issuance by the Commission of any stop order suspending the effectiveness of the Registration Statement or any post-effective amendment thereto or of any order preventing or suspending its use or the use of any Prospectus, the Time of Sale Disclosure Package, the Prospectus or any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus, or of any proceedings to remove, suspend or terminate from listing or quotation the Common Stock from any securities exchange upon which it is
 
listed for trading or included or designated for quotation, or of the threatening or initiation of any proceedings for any of such purposes. If the Commission shall enter any such stop order at any time, the Company will use its reasonable efforts to obtain the lifting of such order at the earliest possible moment. Additionally, the Company agrees that it shall comply with the provisions of Rules 424(b), 430A and 430B, as applicable, under the Securities Act and will use its reasonable efforts to confirm that any filings made by the Company under Rule 424(b) or Rule 433 were received in a timely manner by the Commission (without reliance on Rule 424(b)(8) or Rule 164(b)).
(iii) (A) During the Prospectus Delivery Period, the Company will comply as far as it is able with all requirements imposed upon it by the Securities Act, as now and hereafter amended, and by the Rules and Regulations, as from time to time in force, and by the Exchange Act so far as necessary to permit the continuance of sales of or dealings in the Securities as contemplated by the provisions hereof, the Time of Sale Disclosure Package, and the Registration Statement and the Prospectus. If during such period any event occurs as a result of which the Prospectus (or if the Prospectus is not yet available to prospective purchasers, the Time of Sale Disclosure Package ) would include an untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact necessary to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances then existing, not misleading, or if during such period it is necessary or appropriate in the opinion of the Company or its counsel or the Underwriter or counsel to the Underwriter to amend the Registration Statement or supplement the Prospectus (or if the Prospectus is not yet available to prospective purchasers, the Time of Sale Disclosure Package ) to comply with the Securities Act or to file under the Exchange Act any document which would be deemed to be incorporated by reference in the Prospectus in order to comply with the Securities Act or the Exchange Act, the Company will promptly notify the Underwriter and will amend the Registration Statement or supplement the Prospectus (or if the Prospectus is not yet available to prospective purchasers, the Time of Sale Disclosure Package) or file such document (at the expense of the Company) so as to correct such statement or omission or effect such compliance.
(B) If at any time following issuance of an Issuer Free Writing Prospectus there occurred or occurs an event or development as a result of which such Issuer Free Writing Prospectus conflicted or would conflict with the information contained in the Registration Statement, the Statutory Prospectus or the Prospectus or included or would include an untrue statement of a material fact or omitted or would omit to state a material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances prevailing at that subsequent time, not misleading, the Company has promptly notified or promptly will notify the Underwriter and has promptly amended or will promptly amend or supplement, at its own expense, such Issuer Free Writing Prospectus to eliminate or correct such conflict, untrue statement or omission.
(iv) The Company shall take or cause to be taken all necessary action to qualify the Securities for sale under the securities laws of such jurisdictions as the Underwriter reasonably designates and to continue such qualifications in effect so long as required for the distribution of the Securities, except that the Company shall not be required in connection therewith to qualify as a foreign corporation or to execute a general consent to service of process in any state.
 
(v) The Company will furnish to the Underwriter and counsel for the Underwriter copies of the Registration Statement, the Prospectus, any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus, and all amendments and supplements to such documents, in each case as soon as available and in such quantities as the Underwriter may from time to time reasonably request.
(vi) The Company will make generally available to its security holders as soon as practicable, but in any event not later than 15 months after the end of the Company's current fiscal quarter, an earnings statement (which need not be audited) covering a 12-month period that shall satisfy the provisions of Section 11(a) of the Securities Act and Rule 158 of the Rules and Regulations.
(vii) The Company, whether or not the transactions contemplated hereunder are consummated or this Agreement is terminated, will pay or cause to be paid (A) all expenses (including transfer taxes allocated to the respective transferees) incurred in connection with the delivery to the Underwriter of the Securities, (B) all expenses and fees (including, without limitation, fees and expenses of the Company's counsel) in connection with the preparation, printing, filing, delivery, and shipping of the Registration Statement (including the financial statements therein and all amendments, schedules, and exhibits thereto), the Securities, the Prospectus, any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus and any amendment thereof or supplement thereto, and the printing, delivery, and shipping of this Agreement and other underwriting documents, including Blue Sky Memoranda (covering the states and other applicable jurisdictions), (C) all filing fees and fees and disbursements of the Underwriter's counsel incurred in connection with the qualification of the Securities for offering and sale by the Underwriter or by dealers under the securities or blue sky laws of the states and other jurisdictions which the Underwriter shall designate, (D) the fees and expenses of any transfer agent or registrar, (E) the filing fees and fees and disbursements of Underwriter's counsel incident to any required review and approval by the Financial Industry Regulatory Authority ("") of the terms of the sale of the Securities, (F) listing fees, if any, and (G) all other costs and expenses incident to the performance of its obligations hereunder that are not otherwise specifically provided for herein. If this Agreement is terminated by the Underwriter pursuant to Section 8(i), (ii) or (iii) hereof or if the sale of the Securities provided for herein is not consummated by reason of any failure, refusal or inability on the part of the Company to perform any, agreement on its part to be performed, or because any other condition of the Underwriter's obligations hereunder required to be fulfilled by the Company is not fulfilled, the Company will reimburse the Underwriter for all out-of-pocket disbursements (including but not limited to fees and disbursements of counsel, printing expenses, travel expenses, postage, facsimile and telephone charges) incurred by the Underwriter in connection with their investigation, preparing to market and marketing the Securities or in contemplation of performing their obligations hereunder. Notwithstanding anything contained herein, the maximum amount payable by the Company for Underwriter's counsel fees, disbursements and expenses pursuant to this Section 4(a)(vii) shall be $50,000.
FINRA
 
(viii) The Company will apply the net proceeds from the sale of the Securities to be sold by it hereunder for the purposes set forth in the Time of Sale Disclosure Package and in the Prospectus.
(ix) The Company has not taken and will not take, directly or indirectly, any action designed to or which might reasonably be expected to cause or result in, or which has constituted, the stabilization or manipulation of the price of any security of the Company to facilitate the sale or resale of the Securities
(x) The Company will not incur any liability for any finder's or broker's fee or agent's commission in connection with the execution and delivery of this Agreement or the consummation of the transactions contemplated hereby.
(xi) During the Prospectus Delivery Period, the Company will file on a timely basis with the Commission such periodic and special reports as required by the Rules and Regulations.
(xii) The Company and its subsidiaries will maintain such controls and other procedures, including without limitation those applicable to the Company and required by Sections 302 and 906 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act and the applicable regulations thereunder, that are designed to ensure that information required to be disclosed by the Company in the reports that it files or submits under the Exchange Act is recorded, processed, summarized and reported within the time periods specified in the Commission's rules and forms, including without limitation, controls and procedures designed to ensure that information required to be disclosed by the Company in the reports that it files or submits under the Exchange Act is accumulated and communicated to the Company's management, including its principal executive officer and its principal financial officer, or persons performing similar functions, as appropriate to allow timely decisions regarding required disclosure, to ensure that material information relating to Company, including its subsidiaries, is made known to them by others within those entities.
(xiii) The Company and its subsidiaries will substantially comply with all effective applicable provisions of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act.
(xiv) The Company represents and agrees that, unless it obtains the prior written consent of the Underwriter, and the Underwriter represents and agrees that, unless it obtains the prior written consent of the Company, it has not made and will not make any offer relating to the Securities that would constitute an "issuer free writing prospectus," as defined in Rule 433 under the Securities Act, or that would otherwise constitute a "free writing prospectus," as defined in Rule 405 under the Securities Act, required to be filed with the Commission; provided that the prior written consent of the parties hereto shall be deemed to have been given in respect of the free writing prospectuses included in Schedule I. Any such free writing prospectus consented to by the Company and the Underwriter is hereinafter referred to as a "." The Company represents that it has treated or agrees that it will treat each Permitted Free Writing Prospectus as an "issuer free writing prospectus," as defined in Rule 433, and has complied and will comply with the requirements of Rule 433 applicable to any Permitted Free Writing Prospectus, including timely Commission filing where required, legending and record keeping.
Permitted Free Writing Prospectus
 
The obligations of the Underwriter hereunder are subject to the accuracy, as of the date hereof and at the Closing Date (as if made at the Closing Date), of and compliance with all representations, warranties and agreements of the Company contained herein, to the performance by the Company of its obligations hereunder and to the following additional conditions:
5. Conditions of the Underwriter's Obligations.
(a) If filing of the Prospectus, or any amendment or supplement thereto, or any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus, is required under the Securities Act or the Rules and Regulations, the Company shall have filed the Prospectus (or such amendment or supplement) or such Issuer Free Writing Prospectus with the Commission in the manner and within the time period so required (without reliance on Rule 424(b)(8) or Rule 164(b)); the Registration Statement shall remain effective; no stop order suspending the effectiveness of the Registration Statement or any part thereof, or any amendment thereof, nor suspending or preventing the use of the Time of Sale Disclosure Package, the Prospectus or any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus shall have been issued; no proceedings for the issuance of such an order shall have been initiated or threatened; any request of the Commission for additional information (to be included in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Disclosure Package, the Prospectus, any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus or otherwise) shall have been complied with to the Underwriter's satisfaction; and the FINRA shall have raised no objection to the fairness and reasonableness of the underwriting terms and arrangements.
(b) The Underwriter shall not have reasonably determined, and advised the Company, that the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Disclosure Package or the Prospectus, or any amendment thereof or supplement thereto, or any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus, contains an untrue statement of fact which, in the Underwriter's reasonable opinion, is material, or omits to state a fact which, in the Underwriter's reasonable opinion, is material and is required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading.
(c) Except as contemplated in the Time of Sale Disclosure Package or in the Prospectus, subsequent to the respective dates as of which information is given in the Time of Sale Disclosure Package, neither the Company nor any of its subsidiaries shall have incurred any material liabilities or obligations, direct or contingent, or entered into any material transactions, or declared or paid any dividends or made any distribution of any kind with respect to its capital stock; and there shall not have been any change in the capital stock (other than a change in the number of outstanding shares of Common Stock due to the issuance of shares upon the exercise of outstanding options or warrants), or any material change in the short-term or long-term debt of the Company, or any issuance of options, warrants, convertible securities or other rights to purchase the capital stock of the Company or any of its subsidiaries, or any Material Adverse Change (whether or not arising in the ordinary course of business), or any loss by strike, fire, flood, earthquake, accident or other calamity, whether or not covered by insurance, incurred by the Company or any subsidiary, the effect of which, in any such case described above, in the Underwriter's judgment, makes it impractical or inadvisable to offer or deliver the Securities on the terms and in the manner contemplated in the Time of Sale Disclosure Package, the Registration Statement and in the Prospectus.
 
(d) On or after the Time of Sale (i) no downgrading shall have occurred in the rating accorded any of the Company's securities by any "nationally recognized statistical organization," as that term is defined by the Commission for purposes of Rule 436(g)(2) under the Securities Act, and (ii) no such organization shall have publicly announced that it has under surveillance or review, with possible negative implications, its rating of any of the Company's securities.
(e) On the Closing Date, there shall have been furnished to the Underwriter the opinion of Fenwick & West LLP, counsel for the Company, dated the Closing Date and addressed to the Underwriter, in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to the Underwriter, to the effect set forth in Schedule II.
In rendering such opinion such counsel may rely (i) as to matters of law other than California, Delaware and federal law, upon the opinion or opinions of local counsel provided that the extent of such reliance is specified in such opinion and that such counsel shall state that such opinion or opinions of local counsel are satisfactory to them and that they believe they and the Underwriter are justified in relying thereon and (ii) as to matters of fact, to the extent such counsel deems reasonable upon certificates of officers of the Company and its subsidiaries provided that the extent of such reliance is specified in such opinion.
(f) On the Closing Date, the Underwriter shall have received a letter of Deloitte & Touche LLP, dated the Closing Date and addressed to the Underwriter, confirming that they are independent public accountants within the meaning of the Securities Act and are in compliance with the applicable requirements relating to the qualifications of accountants under Rule 2-01 of Regulation S-X of the Commission, and stating, as of the date of such letter (or, with respect to matters involving changes or developments since the respective dates as of which specified financial information is given in the Time of Sale Disclosure Package, as of a date not prior to the date hereof or more than five days prior to the date of such letter), the conclusions and findings of said firm with respect to the financial information and other matters typically covered by "comfort letters" delivered by accountants in connection with the type of transaction contemplated by this Agreement.
(g) On the Closing Date, there shall have been furnished to the Underwriter a certificate, dated the Closing Date and addressed to the Underwriter, signed by the chief executive officer or the chief financial officer of the Company, in their capacity as officers of the Company, to the effect that:
(i) The representations and warranties of the Company in this Agreement are true and correct, in all material respects, as if made at and as of the Closing Date, and the Company has complied with all the agreements and satisfied all the conditions on its part to be performed or satisfied at or prior to the Closing Date;
(ii) No stop order or other order suspending the effectiveness of the Registration Statement or any part thereof or any amendment thereof or the qualification
 
of the Securities for offering or sale nor suspending or preventing the use of the Time of Sale Disclosure Package, the Prospectus or any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus, has been issued, and no proceeding for that purpose has been instituted or, to the best of their knowledge, is contemplated by the Commission or any state or regulatory body; and
(iii) The signers of said certificate have carefully examined the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Disclosure Package and the Prospectus, and any amendments thereof or supplements thereto (including any documents filed under the Exchange Act and deemed to be incorporated by reference into the Time of Sale Disclosure Package, the Registration Statement or the Prospectus), and
(A) each part of the Registration Statement and the Prospectus, and any amendments thereof or supplements thereto (including any documents filed under the Exchange Act and deemed to be incorporated by reference into the Prospectus) contain, and contained, when such part of the Registration Statement (or such amendment) became effective, all statements and information required to be included therein, each part of the Registration Statement, or any amendment thereof, does not contain, and did not contain, when such part of the Registration Statement (or such amendment) became effective, any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state, and did not omit to state when such part of the Registration Statement (or such amendment) became effective, any material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading, and the Prospectus, as amended or supplemented, does not include and did not include as of its date, or the time of first use within the meaning of the Rules and Regulations, any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state and did not omit to state as of its date, or the time of first use within the meaning of the Rules and Regulations, a material fact necessary to make the statements therein, in light of the circumstances under which they were made,
(B) neither (1) the Time of Sale Disclosure Package nor (2) any individual Issuer Limited-Use Free Writing Prospectus, when considered together with the Time of Sale Disclosure Package, include, nor included as of the Time of Sale any untrue statement of a material fact or omits, or omitted as of the Time of Sale, to state any material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading.
(C) since the Time of Sale, there has occurred no event required to be set forth in an amended or supplemented prospectus which has not been so set forth, and no event which has required that there be filed under the Exchange Act any report that upon such filing would be deemed to be incorporated by reference into the Time of Sale Disclosure Package, the Registration Statement or into the Prospectus that has not been so filed,
(D) subsequent to the respective dates as of which information is given in the Time of Sale Disclosure Package, neither the Company nor any of its subsidiaries has incurred any material liabilities or obligations, direct or contingent, or entered into any material transactions, not in the ordinary course of
 
business, or declared or paid any dividends or made any distribution of any kind with respect to its capital stock, and except as disclosed in the Time of Sale Disclosure Package or in the Prospectus, there has not been any change in the capital stock (other than a change in the number of outstanding shares of Common Stock due to the issuance of shares upon the exercise of outstanding options or warrants), or any material change in the short-term or long-term debt, or any issuance of options, warrants, convertible securities or other rights to purchase the capital stock, of the Company, or any of its subsidiaries, or any Material Adverse Change or any development involving a prospective Material Adverse Change (whether or not arising in the ordinary course of business), or any loss by strike, fire, flood, earthquake, accident or other calamity, whether or not covered by insurance, incurred by the Company or any subsidiary, and
(E) except as stated in the Time of Sale Disclosure Package or in the Prospectus, there is not pending, or, to the knowledge of the Company, threatened or contemplated, any action, suit or proceeding to which the Company or any of its subsidiaries is a party before or by any court or governmental agency, authority or body, or any arbitrator, which could reasonably be expected to result in any Material Adverse Change.
(h) The Company shall have furnished to the Underwriter and counsel for the Underwriter such additional documents, certificates and evidence as the Underwriter or counsel for the Underwriter may have reasonably requested.
All such opinions, certificates, letters and other documents will be in compliance with the provisions hereof only if they are satisfactory in form and substance to the Underwriter and counsel for the Underwriter. The Company will furnish the Underwriter with such conformed copies of such opinions, certificates, letters and other documents as the Underwriter shall reasonably request.
6. Indemnification and Contribution.
(a) The Company agrees to indemnify and hold harmless the Underwriter against any losses, claims, damages or liabilities to which the Underwriter may become subject, under the Securities Act or otherwise (including in settlement of any litigation if such settlement is effected with the written consent of the Company), insofar as such losses, claims, damages or liabilities (or actions in respect thereof) arise out of or are based upon (i) an untrue statement or alleged untrue statement of a material fact contained in the Registration Statement, including the information deemed to be a part of the Registration Statement at the time of effectiveness and at any subsequent time pursuant to Rules 430A and 430B of the Rules and Regulations, the Time of Sale Disclosure Package, the Prospectus, or any amendment or supplement thereto (including any documents filed under the Exchange Act and deemed to be incorporated by reference into the Prospectus), any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus or in any materials or information provided to investors by, or with the approval of, the Company in connection with the marketing of the offering of the Common Stock (""), including any roadshow or investor presentations made to investors by the Company (whether in person or electronically) or arise out of or are based upon the omission or alleged omission to state therein a material fact required
Marketing Materials
 
to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading, and will reimburse the Underwriter for any legal or other expenses reasonably incurred by it in connection with investigating or defending against such loss, claim, damage, liability or action; or (ii) in whole or in part upon any inaccuracy in the representations and warranties of the Company contained herein; or (iii) in whole or in part upon any failure of the Company to perform its obligations hereunder or under law; , that the Company shall not be liable in any such case to the extent that any such loss, claim, damage, liability or action arises out of or is based upon an untrue statement or alleged untrue statement or omission or alleged omission made in the Registration Statement, any Preliminary Prospectus, the Time of Sale Disclosure Package, the Prospectus, or any such amendment or supplement, any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus or in any Marketing Materials, in reliance upon and in conformity with written information furnished to the Company by the Underwriter specifically for use in the preparation thereof.
provided, however
The Company agrees that, as an interim measure during the pendency of any claim, action, investigation, inquiry or other proceeding arising out of or based upon any statement or omission, or any alleged statement or omission, described in this Section 6(a), it will reimburse the Underwriter on a monthly basis for all reasonable legal fees or other expenses incurred in connection with investigating or defending any such claim, action, investigation, inquiry or other proceeding, notwithstanding the absence of a judicial determination as to the propriety and enforceability of the Company's obligation to reimburse the Underwriter for such expenses and the possibility that such payments might later be held to have been improper by a court of competent jurisdiction. To the extent that any such interim reimbursement payment is so held to have been improper, the Underwriter shall promptly return it to the Company, together with interest, compounded daily, determined on the basis of the prime rate (or other commercial lending rate for borrowers of the highest credit standing) announced from time to time by Wells Fargo Bank, N.A. (the ). Any such interim reimbursement payments which are not made to the Underwriter within 30 days of a written request for reimbursement shall bear interest at the Prime Rate from the date of such request. This indemnity agreement shall be in addition to any liabilities which the may otherwise have.
"Prime Rate"
(b) The Underwriter will indemnify and hold harmless the Company against any losses, claims, damages or liabilities to which the Company may become subject, under the Securities Act or otherwise (including in settlement of any litigation, if such settlement is effected with the written consent of such Underwriter), insofar as such losses, claims, damages or liabilities (or actions in respect thereof) arise out of or are based upon an untrue statement or alleged untrue statement of a material fact contained in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Disclosure Package, the Prospectus, or any amendment or supplement thereto any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus or any marketing materials, or arise out of or are based upon the omission or alleged omission to state therein a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading, in each case to the extent, but only to the extent, that such untrue statement or alleged untrue statement or omission or alleged omission was made in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Disclosure Package, the Prospectus, or any amendment or supplement thereto, or any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus or any marketing materials in reliance upon and in conformity with written information furnished to the Company by the Underwriter specifically for use in the preparation thereof, and will reimburse the Company for any legal or other expenses reasonably incurred by the Company in connection with investigating or defending against any such loss, claim, damage, liability or action.
 
The Company agrees that, as an interim measure during the pendency of any claim, action, investigation, inquiry or other proceeding arising out of or based upon any statement or omission, or any alleged statement or omission, described in this Section 6(b), it will reimburse the Underwriter on a monthly basis for all reasonable legal fees or other expenses incurred in connection with investigating or defending any such claim, action, investigation, inquiry or other proceeding, notwithstanding the absence of a judicial determination as to the propriety and enforceability of the Company's obligation to reimburse the Underwriter for such expenses and the possibility that such payments might later be held to have been improper by a court of competent jurisdiction. To the extent that any such interim reimbursement payment is so held to have been improper, the Underwriter shall promptly return it to the Company, together with interest, compounded daily, determined on the basis of the prime rate (or other commercial lending rate for borrowers of the highest credit standing) announced from time to time by Wells Fargo Bank, N.A. (the ). Any such interim reimbursement payments which are not made to the Underwriter within 30 days of a written request for reimbursement shall bear interest at the Prime Rate from the date of such request. This indemnity agreement shall be in addition to any liabilities which the may otherwise have.
"Prime Rate"
(c) Promptly after receipt by an indemnified party under subsection (a) or (b) above of notice of the commencement of any action, such indemnified party shall, if a claim in respect thereof is to be made against the indemnifying party under such subsection, notify the indemnifying party in writing of the commencement thereof; but the omission so to notify the indemnifying party shall not relieve the indemnifying party from any liability that it may have to any indemnified party except to the extent such indemnifying party has been materially prejudiced by such failure. In case any such action shall be brought against any indemnified party, and it shall notify the indemnifying party of the commencement thereof, the indemnifying party shall be entitled to participate in, and, to the extent that it shall wish, jointly with any other indemnifying party similarly notified, to assume the defense thereof, with counsel satisfactory to such indemnified party, and after notice from the indemnifying party to such indemnified party of the indemnifying party's election so to assume the defense thereof, the indemnifying party shall not be liable to such indemnified party under such subsection for any legal or other expenses subsequently incurred by such indemnified party in connection with the defense thereof other than reasonable costs of investigation; provided, however, that if (i) the indemnified party has reasonably concluded (based on advice of counsel) that there may be legal defenses available to it or other indemnified parties that are different from or in addition to those available to the indemnifying party, (ii) or a conflict or potential conflict exists (based on advice of counsel to the indemnified party) between the indemnified party and the indemnifying party (in which case the indemnifying party will not have the right to direct the defense of such action on behalf of the indemnified party), or (iii) the indemnifying party has not in fact employed counsel reasonably satisfactory to the indemnified party to assume the defense of such action with a reasonable time after receiving notice of the commencement of the action, the indemnified party shall have the right to employ a single counsel to represent it in any claim in respect of which indemnity may be sought under subsection (a) or (b) of this Section 6, in which event the reasonable fees and expenses of such separate counsel shall be borne by the indemnifying party or parties and reimbursed to the indemnified party as incurred (in accordance with the provisions of the second paragraph in subsection (a) above).
 
The indemnifying party under this Section 6 shall not be liable for any settlement of any proceeding effected without its written consent, but if settled with such consent or if there be a final judgment for the plaintiff, the indemnifying party agrees to indemnify the indemnified party against any loss, claim, damage, liability or expense by reason of such settlement or judgment. No indemnifying party shall, without the prior written consent of the indemnified party, effect any settlement, compromise or consent to the entry of judgment in any pending or threatened action, suit or proceeding in respect of which any indemnified party is or could have been a party and indemnity was or could have been sought hereunder by such indemnified party, unless such settlement, compromise or consent (a) includes an unconditional release of such indemnified party from all liability on claims that are the subject matter of such action, suit or proceeding and (b) does not include a statement as to or an admission of fault, culpability or a failure to act by or on behalf of any indemnified party.
(d) If the indemnification provided for in this Section 6 is unavailable or insufficient to hold harmless an indemnified party under subsection (a) or (b) above, then each indemnifying party shall contribute to the amount paid or payable by such indemnified party as a result of the losses, claims, damages or liabilities referred to in subsection (a) or (b) above, (i) in such proportion as is appropriate to reflect the relative benefits received by the Company on the one hand and the Underwriter on the other from the offering of the Securities or (ii) if the allocation provided by clause (i) above is not permitted by applicable law, in such proportion as is appropriate to reflect not only the relative benefits referred to in clause (i) above but also the relative fault of the Company on the one hand and the Underwriter on the other in connection with the statements or omissions that resulted in such losses, claims, damages or liabilities, as well as any other relevant equitable considerations. The relative benefits received by the Company on the one hand and the Underwriter on the other shall be deemed to be in the same proportion as the total net proceeds from the offering (before deducting expenses) received by the Company bear to the total underwriting discounts and commissions received by the Underwriter, in each case as set forth in the table on the cover page of the Prospectus. The relative fault shall be determined by reference to, among other things, whether the untrue or alleged untrue statement of a material fact or the omission or alleged omission to state a material fact relates to information supplied by the Company or the Underwriter and the parties' relevant intent, knowledge, access to information and opportunity to correct or prevent such untrue statement or omission. The Company and the Underwriter agree that it would not be just and equitable if contributions pursuant to this subsection (d) were to be determined by pro rata allocation or by any other method of allocation which does not take account of the equitable considerations referred to in the first sentence of this subsection (d). The amount paid by an indemnified party as a result of the losses, claims, damages or liabilities referred to in the first sentence of this subsection (d) shall be deemed to include any legal or other expenses reasonably incurred by such indemnified party in connection with investigating or defending against any action or claim which is the subject of this subsection (d). Notwithstanding the provisions of this subsection (d), the Underwriter shall not be required to contribute any amount in excess of the amount by which the total price at which the Securities were offered to the public exceeds the amount of any damages that the Underwriter has otherwise been required to pay by reason of such untrue or alleged untrue statement or omission or alleged omission. No person guilty of fraudulent misrepresentation (within the meaning of Section 11(f) of the Securities Act) shall be entitled to contribution from any person who was not guilty of such fraudulent misrepresentation.
 
(e) The obligations of the Company under this Section 6 shall be in addition to any liability which the Company may otherwise have and the benefits of such obligations shall extend, upon the same terms and conditions, to each person, if any, who controls the Underwriter within the meaning of the Securities Act; and the obligations of the Underwriter under this Section 6 shall be in addition to any liability that the Underwriter may otherwise have and the benefits of such obligations shall extend, upon the same terms and conditions, to each director of the Company (including any person who, with his consent, is named in the Registration Statement as about to become a director of the Company), to each officer of the Company who has signed the Registration Statement and to each person, if any, who controls the Company within the meaning of the Securities Act.
(f) The Underwriter confirms and the Company acknowledges that there is no information concerning the Underwriter furnished in writing to the Company by the Underwriter specifically for inclusion in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Disclosure Package, the Prospectus or any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus.
All representations, warranties, and agreements of the Company herein or in certificates delivered pursuant hereto, including but not limited to the agreements of the Underwriter and the Company contained in Section 6 hereof, shall remain operative and in full force and effect regardless of any investigation made by or on behalf of the Underwriter or any controlling person thereof, or the Company or any of its officers, directors, or controlling persons, and shall survive delivery of, and payment for, the Securities to and by the Underwriter hereunder.
7. Representations and Agreements to Survive Delivery.
8. Termination of this Agreement.
(a) The Underwriter shall have the right to terminate this Agreement by giving notice to the Company as hereinafter specified at any time at or prior to the Closing Date, if (i) the Company shall have failed, refused or been unable, at or prior to the Closing Date, to perform any material agreement on its part to be performed hereunder, (ii) any condition of the Underwriter's obligations hereunder is not fulfilled, (iii) trading in the Company's Common Stock shall have been suspended by the Commission or the American Stock Exchange or trading in securities generally on the Nasdaq Global Market, New York Stock Exchange or the American Stock Exchange shall have been suspended, (iv) minimum or maximum prices for trading shall have been fixed, or maximum ranges for prices for securities shall have been required, on the Nasdaq Global Market, New York Stock Exchange or the American Stock Exchange, by such Exchange or by order of the Commission or any other governmental authority having jurisdiction, (v) a banking moratorium shall have been declared by federal or California or New York state authorities, or (vi) there shall have occurred any attack on, outbreak or escalation of hostilities or act of terrorism involving the United States, any declaration by the United States of a national emergency or war, any change in financial markets, any substantial change or development involving a prospective substantial change in United States or international political, financial or economic conditions, or any other calamity or crisis that, in the Underwriter's judgment, is material and adverse and makes it impractical or inadvisable to
 
proceed with the completion of the sale of and payment for the Securities. Any such termination shall be without liability of any party to any other party except that the provisions of Section 4(a)(vii) and Section 6 hereof shall at all times be effective and shall survive such termination.
(b) If the Underwriter elects to terminate this Agreement as provided in this Section, the Company shall be notified promptly by the Underwriter by telephone, confirmed by letter.
If the Company shall fail at the Closing Date to sell and deliver the Securities which it is obligated to sell hereunder, then this Agreement shall terminate without any liability on the part of the Underwriter or, except as provided in Section 4(a)(vii), any non-defaulting party. No action taken pursuant to this Section shall relieve the Company from liability, if any, in respect of such default.
9. Default the Company.
Except as otherwise provided herein, all communications hereunder shall be in writing and, if to the Underwriter, shall be mailed, delivered or telecopied to Roth Capital Partners, LLC, 24 Corporate Plaza, Newport Beach, CA 92660, Attn: Aaron Gurewitz; if to the Company, shall be mailed, delivered or telecopied to it at 1501 Industrial Road, San Carlos, California 94070, Attention: James B. Hawkins; or in each case to such other address as the person to be notified may have requested in writing. Any party to this Agreement may change such address for notices by sending to the parties to this Agreement written notice of a new address for such purpose.
10. Notices.
This Agreement shall inure to the benefit of and be binding upon the parties hereto and their respective successors and assigns and the controlling persons, officers and directors referred to in Section 6. Nothing in this Agreement is intended or shall be construed to give to any other person, firm or corporation any legal or equitable remedy or claim under or in respect of this Agreement or any provision herein contained. The term "successors and assigns" as herein used shall not include any purchaser, as such purchaser, of any of the Securities from the Underwriter.
11. Persons Entitled to Benefit of Agreement.
The Company acknowledges and agrees that: (a) the Underwriter has been retained solely to act as underwriter in connection with the sale of the Securities and that no fiduciary, advisory or agency relationship between the Company and the Underwriter has been created in respect of any of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement, irrespective of whether the Underwriter has advised or is advising the Company on other matters; (b) the price and other terms of the Securities set forth in this Agreement were established by the Company following discussions and arms-length negotiations with the Underwriter and the Company is capable of evaluating and understanding and understands and accepts the terms, risks and conditions of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement; (c) it has been advised that the Underwriter and its affiliates are engaged in a broad range of transactions which may involve interests that differ from those of the Company and that the Underwriter has no obligation to disclose such interest and transactions to the Company by virtue of any fiduciary, advisory or agency relationship; (d) it has been advised that the Underwriter is acting, in respect of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement, solely for the benefit of the Underwriter, and not on behalf of the Company.
12. Absence of Fiduciary Relationship.
 
This Agreement shall be governed by and construed in accordance with the laws of the State of California.
13. Governing Law.
This Agreement may be executed in one or more counterparts and, if executed in more than one counterpart, the executed counterparts shall each be deemed to be an original and all such counterparts shall together constitute one and the same instrument.
14. Counterparts.
 
Please sign and return to the Company the enclosed duplicates of this letter whereupon this letter will become a binding agreement between the Company and the Underwriter in accordance with its terms.
 
 
Number of Securities Purchased 770,000
 
None.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Natus Acquisition Corporation (d/b/a Neometrics, Inc., a Division of Natus) (Delaware)
Natus Neonatal Ltd. (United Kingdom)
Fischer-Zoth Diagnosesysteme GmbH (Germany)
Fischer-Zoth GmbH (Austria)
Fischer-Zoth Modulare Hordiagnostik GmBH & Co KG (German limited partnership)
Deltamed S.A. (France)
Excel Tech Ltd. (Canada)
On April 4, 2008, the Company priced the transaction that we previously discussed with you. The public offering price was determined to be $18.27 per share or an aggregate $14,067,900 for the 770,000 shares offered. Our underwriting discount is 5%, amounting to a rate of $0.9135 per share (except for the 175,000 shares sold to D
3
Family Fund, L.P., D
3
Family Canadian Fund, L.P., D
3
Family Bulldog Fund, L.P., DIII Offshore Fund, L.P., or affiliated individuals and investment funds, collectively the "D
3
Family Funds") or $543,532.50. The proceeds, before expenses to the Company, are $18.27 on those shares sold to the D
3
Family Funds and $17.3565 per share on all other shares sold, or in the aggregate $13,524,368. On April 3, 2008, the last reported sale price of the Company's common stock on the Nasdaq Global Market was $18.27 per share.
The Company has entered into an underwriting agreement with us with respect to 770,000 shares of common stock which are being offered pursuant to a prospectus supplement. Pursuant to the underwriting agreement the Company has agreed to sell to us, and we have agreed to purchase from the Company, an aggregate of 770,000 shares of common stock.
We propose to offer to the public (including the shares sold to D
3
Family Funds) the shares of common stock purchased pursuant to the underwriting agreement at the public offering price of $18.27 per share. In connection with the sale of the shares of common stock to be purchased by us, we will be deemed to have received compensation in the form of underwriting discounts (except for the shares sold to D
3
Family Funds). Our commission and discount (except for the shares sold to D
3
Family Funds) will be 5%, amounting to $0.9135 per share of common stock for a total of $543,532.50. The Company will bear the expenses of the offering which are estimated to be $100,000. The net proceeds to the Company, after our commission and discount and the offering expenses, will be $13,424,368.
Pursuant to the underwriting agreement, the Company has agreed to indemnify us, in our role as underwriter, and certain other parties against certain liabilities, including liabilities under the Securities Act, or to contribute to payments which we or such other indemnified parties may be required to make in respect of any such liabilities.
The estimated net proceeds to the Company if it sells the maximum number of shares offered in this offering, including the over-allotment option, will be $15,429,043.25, after deducting our commission and discount and estimated offering expenses of $749,041.75. The Company expects to use the net proceeds to it from this offering for general corporate purposes, which may include the financing of acquisitions of, or investments in, companies and technologies that complement its business, capital expenditures or additions to its working capital.

Exhibit 5.01
Natus Medical Incorporated
1501 Industrial Road
San Carlos, CA 94070
Ladies and Gentlemen:
At your request, we have examined the Registration Statement on Form S-3 (File Number 333-133480) (the "") filed by Natus Medical Incorporated, a Delaware corporation (the ""), with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the "") on April 24, 2006, as amended on August 9, 2006 and August 15, 2006, as subsequently supplemented by the prospectus filed with the Commission on August 18, 2006, and the prospectus supplement applicable to the Offering (as defined below), in connection with the registration under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, of the proposed issuance and sale, from time to time, by the Company of shares of its common stock having a maximum aggregate public offering price of One Hundred Million Dollars ($100,000,000) (the "").
Registration Statement
Company
Commission
Stock
The Company currently proposes to sell up to an aggregate of 770,000 shares (the "") of the Company's common stock, par value of $0.001 per share (the ""), under the Registration Statement (the ""), all of which will be sold to the Underwriter (as defined herein) pursuant to that certain Purchase Agreement (the "") dated April 4, 2008, by and between the Company and Roth Capital Partners, LLC (the "").
Takedown Shares
Common Stock
Offering
Purchase Agreement
Underwriter
In rendering this opinion, we have examined such matters of fact as we have deemed necessary in order to render the opinion set forth herein, which included examination of the following:
 
 
 
 
Natus Medical Incorporated
April 4, 2008
Page 2 of 4
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
In our examination of documents for purposes of this opinion, we have assumed, and express no opinion as to, the authenticity and completeness of all documents submitted to us as originals, the genuineness of all signatures on original documents, the conformity to originals and completeness of all documents submitted to us as copies, the legal capacity of all persons or entities executing the same, the lack of any undisclosed termination, modification, waiver or amendment to any documents reviewed by us, and the due authorization, execution and delivery of all documents where authorization, due execution and delivery are prerequisites to the effectiveness thereof. We have also assumed that, if and to the extent that the Takedown Shares are issued in certificated form, the certificates representing the Takedown Shares will be, when issued, in the form of the certificate reviewed by us and properly signed by authorized officers of the Company or their agents.
As to matters of fact relevant to this opinion, we have relied solely upon our examination of the documents referred to above and have assumed the current accuracy and completeness of the information included in the documents referred to above and the representations and warranties made by representatives of the Company to us, including but not limited to those set forth in the
Natus Medical Incorporated
April 4, 2008
Page 3 of 4
Management Certificate. We have made no independent investigation or other attempt to verify the accuracy of any of such information or to determine the existence or non-existence of any other factual matters; however, we are not aware of any facts that would cause us to believe that the opinion expressed herein is not accurate.
In connection with our opinion expressed below, we have assumed that, at or prior to the time of the delivery of any of the Takedown Shares, there will not have occurred any change in law affecting the validity of the Takedown Shares.
This opinion is limited to such California State and United States of America federal laws or statutes, the General Corporation Law of the State of Delaware as in effect on the date hereof, rules or regulations of any California State and United States of America federal courts or arbitrators or governmental or regulatory authorities, or consents, approvals, authorizations, orders, registrations or qualifications of or with any United States federal or California State court, arbitrator, administrative agency or governmental or regulatory authority, as in our experience are generally applied to transactions of the type provided for in the Purchase Agreement. We express no opinion herein with respect to any other laws or to the application of the laws of any other jurisdiction. Additionally, we disclaim any opinion as to the application of any law of any city, county or other local subdivision of the States of California and Delaware. We have made no inquiry into, and express no opinion with respect to, any statutes, rules, regulations, treaties or common laws of any other nation, state or jurisdiction, or the effect on the transactions provided for in the Purchase Agreement of non-compliance under any such statutes, rules, regulations, treaties or common law. The opinions expressed herein are qualified by, and are subject to, and we express no opinion with respect to, compliance by the Company or the Underwriter with any state or foreign "blue sky" statute, rule or regulation in connection with the issuance and sale of the Securities pursuant to the Purchase Agreement.
Based upon the foregoing, it is our opinion that the Takedown Shares, when issued, sold and delivered in the manner and for the consideration stated in the Registration Statement, the Base Prospectus and the Prospectus Supplement, and pursuant to the terms of the Purchase Agreement, will be validly issued, fully paid and nonassessable.
We consent to the use of this opinion as an exhibit to the Form 8-K and further consent to all references to us, if any, in the Registration Statement, the Base Prospectus and the Prospectus Supplement constituting a part thereof and any amendments thereto. This opinion is intended solely for use in connection with the issuance and sale of Takedown Shares subject to the Registration Statement and is not to be relied upon for any other purpose. This opinion speaks as of the date first above written, and we assume no obligation to advise you of any fact, circumstance, event or change in the law or the facts that may hereafter be brought to our attention whether or not such occurrence would affect or modify the opinions expressed herein.

Exhibit 99.1
Natus to Raise Approximately $13 Million
- Shelf Offering Priced at Close of Market on April 3, 2008
(Nasdaq: BABY) today announced that it priced an offering to sell 770,000 shares of its common stock at a public offering price of $18.27 per share, which is equal to the closing price of the Company's common stock on the NASDAQ Global Market on April 3, 2008. The shares are being sold under the Company's previously filed shelf registration statement, which was declared effective by the Securities and Exchange Commission on August 15, 2006.
SAN CARLOS, Calif., April 4, 2008  Natus Medical Incorporated
The Company expects that the net proceeds of the offering will be approximately $13.4 million after deducting underwriting discounts and other expenses associated with the offering. The Company currently intends to use the net proceeds for general corporate purposes, which may include the financing of potential acquisitions of, or investments in, companies and technologies that complement the Company's business, as well as for capital expenditures and working capital needs. The Company does not expect to use the proceeds to accelerate payments on its existing term debt with Wells Fargo Bank.
In connection with the offering, the Company also granted the underwriter a 30-day option to purchase up to an additional 115,500 shares to cover over-allotments, if any. The offering is expected to close on or about April 9, 2008. For additional information regarding the terms of the offering, please refer to the Company's Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on April 4, 2008.
Roth Capital Partners, LLC acted as the sole underwriter of the offering. Copies of the final prospectus relating to the offering may be obtained from Roth Capital Partners, LLC at 24 Corporate Plaza, Newport Beach, CA 92660, (949) 720-5700.
This press release does not constitute an offer to sell or the solicitation of an offer to buy any securities of the Company and there shall not be any sale of any such securities in a State in which such offer, solicitation or sale would be unlawful prior to registration or qualification under the securities laws of such State.
About Natus Medical Incorporated
Natus is a leading provider of healthcare products used for the screening, detection, treatment, monitoring and tracking of common medical ailments such as hearing impairment, neurological dysfunction, epilepsy, sleep disorders, and newborn care. Product offerings include computerized neurodiagnostic systems for audiology, neurology, polysomnography, and neonatology, as well as newborn care products such as hearing screening systems, phototherapy devices for the treatment of newborn jaundice, head-cooling products for the treatment of brain injury in newborns, and software systems for managing and tracking disorders and diseases for public health laboratories.
Additional information about Natus Medical can be found at www.natus.com.
This press release contains forward-looking statements as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, particularly statements regarding the expectations, beliefs, plans, intentions and strategies of Natus. These forward-looking statements include, but are not limited to, statements regarding
the amount to be raised and the expected use of proceeds. These statements relate to future events or Natus' future financial performance or results, and involve known and unknown risks, uncertainties and other factors that may cause actual results, levels of activity, performance, or achievements to differ materially from those expressed or implied by the forward-looking statements. Forward-looking statements are only predictions and the actual events or results may differ materially. Natus cannot provide any assurance that its future results or the results implied by the forward-looking statements will meet expectations. Our future results could differ materially due to a number of factors, including the effects of competition, the demand for our products and services, our ability to expand our sales in international markets, our ability to maintain current sales levels in a mature domestic market, our ability to control costs, and risks associated with bringing new products to market and integrating acquired businesses. Natus disclaims any obligation to update information contained in any forward-looking statement.
More information about potential risk factors that could affect the business and financial results of Natus is included in Natus' annual report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2007, and its quarterly reports on Form 10-Q, and in other reports filed from time to time by Natus with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission.
COMPANY CONTACT:
Natus Medical Incorporated
Steven J. Murphy
Vice President Finance and Chief Financial Officer
(650) 802-0400
InvestorRelations@Natus.com


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BABY/BABY-8K-20080409112806.txt.gz
TIME:20080409112806
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
As previously announced, on April 4, 2008, Natus Medical Incorporated ("Natus") entered into a common stock purchase agreement (the "Purchase Agreement") with Roth Capital Partners, LLC (the "Underwriter"). The Purchase Agreement provides for the sale of 770,000 shares of Natus common stock at a public offering price of $18.27 per share, which was the closing price of Natus stock on the NASDAQ Global Market on April 3, 2008, (the "Offering"). Natus will pay to the Underwriter an underwriting discount of 5%, or $0.9135 per share, on shares sold in the Offering, except for approximately 175,000 shares expected to be sold to the D3 Family Fund, L.P., D3 Family Bulldog Fund, L.P., D3 Family Canadian Fund, L.P. and DIII Offshore Fund, L.P., or affiliated individuals and investment funds (the "D3 Family Funds"), for which there will be no discount. Natus also granted the Underwriter an option to purchase up to 115,500 additional shares solely to cover over-allotments, if any. These shares are being offered and sold under a prospectus supplement filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission pursuant to Rule 424(b)(5) of the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, in connection with an offering pursuant to Natus's shelf registration statement on Form S-3 (Registration No. 333-133480) (the "Registration Statement").
On April 7, 2008, the Underwriter advised the Company that it was exercising in full its over-allotment option granted pursuant to the Purchase Agreement. The Offering closed on April 9, 2008, with Natus selling an aggregate of 885,500 shares of its common stock to the Underwriter for net proceeds, after underwriting discounts and estimated expenses of the Offering, of approximately $15.4 million. A copy of the press release announcing the closing of the Offering is attached as Exhibit 99.01 to this Form 8-K.
The above description of the Purchase Agreement is qualified in its entirety by the Purchase Agreement, a copy of which is attached as Exhibit 1.01 to the Company's Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the SEC on April 4, 2008.
In connection with the Offering, Natus also entered into a Registration Rights Agreement, dated April 9, 2008, with the D3 Family Funds. Under this agreement, at any time after October 9, 2008, the D3 Family Funds can request that Natus file a registration statement covering registrable securities held by them for a minimum of 500,000 to a maximum of 2 million shares of Natus common stock. In addition, once six months has elapsed from their initial demand registration request, the D3 Family Funds can request that Natus file a second registration statement covering registrable securities held by them for again a minimum of 500,000 to a maximum of 2 million shares. Once in a 12-month period, Natus may postpone the filing of a registration statement for up to 60 days if Natus determines that the filing would be detrimental to it and its stockholders. Natus will pay all expenses incurred in connection with each of the registrations described above, other than underwriting discounts and commissions and the fees of legal counsel for the D3 Family Funds in excess of $10,000, to the extent the registrations do not take the form of an underwritten offering. However, if any distribution of common stock under a demand registration is to be effected by means of an underwritten offering, then the D3 Family Funds will pay all expenses incurred in connection with such registration other than the fees of counsel to Natus. The registration rights will terminate to the extent the shares held by and issuable to the D3 Family Funds may be sold under Rule 144 of the Securities Act in any three-month period.
The above description of the Registration Rights Agreement is qualified in its entirety by the Registration Rights Agreement, a copy of which is attached as Exhibit 4.01 to this Form 8-K, which is incorporated by reference into the Registration Statement.
 
In connection with the Offering, Natus is filing a legal opinion and consent as Exhibit No. 5.01 and Exhibit No. 23.01 to this Report, which are incorporated by reference into the Registration Statement.
 
 
The following exhibits are filed herewith:
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
Exhibit Index
 

Exhibit 4.01
This (this "") is made and entered into as of April 9, 2008 by and among Natus Medical Incorporated, a Delaware corporation (the ""), and the parties listed on the signature page to this Agreement (each hereinafter individually referred to as an "" and collectively referred to as the "").
R R A
EGISTRATION
IGHTS
GREEMENT
Agreement
Company
Investor
Investors
WHEREAS, certain of the Investors have agreed to purchase shares of the Company's common stock, par value $0.001 per share (the ""), pursuant to a registration statement on Form S-3 (File No. 333-133480), as amended (the ""), in connection with a public offering of Common Stock underwritten by Roth Capital Partners, LLC (the ""); and
Common Stock
Shelf Registration Statement
Offering
WHEREAS, the Company has agreed to grant certain registration rights to the Investors in connection with the purchase by certain of the Investors of Common Stock in the Offering, as more fully set forth in this Agreement.
NOW, THEREFORE, in consideration of the foregoing and the representations, warranties, covenants and agreements set forth in this Agreement, the parties agree as follows:
 
. For purposes of this Section 1:
1.1
Definitions
(a) . The term "" means the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission
Commission
Commission
(b) . The term "" means the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended.
Exchange Act
Exchange Act
(c) . The term "" shall mean holders of Registrable Securities that have registration rights pursuant to this Agreement.
Holder
Holders
(d) . The terms "," "" and "" refer to a registration effected by preparing and filing a registration statement in compliance with the Securities Act, and the declaration or ordering of effectiveness of such registration statement.
Registration
register
registered
registration
(e) . The term "" means: (1) all of the shares of the Company's Common Stock owned by the Investors as of the date hereof, including the shares of Common Stock purchased by the Investors in the Offering (the "") and (2) any shares of Common Stock issued as a dividend or other distribution with respect to, or in exchange for or in replacement of, any of the Investor Shares; provided, however, that the term "Registrable Securities" shall exclude in all events (and such securities shall not constitute "Registrable Securities") (i) any Registrable Securities sold or transferred in violation of state or federal securities laws, or (ii) as to any Holder, the Registrable Securities held by such Holder if all of such Registrable Securities can be publicly sold without volume restriction within a three-month period pursuant to Rule 144 under the Securities Act.
Registrable Securities
Registrable Securities
Investor Shares
(f) . The term "" shall mean the prospectus included in any registration statement filed pursuant to Section 1.2 of this Agreement (including, without limitation, a prospectus that discloses information previously omitted from a prospectus filed as part of an
Prospectus
Prospectus
effective registration statement in reliance upon Rule 430A promulgated under the Securities Act), as amended or supplemented by any prospectus supplement (including, without limitation, any prospectus supplement with respect to the terms of the offering of any portion of the Registrable Securities covered by such registration statement), and all other amendments and supplements to the Prospectus, including post-effective amendments, and all material incorporated by reference or deemed to be incorporated by reference in such Prospectus
(g) . The term "" means the Securities Act of 1933, as amended.
Securities Act
Securities Act
.
1.2
Demand Registration
(a) . If the Company shall receive at any time a written request from the Holders that, on or after October 9, 2008, the Company file a registration statement under the Securities Act covering the registration of Registrable Securities pursuant to this Section 1.2 (a ""), then the Company shall effect, as soon as practicable, the registration under the Securities Act of all Registrable Securities which Holders request to be registered and included in such registration; , , that the Registrable Securities requested by the Holders to be registered pursuant to such request must not be an amount greater than two million (2,000,000) shares of Common Stock nor in an amount less than five hundred thousand (500,000) shares. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, to the extent that the Company has shares available under an effective shelf registration statement on Form S-3 (the ""), to the extent permitted by the rules and regulations of the Commission, the Company shall first file a prospectus supplement under such Shelf Registration Statement with respect to the lesser of (1) the number of shares requested to be registered by the Holders pursuant to the Request or (2) the number of shares remaining available under such Shelf Registration Statement. Any shares which cannot be included under the Shelf Registration Statement, whether due to lack of availability under the Shelf Registration Statement or due to the rules and regulations of the Commission, shall be subject to a separate registration statement filed by the Company, which separate registration statement shall be filed as soon as practicable, but in no event later than 30 days after the receipt by the Company of a Request.
Request by Holders
Request
provided
however
Shelf Registration Statement
(b) . If the Holders that provide the Company with a Request intend to distribute the Registrable Securities covered by their Request by means of an underwriting, then they shall so advise the Company as a part of their Request. The Holders shall enter into an underwriting agreement in customary form with the managing underwriter or underwriters selected for such underwriting by the Company and approved by a majority in interest of the Holders. Notwithstanding any other provision of this Section 1.2, if the underwriter(s) advise(s) the Company in writing that marketing factors require a limitation of the number of securities to be underwritten, then the Company shall so advise all Holders of Registrable Securities that would otherwise be registered and underwritten pursuant hereto, and the number of Registrable Securities that may be included in the underwriting shall be reduced as required by the underwriter(s) and allocated among the Holders of Registrable Securities on a pro rata basis according to the number of Registrable Securities then outstanding held by each Holder requesting registration; , , that the number of shares of Registrable Securities to be included in such underwriting and registration shall not be reduced unless all other securities of the Company are first entirely excluded from the underwriting and registration. Any Registrable Securities excluded and withdrawn from such underwriting shall be withdrawn from the registration. For any Holder that is a partnership or corporation, the partners, retired partners and shareholders of such Holder, or the estates and family members of any such partners and retired partners and any trusts for the benefit of any of the foregoing persons shall be deemed to be a single "Holder," and any pro rata reduction with respect to such "Holder" shall be based upon the aggregate amount of shares carrying registration rights owned by all entities and individuals included in such "Holder," as defined in this sentence.
Underwriting
provided
however
 
(c) . The Company is obligated to effect only two (2) registrations pursuant to this Section 1.2. The Holders may not provide the Company with an additional Request pursuant to Section 1.2(a) until at least six months have elapsed from the date the Holders delivered to the Company their previous Request.
Maximum Number of Demand Registrations; Time Period Between Demand Registrations
(d) . Notwithstanding the foregoing, if the Company shall furnish to Holders requesting the filing of a registration statement pursuant to this Section 1.2 a certificate signed by the President or Chief Executive Officer of the Company stating that in the good faith judgment of the Board of Directors of the Company it would be seriously detrimental to the Company and its stockholders for such registration statement to be filed and it is therefore essential to defer the filing of such registration statement, then the Company shall have the right to defer such filing for a period of not more than sixty (60) days after receipt of the Request; , , that the Company may not utilize this right more than once in any twelve (12) month period.
Deferral
provided
however
(e) . "" means, with respect to a registration effected pursuant to this Section 1.2, a period in each case commencing on the day immediately after the Company notifies the Holders that they are required, pursuant to Section 1.3(f), to suspend offers and sales of Registrable Securities during which the Company, in the good faith judgment of its Board of Directors, determines (because of the existence of, or in anticipation of, any acquisition, financing activity, or other transaction involving the Company, or the unavailability of any required financial statements, disclosure of information which is in its best interest not to publicly disclose, or any other event or condition of similar significance to the Company) that the registration and distribution of the Registrable Securities to be covered by such registration statement, if any, would be seriously detrimental to the Company and its stockholders and ending on the earlier of (1) the date upon which the material non-public information commencing the Blackout Period is disclosed to the public or ceases to be material and (2) such time as the Company notifies the selling Holders that the Company will no longer delay such filing of the registration statement, will recommence taking steps to make such registration statement effective, or will allow sales pursuant to such registration statement to resume; that (a) the Company shall limit its use of Blackout Periods, in the aggregate, to 60 trading days in any 12-month period and (b) no Blackout Period may commence sooner than 60 days after the end of a prior Blackout Period. Each Holder of Registrable Securities agrees that, upon receipt of any notice of a Blackout Period, such Holder shall discontinue disposition of Registrable Securities pursuant to the registration statement covering such Registrable Securities until such Holder's receipt of the copies of the supplemented or amended prospectus contemplated by Section 1.3(c) hereof or notice of the end of the Blackout Period, and, if so directed by the Company, such Holder shall deliver to the Company (at the Company's expense) all copies (including, without limitation, any and all drafts), other than permanent file copies, then in such Holder's possession, of the prospectus covering such Registrable Securities current at the time of receipt of such notice.
Blackout Notice
Blackout Period
provided, however,
(f) . The registration fees and expenses incurred by the Company in connection with any registration pursuant to this Section 1.2 (other than as set forth in the second sentence of this paragraph), including, without limitation, all registration, qualification and filing fees, printing expenses, escrow fees, fees and disbursements of counsel for the Company, blue sky fees and expenses, and the expense of any special audits incident to or required by any such registration, but excluding underwriters' discounts and commissions, and the reasonable fees and disbursements of one counsel for the selling Holders (such fees and disbursements not to exceed $10,000), shall be borne by the Company; provided, however, that such one counsel for the selling Holders shall submit reasonably detailed invoices for review by the Company prior to payment. Notwithstanding the foregoing, however, if Registrable Securities are to be distributed by means of an underwriting as contemplated by Section 1.2(b) of this Agreement, then the registration fees and expenses incurred by the Company and the selling Holders in connection with such a registration, including without limitation all registration, qualification and filing fees printing expenses, escrow fees, underwriters' discounts and commissions, fees and
Expenses
,
 
disbursements of counsel for the selling Holders, blue sky fees and expenses, and the expense of any special audits incident to or required by any such registration, but excluding the fees and disbursements of counsel for the Company, shall be borne by the selling Holders. Except as set forth in this Section, Holder shall be responsible for any fees and expenses of its counsel or other advisers. Each Holder participating in a registration pursuant to this Section 1.2 shall bear such Holder's proportionate share (based on the number of shares sold by such Holder over the total number of shares included in such registration at the time it goes effective) of all expenses payable by the selling Holders in connection with such offering.
. The Company shall furnish to each Holder such number of copies of a Prospectus, including a preliminary Prospectus, in conformity with the requirements of the Securities Act, and such other documents (including supplements or prospectus amendments) as the Holder may reasonably request in order to facilitate the public sale or other disposition of the Registrable Securities owned by it that are included in such registration. In addition, whenever required to effect the registration of any Registrable Securities under this Agreement, the Company shall, as expeditiously as reasonably possible:
1.3
Obligations of the Company
(a) Prepare and file with the Commission such amendments and supplements to any registration statement filed pursuant to Section 1.2 of this Agreement and the Prospectus used in connection with such registration statement as may be necessary to comply with the provisions of the Securities Act with respect to the disposition of all securities covered by such registration statement.
(b) Use its best efforts to (i) register and qualify the securities covered by any registration statement filed pursuant to Section 1.2 of this Agreement under such other securities or blue sky laws of such jurisdictions as shall be reasonably requested by the Holder, provided that the Company shall not be required in connection therewith or as a condition thereto to qualify to do business or to file a general consent to service of process in any such states or jurisdictions, (ii) keep such registration or qualification in effect for so long as the related registration statement remains in effect and (iii) take any other action which may be reasonably necessary or advisable to enable the Holders to consummate the disposition in such jurisdictions of the securities to be sold by the Holders, consistent with the plan of distribution described in the Prospectus included in the related registration statement, except that the Company shall not for any such purpose be required to qualify generally to do business as a foreign corporation in any jurisdiction where it is not so qualified, or to subject itself to taxation in any such jurisdiction, or to execute a general consent to service of process in effecting such registration, qualification or compliance, unless the Company is already subject to service in such jurisdiction and except as may be required by the Securities Act or applicable rules or regulations thereunder.
(c) Notify the Holder promptly (i) of any request by the Commission or any other federal or state governmental authority during the period of effectiveness of any registration statement filed pursuant to Section 1.2 of this Agreement for amendments or supplements to such registration statement or related Prospectus or for additional information, (ii) of the issuance by the Commission or any other federal or state governmental authority of any stop order suspending the effectiveness of any registration statement filed pursuant to Section 1.2 of this Agreement or the initiation of any proceedings for that purpose and (iii) of the receipt by the Company of any notification with respect to the suspension of the qualification or exemption from qualification of any of the Registrable Securities for sale in any jurisdiction or the initiation or threatening of any proceeding for such purpose.
(d) Make all commercially reasonable efforts to obtain the withdrawal of any order suspending the effectiveness of any registration statement filed pursuant to Section 1.2 of this Agreement at the earliest possible time.
(e) Cause all Registrable Securities to be listed on each securities exchange or market, if any, on which equity securities issued by the company are then listed.
 
(f) As promptly as practicable after becoming aware of such event, notify each Holder of Registrable Securities at any time when a Prospectus relating thereto is required to be delivered under the Securities Act of the happening of any event which comes to the Company's attention if as a result of such event the prospectus included in any registration statement filed pursuant to Section 1.2 of this Agreement contains an untrue statement of a material fact or omits to state any material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading, and the Company shall promptly prepare and furnish to such Holder a supplement or amendment to such Prospectus (or prepare and file appropriate reports under the Exchange Act) so that, as thereafter delivered to the purchasers of such Registrable Securities, such Prospectus shall not contain an untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state any material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading, unless suspension of the use of such Prospectus otherwise is authorized herein or in the event of a Blackout Period, in which case no supplement or amendment need be furnished (or Exchange Act filing made) until the termination of such suspension or Blackout Period.
(g) From the date of this Agreement until the termination of the Company's obligations with regards to the registration rights of Registrable Securities pursuant to Section 1.6, if the Company grants registration rights to holders of any security of the Company which are more favorable to such holders than the registration rights granted hereunder without the prior written consent of the Holders of a majority of the outstanding Registrable Securities, then such more favorable registration rights shall also be deemed to be granted to the Holders of Registrable Securities hereunder, and the Company covenants and agrees to take any and all steps necessary to modify the terms of this Agreement to so provide.
. It shall be a condition precedent to the obligations of the Company to take any action pursuant to Section 1.2 that the Holders shall furnish to the Company such information regarding it and the Registrable Securities held by it as shall be required to timely effect the registration of its Registrable Securities.
1.4
Furnish Information
. For the purposes of this Section 1.5, the term "registration statement" shall include any final Prospectus, exhibit, supplement, amendment or other document included in, filed as part of, deemed to be a part of, or otherwise relating to any registration statement filed pursuant to Section 1.2 of this Agreement. In the event any Registrable Securities are included in a registration statement under this Agreement:
1.5
Indemnification
(a) . To the extent permitted by law, the Company will indemnify and hold harmless each Holder, its officers and directors, trustees, and each person, if any, who controls the Holder and any underwriter for each (as defined in the Securities Act) (such persons and entities referred to as ""), against any losses, claims, expenses (including reasonable attorneys' fees), damages or liabilities (including in settlement of any claim) to which they may become subject under the Securities Act, the Exchange Act, or other federal or state law (a ""), insofar as such Losses (or actions in respect thereof) arise out of any claim, action or proceeding brought by a third party arising out of or based upon any of the following statements, omissions or violations (collectively a ""):
By the Company
Holder Indemnified Parties
Loss
Violation
(1) any untrue statement or alleged untrue statement of a material fact contained in a registration statement;
(2) the omission or alleged omission to state in a registration statement a material fact required to be stated therein, or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading;
(3) any violation or alleged violation by the Company of the Securities Act, the Exchange Act, any federal or state securities law or any rule or regulation promulgated under the Securities Act, the Exchange Act or any federal or state securities law, in each case in connection with the offering covered by such registration statement;
 
(4) any failure by the Company to fulfill any undertaking included in a registration statement; or
(5) any material breach of any representation, warranty or covenant made by the Company in this Agreement;
and the Company will pay to each Holder Indemnified Party for any legal or other expenses, as incurred, reasonably incurred by them, as incurred, in connection with investigating or defending or settling, compromising or paying an award granted in any proceeding relating to any such Violation; , that the indemnity agreement contained in this subsection shall not apply to amounts paid in settlement of any such Loss, if such settlement is effected without the consent of the Company (which consent shall not be unreasonably withheld or delayed), nor shall the Company be liable in any such case for any such Loss to the extent that it arises out of or is based upon a Violation which occurs in reliance upon and in conformity with written information furnished expressly for use in connection with such registration statement by the Holder Indemnified Party; and provided further, that the Company will not be liable for the reasonable legal fees and expenses of more than one counsel to the Holder Indemnified Parties.
provided, however
(b) . To the extent permitted by law, each Holder (severally and not jointly with any other Holder) will indemnify and hold harmless the Company, each of its directors, each of its officers who have signed the registration statement, and each person, if any, who controls the Company within the meaning of the Securities Act (such persons and entities referred to as "") against any Losses to which such Company Indemnified Parties may become subject under the Securities Act, the Exchange Act or other federal or state law, insofar as such Losses (or actions in respect thereto) arise out of or are based upon any Violation, in each case to the extent (and only to the extent) that such Violation occurs in reliance upon and in conformity with written information furnished by the Holder expressly for use in connection with such registration statement; and the Holder will pay, as incurred, any legal or other expenses reasonably incurred by such Company Indemnified Parties in connection with investigating or defending any such Violation; , that the indemnity agreement contained in this subsection shall not apply to amounts paid in settlement of any such Loss if such settlement is effected without the consent of the Holder (which consent shall not be unreasonably withheld or delayed); , that the Holder shall not be liable for the reasonable legal fees and expenses of more than one counsel to the Company Indemnified Parties; and , that the total amounts payable in indemnity by the Holder under this subsection in respect of any Violation shall not exceed the net proceeds received by each Holder in the registered offering out of which such Violation arises.
By Holders
Company Indemnified Parties
provided, however
provided further
provided further
(c) . Promptly after receipt by an indemnified party under this Section 1.5(c) of notice of the commencement of any action (including any governmental action), such indemnified party will, if a claim for indemnification in respect thereof is to be made against any indemnifying party under this Section 1.5(c), deliver to the indemnifying party a written notice of the commencement of such an action and the indemnifying party shall have the right to participate in, and, to the extent the indemnifying party so desires, jointly with any other indemnifying party similarly noticed, to assume the defense thereof with counsel selected by the indemnifying party and reasonably acceptable to a majority in interest of the indemnified parties; , that an indemnified party shall have the right to retain its own counsel, with the reasonable fees and expenses to be paid by the indemnifying party, if the indemnified party has been advised in writing by counsel that representation of such indemnified party by the counsel retained by the indemnifying party would be inappropriate due to actual conflict of interests between such indemnified party and any other party represented by such counsel in such proceeding. The failure to deliver written notice to the indemnifying party within a reasonable time of the commencement of any such action shall relieve such indemnifying party of
Notice
provided, however
 
liability to the indemnified party under this Section 1.5(c) to the extent such delay caused material prejudice to the indemnified party, but the omission so to deliver written notice to the indemnifying party will not relieve it of any liability that it may have to any indemnified party otherwise than under this Section 1.5(c).
(d) . If the indemnification provided for in this Section 1.5 is held by a court of competent jurisdiction to be unavailable to or insufficient to hold harmless an indemnified party in respect of Losses, then each indemnifying party shall contribute to the amount paid or payable by such indemnified party as a result of such Losses, in such proportion as is appropriate to reflect the relative fault of the Company on the one hand and the Holder on the other in connection with the statements or omissions or other matters which resulted in such losses, claims, damages, liabilities or expenses (or actions in respect thereof), as well as any other relevant equitable considerations. The relative fault shall be determined by reference to, among other things, in the case of an untrue statement, whether the untrue statement relates to information supplied by the Company on the one hand or a Holder on the other and the parties' relative intent, knowledge, access to information and opportunity to correct or prevent such untrue statement. The Company and the Investors agree that it would not be just and equitable if contribution pursuant to this Section 1.5(d) were determined by pro rata allocation (even if all Holders were treated as one entity for such purpose) or by any other method of allocation which does not take into account the equitable considerations referred to above in this Section 1.5(d). The amount paid or payable by an indemnified party as a result of the losses, claims, damages or liabilities (or actions in respect thereof) referred to above in this Section 1.5(d) shall be deemed to include any legal or other expenses reasonably incurred by such indemnified party in connection with investigating or defending any such action or claim. No person guilty of fraudulent misrepresentation (within the meaning of Section 11(f) of the Securities Act) shall be entitled to contribution from any person who was not guilty of such fraudulent misrepresentation. Notwithstanding any provision of this Agreement apparently to the contrary, any contribution (together with any indemnification or other obligations under this Agreement) by any Holder (including any indemnified person associated with such Holder) shall in no event exceed the net amount of proceeds received by such Holder from the sale of the Registrable Securities.
Contribution
(e) . The obligations of the Company and the Holder under this Section shall survive the completion of any offering of Registrable Securities in a registration statement, and otherwise.
Survival
. With a view to making available the benefits of certain rules and regulations of the Commission, which may at any time permit the sale of the Registrable Securities to the public without registration, for a period of one year following the date of this Agreement, the Company agrees to:
1.6
Rule 144 Reporting
(a) Make and keep adequate, current public information available, as those terms are understood and defined in Rule 144 under the Securities Act, at all times
(b) File with the Commission in a timely manner all reports and other documents required of the Company under the Exchange Act; and
(c) So long as the Holder owns any Registrable Securities, to furnish to the Holder forthwith upon request a written statement by the Company as to its compliance with the reporting requirements of Rule 144 and the Exchange Act, or that it qualifies as a registrant whose securities may be resold pursuant to Form S-3 (at any time after it so qualifies) a copy of the most recent annual or quarterly report of the Company and such other reports and documents so filed by the Company, and such other reports and documents of the Company as the Holder may reasonably request in availing itself of any rule or regulation of the Commission allowing a Holder to sell any such securities without registration.
 
. The Company shall have no obligation to maintain a registration statement governing Registrable Securities after the earliest to occur of the following: (i) the date on which all Registrable Securities held by such Holder may be sold without any volume restrictions within a three-month period under Rule 144, as it may be amended from time to time, including but not limited to amendments that reduce that period of time that securities must be held before such securities may be sold pursuant to such rule, or (ii) if all Registrable Securities have been registered and sold (A) pursuant to registrations effected pursuant to this Agreement, (B) to or through a broker or dealer or underwriter in a public distribution or a public securities transaction, and/or (C) in a transaction exempt from the registration and prospectus delivery requirements of the Securities Act under Section 4(1) thereof which results in the removal of all transfer restrictions and restrictive legends with respect thereto.
1.7
Termination of the Company's Obligations
 
. The representations, warranties and covenants of the Company and the Investors contained in or made pursuant to this Agreement shall survive the execution and delivery of this Agreement and shall in no way be affected by any investigation of the subject matter thereof made by or on behalf of any of the Investors, their counsel or the Company, as the case may be.
2.1
Survival of Warranties
. No party may assign either this Agreement or any of its rights, interests, or obligations hereunder without the prior written consent of the other party; provided that an Investor, without the prior written consent of the Company, may transfer all rights herein to another Investor, to any affiliate of such Investor without such consent, or to any other person to whom an Investor transfers Registrable Shares in compliance with applicable federal and state securities laws so long as such other person agrees to be bound by all the terms and conditions of this Agreement. Subject to the preceding sentence, this Agreement shall be binding upon and shall inure to the benefit of the parties hereto and their respective successors and permitted assigns. Any purported assignment in violation of this Section 2.2 shall be void
2.2
Assignment
. This Agreement shall be governed by and construed under the internal laws of the State of California as applied to agreements among California residents entered into and to be performed entirely within California, without reference to principles of conflict of laws or choice of laws.
2.3
Governing Law
. This Agreement may be executed in two or more counterparts, each of which shall be deemed an original, but all of which together shall constitute one and the same agreement.
2.4
Counterparts
2.5
.
Interpretation; Certain Defined Terms
(a) When a reference is made in this Agreement to Sections, such reference shall be to a Section of this Agreement unless otherwise indicated. The words "," "" and "" when used herein shall be deemed in each case to be followed by the words "." The headings contained in this Agreement are for reference purposes only and shall not affect in any way the meaning or interpretation of this Agreement.
include
includes
including
without limitation
(b) For purposes of this Agreement, the term "" shall mean any individual, corporation (including any non-profit corporation), general partnership, limited partnership, limited liability partnership, joint venture, estate, trust, company (including any limited liability company or joint stock company), firm or other enterprise, association, organization, entity or governmental entity.
person
 
. Any and all notices required or permitted to be given to a party pursuant to the provisions of this Agreement will be in writing and will be effective and deemed to provide such party sufficient notice under this Agreement on the earliest of the following: (i) at the time of personal delivery, if delivery is in person; (ii) at the time of transmission by facsimile, addressed to the other party at its facsimile number specified herein (or hereafter modified by subsequent notice to the parties hereto), with confirmation of receipt made by both telephone and printed confirmation sheet verifying successful transmission of the facsimile; (iii) one (1) business day after deposit with an express overnight courier for United States deliveries, or two (2) business days after such deposit for deliveries outside of the United States, with proof of delivery from the courier requested; or (iv) three (3) business days after deposit in the United States mail by certified mail (return receipt requested) for United States deliveries.
2.6
Notices
All notices for delivery outside the United States will be sent by facsimile or by express courier. Notices by facsimile shall be machine verified as received. All notices not delivered personally or by facsimile will be sent with postage and/or other charges prepaid and properly addressed to the party to be notified at the address or facsimile number as follows, or at such other address or facsimile number as such other party may designate by one of the indicated means of notice herein to the other parties hereto as follows:
(a) if to an Investor, to the name of such Investor at the following address:
c/o Nierenberg Investment Management Company
19605 NE Eighth Street
Camas, WA 98607
Attn: Henry Hooper
With a copy to:
DLA Piper US LLP
2000 University Avenue
East Palo Alto, CA 94303
Fax Number: 650.833.2001
Attn: Peter M. Astiz
(b) if to the Company,
Natus Medical Incorporated
1501 Industrial Road
San Carlos, CA 94070
Facsimile: (650) 802-6630
Attn: President
With a copy to:
Fenwick & West LLP
801 California Street
Mountain View, California 94041
Facsimile: 650-938-5200
Attn: Daniel J. Winnike
. All fees and expenses incurred in connection with this Agreement and the transactions contemplated hereby shall be paid by the party incurring such expenses.
2.7
Expenses; Finder's Fees
. If one or more provisions of this Agreement are held to be unenforceable under applicable law, such provision(s) shall be excluded from this Agreement and the balance of the Agreement shall be interpreted as if such provision(s) were so excluded and shall be enforceable in accordance with its terms.
2.8
Severability
 
. This Agreement constitutes the entire agreement and understanding of the parties with respect to the subject matter hereof and supersedes any and all prior negotiations, correspondence, agreements, understandings duties or obligations between the parties with respect to the subject matter hereof.
2.9
Entire Agreement
. From and after the date of this Agreement, upon the request of an Investor or the Company, the Company and the Investors shall execute and deliver such instruments, documents or other writings as may be reasonably necessary or desirable to confirm and carry out and to effectuate fully the intent and purposes of this Agreement.
2.10
Further Assurances
. Subject to applicable law, this Agreement may be amended by the parties hereto at any time by execution of an instrument in writing signed on behalf of the Company and Investors holding a majority of the then-outstanding Registrable Securities. Any party hereto may, to the extent legally allowed, (i) extend the time for the performance of any of the obligations or other acts of the other party hereto or (ii) waive compliance with any of the agreements or conditions for the benefit of such party contained herein. Any agreement on the part of a party hereto to any such extension or waiver shall be valid only if set forth in an instrument in writing signed on behalf of such party. Delay in exercising any right under this Agreement shall not constitute a waiver of such right.
2.11
Amendment; Extension; Waiver
. Except as otherwise provided herein, any and all remedies herein expressly conferred upon a party will be deemed cumulative with and not exclusive of any other remedy conferred hereby, or by law or equity upon such party, and the exercise by a party of any one remedy will not preclude the exercise of any other remedy. The parties hereto agree that irreparable damage would occur in the event that any of the provisions of this Agreement were not performed in accordance with their specific terms or were otherwise breached. It is accordingly agreed that the parties shall be entitled to seek an injunction or injunctions to prevent breaches of this Agreement and to enforce specifically the terms and provisions hereof in any court of the United States or any state having jurisdiction, this being in addition to any other remedy to which they are entitled at law or in equity.
2.12
Other Remedies; Specific Performance
. The parties hereto agree that they have been represented by counsel during the negotiation and execution of this Agreement and, therefore, waive the application of any law, regulation, holding or rule of construction providing that ambiguities in an agreement or other document will be construed against the party drafting such agreement or document.
2.13
Rules of Construction
. EACH OF THE COMPANY AND THE INVESTORS HEREBY IRREVOCABLY WAIVES ALL RIGHT TO TRIAL BY JURY IN ANY ACTION, PROCEEDING OR COUNTERCLAIM (WHETHER BASED ON CONTRACT, TORT OR OTHERWISE) ARISING OUT OF OR RELATING TO THIS AGREEMENT OR THE ACTIONS THE COMPANY OR THE INVESTORS IN THE NEGOTIATION, ADMINISTRATION, PERFORMANCE AND ENFORCEMENT HEREOF.
2.14
Waiver Of Jury Trial
. The Company represents and warrants that following the completion of the Offering, based on the number of shares of Common Stock outstanding as of March 31, 2008, the Company will have outstanding 22,776,054 shares of its Common Stock.
2.15
Outstanding Shares
 
I W W, the parties hereto have caused this Agreement to be executed by their duly authorized respective officers as of the date first written above.
N
ITNESS
HEREOF
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 5.01
Natus Medical Incorporated
1501 Industrial Road
San Carlos, CA 94070
Ladies and Gentlemen:
At your request, we have examined the Registration Statement on Form S-3 (File Number 333-133480) (the "") filed by Natus Medical Incorporated, a Delaware corporation (the ""), with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the "") on April 24, 2006, as amended on August 9, 2006 and August 15, 2006, as subsequently supplemented by the prospectus filed with the Commission on August 18, 2006, and the prospectus supplement applicable to the Offering (as defined below), in connection with the registration under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, of the proposed issuance and sale, from time to time, by the Company of shares of its common stock having a maximum aggregate public offering price of One Hundred Million Dollars ($100,000,000) (the "").
Registration Statement
Company
Commission
Stock
The Company currently proposes to sell up to an aggregate of 115,500 shares (the "") of the Company's common stock, par value of $0.001 per share (the ""), under the Registration Statement (the ""), all of which will be sold to the Underwriter (as defined herein) pursuant to the election by the Underwriter to exercise in full the over-allotment option granted pursuant to that certain Purchase Agreement (the "") dated April 4, 2008, by and between the Company and Roth Capital Partners, LLC (the "").
Takedown Shares
Common Stock
Offering
Purchase Agreement
Underwriter
In rendering this opinion, we have examined such matters of fact as we have deemed necessary in order to render the opinion set forth herein, which included examination of the following:
 
 
 
 
 
 
Natus Medical Incorporated
April 9, 2008
Page 2 of 4
 
 
 
 
 
 
In our examination of documents for purposes of this opinion, we have assumed, and express no opinion as to, the authenticity and completeness of all documents submitted to us as originals, the genuineness of all signatures on original documents, the conformity to originals and completeness of all documents submitted to us as copies, the legal capacity of all persons or entities executing the same, the lack of any undisclosed termination, modification, waiver or amendment to any documents reviewed by us, and the due authorization, execution and delivery of all documents where authorization, due execution and delivery are prerequisites to the effectiveness thereof. We have also assumed that, if and to the extent that the Takedown Shares are issued in certificated form, the certificates representing the Takedown Shares will be, when issued, in the form of the certificate reviewed by us and properly signed by authorized officers of the Company or their agents.
As to matters of fact relevant to this opinion, we have relied solely upon our examination of the documents referred to above and have assumed the current accuracy and completeness of the information included in the documents referred to above and the representations and warranties made by representatives of the Company to us, including but not limited to those set forth in the Management Certificate. We have made no independent investigation or other attempt to verify the accuracy of any of such information or to determine the existence or non-existence of any other factual matters; however, we are not aware of any facts that would cause us to believe that the opinion expressed herein is not accurate.
In connection with our opinion expressed below, we have assumed that, at or prior to the time of the delivery of any of the Takedown Shares, there will not have occurred any change in law affecting the validity of the Takedown Shares.
This opinion is limited to such California State and United States of America federal laws or statutes, the General Corporation Law of the State of Delaware as in effect on the date hereof, rules or regulations of any California State and United States of America federal courts or arbitrators or governmental or regulatory authorities, or consents, approvals, authorizations, orders, registrations or qualifications of or with any United States federal or California State court, arbitrator, administrative agency or governmental or regulatory authority, as in our experience are generally applied to transactions of the type provided for in the Purchase Agreement. We express no opinion herein with respect to any other laws or to the
Natus Medical Incorporated
April 9, 2008
Page 3 of 4
application of the laws of any other jurisdiction. Additionally, we disclaim any opinion as to the application of any law of any city, county or other local subdivision of the States of California and Delaware. We have made no inquiry into, and express no opinion with respect to, any statutes, rules, regulations, treaties or common laws of any other nation, state or jurisdiction, or the effect on the transactions provided for in the Purchase Agreement of non-compliance under any such statutes, rules, regulations, treaties or common law. The opinions expressed herein are qualified by, and are subject to, and we express no opinion with respect to, compliance by the Company or the Underwriter with any state or foreign "blue sky" statute, rule or regulation in connection with the issuance and sale of the Securities pursuant to the Purchase Agreement.
Based upon the foregoing, it is our opinion that the Takedown Shares, when issued, sold and delivered in the manner and for the consideration stated in the Registration Statement, the Base Prospectus and the Prospectus Supplement, and pursuant to the terms of the Purchase Agreement, will be validly issued, fully paid and nonassessable.
We consent to the use of this opinion as an exhibit to the Form 8-K and further consent to all references to us, if any, in the Registration Statement, the Base Prospectus and the Prospectus Supplement constituting a part thereof and any amendments thereto. This opinion is intended solely for use in connection with the issuance and sale of Takedown Shares subject to the Registration Statement and is not to be relied upon for any other purpose. This opinion speaks as of the date first above written, and we assume no obligation to advise you of any fact, circumstance, event or change in the law or the facts that may hereafter be brought to our attention whether or not such occurrence would affect or modify the opinions expressed herein.

Exhibit 99.01
Natus Underwriter Exercises Over-Allotment Option
- Company Closes Public Offering
(Nasdaq: BABY) today announced that the underwriter of its recently announced public offering of 770,000 shares of common stock exercised its over-allotment option to purchase an additional 115,500 shares of the Company's common stock, bringing the total shares offered to 885,500. The offering closed on April 9, 2008. The Company expects to receive approximately $15.4 million in net proceeds from the offering, after payment of underwriting discounts and expenses of the offering. The offering, which was announced on April 4, 2008, was priced at $18.27 per share, which is equal to the closing price of the Company's common stock on the NASDAQ Global Market on April 3, 2008.
SAN CARLOS, Calif., April 9, 2008  Natus Medical Incorporated
Roth Capital Partners, LLC acted as the sole underwriter of the offering. Copies of the final prospectus relating to the offering may be obtained from Roth Capital Partners, LLC at 24 Corporate Plaza Drive, Newport Beach, CA 92660, (949) 720-5700.
This press release does not constitute an offer to sell or the solicitation of an offer to buy any securities of the Company and there shall not be any sale of any such securities in a State in which such offer, solicitation or sale would be unlawful prior to registration or qualification under the securities laws of such State.
About Natus Medical
Natus is a leading provider of healthcare products used for the screening, detection, treatment, monitoring and tracking of common medical ailments such as hearing impairment, neurological dysfunction, epilepsy, sleep disorders, and newborn care. Product offerings include computerized neurodiagnostic systems for audiology, neurology, polysomnography, and neonatology, as well as newborn care products such as hearing screening systems, phototherapy devices for the treatment of newborn jaundice, head-cooling products for the treatment of brain injury in newborns, and software systems for managing and tracking disorders and diseases for public health laboratories.
Additional information about Natus Medical can be found at www.natus.com.
COMPANY CONTACT:
Natus Medical Incorporated
Steven J. Murphy
Vice President Finance and Chief Financial Officer
(650) 802-0400
InvestorRelations@Natus.com


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BABY/BABY-8K-20080429165608.txt.gz
TIME:20080429165608
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
At its April 15, 2007 meeting, the Compensation Committee of the Board of Directors of Natus Medical Incorporated (the "Company") approved an amendment to the employment agreement between the Company and James B. Hawkins, its President and Chief Executive Officer. An amended agreement was executed on April 25, 2008.
The amended agreement provides that if within twelve months of a change-in-control transaction Mr. Hawkins terminates his employment for "good reason" or is terminated without cause, then Mr. Hawkins will receive a lump sum payment due and payable within thirty (30) days after the date of separation, less applicable withholding taxes, equal to two times the sum of (i) the greater of his then current base salary rate and his base salary rate in effect immediately prior to the change-in-control transaction and (ii) the greater of 100% of his target bonus then in effect and 100% of his target bonus as in effect immediately prior to the change-in-control transaction; (iii) continued provision of COBRA or similar benefits through the lesser of twenty-four months or the date upon which Mr. Hawkins becomes covered under similar plans; and (iv) the immediate vesting of unvested stock options, restricted stock and other equity awards. Employment termination is for "good reason" if it follows a material reduction in the officer's duties or responsibilities, a material reduction in base salary, a material reduction in employee benefits, relocation of more than 35 miles from the officer's present location, or the failure of a successor entity to assume the employment agreement. A change in control for purposes of this employment agreement is a transaction by which someone acquires more than 50% of the Company's outstanding voting power, a merger or consolidation following which the stockholders of the Company own 40% or less of the combined voting power of the Company or the surviving entity, stockholder approval of a plan to liquidate the Company, or the sale of all or substantially all of the assets of the Company.
Mr. Hawkins' employment agreement with the Company previously provided for the payment of one times the amount defined in section (i) above, did not provide for a payment associated with any bonus as defined in section (ii) above, and provided for the amount defined in section (iii) above for twelve months. The amended agreement also revised certain other terms of Mr. Hawkins' employment with the company.
To be eligible for termination benefits, Mr. Hawkins must comply with certain non-compete and non-solicitation provisions and payment of these benefits is conditioned on execution of a release of claims.
The amended agreement is attached as Exhibit 99.1 to this report and incorporated herein by reference.
 
On December 3, 2007, Natus Medical Incorporated (the "Company") filed a Current Report on Form 8-K to report that it had completed the acquisition of Excel-Tech, Ltd. ("Xltek"), based in Oakville, Ontario, Canada, pursuant to an Arrangement Agreement dated as of October 9, 2007 by and among the Company, Xltek and 4437713 Canada, Inc., a wholly-owned subsidiary of the Company. The Merger closed and became effective on November 29, 2007.
In connection with a Form S-3 registration statement that it intends to file today, the Company is providing pro forma financial information for the twelve months ended December 31, 2007 relating to its acquisition of Xltek. This pro forma financial information is attached as Exhibit 99.2 to this report and incorporated herein by reference.
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
Exhibit Index
 

Exhibit 99.1
This Agreement is entered into as of April 25, 2008, (the "") by and between Natus Medical, Inc. (the ""), and James B. Hawkins ("") and is an amendment and restatement of the agreement entered into by the parties on April 12, 2004.
Effective Date
Company
Executive
1. .
Duties and Scope of Employment
(a) . As of the Effective Date, Executive shall be an employee of the Company, and serve as President and Chief Executive Officer of the Company. Executive will render such business and professional services in the performance of his duties, consistent with Executive's position within the Company, as shall reasonably be assigned to him by the Company's Board of Directors ("Board"). The period of Executive's employment under this Agreement is referred to herein as the "Employment Term."
Positions and Duties
(b) . During the Employment Term, Executive will perform his duties faithfully and to the best of his ability and will devote his full business efforts and time to the Company. For the duration of the Employment Term, Executive agrees not to actively engage in any other employment, occupation or consulting activity for any direct or indirect remuneration without the prior approval of the Board.
Obligations
2. . The parties agree that Executive's employment with the Company will be "at-will" employment and may be terminated at any time with or without cause or notice. Executive understands and agrees that neither his job performance nor promotions, commendations, bonuses or the like from the Company give rise to or in any way serve as the basis for modification, amendment, or extension, by implication or otherwise, of his employment with the Company.
At-Will Employment
3. .
Compensation
(a) . During the Employment Term, the Company will pay Executive an annual salary (the "Base Salary") of three-hundred-and-ten thousand dollars ($310,000.00) as compensation for his services. The Base Salary will be paid periodically in accordance with the Company's normal payroll practices and be subject to the usual, required withholding. The Base Salary will be subject to review and adjustments will be made based upon the Company's normal performance review practices.
Base Salary
(b) . Executive shall be eligible to receive an annual bonus upon achievement of performance objectives to be determined by the Board or the Compensation Committee of the Board (the "").
Performance Bonus
Compensation Committee
(c) . Executive shall be eligible to receive stock options to purchase shares of Common stock of the Company, pursuant to and governed by the terms of the Natus Amended and Restated 2000 Stock Awards Plan, with an exercise price per share at the last closing market price on the day prior to the date of grant of such stock options. Vesting requirements shall be determined by the Board or Compensation Committee.
Stock Awards
4. . During the Employment Term, Executive will be entitled to participate in the employee benefit plans currently and hereafter maintained by the Company of general applicability to other senior executives of the Company, including, without limitation, the Company's group medical, dental, vision, disability, life insurance, and flexible-spending account plans. The Company reserves the right to cancel or change the benefit plans and programs it offers to its employees at any time.
Employee Benefits
5. Executive is entitled to receive PTO pursuant to Natus' standard benefit policy currently and hereafter maintained by the Company, and as may be cancelled or changed from time to time.
Paid Time Off ("PTO").
6. . The Company will reimburse Executive for reasonable travel, entertainment or other expenses incurred by Executive in the furtherance of or in connection with the performance of Executive's duties hereunder, in accordance with the Company's expense reimbursement policy as in effect from time to time.
Expenses
7. .
Severance
(a) . If Executive's employment with the Company terminates other than for "Cause" (as defined herein), death or disability, and subject to Section 11, Executive shall be entitled to (i) a lump sum payment due and payable within thirty (30) days after the date of Executive's "separation from service" (as defined in regulations promulgated under Section 409A of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended (the "")) and equal to the sum of his Base Salary as then in effect; (ii) the immediate vesting and exercisability (if applicable) of 100% of the shares subject to all of Executive's stock awards to acquire Company Common Stock outstanding on the date of such termination (the "") and (iii) continued provision by the Company of the level of group health coverage provided by the Company to Executive at the time of such termination, including payment by the Company of the necessary premiums for coverage of Executive and Executive's eligible dependents with group health continuation coverage under Title X of the Consolidated Budget Reconciliation Act of 1985, as amended ("") and then, if applicable, individual health coverage under
Involuntary Termination
Code
Stock Awards
COBRA
the individual policy required to be offered Executive for coverage of Executive and Executive's eligible dependents at the end of the COBRA coverage period through the lesser of (x) twelve (12) months from the effective date of such termination, or (y) the date upon which Executive and each of Executive's eligible dependents become covered under similar plans; provided, however, that Executive timely elects such COBRA coverage.
(b) . If Executive's employment with the Company terminates voluntarily by Executive (other than as described in subsection (c) below) or for Cause by the Company or due to Executive's death or disability, or involuntarily for any reason within one hundred and eighty (180) days of commencement of employment, then (i) all vesting of Stock Awards will immediately cease, (ii) all payments of compensation by the Company to Executive hereunder will terminate immediately (except as to amounts already earned), and (iii) Executive will only be eligible for severance benefits, if any, in accordance with the Company's established policies as then in effect.
Voluntary Termination; Termination for Cause
(c) . If within twelve (12) months following a "Change of Control" (as defined below) (i) Executive terminates Executive's employment with the Company for Good Reason after providing the Company with written notice within the ninety (90) days after the occurrence of an event constituting Good Reason and an opportunity for the Company to cure such occurrence of not less than thirty (30) days, or (ii) the Company or the successor corporation terminates Executive's employment with the Company for other than Cause, death or disability, then Executive shall be entitled to receive the benefits provided for in subsection (a) above, except that (A) the amount of the cash payments provided for in (a)(i) above shall be replaced by a cash payment equal to two times the sum of (x) the greater of Executive's Base Salary as in effect immediately prior to the date of the Company's entering into an agreement providing for such Change of Control (or, if no such agreement is entered into, immediately prior to the Change of Control), or Executive's Base Salary as in effect at the time of Executive's termination after the date of the Change of Control, and (y) the greater of Executive's target bonus as most recently established by the Board or Compensation Committee prior to the date of the Company's entering into an agreement providing for such Change of Control (or, if no such agreement is entered into, prior to the date of the Change of Control), or Executive's target bonus as in effect at the time of Executive's termination after the date of the Change of Control; and (B) the reference in subsection (a)(iii)(x) to "twelve (12) months" shall for this purpose be "twenty-four (24) months". Executive shall only be permitted to receive the benefits provided for in subsection (a) once and shall not be permitted to claim such benefits under both subsection (a) and (c) such that Executive would receive the benefits pursuant to subsection (a) twice.
Change of Control Benefits
8. . In the event that the severance and other benefits provided for in this Agreement or otherwise payable to the Executive (i) constitute "parachute payments" within the meaning of Section 280G of the Code and (ii) but for this Section 8, would be subject to the excise tax imposed by Section 4999 of the Code, then the Executive's severance benefits under Section 4(a)(i) shall be either: (A) delivered in full, or (B) delivered as to such lesser extent which would result in no portion of such severance benefits being subject to excise tax under Section 4999 of the Code, whichever of the foregoing amounts, taking into account the applicable federal, state and local income taxes and the excise tax imposed by Section 4999, results in the receipt by Executive on an after-tax basis, of the greatest amount of severance benefits, notwithstanding that all or some portion of such severance benefits may be taxable under Section 4999 of the Code. Unless the Company and Executive otherwise agree in writing, any determination required under this Section 8 shall be made in writing by the Company's independent public accountants immediately prior to Change of Control (the ""), whose determination shall be conclusive and binding upon Executive and the Company for all purposes. For purposes of making the calculations required by this Section 8, the Accountants may make reasonable assumptions and approximations concerning applicable taxes and may rely on reasonable, good faith interpretations concerning the application of Sections 280G and 4999 of the Code. The Company and Executive shall furnish to the Accountants such information and documents as the Accountants may reasonably request in order to make a determination under this Section. The Company shall bear all costs the Accountants may reasonably incur in connection with any calculations contemplated by this Section 8.
Limitation on Payments
Accountants
9. .
Definitions
(a) . For purposes of this Agreement, "" shall mean (i) commission of any act of dishonesty, fraud, misrepresentation or other act of moral turpitude by Executive, (ii) Executive's conviction of a felony, (iii) a willful act by Executive which constitutes disloyalty or gross misconduct injurious to the Company, (iv) misrepresentation or concealment by Executive of any fact for the purpose of securing or maintaining this Agreement, or (v) continued violations by Executive of Executive's employment duties which are willful on Executive's part after Executive has been given written demand for performance from the Board which specifically sets forth the factual basis for the Board's belief that Executive has not substantially performed Executive's duties.
Cause
Cause
 
(i) any "person" (as such term is used in Sections 13(d) and 14(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended) is or becomes the "beneficial owner" (as defined in Rule 13d-3 under said Act), directly or indirectly, of securities of the Company representing 50% or more of the total voting power represented by the Company's then outstanding voting securities; or
(ii) the date of the consummation of a merger or consolidation of the Company with any other corporation that has been approved by the stockholders of the Company, other than a merger or consolidation which would result in the voting securities of the Company outstanding immediately prior thereto continuing to represent (either by remaining outstanding or by being converted into voting securities of the surviving entity) more than forty percent (40%) of the total voting power represented by the voting securities of the Company or such surviving entity outstanding immediately after such merger or consolidation, or
(iii) the stockholders of the Company approve a plan of complete liquidation of the Company; or
(iv) the date of the consummation of the sale or disposition by the Company of all or substantially all the Company's assets.
(c) . For purposes of this Agreement, "" shall mean without the Executive's express written consent shall mean (i) the material reduction of the Executive's duties or responsibilities relative to Executive's duties or responsibilities in effect immediately prior to such reduction; provided, however, that a reduction in duties or responsibilities solely by virtue of the Company being acquired and made part of a larger entity (as, for example, when the Chief Financial Officer remains as such following a Change of Control and is not made the Chief Financial Officer of the acquiring corporation) shall not constitute "Good Reason;" (ii) a material reduction by the Company in Executive's Base Salary as in effect immediately prior to such reduction; (iii) a material reduction by the Company in the kind or level of employee benefits to which Executive is entitled immediately prior to such reduction with the result that Executive's overall benefits package is significantly reduced; (iv) the relocation of Executive's ongoing worksite to a facility or a location that increases Executive's commute distance by more than 35 miles from Executive's then ongoing worksite, without Executive's express written consent; or (v) the failure of the Company to obtain the assumption of this Agreement by any successors contemplated in Section 12.
Good Reason
Good Reason
10. . Executive agrees to enter into the Company's standard Confidential Information and Invention Assignment Agreement (the "") upon commencing employment hereunder. Executive represents and warrants that all personal background information provided by him, or to be provided during the term of his employment, in response to background questions asked by the Company pertaining to Executive's employment, is true and accurate, and does not and will not contain any material omissions, nor shall it omit any material information. Executive further represents and warrants that he has not committed any act as described in section 9(a)(i), (ii) or (iv) hereof.
Confidential Information; Representation
Confidential Information Agreement
11. .
Conditional Nature of Severance Payments
(a) . Executive acknowledges that the nature of the Company's business is such that if Executive were to become employed by, or substantially involved in, the business of a competitor of the Company following the termination of Executive's employment with the Company, it would be very difficult for Executive not to rely on or use the Company's trade secrets and confidential information. Thus, to avoid the inevitable disclosure of the Company's trade secrets and confidential information, Executive agrees and acknowledges that Executive's right to receive the severance payments set forth in Section 7 (to the extent Executive is otherwise entitled to such payments) shall be conditioned upon Executive not directly or indirectly engaging in (whether as an employee, consultant, agent, proprietor, principal, partner, stockholder, corporate officer, director or otherwise), nor having any ownership interest in or participating in the financing, operation, management or control of, any person, firm, corporation or business that competes with Company or is a customer of the Company. Upon any breach of this section, all severance payments pursuant to this Agreement shall immediately cease and Executive shall immediately return a pro-rated amount of all cash paid to him pursuant to subsection 7(a) or (c), as the case may be, with the pro-rated amount determined by multiplying the aggregate of the cash payments made to Executive pursuant to subsection 7(a) or (c) in each instance by a fraction, the denominator of which is twelve (12) if termination is pursuant to subsection 7(a) and twenty-four (24) if termination is pursuant to subsection 7(c) and the numerator is the number (not to be less than zero) obtained by subtracting from the number used in the denominator the number of months from the date of termination to the date of the breach as determined in good faith by the Board.
Noncompete
(b) . Until the date eighteen (18) months after the termination of Executive's employment with the Company for any reason, Executive agrees not, either directly or indirectly, to solicit, induce, attempt to hire, recruit, encourage, take away, hire any employee of the Company or cause an employee to leave his or her employment either for Executive or for any other entity or person. Additionally, Executive acknowledges that Executive's right to receive the severance payments set forth in Section 7 (to the extent Executive is otherwise entitled to such payments) are contingent upon Executive complying with this Section 11(b) and upon any breach of this section all severance payments pursuant to this Agreement shall immediately cease and Executive shall immediately return a pro-rated amount of all cash paid to him pursuant to subsection 7(a) or (c), with the pro-rated amount determined by multiplying the aggregate cash payments made to Executive pursuant to subsection 7(a) or (c) in each instance by a fraction, of which the denominator is eighteen (18) and the numerator is the number (not to be less than zero) equal to eighteen (18) minus the number of months from the date of termination to the date of the breach as determined in good faith by the Board.
Non-Solicitation
In no event shall Executive be required to make a payment back to the Company under both subsections (a) and (b) above of amounts received under subsections (a) and (c) of section 7. The Company's election to require a return of payment under either (a) or (b) above shall preclude it from seeking payment under the other, but shall not prevent it from otherwise seeking to enforce the covenants contained by Executive in such subsections.
(c) . Executive represents that Executive (i) is familiar with the foregoing covenants not to compete and not to solicit, and (ii) is fully aware of Executive's obligations hereunder, including, without limitation, the reasonableness of the length of time, scope and geographic coverage of these covenants.
Understanding of Covenants
(d) . Executive agrees and acknowledges that Executive's right to receive the severance payments pursuant to Section 7(a) (to the extent Executive is otherwise entitled to such payments) is conditioned upon Executive executing a release of claims in favor of the Company and its officers and directors. If Executive does not sign, or signs but then timely revokes his acceptance (as determined by reference to the U.S. Age Discrimination in Employment Act, as amended), of a standard release of claims with the Company, then Executive shall immediately return all sums paid to him and all property received by him pursuant to subsection 7(a).
Release of Claims
12. . This Agreement will be binding upon and inure to the benefit of (a) the heirs, executors and legal representatives of Executive upon Executive's death and (b) any successor of the Company. Any such successor of the Company will be deemed substituted for the Company under the terms of this Agreement for all purposes. For this purpose, "" means any person, firm, corporation or other business entity which at any time, whether by purchase, merger or otherwise, directly or indirectly acquires all or substantially all of the assets or business of the Company. None of the rights of Executive to receive any form of compensation payable pursuant to this Agreement may be assigned or transferred except by will or the laws of descent and distribution. Any other attempted assignment, transfer, conveyance or other disposition of Executive's right to compensation or other benefits will be null and void.
Assignment
successor
13. . All notices, requests, demands and other communications called for hereunder shall be in writing and shall be deemed given (i) on the date of delivery if delivered personally, (ii) one (1) day after being sent by a well established commercial overnight service, or (iii) four (4) days after being mailed by registered or certified mail, return receipt requested, prepaid and addressed to the parties or their successors at the following addresses, or at such other addresses as the parties may later designate in writing:
Notices
If to the Company:
Natus Medical, Inc.
1501 Industrial Road
San Carlos, CA 94070
:
Attn
Chairman of the Board
If to Executive:
at the last residential address known by the Company.
14. . In the event that any provision hereof becomes or is declared by a court of competent jurisdiction to be illegal, unenforceable or void, this Agreement will continue in full force and effect without said provision.
Severability
15. .
Arbitration
(a) In consideration of Executive's service to the Company, its promise to arbitrate all employment related disputes and Executive's receipt of the compensation, pay raises and other benefits paid to Executive by the Company, at present and in the future, Executive agrees that any and all controversies, claims, or disputes with anyone (including the Company and any employee, officer, director, shareholder or benefit plan of the Company in their capacity as such or otherwise) arising out of, relating to, or resulting from Executive's service to the Company under this Agreement or otherwise or the termination of Executive's service with the Company, including any breach of this Agreement, shall be subject to binding arbitration under the Arbitration Rules set forth in California Code of Civil Procedure Section 1280 through 1294.2, including Section 1283.05 (the "") and pursuant to California law. Disputes which Executive agrees to arbitrate, and thereby agrees to waive any right to a trial by jury, include any statutory claims under state or federal law, including, but not limited to, claims under Title VII of the Civil Rights Act of 1964, the Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990, the Age Discrimination in Employment Act of 1967, the Older Workers Benefit Protection Act, the California Fair Employment and Housing Act, the California Labor Code, claims of harassment, discrimination or wrongful termination and any statutory claims. Executive further understands that this Agreement to arbitrate also applies to any disputes that the Company may have with Executive.
General.
Rules
(b) . Executive agrees that any arbitration will be administered by the American Arbitration Association ("") and that a neutral arbitrator will be selected in a manner consistent with its National Rules for the Resolution of Employment Disputes. The arbitration proceedings will allow for discovery according to the rules set forth in the . Executive agrees that the arbitrator shall have the power to decide any motions brought by any party to the arbitration, including motions for summary judgment and/or adjudication and motions to dismiss and demurrers, prior to any arbitration hearing. Executive agrees that the arbitrator shall issue a written decision on the merits. Executive also agrees that the arbitrator shall have the power to award any remedies, including attorneys' fees and costs, available under applicable law. Executive understands the Company will pay for any administrative or hearing fees charged by the arbitrator or AAA except that Executive shall pay the first $200.00 of any filing fees associated with any arbitration Executive initiates. Executive agrees that the arbitrator shall administer and conduct any arbitration in a manner consistent with the Rules and that to the extent that the AAA's National Rules for the Resolution of Employment Disputes conflict with the Rules, the Rules shall take precedence.
Procedure
AAA
National Rules for the Resolution of Employment Disputes or California Code of Civil Procedure
(c) . Except as provided by the Rules, arbitration shall be the sole, exclusive and final remedy for any dispute between Executive and the Company. Accordingly, except as provided for by the Rules, neither Executive nor the Company will be permitted to pursue court action regarding claims that are subject to arbitration. Notwithstanding, the arbitrator will not have the authority to disregard or refuse to enforce any lawful Company policy, and the arbitrator shall not order or require the Company to adopt a policy not otherwise required by law that the Company has not adopted.
Remedy
(d) . In addition to the right under the Rules to petition the court for provisional relief, Executive agrees that any party may also petition the court for injunctive relief where either party alleges or claims a violation of this Agreement or the Confidentiality Agreement or any other agreement regarding trade secrets, confidential information, nonsolicitation or Labor Code 2870. In the event either party seeks injunctive relief, the prevailing party shall be entitled to recover reasonable costs and attorneys' fees.
Availability of Injunctive Relief
(e) . Executive understands that this Agreement does not prohibit Executive from pursuing an administrative claim with a local, state or federal administrative body such as the Department of Fair Employment and Housing, the Equal Employment Opportunity Commission or the workers' compensation board. This Agreement does, however, preclude Executive from pursuing court action regarding any such claim.
Administrative Relief
(f) . Executive acknowledges and agrees that Executive is executing this Agreement voluntarily and without any duress or undue influence by the Company or anyone else. Executive further acknowledges and agrees that Executive has carefully read this Agreement and that Executive has asked any questions needed for Executive to understand the terms, consequences and binding effect of this Agreement and fully understand it, including that Executive is waiving Executive's right to a jury trial. Finally, Executive agrees that Executive has been provided an opportunity to seek the advice of an attorney of Executive's choice before signing this Agreement.
Voluntary Nature of Agreement
16. . This Agreement, together with the Option Plan, Option Agreement and the Confidential Information Agreement represents the entire agreement and understanding between the parties as to the subject matter herein and supersedes all prior or contemporaneous agreements whether written or oral. No waiver, alteration, or modification of any of the provisions of this Agreement will be binding unless it is in writing and specifically mentions this Section 16 and it is signed by duly authorized representatives of the parties hereto.
Integration
17. . The waiver of a breach of any term or provision of this Agreement, which must be in writing, shall not operate as or be construed to be a waiver of any other previous or subsequent breach of this Agreement.
Waiver of Breach
18. . All captions and section headings used in this Agreement are for convenient reference only and do not form a part of this Agreement.
Headings
 
20. . This Agreement will be governed by the laws of the State of California (with the exception of its conflict of laws provisions).
Governing Law
21. . Executive acknowledges that he has had the opportunity to discuss this matter with and obtain advice from his private attorney, has had sufficient time to, and has carefully read and fully understands all the provisions of this Agreement, and is knowingly and voluntarily entering into this Agreement.
Acknowledgment
22. . This Agreement may be executed in counterparts, and each counterpart shall have the same force and effect as an original and shall constitute an effective, binding agreement on the part of each of the undersigned.
Counterparts
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, each of the parties has executed this Agreement, in the case of the Company by its Chairman of the Board, as of the day and year first above written.
 

Exhibit 99.2
On December 3, 2007, Natus Medical Incorporated ("Natus", the "Company") filed a Current Report on Form 8-K to report that it had completed the acquisition of Excel-Tech Ltd. ("Xltek"), based in Oakville, Ontario, Canada, pursuant to an arrangement agreement dated as of October 9, 2007 by and among the Company, Xltek, and 4437713 Canada, Inc., a wholly-owned subsidiary of the Company. Under the terms of the arrangement agreement, Natus, through its wholly owned subsidiary, acquired Xltek by means of a court-approved plan of arrangement. The acquisition closed and became effective on November 29, 2007.
On February 12, 2008 the Company filed an amendment to the aforementioned Current Report to provide pro forma financial information as of and for the nine months ended September 30, 2007, and for the twelve months ended December 31, 2006, and certain other acquisition related information.
The following unaudited pro forma condensed combined statement of operations ("Pro Forma Statement of Operations") for the year ended December 31, 2007 is based on the historical financial statements of the Company and Xltek after giving effect to the acquisition using the purchase method of accounting and applying the assumptions and adjustments described in the accompanying notes to the Pro Forma Statement of Operations.
The Pro Forma Statement of Operations has been prepared by management for illustrative purposes only and is not necessarily indicative of the condensed consolidated results of operations in future periods or the results that actually would have been realized had Natus and Xltek been a combined company during the specified period. The pro forma adjustments are based on the preliminary information available at the time of the preparation of this document. The Pro Forma Statement of Operations, including the notes thereto, is qualified in its entirety by reference to, and should be read in conjunction with:
 
 
 
The Pro Forma Statement of Operations also includes certain purchase accounting adjustments, including items expected to have a continuing impact on the combined results, such as amortization expense on acquired intangible assets, interest expense on acquisition related borrowing, and the amortization of debt issuance costs.
The Pro Forma Statement of Operations does not include the impacts of any revenue, cost, or other operating synergies that may result from the acquisition or any related restructuring actions. Cost savings, if achieved, could result from the elimination of redundant costs including headcount and facilities. The Pro Forma Statement of Operations does not reflect certain amounts resulting from the acquisition because the Company's management considers them to be of a non-recurring nature. Such amounts are comprised primarily of change-of-control and restructuring costs related to the integration of the Company and Xltek's businesses. To the extent these costs relate to the Xltek business and meet certain criteria, an amount will be recorded on the opening balance sheet in purchase accounting in accordance with Emerging Issues Task Force ("EITF") Issue No. 95-3, To the extent that such costs relate to the Company's businesses, they will not meet the criteria in EITF Issue No. 95-3, and will be recorded as expenses through the statement of operations.
"Recognition of Liabilities in Connection with a Purchase Business Combination."
 
1 - Basis of Pro Forma Presentation
The unaudited pro forma condensed combined statement of operations for the year ended December 31, 2007 is based on the historical financial statements of the Company and Xltek after giving effect to the acquisition using the purchase method of accounting and applying the assumptions and adjustments described in the accompanying notes to the unaudited condensed combined pro forma statement of operations. All dollar amounts are in U.S. Dollars unless noted otherwise.
The unaudited pro forma condensed combined statement of operations for the year ended December 31, 2007 combines the historical consolidated statement of operations of Natus for the year ended December 31, 2007, with the historical consolidated statement of operations of Xltek for the period from January 1, 2007 to the date of the acquisition.
Xltek statement of operations has been prepared in accordance with accounting principles generally accepted in the United Sates of America and converted from Canadian Dollars to U.S. Dollars pursuant to SFAS No. 52, .
Foreign Currency Translation
2 - Pro Forma Adjustments
Pro forma adjustments are necessary to reflect the amortization expense related to the estimated amortizable intangible assets, to reflect interest expense and amortization of debt issuance costs associated with acquisition borrowing, and to reflect the impact on revenue of the write-down of deferred revenue to fair value.
The Company utilized CAD $13.7 million of Xltek cash to fund the acquisition. There were no other significant intercompany balances and transactions between Natus and Xltek as of the dates and for the periods of this pro forma condensed combined financial statement.
Following are the descriptions of the pro forma adjustments to the condensed combined statement of operations:
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BABY/BABY-8K-20080501070727.txt.gz
TIME:20080501070727
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 OR 15(d) of
The Securities Exchange Act of 1934
Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported): May 1, 2008
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 - 
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 - 
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 - 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 - 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Item 2.02     Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On May 1, 2008, Natus Medical Incorporated (the Company) is issuing a press release and holding a conference call regarding its financial results for the first fiscal quarter of 2008 ended March 31, 2008 and other financial information. A copy of the press release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 to this Form 8-K.
The information in this Form 8-K and the exhibit attached hereto shall not be deemed filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the Exchange Act) or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that Section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
Item 9.01     Financial Statements and Exhibits.
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Index to Exhibits

Exhibit 99.1
Natus Medical Announces Record 2008 First Quarter Financial Results
- 73% Increase in Net Income Leads to Record First Quarter Results
- 2008 Guidance Increased
SAN CARLOS, Calif.--(BUSINESS WIRE)-- (Nasdaq:BABY) today announced financial results for the three months ended March 31, 2008.
Natus Medical Incorporated
For the first quarter ended March 31, 2008, revenue increased 36% to $36.9 million, compared to $27.1 million reported in the comparable quarter of the previous year. Net income increased 73% to $2.6 million, or $0.11 per diluted share, for the first quarter of 2008, compared with net income of $1.5 million, or $0.07 per share, for the first quarter of 2007.
Jim Hawkins, President and Chief Executive Officer of the Company said, I am very pleased with our results for the first quarter of 2008. We had an excellent first quarter led by strong sales of our newborn hearing screening products. A highlight was the introduction of the ALGO 5, our next generation hearing screener. We also were able to resume domestic shipments of the Olympic Cool-Cap during the quarter, filling substantially our entire backlog.
We completed the integration of Xltek ahead of schedule, with Xltek contributing to both the revenue and earnings growth during the quarter. Our world class sales organization again showed their ability to add new products while increasing sales, as we successfully realigned our domestic sales organizations into two distinct groups focused on Newborn Care and Neurology, added Hawkins. We also recently announced our agreement to acquire Sonamed, a manufacturer of hearing screening products, which we expect to close by the end of May. Sonameds device and disposable supply model with high gross profits is an ideal fit for Natus.
I remain very excited and optimistic for our prospects in 2008 as we look to achieve our goal of 50% earnings growth. We continue to remain confident in our strategy of combining internal growth with accretive acquisitions to build a focused and highly profitable medical device company, said Hawkins.
As of March 31, 2008 the Company had cash, cash equivalents, and short-term investments of $12.6 million, revolving and term debt of $35.6 million, stockholders' equity of approximately $118 million, and working capital of approximately $22 million. The Company raised approximately $15.4 million in April 2008 in a public offering of 885,500 shares of its common stock.
2008 Guidance
Natus increased its revenue and earnings guidance for the full year 2008. For the full year 2008, the Company now expects revenue to range from $161 million to $162 million and earnings per share to range from $0.70 to $0.72. The Company had previously said revenue would be approximately $160 million and earnings per share would range from $0.68 to $0.70.
Natus also announced revenue and earnings guidance for the second quarter of 2008. For the second quarter 2008, the Company expects revenue to range from $38.0 million to $39.0 million and earnings per share to range from $0.14 to $0.15. This compares to revenue of $28.3 million and earnings per share of $0.10 reported in the second quarter of 2007.
The Companys 2008 guidance does not include the impact of the acquisition of Sonamed. Natus plans to update its annual guidance after the Sonamed acquisition closes. The guidance is on a GAAP basis, including the impact of expensing employee equity-based compensation, however it does not include the impact of any one-time acquisition or restructuring related charges that may be incurred in 2008. All earnings per share amounts are on a diluted basis.
Conference Call
Natus has scheduled an investment-community conference call to discuss this announcement beginning at 11:00 a.m. Eastern Time today (8:00 a.m. Pacific Time). Individuals interested in listening to the conference call may do so by dialing (866) 510-0711 for domestic callers, or (617) 597-5379 for international callers, and entering reservation code 95788733. A telephone replay will be available for 48 hours following the conclusion of the call by dialing (888) 286-8010 for domestic callers, or (617) 801-6888 for international callers, and entering reservation code 81347534.
The conference call also will be available real-time via the Internet at , and a recording of the call will be available on the Companys Web site for 90 days following the completion of the call.
http://investor.natus.com
About Natus Medical Incorporated
Natus is a leading provider of healthcare products used for the screening, detection, treatment, monitoring and tracking of common medical ailments such as hearing impairment, neurological dysfunction, epilepsy, sleep disorders, and newborn care. Product offerings include computerized neurodiagnostic systems for audiology, neurology, polysomnography, and neonatology, as well as newborn care products such as hearing screening systems, phototherapy devices for the treatment of newborn jaundice, head-cooling products for the treatment of brain injury in newborns, and software systems for managing and tracking disorders and diseases for public health laboratories.
Additional information about Natus Medical can be found at .
www.natus.com
This press release contains forward-looking statements as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, particularly statements regarding the expectations, beliefs, plans, intentions and strategies of Natus. These forward-looking statements include, but are not limited to, statements regarding completion of the Sonamed transaction, future revenue and earnings growth, and anticipated revenue and profitability for the second quarter and full year 2008. These statements relate to future events or Natus' future financial performance or results, and involve known and unknown risks, uncertainties and other factors that may cause actual results, levels of activity, performance, or achievements to differ materially from those expressed or implied by the forward-looking statements. Forward-looking statements are only predictions and the actual events or results may differ materially. Natus cannot provide any assurance that its future results or the results implied by the forward-looking statements will meet expectations. Our future results could differ materially due to a number of factors, including the effects of competition, the demand for our products and services, our ability to expand our sales in international markets, our ability to maintain current sales levels in a mature domestic market, our ability to control costs, and risks associated with bringing new products to market and integrating acquired businesses. Natus disclaims any obligation to update information contained in any forward-looking statement.
More information about potential risk factors that could affect the business and financial results of Natus is included in Natus' annual report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2007, and its quarterly reports on Form 10-Q, and in other reports filed from time to time by Natus with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission.
CONTACT: Natus Medical Incorporated Steven J. Murphy, Chief Financial Officer, 650-802-0400
InvestorRelations@Natus.com


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BABY/BABY-8K-20080523210824.txt.gz
TIME:20080523210824
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On May 22, 2008, Natus Medical Incorporated ("Natus") entered into an underwriting agreement (the "Underwriting Agreement") with Cowen and Company, LLC and UBS Investment Bank, acting as joint bookrunning managers, and Natixis Bleichroeder Inc., Needham & Company, LLC, Raymond James & Associates, Inc. and Roth Capital Partners, LLC, acting as co-managers (collectively, the "Underwriters"). The Underwriting Agreement provides for the sale of 4,000,000 shares of Natus common stock at a price to the Underwriters of $18.33 per share (the "Offering"). Natus also granted the Underwriters an option to purchase up to 600,000 additional shares of Natus common stock to cover over-allotments, if any, which option the Underwriters exercised in full on May 23, 2008. These shares are being offered and sold under a prospectus supplement filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission pursuant to Rule 424(b)(5) of the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, in connection with an offering pursuant to Natus' shelf registration statement on Form S-3 (Registration No. 333-150503) (the "Registration Statement"). Natus expects to close the offering and sale of the 4,600,000 shares of its common stock on May 29, 2008.
The above description of the Underwriting Agreement is qualified in its entirety by the Underwriting Agreement, which is attached to this Report as Exhibit 1.01 and which is incorporated by reference into the Registration Statement.
A copy of the press release dated May 23, 2008 announcing the Offering is attached to this Report as Exhibit 99.01.
 
In connection with the Offering, Natus is filing a legal opinion and consent as Exhibit No. 5.01 and Exhibit No. 23.01 to this Report, which are incorporated by reference into the Registration Statement.
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 1.01
EXECUTION COPY
May 22, 2008
C C, LLC
OWEN
AND
OMPANY
UBS Securities LLC
As Representatives of the several Underwriters
c/o Cowen and Company, LLC
1221 Avenue of the Americas
New York, New York 10020
Dear Sirs:
1. . Natus Medical Incorporated, a Delaware corporation (the "Company"), proposes to sell, pursuant to the terms of this Agreement, to the several underwriters named in Schedule A hereto (the "Underwriters," or, each, an "Underwriter"), an aggregate of 4,000,000 shares of Common Stock, $0.001 par value per share (the "Common Stock"), of the Company. The aggregate of 4,000,000 shares of Common Stock so proposed to be sold is hereinafter referred to as the "Firm Stock." The Company also proposes to sell to the Underwriters, upon the terms and conditions set forth in Section 3 hereof, up to an additional 600,000 shares of Common Stock (the "Optional Stock"). The Firm Stock and the Optional Stock are hereinafter collectively referred to as the "Stock." Cowen and Company, LLC ("Cowen") and UBS Securities LLC are acting as representatives of the several Underwriters and in such capacity are hereinafter referred to as the "Representatives."
I
NTRODUCTORY
2. R W
EPRESENTATIONS
AND
ARRANTIES
(I) The Company represents and warrants to the several Underwriters, as of the date hereof and as of the Closing Date (as defined below), and agrees with the several Underwriters, that:
(a) A registration statement of the Company on Form S-3 (File No. 333-150503) (including all pre-effective amendments thereto and all post-effective amendments thereto filed before execution of this Agreement, the "Initial Registration Statement") in respect of the Stock has been filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the "Commission") pursuant to Rule 415 under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended (the "Securities Act"). The Company meets the requirements for use of Form S-3 under the Securities Act, and the rules and regulations of the Commission thereunder (the "Rules and Regulations"). The Initial Registration Statement, in the form heretofore delivered to you, and, excluding exhibits thereto, to you for each of the other Underwriters, has been declared effective by the Commission in such form and meet the requirements of the Securities Act and the Rules and Regulations. The aggregate market value of the Company's voting and non-voting common equity held by non-affiliates of the Company was at least $150 million within 60 days prior to the date of filing the Initial Registration Statement. Other than (i) the Initial Registration Statement, (ii) a registration statement, if any, increasing the size of the offering filed pursuant to Rule 462(b) under the Securities Act and the Rules and Regulations (a "Rule 462(b) Registration Statement"), (iii) the Prospectus (as defined below) contemplated by this Agreement to be filed pursuant to Rule 424(b) of the Rules and Regulations in accordance with Section 4(I)(a) hereof, (iv) a preliminary prospectus supplement relating to the offer and sale of the Stock filed pursuant to Rule 424(b) under the Rules and Regulations (the "Preliminary Prospectus Supplement") and (v) any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus (as defined below), no other document with respect to the offer and sale of the Stock
has heretofore been filed with the Commission. No stop order suspending the effectiveness of the Initial Registration Statement, any post-effective amendment thereto or the Rule 462(b) Registration Statement, if any, has been issued and no proceeding for that purpose or pursuant to Section 8A of the Securities Act has been initiated or threatened by the Commission. The various parts of the Initial Registration Statement and the Rule 462(b) Registration Statement, if any, in each case including all exhibits thereto and including (i) the information contained in the Prospectus filed with the Commission pursuant to Rule 424(b) of the Rules and Regulations and deemed by virtue of Rules 430A, 430B and 430C under the Securities Act to be part of the Initial Registration Statement at the time it became effective and (ii) the documents incorporated by reference in the Rule 462(b) Registration Statement at the time the Rule 462(b) Registration Statement became effective, are hereinafter collectively called the "Registration Statements." Any preliminary prospectus included in the Initial Registration Statement or filed with the Commission pursuant to Rule 424(a) of the Rules and Regulations is hereinafter called a "Preliminary Prospectus." The base prospectus included in the Initial Registration Statement at the time of effectiveness thereof, as supplemented by the final prospectus supplement relating to the offer and sale of the Stock, in the form filed pursuant to and within the time limits described in Rule 424(b) under the Rules and Regulations, is hereinafter called the "Prospectus."
Any reference herein to any Registration Statement, Preliminary Prospectus or the Prospectus shall be deemed to refer to and include the documents incorporated by reference therein. Any reference to any amendment or supplement to any Preliminary Prospectus or the Prospectus shall be deemed to refer to and include any documents filed after the date of such Preliminary Prospectus or the Prospectus under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (the "Exchange Act"), and incorporated by reference in such Preliminary Prospectus or Prospectus, as the case may be. Any reference to any amendment to the Registration Statements shall be deemed to refer to and include any annual report of the Company filed pursuant to Section 13(a) or 15(d) of the Exchange Act after the date of this Agreement that is incorporated by reference in the Registration Statements.
(b) As of the Applicable Time (as defined below) and as of the Closing Date or the Option Closing Date (as defined below), as the case may be, neither (i) the General Use Free Writing Prospectus(es) (as defined below) issued at or prior to the Applicable Time, the Pricing Prospectus (as defined below) and the information included on Schedule B hereto, all considered together (collectively, the "General Disclosure Package") or (ii) any individual Limited Use Free Writing Prospectus (as defined below), when considered together with the General Disclosure Package, included or will include any untrue statement of a material fact or omitted or will omit to state a material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading; , that the Company makes no representations or warranties as to information contained in or omitted from the Pricing Prospectus, in reliance upon, and in conformity with, written information furnished to the Company through the Representatives by or on behalf of any Underwriter specifically for inclusion therein, which information the parties hereto agree is limited to the Underwriters' Information as defined in Section 17. As used in this paragraph (b) and elsewhere in this Agreement:
provided, however
"Applicable Time" means 5:00 P.M., New York time, on the date of this Agreement or such other time as agreed to by the Company and the Representatives.
"Pricing Prospectus" means the Base Prospectus, as amended and supplemented immediately prior to the Applicable Time, including any document incorporated by reference therein and any prospectus supplement deemed to be a part thereof.
"Issuer Free Writing Prospectus" means any "issuer free writing prospectus," as defined in Rule 433 of the Rules and Regulations relating to the Stock in the form filed or required to be filed with the Commission or, if not required to be filed, in the form retained in the Company's records pursuant to Rule 433(g) of the Rules and Regulations.
"General Use Free Writing Prospectus" means any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus that is identified on Schedule C to this Agreement.
"Limited Use Free Writing Prospectuses" means any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus that is not a General Use Free Writing Prospectus.
(c) No order preventing or suspending the use of any Preliminary Prospectus, any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus or the Prospectus relating to the proposed offering of the Stock has been issued by the Commission, and no proceeding for that purpose or pursuant to Section 8A of the Securities Act has been instituted or, to the Company's knowledge, threatened by the Commission, and each Preliminary Prospectus, at the time of filing thereof, conformed in all material respects to the requirements of the Securities Act and the Rules and Regulations, and did not contain an untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading; , that the Company makes no representations or warranties as to information contained in or omitted from any Preliminary Prospectus in reliance upon, and in conformity with, written information furnished to the Company through the Representatives by or on behalf of any Underwriter specifically for inclusion therein, which information the parties hereto agree is limited to the Underwriters' Information.
provided, however
(d) At the respective times the Registration Statements and any amendments thereto became or become effective, at the date of this Agreement and at each Closing Date, each Registration Statement and any amendments thereto conformed and will conform in all material respects to the requirements of the Securities Act and the Rules and Regulations and did not and will not contain any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state any material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading; and the Prospectus and any amendments or supplements thereto, at the time the Prospectus or any amendment or supplement thereto was issued and at each Closing Date, conformed and will conform in all material respects to the requirements of the Securities Act and the Rules and Regulations and did not and will not contain an untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein, in light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading;, , that the foregoing representations and warranties in this paragraph (d) shall not apply to information contained in or omitted from the Registration Statements or the Prospectus, or any amendment or supplement thereto, in reliance upon, and in conformity with, written information furnished to the Company through the Representatives by or on behalf of any Underwriter specifically for inclusion therein, which information the parties hereto agree is limited to the Underwriters' Information. The Prospectus contains all required information under the Securities Act with respect to the Stock and the distribution of the Stock; , that the Company makes no representations or warranties as to the accuracy of the Underwriters' Information regarding the distribution of the Stock.
provided
however
provided, however
(e) Each Issuer Free Writing Prospectus, as of its issue date and at all subsequent times through the completion of the public offer and sale of the Stock or until any earlier date that the Company notified or notifies the Representatives as described in Section 4(I)(e), did not, does not and will not include any information that conflicted, conflicts or will conflict with the information contained in the Registration Statement, Pricing Prospectus or the Prospectus, including any document incorporated by reference therein and any prospectus supplement deemed to be a part thereof that has not been superseded or modified, or included or would include an untrue statement of a material fact or omitted or would omit to state a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances prevailing at the subsequent time, not misleading.
(f) The documents incorporated by reference in the Prospectus, when they became effective or were filed with the Commission, as the case may be, conformed in all material respects to the requirements of the Securities Act or the Exchange Act, as applicable, and the rules and regulations of the Commission thereunder and none of such documents contained any untrue statement of a material fact or omitted to state any material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading; and any further documents so filed and incorporated by reference in the Prospectus through the completion of the public offer and sale of the Stock, when such documents are filed with Commission, will conform in all material respects to the requirements of the Securities Act or the Exchange Act, as applicable, and the rules and regulations of the Commission thereunder and will not contain any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state any material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading.
(g) The Company has not, directly or indirectly, distributed and will not distribute any offering material in connection with the offering and sale of the Stock other than any Preliminary Prospectus, the Preliminary Prospectus Supplement, the Prospectus and other materials, if any, permitted under the Securities Act and consistent with Section 4(I)(b) below. The Company will file with the Commission all Issuer Free Writing Prospectuses in the time and manner required under Rules 163(b)(2) and 433(d) of the Rules and Regulations.
(h) At the time of filing the Initial Registration Statement, any 462(b) Registration Statement and any post-effective amendments thereto, and at the date hereof, the Company was not, and the Company currently is not, an "ineligible issuer," as defined in Rule 405 of the Rules and Regulations.
(i) The Company and each of its subsidiaries (as defined in Section 15) have been duly organized and are validly existing as corporations or other legal entities in good standing (or the foreign equivalent thereof) under the laws of their respective jurisdictions of organization, except where the failure to be in good standing (or the foreign equivalent thereof) would not (i) have, singularly or in the aggregate, a material adverse effect on the condition (financial or otherwise), results of operations, assets, business or prospects of the Company and its subsidiaries taken as a whole, or (ii) impair in any material respect the ability of the Company to perform its obligations under this Agreement or to consummate any transactions contemplated by this Agreement, the General Disclosure Package or the Prospectus (any such effect as described in clauses (i) or (ii), a "Material Adverse Effect"). The Company and each of its subsidiaries are duly qualified to do business and are in good standing as foreign corporations or other legal entities in each jurisdiction in which their respective ownership or lease of property or the conduct of their respective businesses requires such qualification and have all power and authority (corporate or other) necessary to own or hold their respective properties and to conduct the businesses in which they are engaged, except where the failure to so qualify or have such power or authority would not have a Material Adverse Effect. The Company owns or controls, directly or indirectly, only the following corporations, partnerships, limited liability partnerships, limited liability companies, associations or other entities: Deltamed S.A., Fischer-Zoth Diagnosesysteme GmbH, Fischer-Zoth GmbH, Fischer-Zoth Modulare Hordiagnostik GmbH & Co KG, Natus Acquisition Corporation, d/b/a Neometrics, Inc., a Division of Natus, Excel Tech Ltd., Natus Neonatal Ltd. and, upon the consummation of the acquisition thereof, Sonamed Corporation (Sonamed Corporation, collectively with Natus Acquisition Corporation, being the "Domestic Subsidiaries"), with respect to each of which the Company is the sole owner or, with respect to Sonamed Corporation, will be the sole owner, upon consummation of the acquisition thereof, other than subsidiaries of the Company which were not required to be listed in an exhibit to the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2007 pursuant to Item 601(b)(21) of Regulation S-K.Excel Tech Ltd. (the "Foreign Subsidiary") is the only subsidiary of the Company that is a "significant subsidiary" within the meaning of Regulation S-X promulgated under the Securities Act.
(j) This Agreement has been duly authorized, executed and delivered by the Company.
(k) The Stock to be issued and sold by the Company to the Underwriters hereunder has been duly and validly authorized and, when issued and delivered against payment therefor as provided herein, will be duly and validly issued, fully paid and nonassessable and free of any preemptive or similar rights and will conform to the description thereof contained in the General Disclosure Package and the Prospectus.
(l) The Company has an authorized capitalization as set forth under the heading "Capitalization" in the Pricing Prospectus, and all of the issued shares of capital stock of the Company, have been duly and validly authorized and issued, are fully paid and non-assessable, have been issued in compliance with federal and state securities laws, and conform to the description thereof contained in the General Disclosure Package and the Prospectus. As of April 30, 2008, there were 22,899,376 shares of Common Stock issued and outstanding and no shares of preferred stock, par value $0.001 of the Company issued and outstanding and 2,820,688 shares of Common Stock were issuable upon the exercise of all options, warrants and convertible securities outstanding as of such date. Since such date, the Company has not issued any securities other than awards under the Company's equity incentive plans and Common Stock of the Company issued pursuant to the exercise of stock options previously outstanding under the Company's equity incentive plans. All of the Company's options, warrants and other rights to purchase or exchange any securities for shares of the Company's capital stock have been duly authorized and validly issued and were issued in
compliance with federal and state securities laws. None of the outstanding shares of Common Stock was issued in violation of any preemptive rights, rights of first refusal or other similar rights to subscribe for or purchase securities of the Company. There are no authorized or outstanding shares of capital stock, options, warrants, preemptive rights, rights of first refusal or other rights to purchase, or equity or debt securities convertible into or exchangeable or exercisable for, any capital stock of the Company or any of its subsidiaries other than those described above or accurately described in the General Disclosure Package. The description of the Company's stock option, stock bonus and other stock plans or arrangements, and the options or other rights granted thereunder, as described in the General Disclosure Package and the Prospectus, accurately and fairly present in all material respects the information required to be shown with respect to such plans, arrangements, options and rights.
(m) All the outstanding shares of capital stock (if any) of each subsidiary of the Company have been duly authorized and validly issued, are fully paid and nonassessable and, except to the extent set forth in the General Disclosure Package or the Prospectus, are owned by the Company directly or indirectly through one or more wholly-owned subsidiaries, free and clear of any claim, lien, encumbrance, security interest, restriction upon voting or transfer or any other claim of any third party.
(n) The execution, delivery and performance of this Agreement by the Company, the issue and sale of the Stock by the Company and the consummation of the transactions contemplated hereby will not (with or without notice or lapse of time or both) (A) violate any of the provisions of the charter or by-laws (or analogous governing instruments, as applicable) of the Company or any of its subsidiaries or (B) conflict with or result in a breach or violation of any of the terms or provisions of, constitute a default or a Debt Repayment Triggering Event (as defined below) under, give rise to any right of termination or other right or the cancellation or acceleration of any right or obligation or loss of a benefit under, or give rise to the creation or imposition of any lien, encumbrance, security interest, claim or charge upon any property or assets of the Company or any subsidiary pursuant to, any indenture, mortgage, deed of trust, loan agreement or other agreement or instrument to which the Company or any of its subsidiaries is a party or by which the Company or any of its subsidiaries is bound or to which any of the property or assets of the Company or any of its subsidiaries is subject, except for any conflicts, breaches, violations, defaults, Debt Repayment Triggering Events, terminations, cancellations or accelerations that would not have a Material Adverse Effect, nor will such actions result in any violation of any law, statute, rule, regulation, judgment, order or decree of any court or governmental agency or body, domestic or foreign, having jurisdiction over the Company or any of its subsidiaries or any of their properties or assets, except for any violations that would not have a Material Adverse Effect. A "Debt Repayment Triggering Event" means any event or condition that gives, or with the giving of notice or lapse of time would give the holder of any note, debenture or other evidence of indebtedness (or any person acting on such holder's behalf) the right to require the repurchase, redemption or repayment of all or a portion of such indebtedness by the Company of any of its subsidiaries.
(o) Except for the registration of the Stock under the Securities Act, Exchange Act and applicable state securities laws, the Financial Industry Regulatory Authority (the "FINRA") and the Nasdaq Global Market in connection with the purchase and distribution of the Stock by the Underwriters and the listing of the Stock on the Nasdaq Global Market, no consent, approval, authorization or order of, or filing, qualification or registration (each an "Authorization") with, any court, governmental or non-governmental agency or body, foreign or domestic, which has not been made, obtained or taken and is not in full force and effect, is required for the execution, delivery and performance of this Agreement by the Company, the offer or sale of the Stock or the consummation of the transactions contemplated hereby; and no event has occurred that allows or results in, or after notice or lapse of time or both would allow or result in, revocation, suspension, termination or invalidation of any such Authorization or any other impairment of the rights of the holder or maker of any such Authorization. All corporate approvals (including those of stockholders) necessary for the Company to consummate the transactions contemplated by this Agreement have been obtained and are in effect.
(p) Deloitte & Touche LLP, who have certified certain financial statements and related schedules included or incorporated by reference in the Registration Statements, the General Disclosure Package and the Prospectus, and have audited the Company's internal control over financial reporting, is an independent registered public accounting firm within the meaning of Article 2-01 of Regulation S-X and the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board (United States) (the "PCAOB").
(q) The financial statements, together with the related notes and schedules, included or incorporated by reference in the General Disclosure Package, the Prospectus and in each Registration Statement fairly present the financial position and the results of operations and changes in financial position of the Company and its consolidated subsidiaries at the respective dates or for the respective periods therein specified. Such statements and related notes and schedules have been prepared in accordance with the generally accepted accounting principles in the United States ("GAAP") applied on a consistent basis throughout the periods involved except as may be set forth in the related notes included or incorporated by reference in the General Disclosure Package. The financial statements, together with the related notes and schedules, included or incorporated by reference in the General Disclosure Package and the Prospectus comply in all material respects with Regulation S-X. No other financial statements or supporting schedules or exhibits are required by Regulation S-X to be described, included or incorporated by reference in the Registration Statements, the General Disclosure Package or the Prospectus. There is no pro forma or as adjusted financial information which is required to be included in the Registration Statements, the General Disclosure Package, or the Prospectus or a document incorporated by reference therein in accordance with Regulation S-X which has not been included or incorporated as so required. The pro forma financial information and the related notes included or incorporated by reference in the Registration Statements, the General Disclosure Package and the Prospectus have been properly compiled and prepared in accordance with the applicable requirements of Rule 11-02 of Regulation S-X and present fairly the information shown therein, and the assumptions used in the preparation thereof are reasonable and the adjustments used therein are appropriate to give effect to the transactions and circumstances referred to therein. The summary and selected financial data included or incorporated by reference in the General Disclosure Package, the Prospectus and each Registration Statement fairly present the information shown therein as at the respective dates and for the respective periods specified and are derived from the consolidated financial statements set forth or incorporated by reference in the Registration Statement, the Pricing Prospectus and the Prospectus and other financial information. All information, if any, contained in the Registration Statement, the General Disclosure Package and the Prospectus regarding "non-GAAP financial measures" (as defined in Regulation G) complies with Regulation G and Item 10 of Regulations S-K, to the extent applicable.
(r) Neither the Company nor any of its subsidiaries has sustained, since the date of the latest audited financial statements included or incorporated by reference in the General Disclosure Package, any material loss or interference with its business from fire, explosion, flood or other calamity, whether or not covered by insurance, or from any labor dispute or court or governmental action, order or decree, otherwise than as set forth or contemplated in the General Disclosure Package; and, since such date, there has not been any material change in the capital stock or long-term debt of the Company or any of its subsidiaries, or any material adverse changes, or any development involving a prospective material adverse change, in or affecting the business, assets, general affairs, management, financial position, prospects, stockholders' equity or results of operations of the Company and its subsidiaries taken as a whole, otherwise than as set forth or contemplated in the General Disclosure Package.
(s) Except as set forth in the General Disclosure Package, there is no legal or governmental proceeding to which the Company or any of its subsidiaries is a party or of which any property or assets of the Company or any of its subsidiaries is the subject, including any proceeding before the United States Food and Drug Administration of the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services ("FDA") or comparable federal, state, local or foreign governmental bodies (it being understood that the interaction between the Company and the FDA and such comparable governmental bodies relating to the clinical development and product approval process shall not be deemed proceedings for purposes of this representation), which is required to be described in the Registration Statement, the General Disclosure Package or the Prospectus or a document incorporated by reference therein and is not described therein, or which, singularly or in the aggregate, if determined adversely to the Company or any of its subsidiaries, could reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect; and to the Company's knowledge, no such proceedings are threatened or contemplated by governmental authorities or threatened by others. The Company is in compliance with all applicable federal, state, local and foreign laws, regulations, orders and decrees governing its business as prescribed by the FDA, or any other federal, state or foreign agencies or bodies engaged in the regulation of
ownership, testing, development, manufacture, packaging, processing, use, distribution, marketing, labeling, promotion, sale, offer for sale, storage, import, export or disposal of any product manufactured or distributed by the Company, except where noncompliance would not, singly or in the aggregate, have a Material Adverse Effect. All preclinical and clinical studies conducted by or on behalf of the Company to support approval for commercialization of the Company's products have been conducted by the Company, or to the Company's knowledge by third parties, in compliance with all applicable federal, state or foreign laws, rules, orders and regulations, except for such failure or failures to be in compliance as could not reasonably be expected to have, singly or in the aggregate, a Material Adverse Effect.
(t) Neither the Company nor any of its subsidiaries (i) is in violation of its charter or by-laws (or analogous governing instrument, as applicable), (ii) is in default in any respect, and no event has occurred which, with notice or lapse of time or both, would constitute such a default, in the due performance or observance of any term, covenant or condition contained in any indenture, mortgage, deed of trust, loan agreement, lease or other agreement or instrument to which it is a party or by which it is bound or to which any of its property or assets is subject (including, without limitation, those administered by the FDA or by any foreign, federal, state or local governmental or regulatory authority performing functions similar to those performed by the FDA) or (iii) is in violation in any respect of any law, ordinance, governmental rule, regulation or court order, decree or judgment to which it or its property or assets may be subject except, in the case of clauses (ii) and (iii) of this paragraph (t), for any violations or defaults which, singularly or in the aggregate, would not have a Material Adverse Effect.
(u) The Company and each of its subsidiaries possess all licenses, certificates, authorizations and permits issued by, and have made all declarations and filings with, the appropriate local, state, federal or foreign regulatory agencies or bodies (including, without limitation, those administered by the FDA or by any foreign, federal, state or local governmental or regulatory authority performing functions similar to those performed by the FDA) which are necessary for the ownership of their respective properties or the conduct of their respective businesses as described in the General Disclosure Package and the Prospectus (collectively, the "Governmental Permits") except where any failures to possess or make the same, singularly or in the aggregate, would not have a Material Adverse Effect. The Company and its subsidiaries are in compliance with all such Governmental Permits, except where the failure to be in compliance would not, singularly or in the aggregate, have a Material Adverse Effect; all such Governmental Permits are valid and in full force and effect, except where the validity or failure to be in full force and effect would not, singularly or in the aggregate, have a Material Adverse Effect. All such Governmental Permits are free and clear of any restriction or condition that are in addition to, or materially different from, those normally applicable to similar licenses, certificates, authorizations and permits. Neither the Company nor any subsidiary has received notification of any revocation, modification, suspension, termination or invalidation (or proceedings related thereto) of any such Governmental Permit and to the knowledge of the Company, no event has occurred that allows or results in, or after notice or lapse of time or both would allow or result in, revocation, modification, suspension, termination or invalidation (or proceedings related thereto) of any such Governmental Permit and the Company is not aware of any reasonable basis that any such Governmental Permit would not be renewed; and the Company and its subsidiaries are members in good standing of each Federal, state or foreign exchange, board of trade, clearing house or association and self-regulatory or similar organization, in each case as necessary to conduct their respective businesses as described in the General Disclosure Package and the Prospectus. The studies, tests and preclinical or clinical trials conducted by or on behalf of the Company that are described in the General Disclosure Package and the Prospectus (the "Company Studies and Trials") were and, if still pending, are being, conducted in all material respects in accordance with experimental protocols, procedures and controls pursuant to, where applicable, accepted professional scientific standards; the descriptions of the results of the Company Studies and Trials contained in the General Disclosure Package and Prospectus are accurate in all material respects; and the Company has not received any notices or correspondence with the FDA or any foreign, state or local governmental body exercising comparable authority requiring the termination, suspension or material modification of any Company Studies or Trials that termination, suspension or material modification would reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect.
(v) Neither the Company nor any of its subsidiaries is or, after giving effect to the offering of the Stock and the application of the proceeds thereof as described in the General Disclosure Package and the Prospectus, will become an "investment company" within the meaning of the Investment Company Act of 1940, as amended, and the rules and regulations of the Commission thereunder.
(w) Neither the Company nor, to the Company's knowledge, any of its officers, directors or affiliates has taken or will take, directly or indirectly, any action designed or intended to stabilize or manipulate the price of any security of the Company, or which caused or resulted in, or which might in the future reasonably be expected to cause or result in, stabilization or manipulation of the price of any security of the Company.
(x) The Company and its subsidiaries own or possess or have the valid right to use all (i) valid and enforceable patents, patent applications, trademarks, trademark registrations, service marks, service mark registrations, Internet domain name registrations, copyrights, copyright registrations, licenses, trade secret rights ("Intellectual Property Rights") and (ii) inventions, software, works of authorships, trade marks, service marks, trade names, databases, formulae, know how, Internet domain names and other intellectual property (including trade secrets and other unpatented and/or unpatentable proprietary confidential information, systems, or procedures) (collectively, "Intellectual Property Assets") necessary to conduct their respective businesses as currently conducted, and as proposed to be conducted and described in the General Disclosure Package and the Prospectus, except where the lack of ownership or right to use any Intellectual Property Rights or Intellectual Property Assets would not have a Material Adverse Effect. The Company and its subsidiaries have not received any opinion from their legal counsel concluding that any activities of their respective businesses infringe, misappropriate, or otherwise violate, valid and enforceable Intellectual Property Rights of any other person, and have not received written notice of any challenge, which is to their knowledge still pending, by any other person to the rights of the Company and its subsidiaries with respect to any Intellectual Property Rights or Intellectual Property Assets owned or used by the Company or its subsidiaries. The Company and its subsidiaries respective businesses as now conducted do not give rise to any infringement of, any misappropriation of, or other violation of, any valid and enforceable Intellectual Property Rights of any other person, except where such infringement, misappropriation or other violation would not reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect. To the knowledge of the Company, all licenses for the use of the Intellectual Property Rights described in the General Disclosure Package and the Prospectus are valid, binding upon, and enforceable by or against the parties thereto in accordance to its terms. The Company has complied in all material respects with, and is not in breach nor has received any asserted or threatened claim of breach of any Intellectual Property license, except where the failure to so be in compliance or where any asserted or threatened claim of breach would not reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect, and the Company has no knowledge of any breach or anticipated breach by any other person to any Intellectual Property license. Except as described in the General Disclosure Package, no claim has been made against the Company alleging the infringement by the Company of any patent, trademark, service mark, trade name, copyright, trade secret, license in or other intellectual property right or franchise right of any person.
(y) The Company and each of its subsidiaries have good and marketable title in fee simple to, or have valid rights to lease or otherwise use, all items of real or personal property which are material to the business of the Company and its subsidiaries taken as a whole, in each case free and clear of all liens, encumbrances, security interests, claims and defects that do not, singularly or in the aggregate, materially affect the value of such property and do not materially interfere with the use made and proposed to be made of such property by the Company or any of its subsidiaries; and all of the leases and subleases material to the business of the Company and its subsidiaries, considered as one enterprise, and under which the Company or any of its subsidiaries holds properties described in the General Disclosure Package and the Prospectus, are in full force and effect, and neither the Company nor any subsidiary has any notice of any material claim of any sort that has been asserted by anyone adverse to the rights of the Company or any subsidiary under any of the leases or subleases mentioned above, or affecting or questioning the rights of the Company or such subsidiary to the continued possession of the leased or subleased premises under any such lease or sublease.
(z) Except as described in the General Disclosure Package and the Prospectus, there is (A) no significant unfair labor practice complaint pending against the Company, or any of its subsidiaries, nor to the knowledge of the Company, threatened against it or any of its subsidiaries, before the National Labor Relations Board, any state or local labor relation board or any foreign labor relations board, and no significant grievance or significant arbitration proceeding arising out of or under any collective bargaining
agreement is so pending against the Company or any of its subsidiaries, or, to the knowledge of the Company, threatened against it and (B) no labor disturbance by the employees of the Company or any of its subsidiaries exists or, to the Company's knowledge, is imminent, and the Company is not aware of any existing or imminent labor disturbance by the employees of any of its or its subsidiaries principal suppliers, manufacturers, customers or contractors, that could reasonably be expected, singularly or in the aggregate, to have a Material Adverse Effect. The Company is not aware that any executive officer of the Company plans to terminate employment with the Company prior to the end of the Lock-Up Period (as defined below).
(aa) No "prohibited transaction" (as defined in Section 406 of the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, as amended, including the regulations and published interpretations thereunder ("ERISA"), or Section 4975 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended from time to time (the "Code")) or "accumulated funding deficiency" (as defined in Section 302 of ERISA) or any of the events set forth in Section 4043(b) of ERISA (other than events with respect to which the thirty (30)-day notice requirement under Section 4043 of ERISA has been waived) has occurred or could reasonably be expected to occur with respect to any employee benefit plan of the Company or any of its subsidiaries which could, singularly or in the aggregate, have a Material Adverse Effect. Each employee benefit plan of the Company or any of its subsidiaries is in compliance in all material respects with applicable law, including ERISA and the Code. The Company and its subsidiaries have not incurred and could not reasonably be expected to incur liability under Title IV of ERISA with respect to the termination of, or withdrawal from, any pension plan (as defined in ERISA). Each pension plan for which the Company or any of its subsidiaries would have any liability that is intended to be qualified under Section 401(a) of the Code is so qualified, and nothing has occurred, whether by action or by failure to act, which could, singularly or in the aggregate, cause the loss of such qualification as would result in a Material Adverse Effect.
(bb) The Company and its subsidiaries are in compliance with all foreign, federal, state and local rules, laws and regulations relating to the use, treatment, storage and disposal of hazardous or toxic substances or waste and protection of health and safety or the environment which are applicable to their businesses ("Environmental Laws"), except where the failure to so be in compliance would not result in a Material Adverse Effect. There has been no storage, generation, transportation, handling, treatment, disposal, discharge, emission, or other release of any kind of toxic or other wastes or other hazardous substances by, due to, or caused by the Company or any of its subsidiaries (or, to the Company's knowledge, any other entity for whose acts or omissions the Company or any of its subsidiaries is or may otherwise be liable) upon any of the property now or previously owned or leased by the Company or any of its subsidiaries, or upon any other property, in violation of any law, statute, ordinance, rule, regulation, order, judgment, decree or permit or which would, under any law, statute, ordinance, rule (including rule of common law), regulation, order, judgment, decree or permit, give rise to any liability, except for any violation or liability which would not have a Material Adverse Effect; and there has been no disposal, discharge, emission or other release of any kind onto such property or into the environment surrounding such property of any toxic or other wastes or other hazardous substances with respect to which the Company or any of its subsidiaries has knowledge.
(cc) The Company and its subsidiaries each (i) have timely filed all necessary federal, state, local and foreign tax returns, and all such returns were true, complete and correct in all material respects, (ii) have paid all federal, state, local and foreign taxes, assessments, governmental or other charges due and payable for which it is liable, including, without limitation, all sales and use taxes and all taxes which the Company or any of its subsidiaries is obligated to withhold from amounts owing to employees, creditors and third parties, and (iii) do not have any tax deficiency or claims outstanding or assessed or, to its knowledge, proposed against any of them, except those, in each of the cases described in clauses (i), (ii) and (iii) of this paragraph (cc), that would not, singularly or in the aggregate, have a Material Adverse Effect. The Company and its subsidiaries have not engaged in any transaction which is a corporate tax shelter and the Company has no knowledge of any basis by which any transaction in which it has engaged could be characterized as such by the Internal Revenue Service or any other taxing authority. The accruals and reserves on the books and records of the Company and its subsidiaries in respect of tax liabilities for any taxable period not yet finally determined are reasonable estimates of the assessments and related liabilities for any such period and have been prepared in accordance with GAAP, and since December 31, 2007 the Company and its subsidiaries have not incurred any liability for taxes other than in the ordinary course.
(dd) The Company and each of its subsidiaries carry, or are covered by, insurance in such amounts and covering such risks as the Company reasonably believes is adequate for the conduct of their respective businesses and the value of their respective properties and as the Company reasonably believes is customary for companies engaged in similar businesses in similar industries. Neither the Company nor any of its subsidiaries has any reason to believe that it will not be able to renew its existing insurance coverage as and when such coverage expires or to obtain similar coverage from similar insurers as may be necessary to continue its business at a cost that would not have a Material Adverse Effect. All policies of insurance owned by the Company or any of its subsidiaries are, to the Company's knowledge, in full force and effect and the Company and its subsidiaries are in compliance with the terms of such policies, except where the failure to be in compliance would not result in a Material Adverse Effect. Neither the Company nor any of its subsidiaries has received written notice from any insurer, agent of such insurer or the broker of the Company or any of its subsidiaries that any material capital improvements or any other material expenditures (other than premium payments) are required or necessary to be made in order to continue such insurance. None of the Company or any of its subsidiaries insures risk of loss through any captive insurance, risk retention group, reciprocal group or by means of any fund or pool of assets specifically set aside for contingent liabilities other than as described in the General Disclosure Package.
(ee) The Company maintains a system of internal control over financial reporting (as such term is defined in Rule 13a-15 of the General Rules and Regulations under the Exchange Act (the "Exchange Act Rules")) that complies with the requirements of the Exchange Act and has been designed by the Company's principal executive officer and principal financial officer, or under their supervision, to provide reasonable assurances that (i) transactions are executed in accordance with management's general or specific authorizations; (ii) transactions are recorded as necessary to permit preparation of financial statements in conformity with GAAP and to maintain accountability for assets; (iii) access to assets is permitted only in accordance with management's general or specific authorization; and (iv) the recorded accountability for assets is compared with existing assets at reasonable intervals and appropriate action is taken with respect to any differences. The Company's internal control over financial reporting is effective. Except as described in the General Disclosure Package, since the end of the Company's most recent audited fiscal year, there has been (A) no material weakness in the Company's internal control over financial reporting (whether or not remediated) and (B) no change in the Company's internal control over financial reporting that has materially affected, or is reasonably likely to materially affect, the Company's internal control over financial reporting. The Company's internal control over financial reporting is overseen by the Audit Committee of the Board of Directors of the Company (the "Audit Committee") in accordance with the Exchange Act Rules. Except as described in the General Disclosure Package, since the end of the Company's most recent audited fiscal year, the Company has not publicly disclosed or reported to the Audit Committee or to the Board a significant deficiency, material weakness, change in internal control over financial reporting or fraud involving management or other employees who have a significant role in the internal control over financial reporting (each an "Internal Control Event"), any violation of, or failure to comply with, the U.S. securities laws, or any matter which if determined adversely, would have a Material Adverse Effect.
(ff) The Company and each of its subsidiaries have made and keep books, records and accounts, which, in reasonable detail, accurately and fairly reflect the transactions and dispositions of the assets of the Company and its subsidiaries in all material respects.
(gg) The Company maintains disclosure controls and procedures (as such is defined in Rule 13a-15 of the Exchange Act Rules) that comply with the requirements of the Exchange Act.
(hh) The minute books of the Company have been made available to the Underwriters and counsel for the Underwriters, and such books (i) contain a summary of all meetings and actions of the board of directors (including each board committee) and stockholders of the Company, since the date of its initial public offering through the date of the latest meeting and action, and (ii) accurately in all material respects reflect all transactions referred to in such minutes.
(ii) There is no agreement, lease, contract, or other document required by the Securities Act or by the Rules and Regulations to be described in the General Disclosure Package and in the Prospectus or a document incorporated by reference therein or to be filed as an exhibit to the Registration Statements or a
document incorporated by reference therein which is not so described or filed therein as required; and all descriptions of any such agreements, leases, contracts, or other documents contained in the General Disclosure Package and in the Prospectus or in a document incorporated by reference therein are accurate and complete descriptions of such documents in all material respects. Other than as described in the General Disclosure Package, no such agreement, lease, contract or other document has been suspended or terminated for convenience or default by the Company or any of the other parties thereto, and neither the Company nor any of its subsidiaries has received notice of and the Company does not have knowledge of any such pending or threatened suspension or termination.
(jj) No relationship, direct or indirect, exists between or among the Company on the one hand, and the directors, officers, stockholders (or analogous interest holders), customers or suppliers of the Company or any of its affiliates on the other hand, which is required to be described in the General Disclosure Package and the Prospectus or a document incorporated by reference therein and which is not so described.
(kk) Except as described in the General Disclosure Package, no person or entity has the right to require registration of shares of Common Stock or other securities of the Company or any of its subsidiaries because of the filing or effectiveness of the Registration Statements or otherwise, except for persons and entities who have expressly waived such right in writing or who have been given timely and proper written notice and have failed to exercise such right within the time or times required under the terms and conditions of such right. Except as described in the General Disclosure Package, there are no persons with registration rights or similar rights to have any securities registered by the Company or any of its subsidiaries under the Securities Act.
(ll) Neither the Company nor any of its subsidiaries own any "margin securities" as that term is defined in Regulation U of the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System (the "Federal Reserve Board"), and none of the proceeds of the sale of the Stock will be used, directly or indirectly, for the purpose of purchasing or carrying any margin security, for the purpose of reducing or retiring any indebtedness which was originally incurred to purchase or carry any margin security or for any other purpose which might cause any of the Stock to be considered a "purpose credit" within the meanings of Regulation T, U or X of the Federal Reserve Board.
(mm) Neither the Company nor any of its subsidiaries is a party to any contract, agreement or understanding with any person that would give rise to a valid claim against the Company or the Underwriters for a brokerage commission, finder's fee or like payment in connection with the offering and sale of the Stock or any transaction contemplated by this Agreement, the Registration Statements, the General Disclosure Package or the Prospectus.
(nn) The exercise price of each option issued under the Company's stock option or other employee benefit plans has been no less than the fair market value of a share of common stock as determined on the date of grant of such option. All grants of options were validly issued and properly approved by the board of directors of the Company (or a duly authorized committee thereof) in material compliance with all applicable laws and regulations and recorded in the Company's financial statements in accordance with GAAP and, to the Company's knowledge, no such grants involved "back dating," "forward dating" or similar practice with respect to the effective date of grant.
(oo) Except as described in the General Disclosure Package and the Prospectus, no subsidiary of the Company is currently prohibited, directly or indirectly, under any agreement or other instrument to which it is a party or is subject, from paying any dividends to the Company, from making any other distribution on such subsidiary's capital stock, from repaying to the Company any loans or advances to such subsidiary from the Company or from transferring any of such subsidiary's properties or assets to the Company or any other subsidiary of the Company.
(pp) Since the date as of which information is given in the General Disclosure Package and the Prospectus through the date hereof, and except as set forth in the Pricing Prospectus, neither the Company nor any of its subsidiaries has (i) issued or granted any securities other than options to purchase common stock pursuant to the Company's stock option plan, (ii) incurred any material liability or obligation, direct or contingent, other than liabilities and obligations which were incurred in the ordinary course of business,
(iii) entered into any material transaction other than in the ordinary course of business or (iv) declared or paid any dividend on its capital stock.
(qq) If applicable, all of the information provided to the Underwriters or to counsel for the Underwriters by the Company, its officers and directors and the holders of any securities (debt or equity) or options to acquire any securities of the Company in connection with letters, filings or other supplemental information provided to FINRA pursuant to FINRA Conduct rule 2710 or 2720 is true, correct and complete in all material respects.
(rr) No forward-looking statement (within the meaning of Section 27A of the Securities Act and Section 21E of the Exchange Act) contained in either the General Disclosure Package or the Prospectus has been made or reaffirmed without a reasonable basis or has been disclosed other than in good faith.
(ss) The Company is subject to and in compliance in all material respects with the reporting requirements of Section 13 or Section 15(d) of the Exchange Act. The Common Stock is registered pursuant to Section 12(b) or 12(g) of the Exchange Act and is listed on the Nasdaq Global Market (the "Exchange"), and the Company has taken no action designed to, or reasonably likely to have the effect of, terminating the registration of the Common Stock under the Exchange Act or delisting the Common Stock from the Exchange, nor has the Company received any notification that the Commission or the Nasdaq Global Market is contemplating terminating such registration or listing. The Company has made or will make all necessary filings required for the listing and trading of the Stock on the Exchange.
(tt) The Company is in compliance with all applicable provisions of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002 and all rules and regulations promulgated thereunder or implementing the provisions thereof (the "Sarbanes-Oxley Act"), except for where the failure to so be in compliance would not reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect.
(uu) The Company is in compliance in all material respects with all applicable corporate governance requirements set forth in the rules of the Exchange that are then in effect.
(vv) Neither the Company nor any of its subsidiaries nor, to the Company's knowledge, any employee or agent of the Company or any subsidiary, has (i) used any corporate funds for unlawful contributions, gifts, entertainment or other unlawful expenses relating to political activity, (ii) made any unlawful payment to foreign or domestic government officials or employees or to foreign or domestic political parties or campaigns from corporate funds, (iii) violated any provision of the Foreign Corrupt Practices Act of 1977, as amended or (iv) made any other unlawful payment.
(ww) There are no transactions, arrangements or other relationships between and/or among the Company, any of its affiliates (as such term is defined in Rule 405 of the Rules and Regulations) and any unconsolidated entity, including, but not limited to, any structured finance, special purpose or limited purpose entity that could reasonably be expected to materially affect the Company's liquidity or the availability of or requirements for its capital resources required to be described in the General Disclosure Package and the Prospectus or a document incorporated by reference therein which have not been described as required.
(xx) There are no outstanding loans, advances (except normal advances for business expenses in the ordinary course of business) or guarantees of indebtedness by the Company or any of its subsidiaries to or for the benefit of any of the officers or directors of the Company, any of its subsidiaries or any of their respective family members, except as disclosed in the Registration Statements, the General Disclosure Package and the Prospectus. All transactions by the Company with office holders or control persons of the Company have been duly approved by the board of directors of the Company, or duly appointed committees or officers thereof, if and to the extent required under U.S. law.
(yy) The statistical and market related data included in the Registration Statement, the General Disclosure Package and the Prospectus are based on or derived from sources that the Company believes to be reliable and accurate, and such data agree with the sources from which they are derived.
(zz) The operations of the Company and its subsidiaries are and have been conducted at all times in compliance with applicable financial recordkeeping and reporting requirements of the Currency and Foreign Transactions Reporting Act of 1970, as amended, applicable money laundering statutes and applicable rules and regulations thereunder (collectively, the "Money Laundering Laws"), except for where the failure to so be in compliance would not reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect, and no action, suit or proceeding by or before any court or governmental agency, authority or body or any arbitrator involving the Company or any of its subsidiaries with respect to the Money Laundering Laws is pending, or to the Company's knowledge, threatened.
(aaa) Neither the Company nor any of its subsidiaries nor, to the Company's knowledge, any director, officer, agent, employee or affiliate of the Company or any of its subsidiaries is currently subject to any U.S. sanctions administered by the Office of Foreign Assets Control of the U.S. Treasury Department ("OFAC"); and the Company will not directly or indirectly use the proceeds of the offering, or lend, contribute or otherwise make available such proceeds to any subsidiary, joint venture partner or other person or entity, for the purpose of financing the activities of any person currently subject to any U.S. sanctions administered by OFAC.
(bbb) Neither the Company nor any of its affiliates (within the meaning of FINRA Conduct Rule 2720(b)(1)(a)) directly or indirectly controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with, or is an associated person (within the meaning of Article I, Section 1(ee) of the By-laws of FINRA) of, any member firm of FINRA.
Any certificate signed by or on behalf of the Company and delivered to the Representatives or to counsel for the Underwriters shall be deemed to be a representation and warranty by the Company to each Underwriter as to the matters covered thereby.
3. . On the basis of the representations, warranties and agreements herein contained, but subject to the terms and conditions herein set forth the Company agrees to sell to the Underwriters, and the Underwriters agree, severally and not jointly, to purchase from the Company the respective numbers of shares of Firm Stock set forth opposite the names of the Underwriters in Schedule A hereto.
P, S D O S
URCHASE
ALE
AND
ELIVERY
OF
FFERED
ECURITIES
The purchase price per share to be paid by the Underwriters to the Company for the Stock will be $18.33 per share (the "Purchase Price").
The Company will deliver the Firm Stock to the Representatives for the respective accounts of the several Underwriters, through the facilities of The Depository Trust Company, issued in such names and in such denominations as the Representatives may direct by notice in writing to the Company given at or prior to 12:00 Noon, New York time, on the second (2
nd
) full business day preceding the Closing Date against payment of the aggregate Purchase Price therefor by wire transfer in federal (same day) funds to an account at a bank acceptable to the Representatives payable to the order of the Company all at the offices of Fenwick & West LLP, 801 California Street, Mountain View, CA 94041. Time shall be of the essence, and delivery at the time and place specified pursuant to this Agreement is a further condition of the obligations of each Underwriter hereunder. The time and date of the delivery and closing shall be at 10:00 A.M., New York time, on May 29, 2008, in accordance with Rule 15c6-1 of the Exchange Act. The time and date of such payment and delivery are herein referred to as the "Closing Date." The Closing Date and the location of delivery of, and the form of payment for, the Firm Stock may be varied by agreement between the Company and the Representatives.
For the purpose of covering any over-allotments in connection with the distribution and sale of the Firm Stock as contemplated by the Prospectus, the Underwriters may purchase all or less than all of the Optional Stock. The price per share to be paid for the Optional Stock shall be the Purchase Price. The Company agrees to sell to the Underwriters the number of shares of Optional Stock specified in the written notice delivered by the Representatives to the Company described below and the Underwriters agree, severally and not jointly, to purchase such shares of Optional Stock. Such shares of Optional Stock shall be purchased from the Company for the account of each Underwriter in the same proportion as the number of shares of Firm Stock set forth opposite such Underwriter's name on Schedule A bears to the total number of shares of Firm Stock (subject to adjustment by the Representatives to eliminate fractions). The option granted hereby may be exercised as to all or any part of the Optional Stock at any time, and from time to time, not more than thirty (30) days subsequent to the date of this Agreement for the purpose
of covering any over-allotments in connection with the distribution and sale of the Firm Stock as contemplated by the Prospectus. No Optional Stock shall be sold and delivered unless the Firm Stock previously has been, or simultaneously is, sold and delivered. The right to purchase the Optional Stock or any portion thereof may be surrendered and terminated at any time upon notice by the Representatives to the Company.
The option granted hereby may be exercised by written notice being given to the Company by the Representatives setting forth the number of shares of the Optional Stock to be purchased by the Underwriters and the date and time for delivery of and payment for the Optional Stock. Each date and time for delivery of and payment for the Optional Stock (which may be the Closing Date, but not earlier) is herein called the "Option Closing Date" and shall in no event be earlier than two (2) business days nor later than five (5) business days after written notice is given. The Option Closing Date and the Closing Date are herein called the "Closing Dates."
The Company will deliver the Optional Stock to the Representatives for the respective accounts of the several Underwriters through the facilities of The Depository Trust Company, issued in such names and in such denominations as the Representatives may direct by notice in writing to the Company given at or prior to 12:00 Noon, New York time, on the second (2
nd
) full business day preceding the Option Closing Date against payment of the aggregate Purchase Price therefor by wire transfer in federal (same day) funds to an account at a bank acceptable to the Representatives payable to the order of the Company for the Optional Stock sold by it, all at the offices of Fenwick & West LLP, 801 California Street, Mountain View, CA 94041. Time shall be of the essence, and delivery at the time and place specified pursuant to this Agreement is a further condition of the obligations of each Underwriter hereunder. The Option Closing Date and the location of delivery of, and the form of payment for, the Optional Stock may be varied by agreement between the Company and the Representatives.
The several Underwriters propose to offer the Stock for sale upon the terms and conditions set forth in the Prospectus.
4. F A
URTHER
GREEMENTS
(I) . The Company agrees with the several Underwriters:
F A O T C
URTHER
GREEMENTS
F
HE
OMPANY
(a) To prepare the Rule 462(b) Registration Statement, if necessary, in a form approved by the Representatives and file such Rule 462(b) Registration Statement with the Commission by 10:00 P.M., New York time, on the date hereof, and the Company shall at the time of filing either pay to the Commission the filing fee for the Rule 462(b) Registration Statement or give irrevocable instructions for the payment of such fee pursuant to Rule 111(b) under the Rules and Regulations; to prepare the Prospectus in a form approved by the Representatives containing information previously omitted at the time of effectiveness of the Registration Statement in reliance on Rules 430A, 430B or 430C of the Rules and Regulations and to file such Prospectus pursuant to Rule 424(b) of the Rules and Regulations not later than the second business (2
nd
) day following the execution and delivery of this Agreement or, if applicable, such earlier time as may be required by Rule 430A of the Rules and Regulations; to notify the Representatives immediately of the Company's intention to file or prepare any supplement or amendment to any Registration Statement or to the Prospectus and to make no amendment or supplement to the Registration Statements, the General Disclosure Package or to the Prospectus to which the Representatives shall reasonably object by notice to the Company after a reasonable period to review; to advise the Representatives, promptly after it receives notice thereof, of the time when any amendment to any Registration Statement has been filed or becomes effective or any supplement to the General Disclosure Package or the Prospectus or any amended Prospectus has been filed and to furnish the Underwriters with copies thereof; to file promptly all material required to be filed by the Company with the Commission pursuant to Rules 433(d) or 163(b)(2) of the Rules and Regulations, as the case may be; to file promptly all reports and any definitive proxy or information statements required to be filed by the Company with the Commission pursuant to Section 13(a), 13(c), 14 or 15(d) of the Exchange Act subsequent to the date of the Prospectus and for so long as the delivery of a prospectus (or in lieu thereof, the notice referred to in Rule 173(a) of the Rules and Regulations) is required in connection with the offering or sale of the Stock; to advise the Representatives, promptly after it receives notice thereof, of the issuance by the Commission of any stop order or of any order preventing or suspending the use of any Preliminary Prospectus, any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus or the Prospectus, of the suspension of the qualification of the Stock for offering
or sale in any jurisdiction, of the initiation or threatening of any proceeding for any such purpose, or of any request by the Commission for the amending or supplementing of the Registration Statements, the General Disclosure Package or the Prospectus or for additional information; and, in the event of the issuance of any stop order or of any order preventing or suspending the use of any Preliminary Prospectus, any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus or the Prospectus or suspending any such qualification, and promptly to use its best efforts to obtain the withdrawal of such order.
(b) The Company represents and agrees that, unless it obtains the prior consent of the Representative, it has not made and will not make any offer relating to the Stock that would constitute a "free writing prospectus" as defined in Rule 405 of the Rules and Regulations unless the prior written consent of the Representatives has been received (each, a "Permitted Free Writing Prospectus"); that the prior written consent of the Representatives hereto shall be deemed to have been given in respect of the Issuer Free Writing Prospectuses included in Schedule C hereto. The Company represents that it has treated and agrees that it will treat each Permitted Free Writing Prospectus as an Issuer Free Writing Prospectus, comply with the requirements of Rules 164 and 433 of the Rules and Regulations applicable to any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus, including the requirements relating to timely filing with the Commission, legending and record keeping and will not take any action that would result in an Underwriter or the Company being required to file with the Commission pursuant to Rule 433(d) of the Rules and Regulations a free writing prospectus prepared by or on behalf of such Underwriter that such Underwriter otherwise would not have been required to file thereunder.
provided
(c) If at any time prior to the expiration of nine (9) months after the later of (i) the latest effective date of the Registration Statement or (ii) the date of the Prospectus, when a prospectus relating to the Stock is required to be delivered (or in lieu thereof, the notice referred to in Rule 173(a) of the Rules and Regulations) any event occurs or condition exists as a result of which the Prospectus as then amended or supplemented would include any untrue statement of a material fact, or omit to state any material fact necessary to make the statements therein, in light of the circumstances under which they were made when the Prospectus is delivered (or in lieu thereof, the notice referred to in Rule 173(a) of the Rules and Regulations), not misleading, or if it is necessary at any time to amend or supplement any Registration Statement or the Prospectus or to file under the Exchange Act any document incorporated by reference in the Prospectus to comply with the Securities Act or the Exchange Act, that the Company will promptly notify the Representatives thereof and upon their request will prepare an appropriate amendment or supplement or upon their request make an appropriate filing pursuant to Section 13 or 14 of the Exchange Act in form and substance satisfactory to the Representatives which will correct such statement or omission or effect such compliance and will use its best efforts to have any amendment to any Registration Statement declared effective as soon as possible. The Company will furnish without charge to each Underwriter and to any dealer in securities as many copies as the Representatives may from time to time reasonably request of such amendment or supplement. In case any Underwriter is required to deliver a prospectus (or in lieu thereof, the notice referred to in Rule 173(a) of the Rules and Regulations) relating to the Stock nine (9) months or more after the later of (i) the latest effective date of the Registration Statement or (ii) the date of the Prospectus, the Company upon the request of the Representatives will prepare promptly an amended or supplemented Prospectus as may be necessary to permit compliance with the requirements of Section 10(a)(3) of the Securities Act and deliver to such Underwriter as many copies as such Underwriter may request of such amended or supplemented Prospectus complying with Section 10(a)(3) of the Securities Act.
(d) If the General Disclosure Package is being used to solicit offers to buy the Stock at a time when the Prospectus is not yet available to prospective purchasers and any event shall occur as a result of which, in the judgment of the Company or in the reasonable opinion of the Underwriters, it becomes necessary to amend or supplement the General Disclosure Package in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances then prevailing, not misleading, or to make the statements therein not conflict with the information contained or incorporated by reference in the Registration Statement then on file and not superseded or modified, or if it is necessary at any time to amend or supplement the General Disclosure Package to comply with any law, the Company promptly will either (i) prepare, file with the Commission (if required) and furnish to the Underwriters and any dealers an appropriate amendment or supplement to the General Disclosure Package or (ii) prepare and file with the Commission an appropriate filing under the Exchange Act which shall be incorporated by reference in the General Disclosure Package so that the
General Disclosure Package as so amended or supplemented will not, in the light of the circumstances then prevailing, be misleading or conflict with the Registration Statement then on file, or so that the General Disclosure Package will comply with law.
(e) If at any time following issuance of an Issuer Free Writing Prospectus there occurred or occurs an event or development as a result of which such Issuer Free Writing Prospectus conflicted or will conflict with the information contained in the Registration Statement, Pricing Prospectus or Prospectus, including any document incorporated by reference therein and any prospectus supplement deemed to be a part thereof and not superseded or modified or included or would include an untrue statement of a material fact or omitted or would omit to state a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances prevailing at the subsequent time, not misleading, the Company has promptly notified or will promptly notify the Representatives so that any use of the Issuer Free Writing Prospectus may cease until it is amended or supplemented and has promptly amended or will promptly amend or supplement, at its own expense, such Issuer Free Writing Prospectus to eliminate or correct such conflict, untrue statement or omission. The foregoing sentence does not apply to statements in or omissions from any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus in reliance upon, and in conformity with, written information furnished to the Company through the Representatives by or on behalf of any Underwriter specifically for inclusion therein, which information the parties hereto agree is limited to the Underwriters' Information.
(f) To furnish promptly to each of the Representatives and to counsel for the Underwriters a signed copy of each of the Registration Statements as originally filed with the Commission, and of each amendment thereto filed with the Commission, including all consents and exhibits filed therewith.
(g) To deliver promptly to the Representatives in New York City such number of the following documents as the Representatives shall reasonably request: (i) conformed copies of the Registration Statements as originally filed with the Commission (in each case excluding exhibits), (ii) each Preliminary Prospectus, (iii) any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus, (iv) the Prospectus (the delivery of the documents referred to in clauses (i), (ii), (iii) and (iv) of this paragraph (g) to be made not later than 10:00 A.M., New York time, on the business day following the execution and delivery of this Agreement), (v) conformed copies of any amendment to the Registration Statement (excluding exhibits), (vi) any amendment or supplement to the General Disclosure Package or the Prospectus (the delivery of the documents referred to in clauses (v) and (vi) of this paragraph (g) to be made not later than 10:00 A.M., New York City time, on the business day following the date of such amendment or supplement) and (vii) any document incorporated by reference in the General Disclosure Package or the Prospectus (excluding exhibits thereto) (the delivery of the documents referred to in clause (vi) of this paragraph (g) to be made not later than 10:00 A.M., New York City time, on the business day following the date of such document).
(h) To make generally available to its shareholders as soon as practicable, but in any event not later than sixteen (16) months after the effective date of each Registration Statement (as defined in Rule 158(c) of the Rules and Regulations), an earnings statement of the Company and its subsidiaries (which need not be audited) complying with Section 11(a) of the Securities Act and the Rules and Regulations (including, at the option of the Company, Rule 158).
(i) To take promptly from time to time such actions as the Representatives may reasonably request to qualify the Stock for offering and sale under the securities or Blue Sky laws of such jurisdictions (domestic or foreign) as the Representatives may designate and to continue such qualifications in effect, and to comply with such laws, for so long as required to permit the offer and sale of Stock in such jurisdictions; that the Company and its subsidiaries shall not be obligated to qualify as foreign corporations in any jurisdiction in which they are not so qualified or to file a general consent to service of process in any jurisdiction.
provided
(j) Upon request, during the period of five (5) years from the date hereof, to deliver to each of the Underwriters, (i) as soon as they are available, copies of all reports or other communications furnished to shareholders, and (ii) as soon as they are available, copies of any reports and financial statements furnished or filed with the Commission or any national securities exchange on which the Stock is listed. However, so long as the Company is subject to the reporting requirements of either Section 13 or Section 15(d) of the Exchange Act and is timely filing reports with the Commission on its Electronic Data Gathering, Analysis and Retrieval system ("EDGAR"), it is not required to furnish such reports or statements to the Underwriters.
(k) That the Company will not, for a period of ninety (90) days from the date of this Agreement, (the "Lock-Up Period") without the prior written consent of the Representatives, directly or indirectly offer, sell, assign, transfer, pledge, contract to sell, or otherwise dispose of, any shares of Common Stock or any securities convertible into or exercisable or exchangeable for Common Stock, other than (1) the Company's sale of the Stock hereunder, (2) the issuance of restricted Common Stock or options to acquire Common Stock pursuant to the Company's employee benefit plans, qualified stock option plans or other employee compensation plans as such plans are in existence on the date hereof and described in the Prospectus, (3) the issuance of Common Stock pursuant to the valid exercises of options, warrants or rights outstanding on the date hereof and (4) up to an aggregate of 5.0% of the Company's outstanding shares of Common Stock (calculated as of the last Closing Date) issued (A) in connection with the acquisition by the Company of any business or (B) in connection with any joint venture or strategic alliance involving the Company and other entities in, so long as in the case of subclauses (4)(A) and (B), the recipients of such Common Stock enter into a written agreement with the Underwriters substantially to the effect set forth in Exhibit I hereto. The Company will cause each officer and director listed in Schedule D to furnish to the Representatives, prior to the Closing Date, a letter, substantially in the form of Exhibit I hereto, pursuant to which each such person shall agree, among other things, not to directly or indirectly offer, sell, assign, transfer, pledge, contract to sell, or otherwise dispose of, or announce the intention to otherwise dispose of, any shares of Common Stock or any securities convertible into or exercisable or exchangeable for Common Stock, not to engage in any swap, hedge or similar agreement or arrangement that transfers, in whole or in part, directly or indirectly, the economic risk of ownership of Common Stock or any such securities and not to engage in any short selling of any Common Stock or any such securities, during the Lock-Up Period, without the prior written consent of the Representatives. The Company also agrees that during such period, other than for the sale of the Stock hereunder, the Company will not file any registration statement, preliminary prospectus or prospectus, or any amendment or supplement thereto, under the Securities Act for any such transaction or which registers, or offers for sale, Common Stock or any securities convertible into or exercisable or exchangeable for Common Stock, except for a registration statement on Form S-8 relating to employee benefit plans. The Company hereby agrees that (i) if it issues an earnings release or material news, or if a material event relating to the Company occurs, during the last seventeen (17) days of the Lock-Up Period, or (ii) if prior to the expiration of the Lock-Up Period, the Company announces that it will release earnings results during the sixteen (16)-day period beginning on the last day of the Lock-Up Period, the restrictions imposed by this paragraph (k) or the letter shall continue to apply until the expiration of the eighteen (18)-day period beginning on the issuance of the earnings release or the occurrence of the material news or material event. The Company will provide the Representatives and any co-managers and each stockholder subject to the Lock-Up Period with prior notice (in accordance with Section 14 herein) of any such announcement that gives rise to an extension of the Lock-Up Period.
(l) To supply the Representatives with copies of all written correspondence to and from, and all documents issued to and by, the Commission in connection with the registration of the Stock under the Securities Act or any of the Registration Statements, any Preliminary Prospectus or the Prospectus, or any amendment or supplement thereto or document incorporated by reference therein.
(m) Prior to each of the Closing Dates, to furnish to the Representatives, as soon as they have been prepared, copies of any unaudited interim consolidated financial statements of the Company for any periods subsequent to the periods covered by the financial statements appearing in the Registration Statements and the Prospectus.
(n) Prior to the latest of the Closing Dates, not to issue any press release or other communication directly or indirectly or hold any press conference with respect to the Company, its condition, financial or otherwise, or earnings, business affairs or business prospects (except for routine oral marketing communications in the ordinary course of business and consistent with the past practices of the Company and of which the Representatives are notified), without the prior written consent of the Representatives, which consent shall not be unreasonably withheld or delayed, unless in the judgment of the Company and its counsel, and after notification to the Representatives, such press release or communication is required by law.
(o) Not to take any action prior to latest of the Closing Dates without the prior written consent of the Representatives, which consent shall not be unreasonably withheld or delayed, which would require the Prospectus to be amended or supplemented pursuant to Section 4(I)(c).
(p) To at all times comply with all applicable provisions of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act in effect from time to time.
(q) To maintain, at its expense, a registrar and transfer agent for the Stock.
(r) To apply the net proceeds from the sale of the Stock as set forth in the Registration Statement, the General Disclosure Package and the Prospectus under the heading "Use of Proceeds," and except as disclosed in the General Disclosure Package, the Company does not intend to use any of the proceeds from the sale of the Stock hereunder to repay any outstanding debt owed to any affiliate of any Underwriter. The Company shall manage its affairs and investments in such a manner as not to be or become an "investment company" within the meaning of the Investment Company Act and the rules and regulations thereunder.
(s) To use its best efforts to list, subject to notice of issuance, and to maintain the listing of the Stock on the Exchange.
(t) To use its best efforts to do and perform all things required to be done or performed under this Agreement by the Company prior to each Closing Date and to satisfy all conditions precedent to the delivery of the Firm Stock and the Optional Stock.
(u) Upon request of any Underwriter, to furnish, or cause to be furnished, to such Underwriter an electronic version of the Company's trademarks, servicemarks and corporate logo for use on the website, if any, operated by such Underwriter for the purpose of facilitating the on-line offering of the Stock (the "License"); that the License shall be used solely for the purpose described above, is granted without any fee and may not be assigned or transferred.
provided, however
5. . The Company agrees to pay, or reimburse if paid by any Underwriter, whether or not the transactions contemplated hereby are consummated or this Agreement is terminated: (a) the costs incident to the authorization, issuance, sale, preparation and delivery of the Stock and any taxes payable in that connection; (b) the costs incident to the registration of the Stock under the Securities Act; (c) the costs incident to the preparation, printing and distribution of the Registration Statements, the Base Prospectus, any Preliminary Prospectus, any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus, the General Disclosure Package, the Prospectus, any amendments, supplements and exhibits thereto or any document incorporated by reference therein and the costs of printing, reproducing and distributing the "Agreement Among Underwriters" between the Representatives and the Underwriters, the Master Selected Dealers' Agreement, the Underwriters' Questionnaire, this Agreement and any closing documents by mail, telex or other means of communications; (d) the fees and expenses (including related fees and expenses of counsel for the Underwriters) incurred in connection with securing any required review by the FINRA of the terms of the sale of the Stock and any filings made with the FINRA; (e) any applicable listing or other fees; (f) the fees and expenses (including related fees and expenses of counsel to the Underwriters) of qualifying the Stock under the securities laws of the several jurisdictions as provided in Section 4(I)(i)) and of preparing, printing and distributing wrappers, Blue Sky Memoranda and Legal Investment Surveys; (g) the cost of preparing and printing stock certificates; (h) all fees and expenses of the registrar and transfer agent of the Stock; (i) the costs and expenses (including, without limitation, any damages or other amounts payable in connection with the legal or contractual liability) associated with the reforming of any contracts for sale of the Stock made by the Underwriters caused by a breach of the representation contained in Section 2(I)(c), (j) the costs and expenses of the Company relating to investor presentations on any "road show" undertaken in connection with the marketing of the offering of the Stock, including, without limitation, expenses associated with the preparation or dissemination of any electronic road show, expenses associated with the production of road show slides and graphics, fees and expenses of any consultants engaged in connection with the road show presentations with the prior approval of the Company, travel and lodging expenses of the officers of the Company and such consultants, including one-half of the cost of any aircraft chartered in connection with the road show, and (k) all other costs and expenses incident to the offering of
P E
AYMENT
OF
XPENSES
the Stock or the performance of the obligations of the Company under this Agreement (including, without limitation, the fees and expenses of the Company's counsel and the Company's independent accountants); provided that, except to the extent otherwise provided in this Section 5 and in Sections 9 and 10, the Underwriters shall pay their own costs and expenses, including the fees and expenses of their counsel, travel and lodging expenses of any representatives of the Underwriters, one-half of the cost of any aircraft chartered in connection with the road show, any transfer taxes on the resale of any Stock by them and the expenses of advertising any offering of the Stock made by the Underwriters.
6. The respective obligations of the several Underwriters hereunder are subject to the accuracy, when made and as of the Applicable Time and on such Closing Date, of the representations and warranties of the Company contained herein, to the accuracy of the statements of the Company made in any certificates pursuant to the provisions hereof, to the performance by the Company of its obligations hereunder, and to each of the following additional terms and conditions:
C U' O.
ONDITIONS
OF
NDERWRITERS
BLIGATIONS
(a) The Registration Statements have become effective under the Securities Act, and no stop order suspending the effectiveness of any Registration Statement or any part thereof, preventing or suspending the use of any Base Prospectus, any Preliminary Prospectus, the Prospectus or any Permitted Free Writing Prospectus or any part thereof shall have been issued and no proceedings for that purpose or pursuant to Section 8A under the Securities Act shall have been initiated or threatened by the Commission, and all requests for additional information on the part of the Commission (to be included or incorporated by reference in the Registration Statements or the Prospectus or otherwise) shall have been complied with to the reasonable satisfaction of the Representatives; the Rule 462(b) Registration Statement, if any, each Issuer Free Writing Prospectus and the Prospectus shall have been filed with, the Commission within the applicable time period prescribed for such filing by, and in compliance with, the Rules and Regulations and in accordance with Section 4(I)(a), and the Rule 462(b) Registration Statement, if any, shall have become effective immediately upon its filing with the Commission; and the FINRA shall have raised no objection to the fairness and reasonableness of the terms of this Agreement or the transactions contemplated hereby.
(b) None of the Underwriters shall have discovered and disclosed to the Company on or prior to such Closing Date that any Registration Statement or any amendment or supplement thereto contains an untrue statement of a fact which, in the opinion of counsel for the Underwriters, is material or omits to state any fact which, in the opinion of such counsel, is material and is required to be stated therein or is necessary to make the statements therein not misleading, or that the General Disclosure Package, any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus or the Prospectus or any amendment or supplement thereto contains an untrue statement of fact which, in the opinion of such counsel, is material or omits to state any fact which, in the opinion of such counsel, is material and is necessary in order to make the statements, in the light of the circumstances in which they were made, not misleading.
(c) All corporate proceedings and other legal matters incident to the authorization, form and validity of each of this Agreement, the Stock, the Registration Statements, the General Disclosure Package, each Issuer Free Writing Prospectus and the Prospectus and all other legal matters relating to this Agreement and the transactions contemplated hereby shall be reasonably satisfactory in all material respects to counsel for the Underwriters, and the Company shall have furnished to such counsel all documents and information that they may reasonably request to enable them to pass upon such matters.
(d) Fenwick & West LLP shall have furnished to the Representatives such counsel's written opinion, as counsel to the Company, addressed to the Underwriters and dated such Closing Date, in substantially the form set forth on Exhibit II.
(e) Charles Morin, Esq. shall have furnished to the Representatives such counsel's written opinion, as regulatory counsel to the Company, addressed to the Underwriters and dated such Closing Date, in the form set forth on Exhibit III.
(f) Osler, Hoskin & Harcourt LLP shall have furnished to the Representatives such counsel's written opinion, as Canadian counsel to the Company, addressed to the Underwriters and dated such Closing Date, in substantially the form set forth on Exhibit IV.
(g) The Representatives shall have received from Latham & Watkins LLP, counsel for the Underwriters, such opinion or opinions, dated such Closing Date, with respect to such matters as the Underwriters may reasonably require, and the Company shall have furnished to such counsel such documents as they request for enabling them to pass upon such matters.
(h) At the time of the execution of this Agreement, the Representatives shall have received from Deloitte & Touche LLP a letter, addressed to the Underwriters, executed and dated such date, in form and substance satisfactory to the Representatives (i) confirming that they are an independent registered accounting firm with respect to the Company and its subsidiaries within the meaning of the Securities Act and the Rules and Regulations and PCAOB and (ii) stating the conclusions and findings of such firm, of the type ordinarily included in accountants' "comfort letters" to underwriters, with respect to the financial statements and certain financial information contained or incorporated by reference in the Registration Statements, the General Disclosure Package and the Prospectus.
(i) At the time of the execution of this Agreement, the Representatives shall have received from Ernst & Young LLP a letter, addressed to the Underwriters, executed and dated such date, in form and substance satisfactory to the Representatives (i) confirming that they are an independent registered accounting firm with respect to the Company and its subsidiaries within the meaning of the Securities Act and the Rules and Regulations and PCAOB and (ii) stating the conclusions and findings of such firm, of the type ordinarily included in accountants' "comfort letters" to underwriters, with respect to the financial statements and certain financial information incorporated by reference in the Registration Statements, the General Disclosure Package and the Prospectus.
(j) On the effective date of any post-effective amendment to any Registration Statement and on such Closing Date, the Representatives shall have received a letter (the "bring-down letter") from Deloitte & Touche LLP addressed to the Underwriters and dated such Closing Date confirming, as of the date of the bring-down letter (or, with respect to matters involving changes or developments since the respective dates as of which specified financial information is given in the General Disclosure Package and the Prospectus, as the case may be, as of a date not more than three (3) business days prior to the date of the bring-down letter), the conclusions and findings of such firm, of the type ordinarily included in accountants' "comfort letters" to underwriters, with respect to the financial information and other matters covered by its letter delivered to the Representatives concurrently with the execution of this Agreement pursuant to paragraph (h) of this Section 6.
(k) The Company shall have furnished to the Representatives a certificate, dated such Closing Date, of its Chairman of the Board or President and its Chief Financial Officer on behalf of the Company stating that (i) such officers have carefully examined the Registration Statement, the General Disclosure Package, any Permitted Free Writing Prospectus and the Prospectus and, in their opinion, the Registration Statement, at the Applicable Time and as of such Closing Date did not include any untrue statement of a material fact and did not omit to state a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading, and the General Disclosure Package, as of the Applicable Time and as of such Closing Date, any Permitted Free Writing Prospectus as of its date and as of such Closing Date, the Prospectus and each amendment or supplement thereto, as of the respective date thereof and as of such Closing Date, did not include any untrue statement of a material fact and did not omit to state a material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances in which they were made, not misleading, (ii) since the effective date of the Initial Registration Statement, no event has occurred which should have been set forth in a supplement or amendment to the Registration Statements, the General Disclosure Package or the Prospectus which has not been so set forth, (iii) to the best of their knowledge, as of such Closing Date, the representations and warranties of the Company in this Agreement are true and correct and the Company has complied with all agreements and satisfied all conditions on its part to be performed or satisfied hereunder at or prior to such Closing Date, and (iv) there has not been, subsequent to the date of the most recent audited financial statements included or incorporated by reference in the General Disclosure Package, any material adverse change in the financial position or results of operations of the Company and its subsidiaries, or any change or development that, singularly or in the aggregate, would involve a material adverse change or a prospective material adverse change, in or affecting the condition (financial or otherwise), results of operations, business, assets or prospects of the Company and its subsidiaries taken as a whole, except as set forth in the Prospectus.
(l) Since the date of the latest audited financial statements included in the General Disclosure Package or incorporated by reference in the General Disclosure Package as of the date hereof, (i) neither the Company nor any of its subsidiaries shall have sustained any loss or interference with its business from fire, explosion, flood or other calamity, whether or not covered by insurance, or from any labor dispute or court or governmental action, order or decree, otherwise than as set forth in the General Disclosure Package, and (ii) there shall not have been any change in the capital stock or long-term debt of the Company or any of its subsidiaries, or any change, or any development involving a prospective change, in or affecting the business, general affairs, management, financial position, stockholders' equity or results of operations of the Company and its subsidiaries, otherwise than as set forth in the General Disclosure Package, the effect of which, in any such case described in clause (i) or (ii) of this paragraph (l), is, in the judgment of the Representatives, so material and adverse as to make it impracticable or inadvisable to proceed with the sale or delivery of the Stock on the terms and in the manner contemplated in the General Disclosure Package.
(m) No action shall have been taken and no law, statute, rule, regulation or order shall have been enacted, adopted or issued by any governmental agency or body which would prevent the issuance or sale of the Stock or materially and adversely affect or be reasonably expected to materially and adversely affect the business or operations of the Company; and no injunction, restraining order or order of any other nature by any federal or state court of competent jurisdiction shall have been issued which would prevent the issuance or sale of the Stock or materially and adversely affect or be reasonably expected to materially and adversely affect the business or operations of the Company.
(n) Subsequent to the execution and delivery of this Agreement (i) no downgrading shall have occurred in the Company's corporate credit rating or the rating accorded the Company's debt securities by any "nationally recognized statistical rating organization," as that term is defined by the Commission for purposes of Rule 436(g)(2) of the Rules and Regulations and (ii) no such organization shall have publicly announced that it has under surveillance or review (other than an announcement with positive implications of a possible upgrading), the Company's corporate credit rating or the rating of any of the Company's debt securities.
(o) Subsequent to the execution and delivery of this Agreement there shall not have occurred any of the following: (i) trading in securities generally on the New York Stock Exchange, Nasdaq Global Market or the American Stock Exchange or in the over-the-counter market, or trading in any securities of the Company on any exchange or in the over-the-counter market, shall have been suspended or materially limited, or minimum or maximum prices or maximum range for prices shall have been established on any such exchange or such market by the Commission, by such exchange or market or by any other regulatory body or governmental authority having jurisdiction, (ii) a banking moratorium shall have been declared by Federal or state authorities or a material disruption has occurred in commercial banking or securities settlement or clearance services in the United States, (iii) the United States shall have become engaged in hostilities, or the subject of an act of terrorism, or there shall have been an outbreak of or escalation in hostilities involving the United States, or there shall have been a declaration of a national emergency or war by the United States or (iv) there shall have occurred such a material adverse change in general economic, political or financial conditions (or the effect of international conditions on the financial markets in the United States shall be such) as to make it, in the judgment of the Representatives, impracticable or inadvisable to proceed with the sale or delivery of the Stock on the terms and in the manner contemplated in the General Disclosure Package and the Prospectus.
(p) The Representatives shall have received on and as of such Closing Date satisfactory evidence of the good standing of the Company, the Domestic Subsidiaries and the Foreign Subsidiary in their respective jurisdictions of organization and the good standing of the Company as a foreign entity in the States of California, Illinois and Washington and of Sonamed Corporation in the State of Massachusetts, in each case in writing or any standard form of telecommunication from the appropriate Governmental Authorities of such jurisdictions.
(q) The Representatives shall have received the written agreements, substantially in the form of Exhibit I hereto, of the officers and directors of the Company listed in Schedule D to this Agreement.
(r) On or prior to such Closing Date, the Company shall have furnished to the Representatives such further certificates and documents as the Representatives may reasonably request.
All opinions, letters, evidence and certificates mentioned above or elsewhere in this Agreement shall be deemed to be in compliance with the provisions hereof only if they are in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to counsel for the Underwriters.
7.
I C.
NDEMNIFICATION
AND
ONTRIBUTION
(a) The Company shall indemnify and hold harmless:
each Underwriter, its directors, officers, managers, members, employees, representatives and agents and each person, if any, who controls any Underwriter within the meaning of Section 15 of the Securities Act or Section 20 of the Exchange Act (collectively the "Underwriter Indemnified Parties," and each an "Underwriter Indemnified Party") against any loss, claim, damage, expense or liability whatsoever (or any action, investigation or proceeding in respect thereof), joint or several, to which such Underwriter Indemnified Party may become subject, under the Securities Act or otherwise, insofar as such loss, claim, damage, expense, liability, action, investigation or proceeding arises out of or is based upon (A) any untrue statement or alleged untrue statement of a material fact contained in any Preliminary Prospectus, any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus, any "issuer information" filed or required to be filed pursuant to Rule 433(d) of the Rules and Regulations, any Registration Statement or the Prospectus, or in any amendment or supplement thereto or document incorporated by reference therein, or (B) the omission or alleged omission to state in any Preliminary Prospectus, any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus, any "issuer information" filed or required to be filed pursuant to Rule 433(d) of the Rules and Regulations, any Registration Statement or the Prospectus, or in any amendment or supplement thereto or document incorporated by reference therein, a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading, and shall reimburse each Underwriter Indemnified Party promptly upon demand for any legal fees or other expenses reasonably incurred by that Underwriter Indemnified Party in connection with investigating, or preparing to defend, or defending against, or appearing as a third party witness in respect of, or otherwise incurred in connection with, any such loss, claim, damage, expense, liability, action, investigation or proceeding, as such fees and expenses are incurred; , , that the Company shall not be liable in any such case to the extent that any such loss, claim, damage, expense or liability arises out of or is based upon an untrue statement or alleged untrue statement in, or omission or alleged omission from any Preliminary Prospectus, any Registration Statement or the Prospectus, or any such amendment or supplement thereto, or any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus made in reliance upon and in conformity with written information furnished to the Company through the Representatives by or on behalf of any Underwriter specifically for use therein, which information the parties hereto agree is limited to the Underwriters' Information.
provided
however
The indemnity agreement in this Section 7(a) is not exclusive and is in addition to each other liability which the Company might have under this Agreement or otherwise, and shall not limit any rights or remedies which may otherwise be available under this Agreement, at law or in equity to any Underwriter Indemnified Party.
(b) Each Underwriter, severally and not jointly, shall indemnify and hold harmless the Company and its directors, its officers who signed the Registration Statement and each person, if any, who controls the Company within the meaning of Section 15 of the Securities Act or Section 20 of the Exchange Act (collectively the "Company Indemnified Parties" and each a "Company Indemnified Party") against any loss, claim, damage, expense or liability whatsoever (or any action, investigation or proceeding in respect thereof), joint or several, to which such Company Indemnified Party may become subject, under the Securities Act or otherwise, insofar as such loss, claim, damage, expense, liability, action, investigation or proceeding arises out of or is based upon (i) any untrue statement or alleged untrue statement of a material fact contained in any Preliminary Prospectus, any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus, any "issuer information" filed or required to be filed pursuant to Rule 433(d) of the Rules and Regulations, any Registration Statement or the Prospectus, or in any amendment or supplement thereto, or (ii) the omission or alleged
omission to state in any Preliminary Prospectus, any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus, any "issuer information" filed or required to be filed pursuant to Rule 433(d) of the Rules and Regulations, any Registration Statement or the Prospectus, or in any amendment or supplement thereto, a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading, but in each case only to the extent that the untrue statement or alleged untrue statement or omission or alleged omission was made in reliance upon and in conformity with written information furnished to the Company through the Representatives by or on behalf of that Underwriter specifically for use therein, which information the parties hereto agree is limited to the Underwriters' Information, and shall reimburse the Company Indemnified Parties for any legal or other expenses reasonably incurred by such party in connection with investigating or preparing to defend or defending against or appearing as third party witness in connection with any such loss, claim, damage, liability, action, investigation or proceeding, as such fees and expenses are incurred. This indemnity agreement is not exclusive and will be in addition to any liability which the Underwriters might otherwise have and shall not limit any rights or remedies which may otherwise be available under this Agreement, at law or in equity to the Company Indemnified Parties.
(c) Promptly after receipt by an indemnified party under this Section 7 of notice of the commencement of any action, the indemnified party shall, if a claim in respect thereof is to be made against an indemnifying party under this Section 7, notify such indemnifying party in writing of the commencement of that action; that the failure to notify the indemnifying party shall not relieve it from any liability which it may have under this Section 7 except to the extent it has been materially prejudiced by such failure; and, that the failure to notify an indemnifying party shall not relieve it from any liability which it may have to an indemnified party otherwise than under this Section 7. If any such action shall be brought against an indemnified party, and it shall notify the indemnifying party thereof, the indemnifying party shall be entitled to participate therein and, to the extent that it wishes, jointly with any other similarly notified indemnifying party, to assume the defense of such action with counsel reasonably satisfactory to the indemnified party (which counsel shall not, except with the written consent of the indemnified party, be counsel to the indemnifying party). After notice from the indemnifying party to the indemnified party of its election to assume the defense of such action, except as provided herein, the indemnifying party shall not be liable to the indemnified party under Section 7 for any legal or other expenses subsequently incurred by the indemnified party in connection with the defense of such action other than reasonable costs of investigation; that any indemnified party shall have the right to employ separate counsel in any such action and to participate in the defense of such action but the fees and expenses of such counsel (other than reasonable costs of investigation) shall be at the expense of such indemnified party unless (i) the employment thereof has been specifically authorized in writing by the Company in the case of a claim for indemnification under Section 7(a) or the Representatives in the case of a claim for indemnification under Section 7(b), (ii) such indemnified party shall have been advised by its counsel that there may be one or more legal defenses available to it which are different from or additional to those available to the indemnifying party or (iii) the indemnifying party has failed to assume the defense of such action and employ counsel reasonably satisfactory to the indemnified party within a reasonable period of time after notice of the commencement of the action or the indemnifying party does not diligently defend the action after assumption of the defense, in which case, if such indemnified party notifies the indemnifying party in writing that it elects to employ separate counsel at the expense of the indemnifying party, the indemnifying party shall not have the right to assume the defense of (or, in the case of a failure to diligently defend the action after assumption of the defense, to continue to defend) such action on behalf of such indemnified party and the indemnifying party shall be responsible for legal or other expenses subsequently incurred by such indemnified party in connection with the defense of such action; , , that the indemnifying party shall not, in connection with any one such action or separate but substantially similar or related actions in the same jurisdiction arising out of the same general allegations or circumstances, be liable for the reasonable fees and expenses of more than one separate firm of attorneys at any time for all such indemnified parties (in addition to any local counsel), which firm shall be designated in writing by the Representatives if the indemnified parties under this Section 7 consist of any Underwriter Indemnified Party or by the Company if the indemnified parties under this Section 7 consist of any Company Indemnified Parties. Subject to this Section 7(c), the amount payable by an indemnifying party under Section 7 shall include, but not be limited to, (x) reasonable legal fees and expenses of counsel to the indemnified party and any other expenses in investigating, or preparing to defend or defending against, or appearing as a third party witness in respect of, or otherwise incurred in connection with, any action, investigation, proceeding or claim, and (y) all amounts paid in settlement of any of the foregoing. No
provided, however,
provided, further,
provided, however,
provided
however
indemnifying party shall, without the prior written consent of the indemnified parties, settle or compromise or consent to the entry of judgment with respect to any pending or threatened action or any claim whatsoever, in respect of which indemnification or contribution could be sought under this Section 7 (whether or not the indemnified parties are actual or potential parties thereto), unless such settlement, compromise or consent (i) includes an unconditional release of each indemnified party in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to such indemnified party from all liability arising out of such action or claim and (ii) does not include a statement as to or an admission of fault, culpability or a failure to act by or on behalf of any indemnified party. Subject to the provisions of the following sentence, no indemnifying party shall be liable for settlement of any pending or threatened action or any claim whatsoever that is effected without its written consent (which consent shall not be unreasonably withheld or delayed), but if settled with its written consent, if its consent has been unreasonably withheld or delayed or if there be a judgment for the plaintiff in any such matter, the indemnifying party agrees to indemnify and hold harmless any indemnified party from and against any loss or liability by reason of such settlement or judgment. In addition, if at any time an indemnified party shall have requested that an indemnifying party reimburse the indemnified party for fees and expenses of counsel, such indemnifying party agrees that it shall be liable for any settlement of the nature contemplated by Section 7(a) effected without its written consent if (i) such settlement is entered into more than forty-five (45) days after receipt by such indemnifying party of the request for reimbursement, (ii) such indemnifying party shall have received notice of the terms of such settlement at least thirty (30) days prior to such settlement being entered into and (iii) such indemnifying party shall not have reimbursed such indemnified party in accordance with such request prior to the date of such settlement.
(d) If the indemnification provided for in this Section 7 is unavailable or insufficient to hold harmless an indemnified party under Section 7(a) or 7(b), then each indemnifying party shall, in lieu of indemnifying such indemnified party, contribute to the amount paid, payable or otherwise incurred by such indemnified party as a result of such loss, claim, damage, expense or liability (or any action, investigation or proceeding in respect thereof), as incurred, (i) in such proportion as shall be appropriate to reflect the relative benefits received by the Company on the one hand and the Underwriters on the other from the offering of the Stock, or (ii) if the allocation provided by clause (i) of this Section 7(d) is not permitted by applicable law, in such proportion as is appropriate to reflect not only the relative benefits referred to in clause (i) of this Section 7(d) but also the relative fault of the Company on the one hand and the Underwriters on the other with respect to the statements, omissions, acts or failures to act which resulted in such loss, claim, damage, expense or liability (or any action, investigation or proceeding in respect thereof) as well as any other relevant equitable considerations. The relative benefits received by the Company on the one hand and the Underwriters on the other with respect to such offering shall be deemed to be in the same proportion as the total net proceeds from the offering of the Stock purchased under this Agreement (before deducting expenses) received by the Company bear to the total underwriting discounts and commissions received by the Underwriters with respect to the Stock purchased under this Agreement, in each case as set forth in the table on the cover page of the Prospectus. The relative fault of the Company on the one hand and the Underwriters on the other shall be determined by reference to, among other things, whether the untrue or alleged untrue statement of a material fact or the omission or alleged omission to state a material fact relates to information supplied by the Company on the one hand or the Underwriters on the other, the intent of the parties and their relative knowledge, access to information and opportunity to correct or prevent such untrue statement, omission, act or failure to act; that the parties hereto agree that the written information furnished to the Company through the Representatives by or on behalf of the Underwriters for use in the Preliminary Prospectus, any Registration Statement or the Prospectus, or in any amendment or supplement thereto, consists solely of the Underwriter's Information as defined in Section 15.
provided
(e) The Company and the Underwriters agree that it would not be just and equitable if contributions pursuant to Section 7(d) above were to be determined by pro rata allocation (even if the Underwriters were treated as one entity for such purpose) or by any other method of allocation which does not take into account the equitable considerations referred to Section 7(d) above. The amount paid or payable by an indemnified party as a result of the loss, claim, damage, expense, liability, action, investigation or proceeding referred to in Section 7(d) above shall be deemed to include, subject to the limitations set forth above, any legal or other expenses reasonably incurred by such indemnified party in connection with investigating, preparing to defend or defending against or appearing as a third party witness in respect of, or otherwise incurred in connection with, any such loss, claim, damage, expense, liability, action,
investigation or proceeding. Notwithstanding the provisions of this Section 7, no Underwriter shall be required to contribute any amount in excess of the amount by which the total price at which the Stock underwritten by it and distributed to the public were offered to the public less the amount of any damages which such Underwriter has otherwise paid or become liable to pay by reason of any untrue or alleged untrue statement, omission or alleged omission, act or alleged act or failure to act or alleged failure to act. No person guilty of fraudulent misrepresentation (within the meaning of Section 11(f) of the Securities Act) shall be entitled to contribution from any person who was not guilty of such fraudulent misrepresentation. The Underwriters' obligations to contribute as provided in this Section 7 are several in proportion to their respective underwriting obligations and not joint.
8. The obligations of the Underwriters hereunder may be terminated by the Representatives, in their absolute discretion by notice given to the Company prior to delivery of and payment for the Firm Stock if, prior to that time, (i) any of the events described in Sections 6(l) or 6(n) have occurred, (ii) any of the events described in Section 6(o) have occurred, or (iii) if the Underwriters shall decline to purchase the Stock for any reason permitted under this Agreement.
T.
ERMINATION
9. . Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this Agreement, if (a) this Agreement shall have been terminated pursuant to Section 8(i) or 10 or (b) the Company shall fail to tender the Stock for delivery to the Underwriters for any reason not permitted under this Agreement, (c) the Underwriters shall decline for any reason to purchase the Stock for any reason permitted under this Agreement other than pursuant to Section 6(o) or (d) the sale of the Stock is not consummated because any condition to the obligations of the Underwriters set forth herein is not satisfied because of the refusal, inability or failure on the part of the Company to perform any agreement herein or to satisfy any condition or to comply with the provisions hereof, other than a refusal, inability or failure to perform or failure to satisfy any condition or comply with any provision hereof resulting solely from the occurrence of any of the events described in Section 6(o), then in addition to the payment of amounts in accordance with Section 5, the Company shall reimburse the Underwriters for the fees and expenses of Underwriters' counsel and for such other out-of-pocket expenses as shall have been reasonably incurred by them in connection with this Agreement and the proposed purchase of the Stock, including, without limitation, travel and lodging expenses of the Underwriters, and upon demand the Company shall pay the full amount thereof to the Representatives; that if this Agreement is terminated pursuant to Section 10 by reason of the default of one or more Underwriters, the Company shall not be obligated to reimburse any defaulting Underwriter on account of expenses to the extent incurred by such defaulting Underwriter that the foregoing shall not limit any reimbursement obligation of the Company to any non-defaulting Underwriter under this Section 9.
R U' E
EIMBURSEMENT
OF
NDERWRITERS
XPENSES
provided
provided further
10. . If any Underwriter or Underwriters shall default in its or their obligations to purchase shares of Stock hereunder on any Closing Date and the aggregate number of shares which such defaulting Underwriter or Underwriters agreed but failed to purchase does not exceed ten percent (10%) of the total number of shares to be purchased by all Underwriters on such Closing Date, the other Underwriters shall be obligated severally, in proportion to their respective commitments hereunder, to purchase the shares which such defaulting Underwriter or Underwriters agreed but failed to purchase on such Closing Date. If any Underwriter or Underwriters shall so default and the aggregate number of shares with respect to which such default or defaults occur is more than ten percent (10%) of the total number of shares to be purchased by all Underwriters on such Closing Date and arrangements satisfactory to the Representatives and the Company for the purchase of such shares by other persons are not made within forty-eight (48) hours after such default, this Agreement shall terminate.
S U
UBSTITUTION
OF
NDERWRITERS
If the remaining Underwriters or substituted Underwriters are required hereby or agree to take up all or part of the shares of Stock of a defaulting Underwriter or Underwriters on such Closing Date as provided in this Section 10, (i) the Company shall have the right to postpone such Closing Date for a period of not more than five (5) full business days in order that the Company may effect whatever changes may thereby be made necessary in the Registration Statements or the Prospectus, or in any other documents or arrangements, and the Company agrees promptly to file any amendments to the Registration Statements or supplements to the Prospectus which may thereby be made necessary, and (ii) the respective numbers of shares to be purchased by the remaining Underwriters or substituted Underwriters shall be taken as the basis of their underwriting obligation for all purposes of this Agreement. Nothing herein contained shall relieve any defaulting Underwriter of its liability to the Company or the other Underwriters for damages occasioned by its default hereunder. Any termination of this Agreement pursuant to
this Section 10 shall be without liability on the part of any non-defaulting Underwriter or the Company, except that the representations, warranties, covenants, indemnities, agreements and other statements set forth in Section 2, the obligations with respect to expenses to be paid or reimbursed pursuant to Sections 5 and 9 and the provisions of Section 7 and Sections 11 through 21, inclusive, shall not terminate and shall remain in full force and effect.
11The Company acknowledges and agrees that:
. A F R.
BSENCE
OF
IDUCIARY
ELATIONSHIP
(a) each Underwriter's responsibility to the Company is solely contractual in nature, the Representatives have been retained solely to act as underwriters in connection with the sale of the Stock and no fiduciary, advisory or agency relationship between the Company and the Representatives has been created in respect of any of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement, irrespective of whether any of the Representatives has advised or is advising the Company on other matters;
(b) the price of the Stock set forth in this Agreement was established by the Company following discussions and arms-length negotiations with the Representatives, and the Company is capable of evaluating and understanding, and understands and accepts, the terms, risks and conditions of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement;
(c) it has been advised that the Representatives and their affiliates are engaged in a broad range of transactions which may involve interests that differ from those of the Company and that the Representatives have no obligation to disclose such interests and transactions to the Company by virtue of any fiduciary, advisory or agency relationship; and
(d) it waives, to the fullest extent permitted by law, any claims it may have against the Representatives for breach of fiduciary duty or alleged breach of fiduciary duty and agrees that the Representatives shall have no liability (whether direct or indirect) to the Company in respect of such a fiduciary duty claim or to any person asserting a fiduciary duty claim on behalf of or in right of the Company, including stockholders, employees or creditors of the Company.
12. . This Agreement shall inure to the benefit of and be binding upon the several Underwriters, the Company and their respective successors and assigns. Nothing expressed or mentioned in this Agreement is intended or shall be construed to give any person, other than the persons mentioned in the preceding sentence, any legal or equitable right, remedy or claim under or in respect of this Agreement, or any provisions herein contained, this Agreement and all conditions and provisions hereof being intended to be and being for the sole and exclusive benefit of such persons and for the benefit of no other person; except that the representations, warranties, covenants, agreements and indemnities of the Company contained in this Agreement shall also be for the benefit of the Underwriter Indemnified Parties, and the indemnities of the several Underwriters shall be for the benefit of the Company Indemnified Parties. It is understood that each Underwriter's responsibility to the Company is solely contractual in nature and the Underwriters do not owe the Company, or any other party, any fiduciary duty as a result of this Agreement. No purchaser of any of the Stock from any Underwriter shall be deemed to be a successor or assign by reason merely of such purchase.
S; P E B A
UCCESSORS
ERSONS
NTITLED
TO
ENEFIT
OF
GREEMENT
13. . The respective indemnities, covenants, agreements, representations, warranties and other statements of the Company and the several Underwriters, as set forth in this Agreement or made by them respectively, pursuant to this Agreement, shall remain in full force and effect, regardless of any investigation made by or on behalf of any Underwriter, the Company or any person controlling any of them and shall survive delivery of and payment for the Stock. Notwithstanding any termination of this Agreement, including without limitation any termination pursuant to Section 8 or Section 10, the indemnities, covenants, agreements, representations, warranties and other statements forth in Sections 2, 5, 7 and 9 and Sections 12 through 21, inclusive, of this Agreement shall not terminate and shall remain in full force and effect at all times.
S I, R, W,
URVIVAL
OF
NDEMNITIES
EPRESENTATIONS
ARRANTIES
ETC
14. . All statements, requests, notices and agreements hereunder shall be in writing, and:
N
OTICES
(a) if to the Underwriters, shall be delivered or sent by mail, telex, facsimile transmission or email to (i) Cowen and Company, LLC, Attention: Head of Equity Capital Markets, Fax: 646-562-1249 with a copy to the General Counsel, Fax: 646-562-1861 and (ii) UBS Securities LLC, Attention: Chairman, US Equity Capital Markets, Fax 212-821-4607 with a copy to General Counsel, Fax: 212-821-3915; and
(b) if to the Company shall be delivered or sent by mail, telex, facsimile transmission or email to Natus Medical Incorporated, 1501 Industrial Road, San Carlos, CA 94070-4111, Attention: James B. Hawkins, Fax: (650) 802-0401, email jhawkins@natus.com with copies to Dan Winnike of Fenwick & West LLP, Fax: (650) 938-5200, email dwinnike@fenwick.com;
that any notice to an Underwriter pursuant to Section 7 shall be delivered or sent by mail, or facsimile transmission to such Underwriter at its address set forth in its acceptance telex to the Representatives, which address will be supplied to any other party hereto by the Representatives upon request. Any such statements, requests, notices or agreements shall take effect at the time of receipt thereof.
provided, however,
15. . For purposes of this Agreement, (a) "business day" means any day on which the New York Stock Exchange, Inc. is open for trading and (b) "subsidiary" has the meaning set forth in Rule 405 of the Rules and Regulations.
D C T
EFINITION
OF
ERTAIN
ERMS
16. The Company irrevocably (a) submits to the non-exclusive jurisdiction of the Federal and state courts in the Borough of Manhattan in The City of New York for the purpose of any suit, action or other proceeding arising out of this Agreement or the transactions contemplated by this Agreement, the Registration Statements and any Preliminary Prospectus or the Prospectus, (b) agrees that all claims in respect of any such suit, action or proceeding may be heard and determined by any such court, (c) waives to the fullest extent permitted by applicable law, any immunity from the jurisdiction of any such court or from any legal process, (d) agrees not to commence any such suit, action or proceeding other than in such courts, and (e) waives, to the fullest extent permitted by applicable law, any claim that any such suit, action or proceeding is brought in an inconvenient forum.
G L J
OVERNING
AW
AND
URISDICTION
.
This Agreement shall be governed by and construed in accordance with the laws of the State of New York, including without limitation Section 5-1401 of the New York General Obligations.
17. . The parties hereto acknowledge and agree that, for all purposes of this Agreement, the Underwriters' Information consists solely of the following information in the Prospectus: (i) the last paragraph on the front cover page concerning the terms of the offering by the Underwriters; and (ii) the statements concerning the Underwriters contained in the eighth paragraph of text (concerning the terms of the offering by the Underwriters), the ninth paragraph of text (concerning sales to discretionary accounts) and the thirteenth paragraph of text (concerning short sales, stabilizing transactions and purchases to cover positions created by short sales by the Underwriters) under the heading "Underwriting."
U' I
NDERWRITERS
NFORMATION
18. . In connection with this Agreement, you will act for and on behalf of the several Underwriters, and any action taken under this Agreement by the Representatives, will be binding on all the Underwriters.
A R
UTHORITY
OF
THE
EPRESENTATIVES
19. . The invalidity or unenforceability of any section, paragraph, clause or provision of this Agreement shall not affect the validity or enforceability of any other section, paragraph, clause or provision hereof. If any section, paragraph, clause or provision of this Agreement is for any reason determined to be invalid or unenforceable, there shall be deemed to be made such minor changes (and only such minor changes) as are necessary to make it valid and enforceable.
P U
ARTIAL
NENFORCEABILITY
20. . This Agreement constitutes the entire agreement of the parties to this Agreement and supersedes all prior written or oral and all contemporaneous oral agreements, understandings and negotiations with respect to the subject matter hereof. In this Agreement, the masculine, feminine and neuter genders and the singular and the plural include one another. The section headings in this Agreement are for the convenience of the parties only and will not affect the construction or interpretation of this Agreement. This Agreement may be amended or modified, and the observance of any term of this Agreement may be waived, only by a writing signed by the Company and the Representatives.
G
ENERAL
21. . This Agreement may be signed in any number of counterparts, each of which shall be an original, with the same effect as if the signatures thereto and hereto were upon the same instrument.
C
OUNTERPARTS
If the foregoing is in accordance with your understanding of the agreement between the Company and the several Underwriters, kindly indicate your acceptance in the space provided for that purpose below.
 
 

Exhibit 5.01
Natus Medical Incorporated
1501 Industrial Road
San Carlos, CA 94070
Ladies and Gentlemen:
At your request, we have examined the Registration Statement on Form S-3 (File Number 333-150503) (the "") filed by Natus Medical Incorporated, a Delaware corporation (the ""), with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the "") on April 29, 2008, as amended on May 13, 2008, as subsequently supplemented by the preliminary prospectus supplement and the prospectus supplement applicable to the Offering (as defined below), in connection with the registration under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, of the proposed issuance and sale, from time to time, by the Company of shares of its common stock having a maximum aggregate public offering price of One Hundred Fifty Million Dollars ($150,000,000) (the "").
Registration Statement
Company
Commission
Stock
The Company currently proposes to sell an aggregate of up to 4,600,000 shares (the "") of the Company's common stock, par value of $0.001 per share (the ""), under the Registration Statement (the ""), all of which will be sold pursuant to that certain Underwriting Agreement (the "") dated May 22, 2008, by and among the Company and Cowen and Company, LLC and UBS Securities LLC, as representatives of the several underwriters named on Schedule A to the Underwriting Agreement (the "").
Takedown Shares
Common Stock
Offering
Underwriting Agreement
Underwriters
In rendering this opinion, we have examined such matters of fact as we have deemed necessary in order to render the opinion set forth herein, which included examination of the following:
 
 
 
 
Natus Medical Incorporated
May 23, 2008
Page 2 of 4
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
In our examination of documents for purposes of this opinion, we have assumed, and express no opinion as to, the authenticity and completeness of all documents submitted to us as originals, the genuineness of all signatures on original documents, the conformity to originals and completeness of all documents submitted to us as copies, the legal capacity of all persons or entities executing the same, the lack of any undisclosed termination, modification, waiver or amendment to any documents reviewed by us, and the due authorization, execution and delivery of all documents where authorization, due execution and delivery are prerequisites to the effectiveness thereof. We have also assumed that, if and to the extent that the Takedown Shares are issued in certificated form, the certificates representing the Takedown Shares will be, when issued, in the form of the certificate reviewed by us and properly signed by authorized officers of the Company or their agents.
As to matters of fact relevant to this opinion, we have relied solely upon our examination of the documents referred to above and have assumed the current accuracy and completeness of the information included in the documents referred to above and the representations and warranties made by representatives of the Company to us, including but not limited to those set forth in the
Natus Medical Incorporated
May 23, 2008
Page 3 of 4
 
Management Certificate. We have made no independent investigation or other attempt to verify the accuracy of any of such information or to determine the existence or non-existence of any other factual matters; however, we are not aware of any facts that would cause us to believe that the opinion expressed herein is not accurate.
In connection with our opinion expressed below, we have assumed that, at or prior to the time of the delivery of any of the Takedown Shares, there will not have occurred any change in law affecting the validity of the Takedown Shares.
This opinion is limited to such California State and United States of America federal laws or statutes, the General Corporation Law of the State of Delaware as in effect on the date hereof, rules or regulations of any California State and United States of America federal courts or arbitrators or governmental or regulatory authorities, or consents, approvals, authorizations, orders, registrations or qualifications of or with any United States federal or California State court, arbitrator, administrative agency or governmental or regulatory authority, as in our experience are generally applied to transactions of the type provided for in the Underwriting Agreement. We express no opinion herein with respect to any other laws or to the application of the laws of any other jurisdiction. Additionally, we disclaim any opinion as to the application of any law of any city, county or other local subdivision of the States of California and Delaware. We have made no inquiry into, and express no opinion with respect to, any statutes, rules, regulations, treaties or common laws of any other nation, state or jurisdiction, or the effect on the transactions provided for in the Underwriting Agreement of non-compliance under any such statutes, rules, regulations, treaties or common law. The opinions expressed herein are qualified by, and are subject to, and we express no opinion with respect to, compliance by the Company or the Underwriters with any state or foreign "blue sky" statute, rule or regulation in connection with the issuance and sale of the Takedown Shares pursuant to the Underwriting Agreement.
Based upon the foregoing, it is our opinion that the Takedown Shares, when issued, sold and delivered in the manner and for the consideration stated in the Registration Statement, the Preliminary Prospectus and the Prospectus, and pursuant to the terms of the Underwriting Agreement, will be validly issued, fully paid and nonassessable.
We consent to the use of this opinion as an exhibit to the Form 8-K and further consent to all references to us, if any, in the Registration Statement, the Preliminary Prospectus and the Prospectus constituting a part thereof and any amendments thereto. This opinion is intended solely for use in connection with the issuance and sale of Takedown Shares subject to the Registration Statement and is not to be relied upon for any other purpose. This opinion speaks as of the date first above written, and we assume no obligation to advise you of any fact, circumstance, event or change in the law or the facts that may hereafter be brought to our attention whether or not such occurrence would affect or modify the opinions expressed herein.

Exhibit 99.01
Natus Medical Announces Pricing of Public Offering
(Nasdaq: BABY), a leading provider of medical devices for the newborn care, hearing and neurology markets, today announced the pricing of its public offering of 4,000,000 shares of its common stock at $19.50 per share. All of the shares are being offered by Natus. Natus has granted the underwriters a 30-day option to purchase up to an additional 600,000 shares of its common stock to cover over-allotments, if any. The offering is expected to close on May 29, 2008, subject to the satisfaction of customary closing conditions.
SAN CARLOS, Calif. (May 23, 2008)  Natus Medical Incorporated
Cowen and Company, LLC and UBS Investment Bank are acting as joint bookrunning managers for the offering and Natixis Bleichroeder Inc., Needham & Company, LLC, Raymond James & Associates, Inc. and Roth Capital Partners, LLC are acting as co-managers. Information about the offering is available in the prospectus supplement and accompanying prospectus for the offering filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
The offering is being made solely by means of a written prospectus supplement and accompanying prospectus. The securities may not be sold nor may offers to buy be accepted prior to the time that the prospectus supplement is final. This press release shall not constitute an offer to sell, or the solicitation of an offer to buy, nor shall there be any sale of these securities in any state or jurisdiction in which such offer, solicitation, or sale would be unlawful prior to registration or qualification under securities laws of any such state or jurisdiction. Printed copies of the prospectus supplement relating to the offering may be obtained by contacting Cowen and Company, LLC, c/o Broadridge Financial Solutions, 1155 Long Island Avenue, Edgewood, NY 11717, Attention: Prospectus Department, or UBS Investment Bank, Prospectus Department, 299 Park Avenue, New York, NY 10171.
This press release contains forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, including statements regarding the expected closing date of the proposed offering described above. These statements relate to future events and involve known and unknown risks, uncertainties and other factors that may cause actual results to differ materially from those expressed or implied by the forward-looking statements. Actual results could differ materially due to a number of factors, including general political, economic and market conditions and events, developments in our business and other risks described in our quarterly report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2008. Natus disclaims any obligation to update information contained in any forward-looking statement.
COMPANY CONTACT:
Natus Medical Incorporated
Steven J. Murphy, (650) 802-0400
Chief Financial Officer
InvestorRelations@Natus.com


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BABY/BABY-8K-20080618162348.txt.gz
TIME:20080618162348
EVENTS:	Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On December 21, 2007, Natus Medical Incorporated (the "Company") filed a Current Report on Form 8-K to, among other things, report that the Board of Directors of the Company had approved an amendment to the Company's Bylaws. The Bylaws filed with the Current Report on Form 8-K were those in effect prior to the amendment being reported. This Form 8-K/A is being filed to provide the correct form of the Company's Bylaws, as amended. The amended Bylaws are attached as Exhibit 3.1 to this Form 8- K/A.
 
On December 19, 2007, the Board of Directors (the "Board") of the Company approved an amendment to the Company's Bylaws to be effective immediately. The amendment, which consolidated Article 6, Sections 6.1 and 6.2 into an amended section 6.1, and renumbered Sections 6.3, 6.4 and 6.5 as Sections 6.2, 6.3 and 6.4, respectively, provides that (i) the Board may provide that some or all of the Company's stock shall be evidenced by uncertificated shares and (ii) any resolution by the Board providing for uncertificated shares will not apply to shares represented by a certificate until the certificate is surrendered to the Company, and also makes related changes.
A copy of the amended Bylaws are attached as Exhibit 3.1 to this Current Report.
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 3.1
Section 1.1. . The registered office of the Corporation which is required by the state of Delaware to be maintained in the state of Delaware shall be the registered office named in the charter documents of the Corporation, or such other office as may be designated from time to time by the Board of Directors in the manner provided by law.
Registered Office
Section 1.2. . The Corporation may also have offices at such other places both within and without the state of Delaware as the Board of Directors may from time to time determine or the business of the Corporation may require.
Other Offices
Section 2.1. Place of Meetings. All meetings of the stockholders shall be held at the principal office of the Corporation, or at such other place within or without the state of Delaware as shall be specified or fixed in the notices or waivers of notice thereof.
Section 2.2. Quorum; Adjournment of Meetings. Unless otherwise required by law or provided in the charter documents of the Corporation or these Bylaws, (i) the holders of a majority of the stock issued and outstanding and entitled to vote thereat, present in person or represented by proxy, shall constitute a quorum at any meeting of stockholders for the transaction of business, (ii) in all matters other than election of directors, the affirmative vote of the holders of a majority of such stock so present or represented at any meeting of stockholders at which a quorum is present shall constitute the act of the stockholders, and (iii) where a separate vote by a class or classes is required, a majority of the outstanding shares of such class or classes, present in person or represented by proxy shall constitute a quorum entitled to take action with respect to that vote on that matter and the affirmative vote of the majority of the shares of such class or classes present in person or represented by proxy at the meeting shall be the act of such class. The stockholders present at a duly organized meeting may continue to transact business until adjournment, notwithstanding the withdrawal of enough stockholders to leave less than a quorum, subject to the provisions of clauses (ii) and (iii) above. Directors shall be elected by a plurality of the votes of the shares present in person or represented by proxy at the meeting and entitled to vote on the election of directors.
Notwithstanding the other provisions of the charter documents of the Corporation or these Bylaws, the chairman of the meeting or the holders of a majority of the issued and outstanding stock, present in person or represented by proxy and entitled to vote thereat, at any meeting of stockholders, whether or not a quorum is present, shall have the power to adjourn such meeting from time to time, without any notice other than announcement at the meeting of the time and place of the holding of the adjourned meeting. If the adjournment is for more than thirty (30) days, or if after the adjournment a new record date is fixed for the adjourned meeting, a notice of the adjourned meeting shall be given to each stockholder of record entitled to vote at such meeting. At such adjourned meeting at which a quorum shall be present or represented any business may be transacted which might have been transacted at the meeting as originally called.
Section 2.3. Annual Meeting. (a) An annual meeting of the stockholders, for the election of directors to succeed those whose terms expire and for the transaction of such other business as may properly come before the meeting, shall be held at such place (within or without the state of Delaware), on such date, and at such time as the Board of Directors shall fix and set forth in the notice of the meeting, which date shall be within thirteen (13) months subsequent to the last annual meeting of stockholders.
(b) At an annual meeting of stockholders, only such business shall be conducted as shall have been properly brought before the meeting. To be properly brought before an annual meeting, business must be: (A) specified in the notice of meeting (or any supplement thereto) given by or at the direction of the Board of Directors, (B) otherwise properly brought before the meeting by or at the direction of the Board of Directors, or (C) otherwise properly brought before the meeting by a stockholder. For business to be properly brought before an annual meeting by a stockholder, the stockholder must have given timely notice thereof in writing to the Secretary of the Corporation. To be timely, a stockholder's notice must be delivered to or mailed and received at the principal executive offices of the Corporation not less than sixty (60) calendar days in advance of the date specified in the Corporation's proxy statement released to stockholders in connection with the previous year's annual meeting of stockholders; provided, however, that in the event that no annual meeting was held in the previous year or the date of the annual meeting has been changed by more than thirty (30) days from the date contemplated at the time of the previous year's proxy statement, notice by the stockholder to be timely must be so received a reasonable time before the solicitation is made. A stockholder's notice to the Secretary shall set forth as to each matter the stockholder proposes to bring before the annual meeting: (i) a brief description of the business desired to be brought before the annual meeting and the reasons for conducting such business at the annual meeting, (ii) the name and address, as they appear on the Corporation's books, of the stockholder proposing such business, (iii) the class and number of shares of the Corporation which are beneficially owned by the stockholder, (iv) any material interest of the stockholder in such business and (v) any other information that is required to be provided by the stockholder pursuant to Regulation 14A under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (the "1934 Act"), in his capacity as a proponent to a stockholder proposal. Notwithstanding the foregoing, in order to include information with respect to a stockholder proposal in the proxy statement and form of proxy for a stockholder's meeting, stockholders must provide notice as required by the regulations promulgated under the 1934 Act. Notwithstanding anything in these Bylaws to the contrary, no business shall be conducted at any annual meeting except in accordance with the procedures set forth in this paragraph (b). The chairman of the annual meeting shall, if the facts warrant, determine and declare at the meeting that business was not properly brought before the meeting and in accordance with the provisions of this paragraph (b), and, if he should so determine, he shall so declare at the meeting that any such business not properly brought before the meeting shall not be transacted.
(c) Only persons who are nominated in accordance with the procedures set forth in this paragraph (c) shall be eligible for election as Directors. Nominations of persons for election to the Board of Directors of the Corporation may be made at a meeting of stockholders by or at the direction of the Board of Directors or by any stockholder of the Corporation entitled to vote in the election of Directors at the meeting who complies with the notice procedures set forth in this paragraph (c). Such nominations, other than those made by or at the direction of the Board of Directors, shall be made pursuant to timely notice in writing to the Secretary of the Corporation in accordance with the provisions of paragraph (b) of this Section 2.2. Such stockholder's notice shall set forth (i) as to each person, if any, whom the stockholder proposes to nominate for election or re-election as a Director: (A) the name, age, business address and residence address of such person, (B) the principal occupation or employment of such person, (C) the class and number of shares of the Corporation which are beneficially owned by such person, (D) a description of all arrangements or understandings between the stockholder and each nominee and any other person or persons (naming such person or persons) pursuant to which the nominations are to be made by the stockholder, and (E) any other information relating to such person that is required to be disclosed in solicitations of proxies for elections of Directors, or is otherwise required, in each case pursuant to Regulation 14A under the 1934 Act (including without limitation such person's written consent to being named in the proxy statement, if any, as a nominee and to serving as a Director if elected); and (ii) as to such stockholder giving notice, the information required to be provided pursuant to paragraph (b) of this Section 2.2. At the request of the Board of Directors, any person nominated by a stockholder for election as a Director shall furnish to the Secretary of the Corporation that information required to be set forth in the stockholder's notice of nomination, which pertains to the nominee. No person shall be eligible for election as a Director of the Corporation unless nominated in accordance with the procedures set forth in this paragraph (c). The chairman of the meeting shall, if the facts warrants, determine and declare at the meeting that a nomination was not made in accordance with the procedures prescribed by these Bylaws, and if he should so determine, he shall so declare at the meeting, and the defective nomination shall be disregarded.
Section 2.4. Special Meetings. Special meetings of stockholders may be called at any time by a majority of the Board of Directors, by the Chairman of the Board, the Chief Executive Officer or by the holders of at least 10% of the shares of the Corporation's capital stock entitled to vote at such meeting, but such special meetings may not be called by any other person or persons; provided, however, that effective upon closing of the Corporation's initial public offering pursuant to an effective registration statement under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, covering the offer and sale of shares of its Common Stock for the account of the Corporation to the public (the "IPO") and the Corporation is no longer subject to Section 2115 of the California Corporation Code, special meetings of stockholders may be called at any time by a majority of the Board of Directors, by the Chairman of the Board, by the Chief Executive Officer or by the holders of at least 30% of the shares of the Corporation's capital stock entitled to vote at such meeting, but such special meetings may not be called by any other person or persons.
Section 2.5. Record Date. For the purpose of determining stockholders entitled to notice of or to vote at any meeting of stockholders, or any adjournment thereof, or entitled to receive payment of any dividend or other distribution or allotment of any rights, or entitled to exercise any rights in respect of any change, conversion or exchange of stock or for the purpose of any other lawful action, the Board of Directors of the Corporation may fix a date as the record date for any such of stockholders, which record date shall not precede the date on which the resolutions fixing the record date are adopted and which record date shall not be more than sixty (60) days nor less than ten (10) days before the date of such meeting of stockholders, nor more than sixty (60) days prior to any other action to which such record date relates.
If the Board of Directors does not fix a record date for any meeting of the stockholders, the record date for determining stockholders entitled to notice of or to vote at such meeting shall be at the close of business on the day next preceding the day on which notice is given, or, in accordance with Article 7, Section 7.3 of these Bylaws notice is waived, at the close of business on the day next preceding the day on which the meeting is held. The record date for determining stockholders for any other purpose (other than the consenting to corporate action in writing without a meeting) shall be at the close of business on the day on which the Board of Directors adopts the resolution relating thereto. A determination of stockholders of record entitled to notice of or to vote at a meeting of stockholders shall apply to any adjournment of the meeting; provided, however, that the Board of Directors may fix a new record date for the adjourned meeting.
For the purpose of determining the stockholders entitled to consent to corporate action in writing without a meeting, the Board of Directors may fix a record date, which record date shall not precede the date upon which the resolution fixing the record date is adopted by the Board of Directors, and which date shall not be more than ten (10) days after the date upon which the resolution fixing the record date is adopted by the Board of Directors. If the Board of Directors does not fix the record date, the record date for determining stockholders entitled to consent to corporate action in writing without a meeting, when no prior action by the Board of Directors is necessary, shall be the first date on which a signed written consent setting forth the action taken or proposed to be taken is delivered to the Corporation at its registered office in the state of incorporation of the Corporation or at its principal place of business. If the Board of Directors does not fix the record date, and prior action by the Board of Directors is necessary, the record date for determining stockholders entitled to consent to corporate action in writing without a meeting shall be at the close of business on the day on which the Board of Directors adopts the resolution taking such prior action.
Section 2.6. Notice of Meetings. Written notice of the place, date and hour of all meetings, and, in case of a special meeting, the purpose or purposes for which the meeting is called, shall be given by or at the direction of the President, the Secretary or the other person(s) calling the meeting to each stockholder entitled to vote thereat not less than ten (10) nor more than sixty (60) days before the date of the meeting. Such notice may be delivered either personally or by mail.
If mailed, notice is given when deposited in the United States mail, postage prepaid, directed to the stockholder at such stockholder's address as it appears on the records of the Corporation.
Section 2.7. Stockholder List. A complete list of stockholders entitled to vote at any meeting of stockholders, arranged in alphabetical order for each class of stock and showing the address of each such stockholder and the number of shares registered in the name of such stockholder, shall be open to the examination of any stockholder, for any purpose germane to the meeting, during ordinary business hours, for a period of at least ten (10) days prior to the meeting, either at a place within the city where the meeting is to be held, which place shall be specified in the notice of the meeting, or, if not so specified, at the place where the meeting is to be held. The stockholder list shall also be produced and kept at the time and place of the meeting during the whole time thereof, and may be inspected by any stockholder who is present.
Section 2.8. Proxies. Each stockholder entitled to vote at a meeting of stockholders or to express consent or dissent to a corporate action in writing without a meeting may authorize another person or persons to act for him by proxy. Proxies for use at any meeting of stockholders shall be filed with the Secretary, or such other officer as the Board of Directors may from time to time determine by resolution, before or at the time of the meeting. All proxies shall be received and taken charge of and all ballots shall be received and canvassed by the secretary of the meeting, who shall decide all questions touching upon the qualification of voters, the validity of the proxies, and the acceptance or rejection of votes, unless an inspector or inspectors shall have been appointed by the chairman of the meeting, in which event such inspector or inspectors shall decide all such questions.
No proxy shall be valid after three (3) years from its date, unless the proxy provides for a longer period. Each proxy shall be revocable unless expressly provided therein to be irrevocable and coupled with an interest sufficient in law to support an irrevocable power.
Should a proxy designate two or more persons to act as proxies, unless such instrument shall provide the contrary, a majority of such persons present at any meeting at which their powers thereunder are to be exercised shall have and may exercise all the powers of voting or giving consents thereby conferred, or if only one be present, then such powers may be exercised by that one; or, if an even number attend and a majority do not agree on any particular issue, each proxy so attending shall be entitled to exercise such powers in respect of such portion of the shares as is equal to the reciprocal of the fraction equal to the number of proxies representing such shares divided by the total number of shares represented by such proxies.
Section 2.9. Voting; Election; Inspectors. Unless otherwise required by law or provided for in the charter documents of the Corporation, each stockholder shall on each matter submitted to a vote at a meeting of stockholders have one vote for each share of the stock entitled to vote which is registered in his name on the record date for the meeting. For the purposes hereof, each election to fill a directorship shall constitute a separate matter. Shares registered in the name of another corporation, domestic or foreign, may be voted by such officer, agent or proxy as the bylaws (or comparable body) of such corporation may determine. Shares registered in the name of a deceased person may be voted by the executor or administrator of such person's estate, either in person or by proxy.
All voting, except as required by the charter documents of the Corporation or where otherwise required by law, may be by a voice vote; provided, however, upon request of the chairman of the meeting or upon demand therefor by stockholders holding a majority of the issued and outstanding stock present in person or by proxy at any meeting a stock vote shall be taken. Every stock vote shall be taken by written ballots, each of which shall state the name of the stockholder or proxy voting and such other information as may be required under the procedure established for the meeting. The directors of the Corporation need not be elected by written ballot unless a stockholder demands election by written ballot at the meeting and before voting begins, or unless the Bylaws so provide.
At any meeting at which a vote is taken by written ballots, the chairman of the meeting may appoint one or more inspectors; each of whom shall subscribe an oath or affirmation to execute faithfully the duties of inspector at such meeting with strict impartiality and according to the best of such inspector's ability. Such inspector shall receive the written ballots, count the votes, and make and sign a certificate of the result thereof. The chairman of the meeting may appoint any person to serve as inspector, except no candidate for the office of director shall be appointed as an inspector.
Each holder of voting stock or of any class or series thereof shall be entitled to cumulative voting rights as to the directors to be elected by each series or class or the combined classes in accordance with the provisions of Section 214 of the Delaware General Corporation Law.
Section 2.10. Conduct of Meetings. The meetings of the stockholders shall be presided over by the President, or, if the President is not present, by a chairman elected at the meeting. The Secretary of the Corporation, if present, shall act as secretary of such meetings, or, if the Secretary is not present, an Assistant Secretary shall so act; if neither the Secretary of or Assistant Secretary is present, then a secretary shall be appointed by the chairman of the meeting.
The chairman of any meeting of stockholders shall determine the order of business and the procedure at the meeting, including such regulation of the manner of voting and the conduct of discussion as seem to the chairman in order.
Section 2.11. Treasury Stock. The Corporation shall not vote, directly or indirectly, shares of its own stock owned by it and such shares shall not be counted for quorum purposes. Nothing in this Section 2.11 shall be construed as limiting the right of the Corporation to vote stock, including but not limited to its own stock, held by it in a fiduciary capacity.
Section 2.12. Action Without Meeting. Unless otherwise provided in the Certificate of Incorporation, any action which may be taken at any annual or special meeting of stockholders may be taken without a meeting and without prior notice, if a consent in writing, setting forth the action so taken, is signed by the holders of outstanding shares having not less than the minimum number of votes that would be necessary to authorize or take that action at a meeting at which all shares entitled to vote on that action were present and voted.
Prompt notice of the taking of the corporate action without a meeting by less than unanimous written consent shall be given to those stockholders who have not consented in writing. If the action which is consented to is such as would have required the filing of a certificate under any section of the General Corporation Law of Delaware if such action had been voted on by stockholders at a meeting thereof, then the certificate filed under such section shall state, in lieu of any statement required by such section concerning any vote of stockholders, that written notice and written consent have been given as provided in Section 228 of the General Corporation Law of Delaware.
Effective upon the closing of the Corporation's IPO and the date that the Corporation is no longer subject to Section 2115 of the California Corporations Code, no action of stockholders shall be taken by the stockholders except at an annual or special meeting of stockholders called in accordance with the notice requirements of Section 2.6 above and no action of the stockholders shall be taken by written consent.
Section 3.1. Power; Number; Term of Office. The business and affairs of the Corporation shall be managed by or under the direction of the Board of Directors, and, subject to the restrictions imposed by law or the charter documents of the Corporation, the Board of Directors may exercise all the powers of the Corporation.
Notwithstanding anything contained in these Bylaws to the contrary, at any time that a valid agreement among the stockholders is in force with respect to the nomination, election and removal of directors or similar matters, such agreement is hereby recognized and directors shall be nominated, elected and removed in accordance therewith.
The number of directors which shall constitute the whole Board of Directors shall be determined from time to time by the Board of Directors (provided that no decrease in the number of directors which would have the effect of shortening the term of an incumbent director may be made by the Board of Directors). Each director shall hold office for the term for which such director is elected, and until such director's successor shall have been elected and qualified or until such director's earlier death, resignation or removal.
Unless otherwise provided in the charter documents of the Corporation, directors need not be stockholders nor resident of the state of Delaware.
Section 3.2. Classes of Directors. Effective upon the closing of the Corporation's IPO and the date that the Corporation is no longer subject to Section 2115 of the California Corporations Code, the Directors shall be divided into three classes designated as Class I, Class II and Class III, respectively. Directors shall be assigned to each class in accordance with a resolution or resolutions adopted by the Board of Directors. At the first annual meeting of stockholders following the closing of the IPO, the term of office of the Class I Directors shall expire and Class I Directors shall be elected for a full term of three years. At the second annual meeting of stockholders following the closing of the IPO, the term of office of the Class II Directors shall expire and Class II Directors shall be elected for a full term of three years. At the third annual meeting of stockholders following the closing of the Initial Public Offering, the term of office of the Class III Directors shall expire and Class III Directors shall be elected for a full term of three years. At each succeeding annual meeting of stockholders, Directors shall be elected for a full term of three years to succeed the Directors of the class whose terms expire at such annual meeting.
Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions of this Article, each Director shall serve until his successor is duly elected and qualified or until his earlier death, resignation or removal. No decrease in the number of Directors constituting the Board of Directors shall shorten the term of any incumbent Director.
Section 3.3. Quorum; Voting. Unless otherwise provided in the charter documents of the Corporation, a majority of the number of directors then in office shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business of the Board of Directors and the vote of a majority of the directors present at a meeting at which a quorum is present shall be the act of the Board of Directors.
Section 3.4. Place of Meetings; Order of Business. The directors may hold their meetings and may have an office and keep the books of the Corporation, except as otherwise provided by law, in such place or places, within or without the state of incorporation of the Corporation, as the Board of Directors may from time to time determine. At all meetings of the Board of Directors business shall be transacted in such order as shall from time to time be determined by the President or by the Board of Directors.
Section 3.5. First Meeting. Each newly elected Board of Directors may hold its first meeting for the purpose of organization and the transaction of business, if a quorum is present, immediately after and at the same place as the annual meeting of the stockholders. Notice of such meeting shall not be required. At the first meeting of the Board of Directors in each year at which a quorum shall be present, held after the annual meeting of stockholders, the Board of Directors shall elect the officers of the Corporation.
Section 3.6. Regular Meetings. Regular meetings of the Board of Directors shall be held at such times and places as shall be designated from time to time by the President, or in the President's absence, by another officer of the Corporation. Notice of such regular meetings shall not be required.
Section 3.7. Special Meetings. Special meetings of the Board of Directors may be called by the President, or on the written request of any director, by the Secretary, in each case on at least twenty-four (24) hours' personal, written, telegraphic, cable or wireless notice to each director. Such notice, or any waiver thereof pursuant to Article 7, Section 7.3 hereof, need not state the purpose or purposes of such meeting, except as may otherwise be required by law or provided for in the charter documents of the Corporation or these Bylaws. Meetings may be held at any time without notice if all the directors are present or if those not present waive notice of the meeting in writing.
Section 3.8. Removal. Any director or the entire Board of Directors may be removed as set forth in the Certificate of Incorporation of the Corporation, as amended from time to time.
Section 3.9. Vacancies; Increases in the Number of Directors. Any director may resign effective on giving written notice to the chairman of the board, the president, the secretary or the board of directors, unless the notice specifies a later time for that resignation to become effective. If the resignation of a director is effective at a future time, the board of directors may elect a successor to take office when the resignation becomes effective.
Unless otherwise provided in the Certificate of Incorporation or these bylaws, vacancies in the board of directors may be filled by a majority of the remaining directors, even if less than a quorum, or by a sole remaining director; however, a vacancy created by the removal of a director by the vote or written consent of the stockholders or by court order may be filled only by the affirmative vote of a majority of the shares represented and voting at a duly held meeting at which a quorum is present (which shares voting affirmatively also constitute a majority of the required quorum), or by the unanimous written consent of all shares entitled to vote thereon. Each director so elected shall hold office until the next annual meeting of the stockholders and until a successor has been elected and qualified. Notwithstanding the foregoing, however, effective upon the closing of the Corporation's IPO and the date that the Corporation is no longer subject to Section 2115 of the California Corporations Code, the number of directors which shall constitute the whole Board of Directors shall be fixed exclusively by one or more resolutions adopted from time to time by the Board of Directors.
Unless otherwise provided in the Certificate of Incorporation or these bylaws:
(i) Vacancies and newly created directorships resulting from any increase in the authorized number of directors elected by all of the stockholders having the right to vote as a single class may be filled by a majority of the directors then in office, although less than a quorum, or by a sole remaining director.
(ii) Whenever the holders of any class or classes of stock or series thereof are entitled to elect one or more directors by the provisions of the certificate of incorporation, vacancies and newly created directorships of such class or classes or series may be filled by a majority of the directors elected by such class or classes or series thereof then in office, or by a sole remaining director so elected.
If at any time, by reason of death or resignation or other cause, the Corporation should have no directors in office, then any officer or any stockholder or an executor, administrator, trustee or guardian of a stockholder, or other fiduciary entrusted with like responsibility for the person or estate of a stockholder, may call a special meeting of stockholders in accordance with the provisions of the certificate of incorporation or these bylaws, or may apply to the Court of Chancery for a decree summarily ordering an election as provided in Section 211 of the General Corporation Law of Delaware.
If, at the time of filling any vacancy or any newly created directorship, the directors then in office constitute less than a majority of the whole board (as constituted immediately prior to any such increase), then the Court of Chancery may, upon application of any stockholder or stockholders holding at least ten (10) percent of the total number of the shares at the time outstanding having the right to vote for such directors, summarily order an election to be held to fill any such vacancies or newly created directorships, or to replace the directors chosen by the directors then in office as aforesaid, which election shall be governed by the provisions of Section 211 of the General Corporation Law of Delaware as far as applicable.
Section 3.10. Compensation. Directors and members of standing committees may receive such compensation as the Board of Directors from time to time shall determine to be appropriate, and shall be reimbursed for all reasonable expenses incurred in attending and returning from meetings of the board of Directors.
Section 3.11. Action Without a Meeting: Telephone Conference Meeting. Unless otherwise restricted by the charter documents of the Corporation, any action required or permitted to be taken at any of the Board of Directors or any committee designated by the Board of Directors may be taken without a meeting if all members of the Board of Directors or committee, as the case may be, consent thereto in writing, and the writing or writings are filed with the minutes of proceedings of the Board of Directors or committee. Such consent shall have the same force and effect as a unanimous vote at a meeting, and may be stated as such in any document or instrument filed with the Secretary of State of the state of incorporation of the Corporation.
Unless otherwise restricted by the charter documents of the Corporation, subject to the requirement for notice of meetings, members of the Board of Directors, or members of any committee designated by the Board of Directors, may participate in a meeting of such Board of Directors or committee, as the case may be, by means of a conference telephone connection or similar communications equipment by means of which all persons participating in the meeting can hear each other, and participation in such a meeting shall constitute presence in person at such meeting, except where a person participates in the meeting for the express purpose of objecting to the transaction of any business on the ground that the meeting is not lawfully called or convened.
Section 3.12. Approval or Ratification of Acts or Contracts by Stockholders. The Board of Directors in its discretion may submit any act or contract for approval or ratification at any annual meeting of the stockholders, or at any special meeting of the stockholders called for the purpose of considering any such act or contract, and any act or contract that shall be approved or be ratified by the vote of the stockholders holding a majority of the issued and outstanding shares of stock of the Corporation entitled to vote and present in person or by proxy at such meeting (provided that a quorum is present) shall be as valid and as binding upon the Corporation and upon all the stockholders as if it has been approved or ratified by every stockholder of the Corporation. In addition, any such act or contract may be approved or ratified by the written consent of stockholders holding a majority of the issued and outstanding shares of capital stock of the Corporation entitled to vote, and such consent shall be as valid and binding upon the Corporation and upon all the stockholders as if it had been approved or ratified by every stockholder of the Corporation.
Section 4.1. Designation; Powers. The Board of Directors may, by resolution passed by a majority of the board, designate one or more committees, including, if they shall so determine, an executive committee and a compensation committee, with each such committee to consist of one or more of the directors of the Corporation. Any such designated committee shall have and may exercise such of the powers and authority of the Board of Directors in the management of the business and affairs of the Corporation as may be provided in such resolution, except that no such committee shall have the power or authority of the Board of Directors in reference of amending the charter documents of the Corporation, adopting an agreement of merger or consolidation, recommending to the stockholders the sale, lease or exchange of all or substantially all of the Corporation's property and assets, recommending to the stockholders a dissolution of the Corporation or a revocation of a dissolution of the Corporation, or amending, altering or repealing these Bylaws or adopting new bylaws for the Corporation. Any such designated committee may authorize the seal of the Corporation to be affixed to all papers, which may require it. In addition to the above, such committee or committees shall have such other powers and limitations of authority as may be determined from time to time by the Board of Directors.
Section 4.2. Procedure; Meetings; Quorum. Any committee designated pursuant to this Article 4 shall keep regular minutes of its actions and proceedings in a book provided for that purpose and report the same to the Board of Directors at its meeting next succeeding such action, shall fix its own rules or procedures, and shall meet at such times and at such place or places as may be provided by such rules, or by such committee or the board of Directors. Should a committee fail to fix its own rules, the provisions of these Bylaws, pertaining to the calling of meetings and conduct of business by the Board of Directors, shall apply as nearly as may be possible. At every meeting of any such committee, the presence of a majority of all the members thereof shall constitute a quorum, except as provided in Section 4.3 of this Article 4 and the affirmative vote of a majority of the members present shall be necessary for the adoption by it of any resolution.
Section 4.3. Substitution and Removal of Members: Vacancies. The Board of Directors may designate one or more directors as alternate members of any committee, who may replace any absent or disqualified member at any meeting of such committee. In the absence or disqualification of a member of a committee, the member or members present at any meeting and not disqualified from voting, whether or not constituting a quorum, may unanimously appoint another member of the Board of Directors to act at the meeting in the place of the absent or disqualified member. The Board of Directors shall have the power at any time to remove any member(s) of a committee and to appoint other directors in lieu of the person(s) so removed and shall also have the power to fill vacancies in a committee.
Section 5.1. Number, Titles, and Term of Office. The officers of the Corporation shall be a President, Treasurer, a Secretary, and such other officers as the Board of Directors may from time to time elect or appoint (including, but not limited to, a Chairman of the Board, and or more Vice Presidents, (anyone or more of whom may be designated Executive Vice President or Senior Vice President) Vice Chairman of the Board, one or more Assistant Secretaries and one or more Assistant Treasurers). Each officer shall hold office until such officer's successor shall be duly elected and shall qualify or until such officer's death or until such officer shall resign or shall have been removed. Any number of offices may be held by the same person, unless the Articles of Incorporation of the Corporation provide otherwise. Except for the Chairman of the Board and the Vice Chairman of the Board, no officer need be a director.
Section 5.2. Powers and Duties of the President. The President shall be the chief executive officer of the Corporation. Subject to the control of the Board of Directors and the Executive Committee (if any), the President shall have general executive charge, management and control of the properties, business and operations of the Corporation with all such powers as may be reasonably incident to such responsibilities; may agree upon and execute all leases, contracts, evidences of indebtedness and other obligations in the name of the Corporation and may sign all certificates for shares of capital stock of the Corporation; and shall have such other powers and duties as designated in accordance with these Bylaws and as from time to time may be assigned to the President by the Board of Directors. The President shall preside at all meetings of the stockholders and of the Board of Directors.
Section 5.3. Vice Presidents. Each Vice President shall at all times possess power to sign all certificates, contracts and other instruments of the Corporation, except as otherwise limited in writing by the Chairman of the Board, the President or the Vice Chairman of the Board of the Corporation. Each Vice President shall have such other powers and duties as from time to time may be assigned to such Vice President by the Board of Directors, the Chairman of the Board, the President or the Vice Chairman of the Board.
Section 5.4. Secretary. The Secretary shall keep the minutes of all meetings of the Board of Directors, committees of the Board of Directors and the stockholders, in books provided for that purpose; shall attend to the giving and serving of all notices; may in the name of the Corporation affix the seal of the Corporation to all contracts and attest the affixation of the seal of the Corporation thereto; may sign with the other appointed officers all certificates for shares of capital stock of the Corporation; shall have charge of the certificate books, transfer books and stock ledgers, and such other books and papers as the Board of Directors may direct, all of which shall at all reasonable times be open to inspection of any director upon application at the office of the Corporation during business hours; shall have such other powers and duties as designated in these Bylaws and as from time to time may be assigned to the Secretary by the Board of Directors, the Chairman of the Board, the President or the Vice Chairman of the Board; and shall in general perform all acts incident of the office of Secretary, subject to the control of the Board of Directors, the Chairman of the Board, the President or the Vice Chairman of the Board.
Section 5.5. Assistant Secretaries. Each Assistant Secretary shall have the usual powers and duties pertaining to such offices, together with such other powers and duties as designated in these Bylaws and as from time to time may be assigned to an Assistant Secretary by the board of directors, the President, or the Secretary. The Assistant Secretaries shall exercise the powers of the Secretary during that officer's absence or inability or refusal to act.
Section 5.6. Treasurer. The Treasurer shall have responsibility for the custody and control of all the funds and securities of the Corporation, and shall have such other powers and duties as designated in these Bylaws and as from time to time may be assigned to the Treasurer by the Board of Directors or the President. The Treasurer shall perform all acts incident to the position of Treasurer, subject to the control of the Board of Directors or the President; and the Treasurer shall, if required by the Board of Directors, give such bond for the faithful discharge of the Treasurer's duties in such form as the Board of Directors may require.
Section 5.7. Assistant Treasurers. Each Assistant Treasurer shall have the usual powers and duties pertaining to such office, together with such other powers and duties as designated in these Bylaws and as from time to time may be assigned to each Assistant Treasurer by the Board of Directors, the President, or the Treasurer. The Assistant Treasurers shall exercise the powers of the Treasurer during that officer's absence or inability or refusal to act.
Section 5.8. Action with Respect to Securities of Other Corporations. Unless otherwise directed by the Board of Directors, the President, together with the Secretary or any Assistant Secretary shall have power to vote and otherwise act on behalf of the Corporation, in person or by proxy, at any meeting of security holders of or with respect to any action of security holders of any other corporation in which this Corporation may hold securities and otherwise to exercise any and all rights and powers which this Corporation may possess by reason of its ownership of securities in such other corporation.
Section 5.9. Delegation. For any reason that the Board of Directors may deem sufficient, the Board of Directors may, except where otherwise provided by statute, delegate the powers or duties of any officer to any other person, and may authorize any officer to delegate specified duties of such office to any other person. Any such delegation or authorization by the Board shall be effected from time to time by resolution of the Board of Directors.
Section 6.1. Stock Certificates and Transfers. The shares of the capital stock of the Corporation shall be evidenced by certificates, provided that the Board of Directors may provide by resolution or resolutions that some or all of any or all classes or series of its stock shall be uncertificated shares. Any such resolution shall not apply to shares represented by certificate until such certificate is surrendered to the Corporation. Every holder of stock represented by certificates shall be entitled to have a certificate signed by, or in the name of, the Corporation in such form as the appropriate officers of the Corporation may from time to time prescribe. Transfers of stock of the Corporation shall be made on the books of the Corporation, and, in the case of certificated shares, by the holder thereof in person or by such person's attorney upon surrender for cancellation of certificates for at least the same number of shares, with an assignment and power of transfer endorsed thereon or attached thereto, duly executed, and with such proof of the authenticity of the signature as the Corporation or its agents may reasonably require or, in the case of uncertificated shares, upon receipt of proper transfer instructions from the registered holder or by such person's attorney, and with such proof of the authenticity of the signature as the Corporation or its agents may reasonably require. The certificates of stock shall be numbered and signed by the Chairman of the Board of Directors, the President, an Executive Vice President, a Senior Vice President or a Vice President, and also by the Treasurer or an Assistant Treasurer, or the Secretary or an Assistant Secretary. Any and all signatures may be facsimiles. In case any officer, transfer agent or registrar who has signed or whose facsimile signature has been placed upon a certificate has ceased to be such officer, transfer agent or registrar before such certificate is issued, it may be issued by he Corporation with the same effect as if he or she were such officer, transfer agent or registrar at the date of issue.
Section 6.2. Ownership of Shares. The Corporation shall be entitled to treat the holder of record of any share or shares of capital stock of the Corporation as the holder in fact thereof and, accordingly, shall not be bound to recognize any equitable or other claim to or interest in such share or shares on the part of any other person, whether or not it shall have express or other notice thereof, except as otherwise provided by the laws of the state of Delaware.
Section 6.3. Regulations Regarding Certificates. The Board of Directors shall have the power and authority to make all such rules and regulations as they may deem expedient concerning the issue, transfer and registration or the replacement of certificates for shares of capital stock of the Corporation.
Section 6.4. Lost or Destroyed Certificates. The Board of Directors may determine the conditions upon which the Corporation may issue a new certificate of stock in place of a certificate theretofore issued by it which is alleged to have been lost, stolen or destroyed and may require the owner of such certificate or such owner's legal representative to give bond, with surety sufficient to indemnify the Corporation and each transfer agent and registrar against any and all losses or claims which may arise by reason of the alleged loss, theft or destruction of any such certificate or the issuance of such new certificate in the place of the one so lost, stolen destroyed.
Section 7.1. Fiscal Year. The fiscal year of the Corporation shall begin on the first day of January of each year.
Section 7.2. Corporate Seal. The corporate seal shall be circular in form and shall have inscribed thereon the name of the Corporation and the state of it incorporation, which seal shall be in the charge of the Secretary and shall be affixed to certificates of stock, debentures, bonds and other documents, in accordance with the direction of the Board of Directors or a committee thereof, and as may be required by law; however, the Secretary may, if the Secretary deems it expedient, have a facsimile of the corporate seal inscribed on any such certificates of stock, debentures, bonds, contract or other documents. Duplicates of the seal may be kept for use by any Assistant Secretary.
Section 7.3. Notice and Waiver of Notice. Whenever any notice is required to be given by law, the charter documents of the Corporation or under the provisions of these Bylaws, said notice shall be deemed to be sufficient if given (i) by telegraphic, cable or wireless transmission (including by telecopy or facsimile transmission) or (ii) by deposit of the same in a post office box or by delivery to an overnight courier service company in a sealed prepaid wrapper addressed to the person entitled thereto at such person's post office address, as it appears on the records of the Corporation, and such notice shall be deemed to have been given on the day of such transmission or mailing or delivery to courier, as the case may be.
Whenever notice is required to be given by law, the charter documents of the Corporation or under any of the provisions of these Bylaws, a written waiver thereof, signed by the person entitled to notice, whether before or after the time stated therein, shall be deemed equivalent to notice. Attendance of a person, including without limitation a director, at meeting shall constitute a waiver of notice of such meeting, except when the person attends a meeting for the express purpose of objecting, at the beginning of the meeting, to the transaction of any business because the meeting is not lawfully called or convened. Neither the business to be transacted at, nor the purpose of, any regular or special meeting of the stockholders, directors, or members of a committee of directors need be specified in any written waiver of notice unless so required by the charter documents of the Corporation or these Bylaws.
Section 7.4. Facsimile Signature. In addition to the provisions for the use of facsimile signatures elsewhere specifically authorized in these Bylaws, facsimile signatures of any officer or officers of the Corporation may be used whenever and as authorized by the Board of Directors.
Section 7.5. Reliance upon Books, Reports and Records. A member of the Board of Directors, or a member of any committee designated by the Board of Directors, shall, in the performance of such person's duties, be protected to the fullest extent permitted by law in relying upon the records of the Corporation and upon information, opinion, reports or statements presented to the Corporation.
Section 7.6. Application of Bylaws. In the event that any provisions of these Bylaws is or may be in conflict with any law of the United States, of the state of Delaware, or of any other governmental body or power having jurisdiction over this Corporation, or over the subject matter to which such provision of these Bylaws applies, or may apply, such provision of these Bylaws shall be inoperative to the extent only that the operation thereof unavoidably conflicts with such law, and shall in all other respects be in full force and effect.
Section 8.1. Indemnification. The Corporation shall, to the maximum extent and in the manner permitted by the General Corporation Law of Delaware, indemnify each of its directors and officers against expenses (including attorneys' fees), judgments, fines, settlements and other amounts actually and reasonably incurred in connection with any proceeding, arising by reason of the fact that such person is or was an agent of the Corporation. For purposes of this Section 6.1, a "director" or "officer" of the Corporation includes any person (i) who is or was a director or officer of the Corporation, (ii) who is or was serving at the request of the Corporation as a director or officer of another corporation, partnership, joint venture, trust or other enterprise, or (iii) who was a director or officer of a corporation which was a predecessor corporation of the Corporation or of another enterprise at the request of such predecessor corporation.
Section 8.2. Indemnification of Others. The Corporation shall have the power, to the maximum extent and in the manner permitted by the General Corporation Law of Delaware, to indemnify each of its employees and agents (other than directors and officers) against expenses (including attorneys' fees), judgments, fines, settlements and other amounts actually and reasonably incurred in connection with any proceeding, arising by reason of the fact that such person is or was an agent of the Corporation. For purposes of this Section 6.2, an "employee" or "agent" of the Corporation (other than a director or officer) includes any person (i) who is or was an employee or agent of the Corporation, (ii) who is or was serving at the request of the Corporation as an employee or agent of another corporation, partnership, joint venture, trust or other enterprise, or (iii) who was an employee or agent of a corporation which was a predecessor corporation of the Corporation or of another enterprise at the request of such predecessor corporation.
Section 8.3. Insurance. The Corporation may purchase and maintain insurance on behalf of any person who is or was a director, officer, employee or agent of the Corporation, or is or was serving at the request of the Corporation as a director, officer, employee or agent of another corporation, partnership, joint venture, trust or other enterprise against any liability asserted against him or her and incurred by him or her in any such capacity, or arising out of his or her status as such, whether or not the Corporation would have the power to indemnify him or her against such liability under the provisions of the General Corporation Law of Delaware.
Section 9.1. Amendments. The Board of Directors shall have the power to adopt, amend and repeal from time to time Bylaws of the Corporation, subject to the right of the stockholders entitled to vote with respect thereto to amend or repeal such Bylaws as adopted or amended by the Board of Directors.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BABY/BABY-8K-20080731090035.txt.gz
TIME:20080731090035
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 OR 15(d) of
The Securities Exchange Act of 1934
Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported): July 31, 2008
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 - 
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 - 
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 - 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 - 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Item 2.02     Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On July 31, 2008, Natus Medical Incorporated (the Company) is issuing a press release and holding a conference call regarding its financial results for the second fiscal quarter of 2008 ended June 30, 2008 and other financial information.  A copy of the press release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 to this Form 8-K.
The information in this Form 8-K and the exhibit attached hereto shall not be deemed filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the Exchange Act) or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that Section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
Item 9.01     Financial Statements and Exhibits.
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Index to Exhibits

Exhibit 99.1
Natus Medical Announces Record 2008 Second Quarter Financial Results
-- 62% Increase in Net Income Leads to Record Second Quarter Results
-- 2008 Guidance Increased
SAN CARLOS, Calif.--(BUSINESS WIRE)-- (Nasdaq:BABY) today announced financial results for the three and six months ended June 30, 2008.
Natus Medical Incorporated
For the second quarter ended June 30, 2008, revenue increased 41% to $39.9 million, compared to $28.3 million reported in the comparable quarter of the previous year. Net income increased 62% to $3.8 million, or $0.15 per diluted share, for the second quarter of 2008, compared with net income of $2.3 million, or $0.10 per share, for the second quarter of 2007.
For the six months ended June 30, 2008, the Company reported net income of $6.4 million, or $0.26 per diluted share, compared to net income of $3.8 million, or $0.17 per diluted share, for the comparable period in 2007. The results for the first six months of 2008 reflect increases in net income and earnings per share of 66% and 56%, respectively.
Jim Hawkins, President and Chief Executive Officer of the Company, said, We had an excellent second quarter with outstanding results in all of our product areas. We are also very encouraged that our strong results were achieved in both the United States and in our international markets.
We acquired Sonamed in May 2008 and have very quickly completed the integration of their operations into Natus. Sonamed, a manufacturer of hearing screening products, has a disposable supply model with high gross profits that is an ideal fit for Natus, added Hawkins.
In July 2008, we acquired the neurology business of Schwarzer GmbH, located in Munich, Germany. Schwarzer Neurology develops and markets EEG systems and disposable supplies used by medical practitioners to aid in the detection, diagnosis, and monitoring of neurologic disorders. With this acquisition, we now lead the market for diagnostic neurology systems in the German-speaking regions of Europe. We expect the results of both Sonamed and Schwarzer Neurology will be accretive to our earnings in 2008.
Also in the second quarter we strengthened our balance sheet by completing two public offerings of our common stock, raising almost $100 million in new equity. As we exited the second quarter we had approximately $77 million in cash with minimal debt. This compares to cash of approximately $13 million and $36 million in debt as of the beginning of the quarter. I am pleased that we are able to maintain our annual earnings guidance for 2008 with only minimal adjustment, even with the significant dilution from these equity offerings. Our current strong cash position supports our strategy of identifying acquisitions and integrating businesses that will be accretive to our earnings," added Hawkins.
I remain optimistic for our prospects in 2008 as we look to achieve our goal of 50% earnings growth. We continue to remain confident in our strategy of combining internal growth and accretive acquisitions to build a focused and highly profitable medical device company, said Hawkins.
As of June 30, 2008 the Company had cash, cash equivalents, and short-term investments of $76.7 million, revolving and term debt of $3.7 million, stockholders' equity of approximately $223 million, and working capital of approximately $105 million. The Company raised approximately $99.5 million net of expenses in April and May 2008 in two separate public offerings of 885,500 and 4,600,000 shares, respectively, of its common stock.
2008 Guidance
Natus increased its revenue and earnings guidance for the full year 2008. For the full year 2008, the Company now expects revenue to range from $166 million to $169 million and earnings per share to range from $0.68 to $0.71. The Company had previously said revenue would range from $163 million to $164 million and earnings per share would range from $0.68 to $0.70.
Natus also announced revenue and earnings guidance for the third and fourth quarters of 2008.
For the third quarter of 2008, the Company expects revenue to range from $42.2 million to $43.2 million and earnings per share to range from $0.17 to $0.18. This compares to revenue of $28.8 million and earnings per share of $0.14 reported in the third quarter of 2007.
For the fourth quarter of 2008, the Company expects revenue to range from $47 million to $49 million and earnings per share to range from $0.25 to $0.27. This compares to revenue of $34.2 million dollars and earnings of per share of $0.12 reported in the fourth quarter of 2007. The Company reported non-GAAP earnings per share of $0.17 iin the fourth quarter of 2007. The Non-GAAP results for the fourth quarter of 2007 excluded acquisition related costs associated with the Companys acquisition of Xltek on November 29, 2007.
In February 2008, the Company announced a restructuring of its North American operating units. These restructuring activities will result in increased costs during the first three quarters of 2008 with a reduction in operating costs beginning in the fourth quarter of 2008. The Company expects that the restructuring will result in an approximate $2.4 million annual cost reduction beginning in 2009.
The guidance is on a GAAP basis, including the impact of expensing employee equity-based compensation, however it does not include the impact of any one-time charges associated with the Schwarzer Neurology acquisition or future restructuring charges exclusive of those previously announced. All earnings per share amounts are on a diluted basis.
Conference Call
Natus has scheduled an investment-community conference call to discuss this announcement beginning at 11:00 a.m. Eastern Time today (8:00 a.m. Pacific Time). Individuals interested in listening to the conference call may do so by dialing (866) 770-7152 for domestic callers, or (617) 213-8066 for international callers, and entering reservation code 90484203. A telephone replay will be available for 48 hours following the conclusion of the call by dialing (888) 286-8010 for domestic callers, or (617) 801-6888 for international callers, and entering reservation code 89306707.
The conference call also will be available real-time via the Internet at , and a recording of the call will be available on the Companys Web site for 90 days following the completion of the call.
http://investor.natus.com
About Natus Medical Incorporated
Natus is a leading provider of healthcare products used for the screening, detection, treatment, monitoring and tracking of common medical ailments such as hearing impairment, neurological dysfunction, epilepsy, sleep disorders, and newborn care. Product offerings include computerized neurodiagnostic systems for audiology, neurology, polysomnography, and neonatology, as well as newborn care products such as hearing screening systems, phototherapy devices for the treatment of newborn jaundice, head-cooling products for the treatment of brain injury in newborns, and software systems for managing and tracking disorders and diseases for public health laboratories.
Additional information about Natus Medical can be found at .
www.natus.com
This press release contains forward-looking statements as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, particularly statements regarding the expectations, beliefs, plans, intentions and strategies of Natus. These forward-looking statements include, but are not limited to, statements regarding future revenue and earnings growth, and anticipated revenue and profitability for the third and fourth quarters and full year 2008. These statements relate to future events or Natus' future financial performance or results, and involve known and unknown risks, uncertainties and other factors that may cause actual results, levels of activity, performance, or achievements to differ materially from those expressed or implied by the forward-looking statements. Forward-looking statements are only predictions and the actual events or results may differ materially. Natus cannot provide any assurance that its future results or the results implied by the forward-looking statements will meet expectations. Our future results could differ materially due to a number of factors, including the effects of competition, the demand for our products and services, our ability to expand our sales in international markets, our ability to maintain current sales levels in a mature domestic market, our ability to control costs, and risks associated with bringing new products to market and integrating acquired businesses. Natus disclaims any obligation to update information contained in any forward-looking statement.
More information about potential risk factors that could affect the business and financial results of Natus is included in Natus' annual report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2007, and its quarterly reports on Form 10-Q, and in other reports filed from time to time by Natus with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission.
CONTACT: Natus Medical Incorporated Steven J. Murphy, 650-802-0400 Chief Financial Officer
InvestorRelations@Natus.com


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BABY/BABY-8K-20080806153902.txt.gz
TIME:20080806153902
EVENTS:	Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On August 5, 2008, the Company executed the First Amendment (the "Amendment") to its Amended and Restated Credit Agreement with Wells Fargo Bank, National Association. The Amendment increases the borrowing limit of the Company's Revolving Line of Credit to $25 million and makes other changes to the terms of the credit facility. The credit facility contains covenants, including covenants relating to liquidity and other financial measurements, and provides for events of default, including failure to pay any interest when due, failure to perform or observe covenants, bankruptcy or insolvency events and the occurrence of a material adverse effect.
The foregoing description of the Amendment does not purport to be complete and is qualified in its entirety by reference to the copies of the First Amendment to Amended and Restated Credit Agreement and Waiver attached hereto as Exhibit 10.1.
 
(d) The following exhibits are filed herewith:
Exhibits.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 

E 10.1
XHIBIT
T F A A R C A W (this ) is entered into as of August 5, 2008, between N M I, a Delaware corporation (), and W F B, N A ().
HIS
IRST
MENDMENT
TO
MENDED
AND
ESTATED
REDIT
GREEMENT
AND
AIVER
"Amendment"
ATUS
EDICAL
NCORPORATED
"Borrower"
ELLS
ARGO
ANK
ATIONAL
SSOCIATION
"Bank"
W Borrower is currently indebted to Bank pursuant to the terms and conditions of the Amended and Restated Credit Agreement, dated as of November 28, 2007 (as amended, modified or supplemented prior to the date hereof, the ), between Borrower and Bank;
HEREAS
"Credit Agreement"
W Bank and Borrower have agreed to certain changes in the terms and conditions set forth in the Credit Agreement and have agreed to amend the Credit Agreement to reflect such changes;
HEREAS
W Borrower has informed Bank that it has, in violation of the aggregate $10,000,000 limitation set forth in clause (e) of the definition of "Permitted Investments," invested approximately $16,200,000 in Subsidiaries formed or acquired after the Closing Date and acquisitions of assets of other Persons constituting business units of such Person (the "");
HEREAS
Investment Default
W Borrower has requested that Bank waive the Investment Default;
HEREAS
W Borrower has informed Bank that is has acquired all of the equity interests in Sonamed (as such term is defined in the Credit Agreement as amended by this Amendment) and, Sonamed did not execute a Guaranty or security agreement within the required timeframes set forth in Section 6.12 (the ""); and
HEREAS
Sonamed Default
W Borrower has requested that Bank waive the Sonamed Default;
HEREAS
N, , for valuable consideration, the receipt and sufficiency of which are hereby acknowledged, Bank has agreed to provide a waiver for the Investment Default and a waiver for the Sonamed Default subject to the terms and conditions provided herein and Bank and Borrower hereby agree that the Credit Agreement shall be amended as follows; that nothing contained herein shall terminate any security interests, guaranties, subordinations or other documents in favor of Bank, all of which shall remain in full force and effect unless expressly amended hereby:
OW
THEREFORE
provided
Section 1. . Each capitalized term used but not otherwise defined herein has the meaning assigned to it in the Credit Agreement.
Definitions
Section 2. . Subject to Section 4 hereof, the Credit Agreement is hereby amended as follows:
Amendments to Credit Agreement
(a) The following definitions in Section 1.1 of the Credit Agreement are hereby amended and restated in their entirety to read as follows:
"" means, from time to time, with respect to any Base Rate Loan, or LIBOR Loan, or with respect to the Unused Commitment Fees payable pursuant to Section 2.7(a), as the case may be, the applicable rate per annum set forth below (expressed in basis points) under the caption "LIBOR Spread," "Base Rate Spread" or "Unused Commitment Fee Rate," as the case may be, based upon, subject to Section 2.6(d), the Leverage Ratio as set forth in the most recent Compliance Certificate received by Bank pursuant to Section 5.1(b)(vii) or Section 6.3(d), as applicable:
Applicable Rate
 
"" means: (a) with respect to (i) a LIBOR Loan, the last day of each Interest Period applicable thereto; that, if any such Interest Period exceeds three months, the date that falls three months after the beginning of such Interest Period shall also be an Interest Payment Date; and (ii) a Base Rate Loan, the last Business Day of each calendar month; and (b) in the case of Revolving Credit Loans, the Revolving Credit Maturity Date.
Interest Payment Date
provided
"" means, as to each LIBOR Loan, the period commencing on the date such LIBOR Loan is disbursed or converted to or continued as a LIBOR Loan and ending on the date one, two, three or six months thereafter, as selected by Borrower in its related Loan Notice; that: (a) any Interest Period that would otherwise end on a day that is not a Business Day shall be extended to the next succeeding Business Day unless such Business Day falls in another calendar month, in which case such Interest Period shall end on the next preceding Business Day; (b) any Interest Period that begins on the last Business Day of a calendar month (or on a day for which there is no numerically corresponding day in the calendar month at the end of such Interest Period) shall end on the last Business Day of the calendar month at the end of such Interest Period; and (c) no Interest Period for any Revolving Credit Loan shall extend beyond the Revolving Credit Maturity Date.
Interest Period
provided
 
"" means any Revolving Credit Loan.
Loan
"" means this Agreement, the Revolving Line of Credit Note, the Security Agreement, the Guaranties, and each other contract, instrument and document required by or delivered to Bank in connection with this Agreement.
Loan Documents
"" means a material adverse effect on (i) the business operations or financial condition of Borrower and its Subsidiaries taken as a whole, (ii) the ability of Borrower to repay all debt, principal, interest, expenses and other amounts owed to Bank by Borrower pursuant to this Agreement, the Revolving Line of Credit Note and the other Loan Documents, or to otherwise perform its material obligations under the Loan Documents, or (iii) Borrower's interest in, or the value, perfection or priority of Bank's security interest or lien in, the collateral described in Section 2.10 hereof.
Material Adverse Effect
"" means the Amended and Restated Revolving Line of Credit Note.
Note
"" means:
Permitted Investments
(a) Investments by Borrower existing as of the Closing Date and listed on ;
Schedule 1.1-B
(b) Investments by Borrower in (i) marketable direct obligations issued or unconditionally guaranteed by the United States or any agency or any state thereof maturing within one year from the date of acquisition thereof, (ii) commercial paper maturing no more than one year from the date of creation thereof and currently having rating of at least A-2 or P-2 from either Standard & Poor's Corporation or Moody's Investors Service, (iii) Bank's certificates of deposit maturing no more than one year from the date of investment therein, (iv) Bank's money market accounts, and (v) in conformance with Borrower's "Investment Policy," as in effect on the Closing Date (or as amended from time to time, subject to the approval of Bank), a copy of which has previously been provided to Bank;
(c) Investments by Borrower consisting of the endorsement of negotiable instruments for deposit or collection or similar transactions in the ordinary course of business of Borrower;
(d) Investments by Borrower consisting of deposit accounts in which Bank has a first priority perfected security interest;
(e) Investments, in the aggregate not to exceed $10,000,000.00, by Borrower (i) in Subsidiaries formed or acquired after the Amendment Closing Date, so long as Borrower has 100% control of such Subsidiary immediately following the effectiveness of such acquisition, and/or (ii) constituting the purchase or other acquisition (in one transaction or a series of transactions) of assets of another Person that constitute a business unit;
 
(f) Investments by Borrower not to exceed at any time $250,000.00 in the aggregate consisting of (i) travel advances and employee relocation loans and other employee loans and advances in the ordinary course of business, and (ii) loans to employees, officers or directors relating to the purchase of equity securities of Borrower pursuant to employee stock purchase plans or agreements approved by Borrower's board of directors;
(g) Investments (including debt obligations) by Borrower not to exceed $50,000.00 in the aggregate outstanding at any time received in connection with the bankruptcy or reorganization of customers or suppliers and in settlement of delinquent obligations of, and other disputes with, customers or suppliers arising in the ordinary course of business;
(h) Investments by Borrower not to exceed $50,000.00 in the aggregate outstanding at any time consisting of notes receivable of, or prepaid royalties and other credit extensions to, customers and suppliers who are not affiliates, in the ordinary course of business; that this paragraph (h) shall not apply to investments of Borrower in any Subsidiary;
provided
(i) A Nine Million Dollar ($9,000,000.00) investment by Borrower in the stock of SonaMed Corporation, a Delaware corporation, pursuant to documentation, copies of which were provided to Bank on or before the Amendment Closing Date; and
(j) A Four Million Two Hundred Seventy Two Thousand Euro (4,272,000.00) investment by Fischer-Zoth Diagnosesysteme GmbH, a company organized under the laws of Germany, in the assets of the neurology division of Schwarzer GmbH, a company organized under the laws of Germany, pursuant to documentation, copies of which were provided to Bank on or before the Amendment Closing Date
(b) The following definitions are hereby added to Section 1.1 of the Credit Agreement in a manner that maintains alphabetical order:
"" has the meaning ascribed to such term in Section 2.1(a).
Amended and Restated Revolving Line of Credit Note
" means August 5, 2008.
Amendment Closing Date"
"" means Sonamed Corporation, a Delaware corporation.
Sonamed
 
(c) The following definitions in Section 1.1 of the Credit Agreement are hereby deleted in their entirety from the Credit Agreement without replacement: """, "", "", "";
Revolving Line of Credit Note",
Term Borrowing
Term Loan
Term Maturity Date
Term Note
(d) Section 2.1(a) of the Credit Agreement is hereby amended and restated in its entirety to read as follows:
"(a) . Subject to the terms and conditions of this Agreement, Bank hereby agrees to make loans (each such loan, a "") to Borrower from time to time on any Business Day during the Availability Period, not to exceed at any time the aggregate principal amount of Twenty Five Million Dollars ($25,000,000.00) (the ""), the proceeds of which shall be used for working capital and general corporate purposes. Borrower's obligation to repay advances under the Revolving Line of Credit shall be evidenced by a promissory note dated August 5, 2008 (the ""), in the form attached hereto as , all terms of which are incorporated herein by this reference."
Revolving Line of Credit
Revolving Credit Loan
Revolving Line of Credit
Amended and Restated Revolving Line of Credit Note
Exhibit A
(e) Section 2.4(c) of the Credit Agreement is hereby amended by deleting the first occurrence of the phrase "or the Term Borrowing";
(f) Section 2.4(f) of the Credit Agreement is hereby amended and restated in its entirety to read as follows:
"(f) After giving effect to all Borrowings, all conversions of Loans from one Type to the other, and all continuations of Loans as the same Type, there shall not be more than five Interest Periods in effect with respect to the Revolving Credit Loans."
(g) The text of Sections 2.1(b), 2.3, 2.5(a), and 2.5(c) are hereby deleted and replaced in each instance with "[Intentionally omitted.]";
(h) Section 6.12(a) of the Credit Agreement is hereby amended and restated in its entirety to read as follows:
(a) . By not later than (i) with respect to each Domestic Subsidiary in existence as of the Closing Date, the Closing Date, (ii) with respect to each Domestic Subsidiary (except Sonamed) formed or acquired on or after the Closing Date, twenty (20) calendar days after the formation or acquisition of such Domestic Subsidiary, and (iii) with respect to Sonamed, December 31, 2008, unless (a) on or before such date Sonamed has merged into Borrower or (b) on or before such date Borrower ceases to the be the owner of one hundred percent (100%) of the Equity Interests of Sonamed, then as of the date that Borrower ceases to be the owner of 100% of the Equity Interests of Sonamed, cause such Domestic Subsidiary to execute and deliver to Bank (X) a Guaranty in satisfaction of the requirements of Section 2.11 hereof, (Y) a security agreement in satisfaction of the requirements of Section 2.10 hereof and (Z) such other documents as Bank shall reasonably request, in form and substance satisfactory to Bank, evidencing the authority of such Domestic Subsidiary to execute and deliver such Guaranty and security agreement, and the incumbency of the Persons executing such Guaranty and security agreement on behalf of such Domestic Subsidiary.
Domestic Subsidiaries
 
(i) Each reference to "Notes" in the Credit Agreement is hereby deleted and replaced in each instance with "Note";
(j) Each reference to "Revolving Line of Credit Note" is hereby deleted and replaced in each instanced with "Amended and Restated Revolving Line of Credit Note";
(k) Exhibit A of the Credit Agreement is hereby deleted in its entirety and replaced with Exhibit A attached hereto;
(l) Exhibit B of the Credit Agreement is hereby deleted in its entirety and replaced with Exhibit B attached hereto; and
(m) Exhibit C of the Credit Agreement is hereby deleted in its entirety and replaced with Exhibit C attached hereto.
Section 3. . Borrower has requested that Bank waive the Events of Default under Section 8.01(c) of the Credit Agreement resulting from the Investment Default and the Sonamed Default and, subject to the conditions set forth in Section 4 below, Bank hereby waives the Events of Default under Section 8.01(c) of the Credit Agreement resulting from the Investment Default and the Sonamed Default. The waivers set forth herein shall not extend to any matters other than the Events of Default under Section 8.01(c) of the Credit Agreement resulting from the Investment Default and the Sonamed Default. The waivers described in this Section 3 apply only to the specific events described herein and are not waivers of any subsequent breach of the same provisions or waivers of any breach of any other provision of the Credit Agreement.
Waiver
Section 4. . This Amendment, including, without limitation the amendments to the Credit Agreement contained herein, shall become effective as of the date first set forth above (the "") upon satisfaction of all of the conditions set forth in this Section 4 to the satisfaction of Bank; that, in the event such conditions are not so satisfied, then this Amendment shall be of no further force and effect:
Conditions Precedent
Effective Date
provided
(a) Bank shall have received each of the following, duly executed and delivered by each of the applicable parties thereto:
(i) this Amendment together with the Consent and Reaffirmation attached hereto;
(ii) the Amended and Restated Revolving Line of Credit Note; and
(iii) such other documents as Bank may require under any other Section of this Amendment.
 
(b) No Event of Default or event which, with the giving of notice, the lapse of time or both would constitute an Event of Default, other than the Events of Default under Section 8.01(c) of the Credit Agreement resulting from the Investment Default and the Sonamed Default, shall have occurred and be continuing; and
(c) Borrower shall pay to Bank a non-refundable upfront fee for the Revolving Line of Credit provided hereunder equal to Twenty Five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00).
Section 5. . Except as specifically provided herein, all terms and conditions of the Credit Agreement remain in full force and effect, without waiver or modification. This Amendment and the Credit Agreement shall be read together, as one document. The Recitals hereto, including the terms defined therein, are incorporated herein by this reference and acknowledged by Borrower to be true, correct and complete.
Interpretation
Section 6. . Borrower hereby remakes all representations and warranties contained in the Credit Agreement and reaffirms all covenants set forth therein (as amended hereby) as of the date of this Amendment. Borrower further certifies that as of the date of this Amendment there exists no Event of Default, other than the Events of Default under Section 8.01(c) of the Credit Agreement resulting from the Investment Default and the Sonamed Default, nor any condition, act or event which with the giving of notice or the passage of time or both would constitute an Event of Default.
Representations, Warranties and Covenants
Section 7. . Borrower will make, execute, endorse, acknowledge, and deliver any agreements, documents, or instruments, and take any and all other actions, as may from time to time be reasonably requested by Bank to perfect and maintain the validity and priority of the liens and security interests granted to Bank pursuant to the Credit Agreement and the other Loan Documents and to effect, confirm, or further assure or protect and preserve the interests, rights, and remedies of Bank under the Credit Agreement (as amended hereby) and the other Loan Documents.
Further Assurances
Section 8. . This Amendment may be executed in any number of identical counterparts, any set of which signed by all the parties hereto shall be deemed to constitute a complete, executed original for all purposes. Delivery of an executed counterpart of a signature page of this Amendment by telefacsimile transmission shall be as effective as delivery of a manually executed counterpart hereof.
Counterparts
Section 9. . This Amendment shall be governed by and construed in accordance with the internal laws of the State of California.
Governing Law
 
I , the parties hereto have caused this Amendment to be executed as of the date first written above.
N
WITNESS
WHEREOF
 
 
F V R, the undersigned (), hereby promises to pay to , or registered assigns (), in accordance with the provisions of the Agreement (as hereinafter defined), the principal amount of each Revolving Credit Loan from time to time made by Lender to Borrower pursuant to that certain Amended and Restated Credit Agreement, dated as of November 28, 2007 (as amended, restated, extended, supplemented or otherwise modified in writing from time to time, the ), between Borrower and Lender.
OR
ALUE
ECEIVED
"Borrower"
                    
"Lender"
"Agreement"
Borrower promises to pay interest on the unpaid principal amount of each Revolving Credit Loan from the date of such Loan until such principal amount is paid in full, at such interest rates and at such times as provided in the Agreement. All payments of principal and interest shall be made to Lender in Dollars in immediately available funds at Lender's office at 3 Palo Alto Square, Suite 150, Palo Alto, California, or at such other place as the holder hereof may designate. If any amount is not paid in full when due hereunder, such unpaid amount shall bear interest, to be paid upon demand, from the due date thereof until the date of actual payment (and before as well as after judgment) computed at the per annum rate set forth in the Agreement.
This Note is the Note referred to in the Agreement, is entitled to the benefits thereof and may be prepaid in whole or in part subject to the terms and conditions provided therein. Upon the occurrence and continuation of one or more of the Events of Default specified in the Agreement, all amounts then remaining unpaid on this Note shall become, or may be declared to be, immediately due and payable all as provided in the Agreement. Loans made by Lender shall be evidenced by one or more loan accounts or records maintained by Lender in the ordinary course of business. Lender may also attach schedules to this Note and endorse thereon the date, amount and maturity of its Loans and payments with respect thereto.
Borrower, for itself, its successors and assigns, hereby waives diligence, presentment, protest and demand and notice of protest, demand, dishonor and non-payment of this Note.
T N C.
HIS
OTE
SHALL
BE
GOVERNED
BY
AND
CONSTRUED
IN
ACCORDANCE
WITH
THE
LAWS
OF
THE
STATE
OF
ALIFORNIA
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BABY/BABY-8K-20080905145311.txt.gz
TIME:20080905145311
EVENTS:	Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On September 2, 2008, the Company executed the Second Amendment (the "Amendment") to its Amended and Restated Credit Agreement with Wells Fargo Bank, National Association (Wells Fargo"). The Amendment corrects the leverage ratio in tier 1 of the applicable rate schedule and provides for Wells Fargo's consent to the Company's acquisition of NeuroCom International Inc. as a permitted investment. The credit facility contains covenants, including covenants relating to liquidity and other financial measurements, and provides for events of default, including failure to pay any interest when due, failure to perform or observe covenants, bankruptcy or insolvency events and the occurrence of a material adverse effect.
The foregoing description of the Amendment does not purport to be complete and is qualified in its entirety by reference to the copies of the Second Amendment to Amended and Restated Credit Agreement attached hereto as Exhibit 10.1.
 
(d) The following exhibits are filed herewith:
Exhibits.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 

E 10.1
XHIBIT
T S A A R C A (this ) is entered into as of September 2, 2008, between N M I, a Delaware corporation (), and W F B, N A ().
HIS
ECOND
MENDMENT
TO
MENDED
AND
ESTATED
REDIT
GREEMENT
"Amendment"
ATUS
EDICAL
NCORPORATED
"Borrower"
ELLS
ARGO
ANK
ATIONAL
SSOCIATION
"Bank"
W Borrower is currently indebted to Bank pursuant to the terms and conditions of the Amended and Restated Credit Agreement, dated as of November 28, 2007 (as amended, modified or supplemented prior to the date hereof, the ), between Borrower and Bank; and
HEREAS
"Credit Agreement"
W Borrower has informed Bank that it desires to make an investment and it desires to receive Bank's consent to make such investment; and
HEREAS
W Bank and Borrower have agreed to certain changes in the terms and conditions set forth in the Credit Agreement and have agreed to amend the Credit Agreement to reflect such changes;
HEREAS
N, , for valuable consideration, the receipt and sufficiency of which are hereby acknowledged, Bank and Borrower hereby agree that the Credit Agreement shall be amended as follows; that nothing contained herein shall terminate any security interests, guaranties, subordinations or other documents in favor of Bank, all of which shall remain in full force and effect unless expressly amended hereby:
OW
THEREFORE
provided
Section 1. . Each capitalized term used but not otherwise defined herein has the meaning assigned to it in the Credit Agreement.
Definitions
Section 2. . Subject to Section 3 hereof, the Credit Agreement is hereby amended as follows:
Amendments to Credit Agreement
(a) The definition of "Applicable Rate" contained in Section 1.1 of the Credit Agreement is hereby amended and restated in its entirety to read as follows:
"" means, from time to time, with respect to any Base Rate Loan, or LIBOR Loan, or with respect to the Unused Commitment Fees payable pursuant to Section 2.7(a), as the case may be, the applicable rate per annum set forth below (expressed in basis points) under the caption "LIBOR Spread," "Base Rate Spread" or "Unused Commitment Fee Rate," as the case may be, based upon, subject to Section 2.6(d), the Leverage Ratio as set forth in the most recent
Applicable Rate
Compliance Certificate received by Bank pursuant to Section 5.1(b)(vii) or Section 6.3(d), as applicable:
 
(b) The definition of "Permitted Investments" in Section 1.1 of the Credit Agreement is hereby amended to add immediately after the last sentence of paragraph (j) thereof the following:
"; and
(k) An Eighteen Million Dollar ($18,000,000.00) investment by Borrower in the stock of NeuroCom International, Inc., an Oregon corporation, pursuant to documentation, copies of which were provided to Bank on or before the Second Amendment Closing Date."
(c) The following definition is hereby added to Section 1.1 of the Credit Agreement in a manner that maintains alphabetical order:
" means September 2, 2008.
Second Amendment Closing Date"
Section 3. . This Amendment, including, without limitation the amendments to the Credit Agreement contained herein, shall become effective as of the date first set forth above (the "") upon satisfaction of all of the conditions set forth in this Section 3 to the satisfaction of Bank; that, in the event such conditions are not so satisfied, then this Amendment shall be of no further force and effect:
Conditions Precedent
Effective Date
provided
(a) Bank shall have received each of the following, duly executed and delivered by each of the applicable parties thereto:
(i) this Amendment together with the Consent and Reaffirmation attached hereto; and
 
(ii) such other documents as Bank may require under any other Section of this Amendment; and
(b) No Event of Default or event which, with the giving of notice, the lapse of time or both would constitute an Event of Default, shall have occurred and be continuing.
Section 4. . Except as specifically provided herein, all terms and conditions of the Credit Agreement remain in full force and effect, without waiver or modification. This Amendment and the Credit Agreement shall be read together, as one document. The Recitals hereto, including the terms defined therein, are incorporated herein by this reference and acknowledged by Borrower to be true, correct and complete.
Interpretation
Section 5. . Borrower hereby remakes all representations and warranties contained in the Credit Agreement and reaffirms all covenants set forth therein (as amended hereby) as of the date of this Amendment. Borrower further certifies that as of the date of this Amendment there exists no Event of Default, nor any condition, act or event which with the giving of notice or the passage of time or both would constitute an Event of Default.
Representations, Warranties and Covenants
Section 6. . Borrower will make, execute, endorse, acknowledge, and deliver any agreements, documents, or instruments, and take any and all other actions, as may from time to time be reasonably requested by Bank to perfect and maintain the validity and priority of the liens and security interests granted to Bank pursuant to the Credit Agreement and the other Loan Documents and to effect, confirm, or further assure or protect and preserve the interests, rights, and remedies of Bank under the Credit Agreement (as amended hereby) and the other Loan Documents.
Further Assurances
Section 7. . This Amendment may be executed in any number of identical counterparts, any set of which signed by all the parties hereto shall be deemed to constitute a complete, executed original for all purposes. Delivery of an executed counterpart of a signature page of this Amendment by telefacsimile transmission shall be as effective as delivery of a manually executed counterpart hereof.
Counterparts
Section 8. . This Amendment shall be governed by and construed in accordance with the internal laws of the State of California.
Governing Law
 
I , the parties hereto have caused this Amendment to be executed as of the date first written above.
N
WITNESS
WHEREOF
 
The undersigned, a subsidiary of Natus Medical Incorporated () who has executed a Continuing Guaranty in favor of Wells Fargo Bank, National Association (""), hereby: (i) consents to the foregoing Second Amendment to Amended and Restated Credit Agreement and Waiver; (ii) reaffirms its obligations under such Continuing Guaranty; (iii) reaffirms the waivers of each and every one of the defenses to such obligations as set forth in such Continuing Guaranty; and (iv) reaffirms that its obligations under such Continuing Guaranty are separate and distinct from the obligations of any other party under the Credit Agreement (as modified by the Second Amendment to Amended and Restated Credit Agreement and Waiver) and the other Loan Documents.
"Borrower"
Bank
Dated as of September 2, 2008
G:
UARANTOR
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BABY/BABY-8K-20081030070451.txt.gz
TIME:20081030070451
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 OR 15(d) of
The Securities Exchange Act of 1934
Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported): October 30, 2008
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 - 
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 - 
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 - 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 - 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
ITEM 2.02     Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On October 30, 2008, Natus Medical Incorporated (the Company) is issuing a press release and holding a conference call regarding its financial results for the third fiscal quarter of 2008 ended September 30, 2008 and other financial information.  A copy of the press release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 to this Form 8-K.
The information in this Form 8-K and the exhibit attached hereto shall not be deemed filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the Exchange Act) or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that Section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
ITEM 9.01.     Financial Statements and Exhibits.
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Index to Exhibits

Exhibit 99.1
Natus Medical Announces Record 2008 Third Quarter Financial Results
52% Increase in Net Income Leads to Record Third Quarter Results
SAN CARLOS, Calif.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--October 30, 2008-- (Nasdaq:BABY) today announced financial results for the three and nine months ended September 30, 2008.
Natus Medical Incorporated
For the third quarter ended September 30, 2008, revenue increased 45% to $41.7 million, compared to $28.8 million reported in the comparable quarter of the previous year. Net income increased 52% to $4.8 million, or $0.17 per diluted share, for the third quarter of 2008, compared with net income of $3.2 million, or $0.14 per share, for the third quarter of 2007.
For the nine months ended September 30, 2008, the Company reported net income of $11.2 million, or $0.43 per diluted share, compared to net income of $7.0 million, or $0.31 per diluted share, for the comparable period in 2007. The results for the first nine months of 2008 reflect increases in net income and earnings per share of 60% and 39%, respectively.
Jim Hawkins, President and Chief Executive Officer of the Company said, We had an excellent third quarter with outstanding results in all of our product areas. We are very encouraged that these strong results were achieved in both the United States and in our international markets.
We acquired Sonamed in May 2008 and very quickly completed the integration of their operations into Natus. This acquisition was immediately accretive to our earnings, added Hawkins. In July 2008, we acquired the neurology business of Schwarzer GmbH, located in Munich, Germany. Schwarzer Neurology develops and markets EEG systems and disposable supplies used by medical practitioners to aid in the detection, diagnosis, and monitoring of neurologic disorders. With this acquisition, we now lead the market for diagnostic neurology systems in the German-speaking regions of Europe.
Additionally, we completed the acquisition of NeuroCom International on October 2, 2008. NeuroCom, based in Oregon, develops and markets computerized systems for the assessment and rehabilitation of balance and mobility disorders, and expands our neurology footprint into the growing balance and mobility assessment market, stated Hawkins.
With pre-tax earnings and net income up 67% and 60%, respectively, on a year-to-date basis, and notwithstanding the near-term dilutive impact of our recent stock offerings, we are on target to achieve our goal of 50% earnings per share growth in 2008, added Hawkins. We continue to remain confident in our strategy of combining internal growth and accretive acquisitions to build a focused and highly profitable medical device company.
As of September 30, 2008 the Company had cash, cash equivalents, and short-term investments of approximately $69 million, stockholders' equity of approximately $229 million, and working capital of approximately $107 million. The Company also has a $25 million revolving line of credit with Wells Fargo Bank with no outstanding borrowing at September 30, 2008. The Company raised approximately $100 million net of expenses in April and May 2008 in two separate public offerings of 885,500 and 4,600,000 shares, respectively, of its common stock.
2008 Guidance
Natus updated its revenue and earnings guidance for the fourth quarter and full year 2008. In forecasting its results for the fourth quarter of 2008, the Company has taken into account factors such as the potential for a worldwide economic slowdown along with the impact of a strong dollar. Given the uncertainties accompanying the current economic climate, the Company has attempted to develop its guidance on a prudently conservative basis.
For the full year 2008, the Company now expects revenue to range from $167 million to $169 million and earnings per share to range from $0.68 to $0.71. The Company had previously said revenue would range from $166 million to $169. This compares to revenue of $118.4 million dollars and earnings per share of $0.43 reported for the full year 2007. The Company reported non-GAAP earnings per share of $0.47 for 2007. The Non-GAAP results for 2007 excluded acquisition related costs associated with the Companys acquisition of Xltek on November 29, 2007.
For the fourth quarter of 2008, the Company expects revenue to range from $48.5 million to $50.5 million and earnings per share to range from $0.25 to $0.28. This compares to revenue of $34.2 million dollars and earnings of per share of $0.12 reported in the fourth quarter of 2007. The Company reported non-GAAP earnings per share of $0.17 in the fourth quarter of 2007. The non-GAAP results for the fourth quarter of 2007 excluded the aforementioned Xltek acquisition related costs.
The Company also announced that is has substantially completed the restructuring of its North American operating units that was initiated in February 2008. Although the restructuring has resulted in approximately $600,000 of increased expense during the first three quarters of 2008, the Company will begin to realize cost reductions resulting from the restructuring in the fourth quarter of 2008. The Company continues to expect the restructuring will result in an approximate $2.4 million annual cost reduction in 2009.
The guidance is on a GAAP basis, including the impact of expensing employee equity-based compensation, however it does not include the impact of any acquisition-related charges associated with the NeuroCom acquisition or other future acquisitions. All earnings per share amounts are on a diluted basis.
Conference Call
Natus has scheduled an investment-community conference call to discuss this announcement beginning at 11:00 a.m. Eastern Time today (8:00 a.m. Pacific Time). Individuals interested in listening to the conference call may do so by dialing (800) 320-2978 for domestic callers, or (617) 614-4923 for international callers, and entering reservation code 57650490. A telephone replay will be available for 48 hours following the conclusion of the call by dialing (888) 286-8010 for domestic callers, or (617) 801-6888 for international callers, and entering reservation code 47851439.
The conference call also will be available real-time via the Internet at , and a recording of the call will be available on the Companys Web site for 90 days following the completion of the call.
http://investor.natus.com
About Natus Medical Incorporated
Natus is a leading provider of healthcare products used for the screening, detection, treatment, monitoring and tracking of common medical ailments such as hearing impairment, neurological dysfunction, epilepsy, sleep disorders, and newborn care. Product offerings include computerized neurodiagnostic systems for audiology, neurology, polysomnography, and neonatology, as well as newborn care products such as hearing screening systems, phototherapy devices for the treatment of newborn jaundice, head-cooling products for the treatment of brain injury in newborns, and software systems for managing and tracking disorders and diseases for public health laboratories.
Additional information about Natus Medical can be found at .
www.natus.com
This press release contains forward-looking statements as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, particularly statements regarding the expectations, beliefs, plans, intentions and strategies of Natus. These forward-looking statements include, but are not limited to, statements regarding future revenue and earnings growth, and anticipated revenue and profitability for the fourth quarter and full year 2008. These statements relate to future events or Natus' future financial performance or results, and involve known and unknown risks, uncertainties and other factors that may cause actual results, levels of activity, performance, or achievements to differ materially from those expressed or implied by the forward-looking statements. Forward-looking statements are only predictions and the actual events or results may differ materially. Natus cannot provide any assurance that its future results or the results implied by the forward-looking statements will meet expectations. Our future results could differ materially due to a number of factors, including the effects of competition, the demand for our products and services, our ability to expand our sales in international markets, our ability to maintain current sales levels in a mature domestic market, our ability to control costs, and risks associated with bringing new products to market and integrating acquired businesses. Natus disclaims any obligation to update information contained in any forward-looking statement.
More information about potential risk factors that could affect the business and financial results of Natus is included in Natus' annual report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2007, and its quarterly reports on Form 10-Q, and in other reports filed from time to time by Natus with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission.
CONTACT: Natus Medical Incorporated Steven J. Murphy, 650-802-0400 Chief Financial Officer
InvestorRelations@Natus.com


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BABY/BABY-8K-20090120180229.txt.gz
TIME:20090120180229
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
UNITED STATES SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549
Form 8-K
Current Report
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported):
January 20, 2009
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 - 
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 - 
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 - 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 - 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Item 2.02     Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
Attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1 and incorporated by reference herein is information regarding the Companys press release of January 20, 2009 announcing preliminary fourth quarter and full-year 2008 revenue and earnings per share.
Item 9.01     Financial Statements and Exhibits.
SIGNATURES
          Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Index to Exhibits

Exhibit 99.1
Natus Medical Announces Preliminary 2008 Fourth Quarter and Full Year Results and Provides 2009 Guidance
SAN CARLOS, Calif.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--January 20, 2009-- (Nasdaq:BABY) today announced preliminary revenue and earnings per share results for the three and twelve months ended December 31, 2008.
Natus Medical Incorporated
For 2008 Natus expects to report revenue of approximately $162 million, increasing 36% from $118.4 million reported for 2007. Earnings per share for 2008 is expected to be $0.65 to $0.66. This compares to earnings per share of $0.43 reported for 2007. For the fourth quarter ended December 31, 2008, the Company expects to report revenue of approximately $43.5 million, increasing 27% from $34.2 million reported for the fourth quarter of 2007. Natus expects fourth quarter 2008 earnings per share to be $0.21 to $0.22. This compares to earnings per share of $0.17 reported for the fourth quarter of 2007. The expected fourth quarter and year results are on a GAAP basis and all earnings per share amounts are on a diluted basis.
The Company expects to report cash, cash equivalents, and short-term investments of approximately $56 million as of December 31, 2008.
Jim Hawkins, President and Chief Executive Officer of the Company, said, We believe that the preliminary results we are announcing today reflect the impact of the economic downturn and resulting reduction in capital spending by our hospital customers, which we first noticed in early December.
Hawkins also stated, Our business model for the past four years has been driven by a combination of internal growth and accretive acquisitions. As discussed during our last conference call, we have temporarily put on hold active acquisition discussions until such time as we have more visibility into the marketplace, both domestically and internationally. Our concern is for the near-term business prospects of potential target businesses as they confront the same market conditions the industry at large is facing. Additionally, as a consequence of the recent reduction in the market cap of most publicly traded medical device companies, there is a high degree of uncertainty surrounding company valuations.
As we proceed through 2009, we are hopeful that the present uncertainty will abate and that business conditions will stabilize. We will monitor this closely, stay in touch with potential targets, and will again actively pursue our acquisition strategy when there is more clarity. Of course, we remain open to unique and opportunistic situations that may present themselves at any time. Fortunately, our strong balance sheet positions us to take advantage of such acquisition opportunities, added Hawkins.
Forecasting our future business has become much more difficult due to a combination of a seemingly accelerating worldwide economic downturn, growing unemployment in the United States and its impact on healthcare providers, the deteriorating condition of financial institutions and the resultant freezing of credit markets, and our perception of reduced capital spending by hospitals, said Hawkins. In addition, we are dealing with a fluctuating U.S. dollar that affects our international business. With that said, we believe our strong market position and unique niche products, combined with our world class sales organization, should allow Natus to continue to gain market share even in these uncertain times. Although we are forecasting a small reduction in year-over-year sales of devices and systems due to our expectation of cuts by healthcare providers, we expect sales of disposable supplies tied to our newborn hearing screening business will increase and remain very solid.
2009 Guidance
While the Company has attempted to be prudent and conservative in providing the following financial guidance, it again stressed the difficultly of providing guidance in these unsettled economic conditions.
For fiscal 2009, the Company expects revenue to range from $166 million to $170 million and earnings per share to range from $0.57 to $0.61. For the first quarter of 2009, the Company expects revenue to range from $37 million to $38 million and earnings per share to range from $0.06 to $0.08. This compares to revenue of $36.9 million and earnings per share of $0.11 reported in the first quarter of 2009.
While the Company is forecasting net income to be flat in 2009 compared to 2008, earnings per share for 2009 will be impacted by the shares issued in the stock offerings the Company completed in April and May 2008, where the Company issued an aggregate of 5,485,500 shares of its common stock and raised approximately $100 million. The effect of these offerings will be particularly significant to the comparison of results for the first quarter of 2009 versus the same quarter in 2008, as the new shares were not outstanding during any part of the first quarter of 2008.
The Companys guidance is on a GAAP basis, including the impact of expensing employee equity-based compensation. All earnings per share amounts are on a diluted basis.
Conference Call
Natus is scheduled to report its complete 2009 fourth quarter financial results on February 26, 2009 and the Company will hold an investment-community conference call on that day to discuss those results and its 2009 guidance in more detail. Dial-in and webcast access information will be made available prior to the call.
About Natus Medical Incorporated
Natus is a leading provider of healthcare products used for the screening, detection, treatment, monitoring and tracking of common medical ailments such as hearing impairment, neurological dysfunction, epilepsy, sleep disorders, and newborn care. Product offerings include computerized neurodiagnostic systems for audiology, neurology, polysomnography, and neonatology, as well as newborn care products such as hearing screening systems, phototherapy devices for the treatment of newborn jaundice, head-cooling products for the treatment of brain injury in newborns, and software systems for managing and tracking disorders and diseases for public health laboratories.
Additional information about Natus Medical can be found at .
www.natus.com
This press release contains forward-looking statements as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, particularly statements regarding the expectations, beliefs, plans, intentions and strategies of Natus. These forward-looking statements include, but are not limited to, statements regarding anticipated revenue and profitability for the fourth quarter and full year 2008, and the first quarter and full year 2009, our ability to gain market share in future periods, and an increase in our sales of disposable supplies. These statements relate to current estimates and assumptions of our management as of the date of this press release, and future events or Natus' future financial performance or results, and involve known and unknown risks, uncertainties and other factors that may cause actual results, levels of activity, performance, or achievements to differ materially from those expressed or implied by the forward-looking statements. Forward-looking statements are only predictions and the actual events or results may differ materially. Natus cannot provide any assurance that its future results or the results implied by the forward-looking statements will meet expectations. Our future results could differ materially due to a number of factors, including the effects of competition, the demand for our products and services, the impact of adverse global economic conditions on our target markets, our ability to expand our sales in international markets, our ability to maintain current sales levels in a mature domestic market, our ability to control costs, and risks associated with bringing new products to market and integrating acquired businesses. Natus disclaims any obligation to update information contained in any forward-looking statement.
More information about potential risk factors that could affect the business and financial results of Natus is included in Natus' annual report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2007, and its quarterly reports on Form 10-Q, and in other reports filed from time to time by Natus with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission.
CONTACT: Natus Medical Incorporated Steven J. Murphy, 650-802-0400 Chief Financial Officer
InvestorRelations@Natus.com


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BABY/BABY-8K-20090121163707.txt.gz
TIME:20090121163707
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
At its January 16, 2009 meeting, the Compensation Committee of the Board of Directors of Natus Medical Incorporated (the "Company") approved a cash bonus plan for executive officers of the Company based on the Company achieving its budgeted pre-tax profit for 2009. The cash bonuses may range from 50% to a maximum of 150% of the target amount (based on the amount of actual pre-tax profit relative to the budgeted amount). The target bonus for Mr. Hawkins is 75% of 2009 base salary and for each of Messrs. Mince, Murphy and Dr. Chung is 40% of 2009 base salary. Mr. Traverso's compensation is comprised of (i) his base salary, (ii) payments made pursuant to a sales commission plan that is paid on a regular basis to a maximum of $87,500, and (iii) a bonus for which the terms are the same as the other executive officers of the Company, except that his target bonus is 27% of his 2009 base salary. The target bonus amounts are the same for 2009 as they were in 2008. The payment of bonuses pursuant to this plan is at the discretion of the Board of Directors.
Base salaries for the Company's executive officers were not changed.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BABY/BABY-8K-20090226082853.txt.gz
TIME:20090226082853
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 OR 15(d) of
The Securities Exchange Act of 1934
Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported): February 26, 2009
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 - 
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 - 
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 - 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 - 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
On February 26, 2009, Natus Medical Incorporated (the Company) is issuing a press release and holding a conference call regarding its financial results for the fourth fiscal quarter of 2008 ended December 31, 2008 and other financial information.  A copy of the press release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 to this Form 8-K.
ITEM 2.02     Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
The information in this Form 8-K and the exhibit attached hereto shall not be deemed filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the Exchange Act) or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that Section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
ITEM 9.01     Financial Statements and Exhibits.
SIGNATURES
          Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Index to Exhibits

Exhibit 99.1
Natus Medical Announces Record 2008 Fourth Quarter and Full Year Results
SAN CARLOS, Calif.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--February 26, 2009-- (Nasdaq:BABY) today announced financial results for the three and twelve months ended December 31, 2008.
Natus Medical Incorporated
For the fourth quarter ended December 31, 2008, Natus reported revenue of $43.4 million, increasing 27% from $34.2 million reported for the fourth quarter of 2007. The Company reported net income of $6.3 million, or $0.22 per diluted share for the fourth quarter of 2008 compared to net income of $2.8 million, or $0.12 per diluted share reported in the fourth quarter of 2007, representing increases of 126% and 81% respectively.
For the year ended December 31, 2008, Natus reported revenue of $161.8 million, increasing 37% from $118.4 million reported for 2007. The Company reported net income of $17.5 million, or $0.66 per diluted share in 2008, compared to net income of $9.8 million, or $0.43 per diluted share in 2007, representing increases of 79% and 54%, respectively.
The Companys reported results for 2007 included acquisition-related charges associated with the acquisition of Xltek in November 2007. Non-GAAP net income excluding those charges was $3.8 million, or $0.17 per diluted share, and $10.8 million, or $0.47 per diluted share, for the three and twelve months ended December 31, 2007, respectively.
Even though they increased significantly on a year over year basis, our results for the fourth quarter were impacted by the economic downturn and the resulting reduction in capital spending by our hospital customers that we first noticed in early December, said Jim Hawkins, President and Chief Executive Officer of the Company.
At the same time, sales of disposable supplies used with our newborn hearing screeners were strong in the fourth quarter, and we expect continued growth throughout 2009 for these disposable supply products, added Hawkins. Throughout 2008 we were able to increase the average selling price of our AABR disposable, and we look for this trend to continue throughout 2009, bringing our margin on this product more in line with the margins earned by other medical device companies on proprietary disposable products.
Hawkins also stated, Our business model for the past four years has been driven by a combination of internal growth and accretive acquisitions. Because the current economic environment is very uncertain, we have taken an even more cautious approach in our evaluation of potential acquisition targets and of the terms under which we would engage in transactions. That being the case, we have held off on finalizing acquisitions that could potentially be consummated in the short term. However, we continue to engage in discussions with potential acquisition targets. Our strong balance sheet leaves us well positioned to be able to take advantage of future acquisition opportunities as they present themselves.
Forecasting our future business has become much more difficult due to a combination of a seemingly accelerating worldwide economic downturn, growing unemployment in the United States and its impact on healthcare providers, the deteriorating condition of financial institutions and the resultant freezing of credit markets, and forecasts of reduced capital spending by hospitals, said Hawkins. In addition, we are dealing with a fluctuating U.S. dollar that may affect our international business. With that said, we believe our strong market position and unique niche products, combined with our world class sales organization, should allow Natus to continue to gain market share even in these uncertain times.
As of December 31, 2008 the Company had cash, cash equivalents, and short-term investments of $57.0 million, stockholders' equity of approximately $227 million, and working capital of approximately $102 million.
2009 Guidance
Natus reiterated the financial guidance that it released on January 20, 2009. While the Company has attempted to be prudent and conservative in providing the following financial guidance, it stressed the difficultly of accurately forecasting results in the current unsettled economic environment.
For fiscal 2009, the Company expects revenue to range from $166 million to $170 million and earnings per share to range from $0.57 to $0.61. For the first quarter of 2009, the Company expects revenue to range from $37 million to $38 million and earnings per share to range from $0.06 to $0.08. This compares to revenue of $36.9 million and earnings per share of $0.11 reported in the first quarter of 2009.
While the Company is forecasting net income to be flat in 2009 compared to 2008, earnings per share for 2009 will be impacted by the stock offerings the Company completed in April and May 2008, where the Company issued an aggregate of 5,485,500 shares of its common stock and raised approximately $100 million. The effect of these offerings will be particularly significant to the comparison of results for the first two quarters of 2009 versus the same periods in 2008, as the new shares were outstanding for only a portion of the second quarter of 2008.
The Companys 2009 guidance is on a GAAP basis, including the impact of expensing employee equity-based compensation, which the Company believes will be approximately $3.5 million. The Company also expects to record approximately $4.3 million of amortization expense associated with acquired intangible assets. All earnings per share amounts are on a diluted basis.
Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures
In addition to disclosing financial results calculated in accordance with GAAP, this release contains non-GAAP financial measures that exclude the effects of costs associated with the November 29, 2007 acquisition of Xltek, including hedging losses associated with funding the acquisition, a charge for in-process research and development, and employee-severance charges, all incurred in the fourth quarter of 2007. The Company believes that the presentation of results excluding these acquisition-related charges provides meaningful supplemental information to both management and investors that is indicative of the Company's core operating results. The Company also believes the in-process research and development charge is not indicative of resources devoted to ongoing research and development efforts. Therefore, the Company believes the non-GAAP financial measures facilitate comparison of operating results across reporting periods. A reconciliation between the Company's results of operations on a GAAP and non-GAAP basis for the periods reported is included as part of the condensed consolidated statements of operations at the end of the Company's financial results release.
The Company believes that both management and investors benefit from referring to these non-GAAP financial measures in assessing the Company's performance and when planning, forecasting, and analyzing future periods. The non-GAAP financial measures also facilitate management's internal comparisons to the Company's historical performance. The non-GAAP financial measures disclosed by the Company should not be considered a substitute for or superior to financial measures calculated in accordance with GAAP, and the financial results calculated in accordance with GAAP and reconciliations to those financial statements should be carefully evaluated.
Conference Call
Natus has scheduled an investment-community conference call to discuss this announcement beginning at 11:00 a.m. Eastern Time today (8:00 a.m. Pacific Time). Individuals interested in listening to the conference call may do so by dialing (866) 953-0762 for domestic callers, or (617) 399-3492 for international callers, and entering reservation code 79352876. A telephone replay will be available for 48 hours following the conclusion of the call by dialing (888) 286-8010 for domestic callers, or (617) 801-6888 for international callers, and entering reservation code 14778289.
The conference call also will be available real-time via the Internet at , and a recording of the call will be available on the Companys Web site for 90 days following the completion of the call.
http://investor.natus.com
About Natus Medical Incorporated
Natus is a leading provider of healthcare products used for the screening, detection, treatment, monitoring and tracking of common medical ailments in newborn care, hearing impairment, neurological dysfunction, epilepsy, sleep disorders, and balance and mobility disorders. Product offerings include computerized neurodiagnostic systems for audiology, neurology, polysomnography, and neonatology, as well as newborn care products such as hearing screening systems, phototherapy devices for the treatment of newborn jaundice, head-cooling products for the treatment of brain injury in newborns, and software systems for managing and tracking disorders and diseases for public health laboratories.
Additional information about Natus Medical can be found at .
www.natus.com
This press release contains forward-looking statements as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, particularly statements regarding the expectations, beliefs, plans, intentions and strategies of Natus. These forward-looking statements include, but are not limited to, statements regarding anticipated revenue and profitability for the first quarter and full year 2009, our ability to gain market share in future periods, our ability to increase the average selling price of disposable supplies and our ability to return to historic revenue and earnings growth rates. These statements are predictions based on current estimates and assumptions of our management as of the date of this press release and involve known and unknown risks, uncertainties, and other factors that may cause actual results, levels of activity, performance, or achievements to differ materially from those expressed or implied by the forward-looking statements. Natus cannot provide any assurance that its future results will meet expectations implied by the forward-looking statements. Our future results could differ materially due to a number of factors, including the effects of competition, the demand for our products and services, the impact of adverse global economic conditions on our target markets, our ability to expand our sales in international markets, our ability to maintain current sales levels in a mature domestic market, our ability to control costs, our ability to acquire businesses on attractive terms, or at all, and risks associated with bringing new products to market and integrating acquired businesses. Natus disclaims any obligation to update information contained in any forward-looking statement.
More information about potential risk factors that could affect the business and financial results of Natus is included in Natus' annual report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2007, and its quarterly reports on Form 10-Q, and in other reports filed from time to time by Natus with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission.
CONTACT: Natus Medical Incorporated Steven J. Murphy, Chief Financial Officer, 650-802-0400
InvestorRelations@Natus.com


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BABY/BABY-8K-20090403060231.txt.gz
TIME:20090403060231
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C.  20549
Form 8-K
Current Report
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported):
April 3, 2009
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
Natus Medical Incorporated
(Commission File Number)
000-33001
(Address of principal executive offices, with zip code)
1501 Industrial Road
San Carlos, CA  94070
(Registrants telephone number, including area code)
650-802-0400
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 - 
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 - 
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 - 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 - 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Item 2.02    Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
Attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1 and incorporated by reference herein is information regarding the Companys press release of April 3, 2009 announcing preliminary first quarter 2009 revenue and earnings per share.
Item 9.01.   Financial Statements and Exhibits.
SIGNATURES
          Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Index to Exhibits

Exhibit 99.1
Natus Medical Announces Preliminary 2009 First Quarter Results
SAN CARLOS, Calif.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--April 3, 2009-- (Nasdaq:BABY) today announced that it expects to report revenue for the first quarter of 2009 of approximately $32.5 million to $33.5 million, down 9% to 12% from revenue in the same period last year and below the $37 million to $38 million guidance provided earlier. The Companys revenue fell short of expectations primarily due to lower than expected sales of capital equipment. The Company estimates that diluted earnings per share for the quarter on a GAAP basis will be in the range of $0.01 to $0.02, falling below the Companys previous earnings estimate of $0.06 to $0.08 per share.
Natus Medical Incorporated
The severe worldwide economic downturn that began last year impacted our results for the first quarter of 2009. In response to this economic downturn and a growing uncertainty in the healthcare industry, hospitals have delayed capital equipment spending, said Jim Hawkins, President and Chief Executive Officer of the Company.
We have been working on several large capital equipment orders that were expected to ship in the first quarter. While these orders were not placed, we believe that they have been pushed out to later in the year and not lost. The exact timing of these orders, however, remains uncertain, said Hawkins.
At the same time, I am happy to report that sales of our ALGO hearing screening products were up on a year over year basis. We believe our market leading position in newborn hearing screening remains strong, even in these difficult economic times, added Hawkins.
Conference Call
Natus expects to report its complete 2009 first quarter financial results on April 30, 2009 and will hold a conference call on that day to discuss those results and its 2009 guidance. Dial-in and webcast access information will be made available prior to the call.
About Natus Medical Incorporated
Natus is a leading provider of healthcare products used for the screening, detection, treatment, monitoring and tracking of common medical ailments such as hearing impairment, neurological dysfunction, epilepsy, sleep disorders, and newborn care. Product offerings include computerized neurodiagnostic systems for audiology, neurology, polysomnography, and neonatology, as well as newborn care products such as hearing screening systems, phototherapy devices for the treatment of newborn jaundice, head-cooling products for the treatment of brain injury in newborns, and software systems for managing and tracking disorders and diseases for public health laboratories.
Additional information about Natus Medical can be found at .
www.natus.com
This press release contains forward-looking statements as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, particularly statements regarding the expectations, beliefs, plans, intentions and strategies of Natus. These forward-looking statements include, but are not limited to, statements regarding anticipated revenue and profitability for the first quarter of 2009. These statements relate to current estimates and assumptions of our management as of the date of this press release, and future events or Natus' future financial performance or results, and involve known and unknown risks, uncertainties and other factors that may cause actual results, levels of activity, performance, or achievements to differ materially from those expressed or implied by the forward-looking statements. Forward-looking statements are only predictions and the actual events or results may differ materially. Natus cannot provide any assurance that its future results or the results implied by the forward-looking statements will meet expectations. Our future results could differ materially due to a number of factors, including the effects of competition, the demand for our products and services, the impact of adverse global economic conditions on our target markets, our ability to expand our sales in international markets, our ability to maintain current sales levels in a mature domestic market, our ability to control costs, and risks associated with bringing new products to market and integrating acquired businesses. Natus disclaims any obligation to update information contained in any forward-looking statement.
More information about potential risk factors that could affect the business and financial results of Natus is included in Natus' annual report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2008, and its quarterly reports on Form 10-Q, and in other reports filed from time to time by Natus with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission.
CONTACT: Natus Medical Incorporated Steven J. Murphy, Chief Financial Officer, 650-802-0400
InvestorRelations@Natus.com


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BABY/BABY-8K-20090430071517.txt.gz
TIME:20090430071517
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C.  20549
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 OR 15(d) of
The Securities Exchange Act of 1934
Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported): April 30, 2009
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
[  ]  
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
[  ]  
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
[  ] 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
[  ] 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
ITEM 2.02     Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On April 30, 2009, Natus Medical Incorporated (the Company) is issuing a press release and holding a conference call regarding its financial results for the first fiscal quarter of 2009 ended March 31, 2009 and other financial information.  A copy of the press release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 to this Form 8-K.
The information in this Form 8-K and the exhibit attached hereto shall not be deemed filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the Exchange Act) or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that Section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
ITEM 9.01.     Financial Statements and Exhibits.
SIGNATURES
          Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Index to Exhibits

Exhibit 99.1
Natus Medical Announces 2009 First Quarter Financial Results
- Updates Guidance
SAN CARLOS, Calif.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--April 30, 2009-- (Nasdaq:BABY) today announced financial results for the three months ended March 31, 2009.
Natus Medical Incorporated
For the first quarter ended March 31, 2009, revenue decreased 10% to $33.4 million, compared to $36.9 million reported in the comparable quarter of the previous year. Net income was $787,000, or $0.03 per diluted share, for the first quarter of 2009, compared with net income of $2.6 million, or $0.11 per share, for the first quarter of 2008.
Jim Hawkins, President and Chief Executive Officer of the Company said, The severe worldwide economic downturn that started to impact our business in December 2008 continued to influence our results for the first quarter of 2009. In the quarter, we had been working on several large orders that were not placed as hospitals continue to reduce capital equipment expenditures. We believe that these orders have been pushed out and not lost. However, the exact timing of these orders remains uncertain.
At the same time, I am happy to report that sales of our ALGO hearing screening products were up on a year over year basis. We believe our market leading position in newborn hearing screening remains solid even in these difficult economic times, added Hawkins.
Hawkins also stated, We remain cautious in our evaluation of potential acquisitions and of the terms under which we would engage in transactions. However, we continue to have discussions with potential acquisition targets.
Forecasting our future business continues to be difficult due to a combination of the worldwide economic downturn, and growing unemployment in the United States and its impact on healthcare providers, said Hawkins.
As of March 31, 2009 the Company had cash, cash equivalents, and short-term investments of $62.2 million, stockholders' equity of approximately $228 million, and working capital of approximately $106 million.
2009 Guidance
The Company believes that the worldwide economic slowdown is having a more significant effect on the spending pattern of healthcare providers than it had expected in issuing its guidance for 2009, and these adverse conditions are reflected in its first quarter results. As a result the Company is updating its revenue and earnings guidance for 2009. In doing so the Company has attempted to be prudent and conservative; however, it stressed the difficultly of providing guidance in the current unsettled economic environment. Among other factors impacting the Companys ability to forecast results are uncertainty regarding the duration and full extent of the worldwide economic slowdown, growing unemployment in the United States and its impact on healthcare providers, the condition of financial institutions and the availability of credit, reduced capital spending by hospitals, and volatility of the U.S. Dollar against foreign currencies.
For the full year 2009, the Company now expects revenue to range from $143 million to $146 million and earnings per share to range from $0.31 to $0.34. The Company had previously said it expected that revenue would range from $166 million to $170 million and earnings per share would range from $0.57 to $0.61.
Natus also announced revenue and earnings guidance for the second quarter of 2009. For the second quarter 2009, the Company expects revenue to range from $34.5 million to $35.5 million and earnings per share to range from $0.05 to $0.06. This compares to revenue of $39.9 million and earnings per share of $0.15 reported in the second quarter of 2008.
The Companys guidance is on a GAAP basis, including the impact of expensing employee equity based compensation. All earnings per share amounts are on a diluted basis.
Conference Call
Natus has scheduled an investment-community conference call to discuss this announcement beginning at 11:00 a.m. Eastern Time today (8:00 a.m. Pacific Time). Individuals interested in listening to the conference call may do so by dialing (866) 713-8563 for domestic callers, or (617) 597-5311 for international callers, and entering reservation code 51679324. A telephone replay will be available for 48 hours following the conclusion of the call by dialing (888) 286-8010 for domestic callers, or (617) 801-6888 for international callers, and entering reservation code 67725313.
The conference call also will be available real-time via the Internet at , and a recording of the call will be available on the Companys Web site for 90 days following the completion of the call.
http://investor.natus.com
About Natus Medical Incorporated
Natus is a leading provider of healthcare products used for the screening, detection, treatment, monitoring and tracking of common medical ailments such as hearing impairment, neurological dysfunction, epilepsy, sleep disorders, and newborn care. Product offerings include computerized neurodiagnostic systems for audiology, neurology, polysomnography, and neonatology, as well as newborn care products such as hearing screening systems, phototherapy devices for the treatment of newborn jaundice, head-cooling products for the treatment of brain injury in newborns, and software systems for managing and tracking disorders and diseases for public health laboratories.
Additional information about Natus Medical can be found at .
www.natus.com
This press release contains forward-looking statements as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, particularly statements regarding the expectations, beliefs, plans, intentions and strategies of Natus. These forward-looking statements include, but are not limited to, statements regarding anticipated revenue and profitability for the second quarter and full year 2009. These statements relate to current estimates and assumptions of our management as of the date of this press release, and future events or Natus' future financial performance or results, and involve known and unknown risks, uncertainties and other factors that may cause actual results, levels of activity, performance, or achievements to differ materially from those expressed or implied by the forward-looking statements. Forward-looking statements are only predictions and the actual events or results may differ materially. Natus cannot provide any assurance that its future results or the results implied by the forward-looking statements will meet expectations. Our future results could differ materially due to a number of factors, including the effects of competition, the demand for our products and services, the impact of adverse global economic conditions on our target markets, our ability to expand our sales in international markets, our ability to maintain current sales levels in a mature domestic market, our ability to control costs, and risks associated with bringing new products to market and integrating acquired businesses. Natus disclaims any obligation to update information contained in any forward-looking statement.
More information about potential risk factors that could affect the business and financial results of Natus is included in Natus' annual report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2008, and its quarterly reports on Form 10-Q, and in other reports filed from time to time by Natus with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission.
CONTACT: Natus Medical Incorporated Steven J. Murphy, 650-802-0400 Chief Financial Officer
InvestorRelations@Natus.com


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BABY/BABY-8K-20090619134523.txt.gz
TIME:20090619134523
EVENTS:	Other Events
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On June 15, 2009, the Compensation Committee of the company's Board of Directors approved nonqualified stock option grants to the company's executive officers. The options vest in 48 equal monthly installments beginning on the date of grant and have an exercise price of $10.37 per share. The options will expire on the sixth anniversary of the date of grant. Each of Dr. Chung and Messrs. Mince, Murphy and Traverso were granted options to purchase 40,000 shares and Mr. Hawkins was granted an option to purchase 150,000 shares.
The Compensation Committee also approved restricted stock awards to the non-employee directors and executive officers of the company (with director awards effective immediately following the 2009 Annual Meeting on June 16, 2009). Each of Messrs. Gunst, Ludlum, Michael, and Moore and Ms. Engibous received an award of 8,500 shares of restricted stock that will vest in full on the first anniversary of the date of grant. The executive officers were awarded restricted stock that will vest as to 50% of the shares awarded on August 15, 2011 and 25% of the shares awarded on August 15, 2012 and August 15, 2013. Dr. Chung and Messrs. Mince, Murphy and Traverso each received 20,000 restricted shares and Mr. Hawkins received 75,000 restricted shares.
On June 16, 2009, Messrs. Gunst, Ludlum, Michael, and Moore and Ms. Engibous, constituting all of the non-employee directors of the company, each were granted a nonstatutory option to purchase 5,000 shares of the company's common stock at an exercise price of $10.37 per share pursuant to the annual formula grant provisions of the company's 2000 Director Stock Option Plan. The options vest in 12 equal monthly installments beginning on the date of grant and expire on the sixth anniversary of the date of grant.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BABY/BABY-8K-20090730060805.txt.gz
TIME:20090730060805
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C.  20549
Form 8-K
Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported):
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 OR 15(d) of
The Securities Exchange Act of 1934
July 30, 2009
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 - 
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 - 
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 - 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 - 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
ITEM 2.02   Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On July 30, 2009, Natus Medical Incorporated (the Company) is issuing a press release and holding a conference call regarding its financial results for the second fiscal quarter of 2009 ended June 30, 2009 and other financial information.  A copy of the press release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 to this Form 8-K.
The information in this Form 8-K and the exhibit attached hereto shall not be deemed filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the Exchange Act) or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that Section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
ITEM 9.01.  Financial Statements and Exhibits.
SIGNATURES
          Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Index to Exhibits

Exhibit 99.1
Natus Medical Announces 2009 Second Quarter Financial Results and Increases 2009 Guidance
SAN CARLOS, Calif.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--July 30, 2009-- (Nasdaq:BABY) today announced financial results for the three and six months ended June 30, 2009.
Natus Medical Incorporated
For the second quarter ended June 30, 2009, Natus reported revenue of $37.3 million, compared to $39.9 million reported in the comparable quarter of the previous year. Net income was $2.3 million, or $0.08 per diluted share, for the second quarter of 2009, compared with net income of $3.8 million, or $0.15 per diluted share, for the second quarter of 2008.
For the six months ended June 30, 2009, the Company reported net income of $3.1 million, or $0.11 per diluted share, compared to net income of $6.4 million, or $0.26 per diluted share, for the comparable period in 2008.
We are pleased with our second quarter results, even though our revenue was down compared to last year, as we were able to outperform on our expectations, said Jim Hawkins, President and Chief Executive Officer of the Company. This is extremely satisfying since we believe hospitals continue to significantly limit spending on capital equipment.
The strength of our sales in the second quarter was across our newborn hearing, neurology, and newborn care product lines. Our international business also performed well, added Hawkins. I am also happy to report that we generated $7 million in cash during the quarter.
We expect continued stabilization in our core businesses and to have sequential revenue and earnings growth, stated Hawkins.
As of June 30, 2009 the Company had cash, cash equivalents, and short-term investments of $68.6 million, stockholders' equity of approximately $233 million, and working capital of approximately $111 million.
2009 Guidance
Natus increased its revenue and earnings guidance for the full year 2009 and provided guidance for the third and fourth quarters. For the full year 2009, the Company now expects revenue to range from $149 million to $151 million and earnings per share to range from $0.35 to $0.37. The Company had previously said it expected that revenue would range from $143 million to $146 million and earnings per share would range from $0.31 to $0.34.
For the third quarter 2009, the Company expects revenue to range from $38 million to $39 million and earnings per share to range from $0.10 to $0.11. This compares to revenue of $41.7 million and earnings per share of $0.17 reported in the third quarter of 2008.
For the fourth quarter of 2009, the Company expects revenue to range from $40 million to $41 million and earnings per share to range from $0.14 to $0.15. This compares to revenue of $43.4 million dollars and earnings of per share of $0.22 reported in the fourth quarter of 2008.
The Companys 2009 guidance is on a GAAP basis, including the impact of expensing employee equity based compensation; however, it does not include the impact of any acquisition-related charges associated with the Hawaii Medical acquisition or other acquisition or restructuring related charges that may be incurred in 2009. All earnings per share amounts are on a diluted basis.
Conference Call
Natus has scheduled an investment-community conference call to discuss this announcement beginning at 11:00 a.m. Eastern Time today (8:00 a.m. Pacific Time). Individuals interested in listening to the conference call may do so by dialing (866) 788-0542 for domestic callers, or (857) 350-1680 for international callers, and entering reservation code 84103764. A telephone replay will be available for 48 hours following the conclusion of the call by dialing (888) 286-8010 for domestic callers, or (617) 801-6888 for international callers, and entering reservation code 77768428.
The conference call also will be available real-time via the Internet at , and a recording of the call will be available on the Companys Web site for 90 days following the completion of the call.
http://investor.natus.com
About Natus Medical Incorporated
Natus is a leading provider of healthcare products used for the screening, detection, treatment, monitoring and tracking of common medical ailments such as hearing impairment, neurological dysfunction, epilepsy, sleep disorders, and newborn care. Product offerings include computerized neurodiagnostic systems for audiology, neurology, polysomnography, and neonatology, as well as newborn care products such as hearing screening systems, phototherapy devices for the treatment of newborn jaundice, head-cooling products for the treatment of brain injury in newborns, and software systems for managing and tracking disorders and diseases for public health laboratories.
Additional information about Natus Medical can be found at .
www.natus.com
This press release contains forward-looking statements as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, particularly statements regarding the expectations, beliefs, plans, intentions and strategies of Natus. These forward-looking statements include, but are not limited to, statements regarding anticipated revenue and profitability for the third and fourth quarters and full year 2009 and stabilization of the Companys core business in the third and fourth quarters of 2009. These statements relate to current estimates and assumptions of our management as of the date of this press release, and future events or Natus' future financial performance or results, and involve known and unknown risks, uncertainties and other factors that may cause actual results, levels of activity, performance, or achievements to differ materially from those expressed or implied by the forward-looking statements. Forward-looking statements are only predictions and the actual events or results may differ materially. Natus cannot provide any assurance that its future results or the results implied by the forward-looking statements will meet expectations. Our future results could differ materially due to a number of factors, including the effects of competition, the demand for our products and services, the impact of adverse global economic conditions on our target markets, our ability to expand our sales in international markets, our ability to maintain current sales levels in a mature domestic market, our ability to control costs, and risks associated with bringing new products to market and integrating acquired businesses. Natus disclaims any obligation to update information contained in any forward-looking statement.
More information about potential risk factors that could affect the business and financial results of Natus is included in Natus' annual report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2008, and its quarterly reports on Form 10-Q, and in other reports filed from time to time by Natus with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission.
CONTACT: Natus Medical Incorporated Steven J. Murphy, 650-802-0400 Chief Financial Officer
InvestorRelations@Natus.com


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BABY/BABY-8K-20090916122602.txt.gz
TIME:20090916122602
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Completion of Acquisition or Disposition of Assets	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Completion of Acquisition or Disposition of Assets
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 1.01 Entry into a material definitive agreement
Execution of Agreement and Plan of Merger
On September 14, 2009 Natus Medical Incorporated ("Natus", the "Company") executed an Agreement and Plan of Merger (the "Merger Agreement") among the Company, Squaw Acquisition Corporation, and Alpine Biomed Holdings Corp. ("Alpine") providing for the Company's acquisition of all of the outstanding shares of capital stock of Alpine for a cash price of $43.2 million. The Merger Agreement includes an earn-out provision that provides for the payment of up to $3.8 million of additional cash consideration depending upon Alpine sales for calendar 2009. Alpine, a privately-held company headquartered in Fountain Valley, California, with operations in Montreal, Canada and Copenhagen, Denmark, and sales subsidiaries in France and Germany, develops, manufactures, and sells devices for the diagnosis of neurological disorders.
Financing for the transaction was provided by Natus' existing cash balances, and based on cash and short-term investments held at June 30, 2009, Natus retains cash of approximately $25 million before giving any effect to potential earn-out payments in the transaction.
The foregoing description of the Merger Agreement does not purport to be complete and is qualified in its entirety by reference to the complete copy of the Merger Agreement, which is attached hereto as Exhibit 2.1 and incorporated herein by reference.
Item 2.01 Completion of Acquisition or Disposition of Assets
Acquisition of Alpine Biomed.
On September 14, 2009, the Company completed the acquisition of Alpine pursuant to the Merger Agreement. The description of the acquisition transaction is provided in Item 1.01 above. Direct costs associated with the acquisition cannot be reasonably determined at this time.
On September 14, 2009, the Company issued a press release announcing the entry into the Merger Agreement and other details of the acquisition, a copy of which is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits
(d) The following exhibits are filed herewith:
Exhibits.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 2.1
Execution Version
CONFIDENTIAL
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
This AGREEMENT AND PLAN OF MERGER is made and entered into as of September 14, 2009 (this ""), among Natus Medical Incorporated, a Delaware corporation (""), Squaw Acquisition Corporation, a Delaware corporation and a wholly-owned Subsidiary of Parent (""), and Alpine Biomed Holdings Corp., a Delaware corporation (the "").
Agreement
Parent
Merger Sub
Company
A. The Company has historically conducted two lines of business, a neurodiagnostic business and a gastrodiagnostic business. The parties intend that Parent will acquire the Company's neurodiagnostic business through the acquisition of the Company as provided herein.
B. The parties intend that, subject to the terms and conditions hereinafter set forth, Merger Sub shall merge with and into the Company (the ""), with the Company to be the surviving corporation of the Merger (the ""), on the terms and subject to the conditions of this Agreement and pursuant to the General Corporation Law of the State of Delaware (the "").
Merger
Surviving Corporation
DGCL
C. The Board of Directors of each of Parent and Merger Sub has determined that the Merger is in the best interests of their respective companies. The Board of Directors of the Company (the "") has determined that the Merger is in the best interests of the Company, and, subject to the terms and conditions of this Agreement, to recommend to the Company Stockholder the approval of this Agreement and the Merger.
Board
D. Parent, Merger Sub and the Company desire to make certain representations, warranties, covenants and agreements in connection with the Merger and to prescribe various conditions to the Merger.
NOW, THEREFORE, in consideration of the foregoing and the mutual covenants and agreements herein contained, and intending to be legally bound hereby, Parent, Merger Sub and the Company hereby agree as follows:
1.01
.
Definitions
(a) For purposes of this Agreement:
"" of a specified person means a person who, directly or indirectly through one or more intermediaries, controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with, such specified person.
affiliate
"" means (A) Forty Three Million One Hundred Sixty Five Thousand Dollars ($43,165,000), minus (B) the sum of (i) Transaction Expenses and (ii) the Indebtedness Payoff Amount.
Aggregate Merger Consideration
"" means Alpine Biomed Corp., a California corporation.
Alpine Biomed Corp.
 
"" means Alpine Vietnam Co. Ltd., a company organized under the laws of Vietnam.
AlpineVietnam
"" means any day on which the principal offices of the SEC in Washington, D.C. are open to accept filings, or, in the case of determining a date when any payment is due, any day (other than a Saturday or Sunday) on which banks are not required or authorized to close in the City of San Francisco, California.
business day
"" means an amount equal to (A) the Post Preference Merger Consideration divided by (B) the sum of the issued and outstanding shares of Company Common Stock and Company Series A Stock.
Common Merger Consideration
"" has the meaning ascribed to such term in the introductory paragraph of this Agreement.
Company
"" means the Company Common Stock, the Company Preferred Stock, the Company Options, and any other rights to acquire capital stock of the Company from the Company.
Company Capital Stock
"" means the common stock, par value $0.01 per share, of the Company.
Company Common Stock
"" means the audited consolidated financial statements of the Company and its Subsidiaries for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2008 and the unaudited consolidated financial statements of the Company and its Subsidiaries for the fiscal period commencing January 1, 2009 and ended June 30, 2009.
Company Financial Statements
"" means all IT Systems used in or held for use in connection with the business of the Company and its Subsidiaries.
Company IT Systems
"" means a holder of Company Options.
Company Optionholder
"" means all options and warrants to purchase or otherwise acquire shares of capital stock (or options, warrants or other rights to purchase or otherwise acquire shares of capital stock) of the Company from the Company.
Company Options
"" means the Company Series A Stock.
Company Preferred Stock
"" means the unaudited consolidated financial statements of the Company and its Subsidiaries for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2008 and for the fiscal period commencing January 1, 2009 and ended June 30, 2009, in each case adjusted to give effect to the Gastrodiagnostic Business Distribution as though it had occurred on the last day of the fiscal year preceding the fiscal year that ended on December 31, 2008.
Company Pro Forma Financial Statements
"" means the Company's merger with and into Alpine Biomed Merger Sub Corp., a Delaware corporation that is a wholly-owned subsidiary of the Company Stockholder, pursuant to which the Company is the surviving corporation and a wholly-owned subsidiary of the Company Stockholder pursuant to the agreements and documents set forth in to this Agreement.
Company Reorganization
Schedule V
 
"" means the Company Stockholder and the Company Optionholders collectively.
Company Securityholders
"" means the Series A Convertible Participating Preferred Stock, par value $0.01 per share, of the Company.
Company Series A Stock
"" means a holder of Company Common Stock or Company Preferred Stock.
Company Stockholder
"" or "" means the presence (actual or reasonably suspected) of Hazardous Substances in, on or under the soil, groundwater, surface water or other environmental media or any structure or improvement, if any investigatory, remedial, removal reporting or other response action is required or legally could be required by a governmental authority under any Environmental Law with respect to such presence or suspected presence of Hazardous Substances, or if such response action otherwise is reasonable or appropriate under the circumstances.
Contamination
Contaminated
"" (including the terms "" and "under "") means the possession, directly or indirectly, of the power to direct or cause the direction of the management and policies of a person, whether through the ownership of voting securities or by contract or otherwise.
control
controlled by
common control with
"" means any payment in respect of Dissenting Shares in excess of the amount of cash that would have been issuable pursuant to Section 2.01(b) in respect of such shares or interests had they never been Dissenting Shares. Dissenting Shares Excess Payments shall constitute "Damages" for purposes of without regard to the Basket.
Dissenting Shares Excess Payments
Article VIII
"" means the time of the filing of the Certificate of Merger (or such later time as may be mutually agreed in writing by the Company and Parent and specified in the Certificate of Merger).
Effective Time
"" means any United States federal, state, local or non United States laws, statutes, ordinances, regulations, rules, codes, orders, other requirements of law and common law relating to (i) releases or threatened releases of Hazardous Substances or materials containing Hazardous Substances; (ii) exposure or alleged exposure to Hazardous Substances; (iii) the manufacture, handling, transport, recycling, reclamation, use, treatment, storage or disposal of Hazardous Substances or materials containing Hazardous Substances; or (iv) pollution, natural resource damages or protection of the environment, health or safety.
Environmental Laws
"" means any trade or business (whether or not incorporated) under common control with the Company and which, together with the Company, is treated as a single employer within the meaning of Section 414(b), (c), (m) or (o) of the Code.
ERISA Affiliate
 
"" means Wells Fargo Bank, N.A. or such other financial institution as is reasonably acceptable to Parent and the Company.
Escrow Agent
"" means an amount of cash equal to $3,000,000.
Escrow Cash
"" means the Securities and Exchange Act of 1934, as amended.
Exchange Act
"" means that certain Delaware limited liability company named as the "Company," together with its successors and authorized assigns, in the Contribution Agreement dated as of September 4, 2009 between such company and Alpine Biomed Corp. and included as part of the Gastrodiagnostic Business Distribution Documents.
Gastro Company
"" means the business of the Company and its Subsidiaries of designing, manufacturing, marketing, selling, distributing, licensing and supporting the Gastrodiagnostic Products.
Gastrodiagnostic Business
"" means Alpine Biomed Corp.'s assignment, transfer and conveyance to Gastro Company of the Gastrodiagnostic Products, the Gastrodiagnostic Business and related assets of Alpine Biomed Corp. used to operate the Gastrodiagnostic Business, and Alpine Biomed Corp.'s assignment to Gastro Company, and Gastro Company's assumption of the Retained Liabilities associated with the Gastrodiagnostic Products, the Gastrodiagnostic Business and such assets and issuance of equity interests of Gastro Company in consideration therefor, and Alpine Biomed Corp.'s subsequent distribution of such equity interests to the Company and/or by the Company to the Company Stockholder.
Gastrodiagnostic Business Distribution
"" means the agreements set forth in to this Agreement, together with any related documents, assignments, consents and/or novations, certificates or instruments executed in connection therewith, used to effectuate the Gastrodiagnostic Business Distribution as in effect on the Spin-Off Date.
Gastrodiagnostic Business Distribution Documents
Schedule III
"" means the diagnostic equipment, products, accessories and related services of the Company and its Subsidiaries designed, manufactured, marketed, sold, distributed, licensed and supported in the operation of the gastrodiagnostic or gastroenterology business of the Company and such Subsidiaries, as set forth in of of this Agreement.
Gastrodiagnostic Products
Part A
Schedule I
"" means (i) those substances defined in or regulated under the following United States federal statutes and their state and local counterparts, as each may be amended from time to time, and all regulations thereunder: the Hazardous Materials Transportation Act, the Resource Conservation and Recovery Act, the Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation and Liability Act, the Clean Water Act, the Safe Drinking Water Act, the Atomic Energy Act, the Federal Insecticide, Fungicide, and Rodenticide Act and the Clean Air Act; (ii) petroleum and petroleum products, including crude oil and any fractions thereof; (iii) natural gas, synthetic gas, and any mixtures thereof; and (iv) polychlorinated biphenyls, asbestos, mold and radon.
Hazardous Substances
 
"" means the following laws or regulations relating to the regulation of the healthcare industry (as such laws are currently enforced or as interpreted at the Effective Time by existing, publicly available judicial and administrative decisions and regulations): (i) Sections 1877, 1128, 1128A or 1128B of the Social Security Act (the ""); (ii) the licensure, certification or registration requirements of healthcare facilities, services or equipment; (iii) any state certificate of need or similar law governing the establishment of healthcare facilities or services or the making of healthcare capital expenditures; (iv) any state law relating to fee-splitting or the corporate practice of medicine; (v) any state physician self-referral prohibition or state anti-kickback law; (vi) any criminal offense relating to the delivery of, or claim for payment for, a healthcare item or service under any federal or state healthcare program; and (vii) any federal or state law relating to the interference with or obstruction of any investigation into any criminal offense.
Healthcare Law
SSA
"" means, collectively, all of the following worldwide legal rights, whether or not filed, perfected, registered or recorded, that may exist under the laws of any jurisdiction to and under all: (i) patents, patent applications, statutory invention registrations, patent rights, including all continuations, continuations-in-part, divisions, reissues, reexaminations or extensions thereof, whether now existing or hereafter filed, issues or acquired, and all inventions, whether or not patentable, (ii) trademarks, service marks, domain names, (including, but not limited to Internet domain names, Internet and World Wide Web URLs, and domain name registrations and pending applications therefor) trade dress, logos, trade names, corporate names, and other identifiers of source or goodwill, including registrations and applications for registration thereof, (iii) rights associated with works of authorship (including audiovisual works) including mask works and copyrights, including copyrights in Software, and registrations and applications for registration thereof, and (iv) rights relating to the protection of trade secrets, know-how, invention rights, and other confidential or proprietary technical, business and other information, including manufacturing and production processes and techniques, research and development information, technology, drawings, specifications, designs, plans, proposals, technical data, financial, marketing and business data, pricing and cost information, business and marketing plans, customer and supplier lists and information, and all rights in any jurisdiction to limit the use or disclosure thereof.
Intellectual Property
"" means computer systems, programs, networks, hardware, Software, databases, operating systems, Internet websites, website content and links and equipment used to process, store, maintain and operate data, information and functions.
IT Systems
"" means the actual knowledge of John Arnott, Richard Drinkward, William Brown, Zaida De Leon, Willy Weinmann, Erik Jensen and Alex Sigal. Each of John Arnott, Richard Drinkward, William Brown, Zaida De Leon, Willy Weinmann, Erik Jensen and Alex Sigal will be deemed to have actual knowledge of a matter if such knowledge would reasonably be expected to be known by an individual who has the duties and responsibilities of such person in the customary performance of such duties and responsibilities.
knowledge of the Company" or the "Company's knowledge
"" or "" means any debt, liability and obligation, whether accrued or fixed, absolute or contingent, matured or unmatured, determined or determinable, known or unknown, including those arising under any law, action or government order and those arising under any contract.
Liability
Liabilities
 
"" means Intellectual Property licensed to the Company or any of its Subsidiaries pursuant to the Licenses.
Licensed Intellectual Property
"" means all licenses, sublicenses and other contracts pursuant to which the Company or any of its Subsidiaries acquired or is authorized to use or exercise any third party Intellectual Property.
Licenses
"" means, when used in connection with the Company, any event, circumstance, change or effect that, individually or in the aggregate with any other events, circumstances, changes and effects occurring after the date hereof, is or would reasonably be expected to be materially adverse to (i) the business, condition (financial or otherwise), assets, liabilities or results of operations of the Company and its Subsidiaries taken as a whole or (ii) the ability of the Company to consummate the Merger, except to the extent that such effect is caused by, or results from changes in general economic conditions or changes affecting the industry in which the Company operates generally (provided that such changes do not affect the Company and its Subsidiaries in a substantially disproportionate manner).
Material Adverse Effect
"" means the Common Stock, par value $0.01 per share, of Merger Sub.
Merger Sub Common Stock
"" means the business of the Company and its Subsidiaries of designing, manufacturing, marketing, selling, distributing, licensing and supporting the Neurodiagnostic Products.
Neurodiagnostic Business
"" means the diagnostic equipment, products, accessories and related services of the Company and its Subsidiaries designed, manufactured, marketed, sold, distributed, licensed and supported in the operation of the neurodiagnostic or neurology business of the Company and such Subsidiaries.
Neurodiagnostic Products
"" means Alpine Gastro Corp., a Delaware corporation.
New Co.
"" means any and all Liabilities, including, without limitation, any severance, bonus, termination or similar obligation arising out of, resulting from, related to or in connection with the termination by the Company or any of its Subsidiaries of those employees identified on .
New Co. Employee Severance Liabilities
Schedule VI
"" means any Intellectual Property that is owned or purportedly owned by or exclusively licensed to the Company or any of its Subsidiaries.
Owned Intellectual Property
"" means an individual, corporation, partnership, limited partnership, limited liability company, syndicate, trust, association or entity or government, political subdivision, agency or instrumentality of a government.
person
"" means the positive difference of (i) the Aggregate Merger Consideration over (ii) the aggregate amount of Merger Consideration to be paid to the holders of Company Preferred Stock pursuant to Section 2.01(b)(ii).
Post Preference Merger Consideration
 
"" means any Owned Intellectual Property subject of an application, certificate, filing, registration or other document issued, filed with, or recorded by any governmental bodies in the United States or applicable foreign jurisdictions, including, but not limited to, any United States, international and foreign: (A) patents and patent applications (including provisional applications); (B) registered trademarks, applications to register trademarks, intent-to-use applications, or other registrations or applications related to trademarks; (C) registered Internet domain names; and (D) registered copyrights and applications for copyright registration.
Registered Intellectual Property
"" means the Securities and Exchange Commission.
SEC
"" means (i) the assignment, transfer and conveyance by the Company or Alpine Biomed Corp. of the capital stock of Alpine Vietnam, certain IT Systems owned by the Company or its Subsidiaries and certain other assets and rights, in each case as set forth in of (the ""), to New Co., and New Co.'s assumption of the Retained Liabilities associated with the Second Spin Business and issuance of equity interests in New Co. to the Company in consideration therefor, and the subsequent distribution by the Company of such equity interests to the Company Stockholder as of immediately prior to the Second Spin-Off Date, and (ii) the Company's or its applicable Subsidiary's, as applicable, termination of those employees identified on .
Second Spin and Distribution
Part B
Schedule I
Second Spin Business
Schedule VI
"" means the agreements set forth in to this Agreement, together with any related documents, assignments, consents and/or novations, certificates or instruments executed in connection therewith, used to effectuate the Second Spin and Distribution as in effect on the Second Spin-Off Date.
Second Spin and Distribution Documents
Schedule IV
"" means the Closing Date but shall be deemed to refer to such time of day on the Closing Date that is immediately prior to the Effective Time.
Second Spin-Off Date
"" means the Securities Act of 1933, as amended.
Securities Act
"" means licenses of generally commercially available off-the-shelf Software licensed pursuant to shrink-wrap, click-wrap licenses or other similar licenses.
Shrink Wrap Software
"" means computer software, programs and databases in any form, including Internet web sites, web content and links, all versions, updates, corrections, enhancements, and modifications thereof, and all related documentation.
Software
"" or "" of the Company, the Surviving Corporation, Parent, as applicable, or any other person means an affiliate controlled by such person, directly or indirectly through one or more intermediaries.
Subsidiary
Subsidiaries
"" shall mean (i) any and all taxes, fees, levies, duties, tariffs, imposts and other similar charges of any kind (together with any and all interest, penalties, additions to tax and additional amounts imposed with respect thereto) imposed by any Governmental Authority or taxing authority, including, without limitation: taxes or other charges on or with respect to income, franchise, windfall or other profits, gross receipts, property, sales, use, capital stock, payroll, employment, social security, workers' compensation, unemployment compensation or
Taxes
 
net worth; taxes or other charges in the nature of excise, withholding, ad valorem, stamp, transfer, value-added or gains taxes; license, registration and documentation fees; and customers' duties, tariffs and similar charges, and (ii) any Liability for the payment of any amounts of the type described in clause (i) of this sentence as a result of being a member of an affiliated, consolidated, combined, unitary or aggregate group for any Taxable period, and (iii) any Liability for the payment of any amounts of the type described in clause (i) or (ii) above as a result of being a transferee of or successor to any Person or as a result of any express or implied obligation to assume such Taxes or to indemnify any other Person.
"" means any return, report, schedule, declaration, estimate or election (including attachments to any of the foregoing) filed or required to be filed with any Governmental Authority or taxing authority with respect to Taxes.
Tax Return
"" means all third party fees and expenses incurred by the Company in connection with the Merger and this Agreement and the transactions contemplated hereby whether or not billed or accrued (including any fees and expenses of legal counsel and accountants, the maximum amount of fees and expenses payable to financial advisors, investment bankers and brokers of the Company and the Subsidiaries notwithstanding any contingencies for earnouts, escrows, etc., and any such fees incurred by Company Securityholders paid for or to be paid for by the Company).
Transaction Expenses
(b) The following terms have the meaning set forth in the Sections set forth below:
 
 
 
2.01
Conversion of the Shares; Earnout Consideration
(a) . At the Effective Time, each share of Merger Sub Common Stock that is issued and outstanding immediately prior to the Effective Time shall be converted into one validly issued, fully paid and nonassessable share of Common Stock, par value $0.01 per share, of the Surviving Corporation, and the shares of the Surviving Corporation into which the shares of Merger Sub Common Stock are so converted shall be the only shares of Company Capital Stock that are issued and outstanding immediately after the Effective Time.
Conversion of Merger Sub Common Stock
(b) .
Conversion of Company Capital Stock
(i) . Subject to the terms and conditions of this Agreement, at the Effective Time, each share of Company Common Stock and Company Series A Stock that is issued and outstanding immediately prior to the Effective Time shall, by virtue of the Merger and without the need for any further action on the part of the holder thereof (except as expressly provided herein), be converted into and represent the right to receive an amount of cash, without interest, equal to the Common Merger Consideration. The preceding provisions of this Section 2.01(b)(i) are subject to the provisions of Section 2.01(c) (regarding rights of holders of Dissenting Shares) and Section 2.03 (regarding the withholding of Escrow Cash).
Company Common Stock
(ii) . Subject to the terms and conditions of this Agreement, at the Effective Time, each share of Company Series A Stock that is issued and outstanding immediately prior to the Effective Time shall, by virtue of the Merger and without the need for any further action on the part of the holder thereof (except
Company Series A Stock
 
as expressly provided herein), be converted into and represent the right to receive an amount of cash, without interest, equal to $0.615164381723721, plus all accrued and unpaid dividends thereon, in an aggregate amount equal to $27,087,683. The preceding provisions of this Section 2.01(b)(ii) are subject to the provisions of Section 2.01(c) (regarding rights of holders of Dissenting Shares) and Section 2.03 (regarding the withholding of Escrow Cash).
The dollar amounts specified in subparagraphs (i) and (ii) of this Section 2.01(b) with respect to the Company Common Stock and the Company Series A Stock are hereinafter sometimes referred to herein as the "," provided that the aggregate amount of Merger Consideration payable to the Company Stockholder under Section 2.01(b) of this Agreement and as a result of the Merger shall not in any case exceed the Aggregate Merger Consideration.
Merger Consideration
(c) . As more fully set forth in Section 7.03, holders of shares of Company Capital Stock who have complied with all requirements for perfecting dissenters' rights, as set forth in the DGCL, shall be entitled to their rights under the DGCL with respect to such shares.
Dissenting Shares
(d) . Notwithstanding Section 2.01(b), (i) each share of Company Capital Stock held by the Company immediately prior to the Effective Time, and (ii) each Company Option that is issued and outstanding immediately prior to the Effective Time, shall in each case, by virtue of the Merger and without the need for any further action on the part of the holder hereof (except as expressly provided herein), be cancelled and extinguished without any conversion thereof or payment therefor.
Cancellation of Certain Shares and Company Options
(e) . The Company Stockholder shall be entitled to the additional earnout amount set forth below as determined by future Company Gross Revenue (as defined below) for the Earnout Period described below on the following terms:
Earnout Consideration
(i) The earnout period shall begin on January 1, 2009 and shall end on December 31, 2009 (the "").
Earnout Period
(ii) The threshold amount for the Earnout Period shall be $35,000,000 (the "").
Earnout Threshold
(iii) The earnout amount payable for the Earnout Period shall be the product of (A) the excess, if any, of Company Gross Revenue during the Earnout Period over the Earnout Threshold, multiplied by (B) 1.25 (the ""); the maximum amount of Earnout Consideration shall not exceed $3,750,000.
Earnout Consideration
provided that
(iv) . For any payments due to the Company Stockholder pursuant to clauses (i), (ii) and (iii) of Section 2.01(e), Parent shall pay to the Company Stockholder cash in the applicable earnout amount. Within seventy-five (75) days after the close of the Earnout Period, Parent shall deliver to the Company Stockholder a certificate of the Chief Financial Officer, Treasurer or Controller of Parent certifying on behalf of Parent the amount of Company Gross Revenue for the Earnout Period and the amount of any Earnout Consideration, if any, payable to the
Payments; Review of Books and Records
 
Company Stockholder. Within ten (10) days of the receipt of a certificate from the Chief Financial Officer, Treasurer or Controller of Parent on behalf of Parent indicating that Earnout Consideration is payable to the Company Stockholder, the Company Stockholder shall provide written notice to Parent indicating wire transfer instructions for the account into which Parent is to pay such Earnout Consideration, if applicable. The parties intend that, for tax purposes, the payments (set forth in subsections (i) through (iii) above) to qualify for installment sale treatment under 453 of the Code. Such payments shall be treated as imputed interest to the extent required by the Code. On at least fifteen (15) days prior written notice from the Company Stockholder to Parent given within thirty (30) days after the Company's Stockholder's receipt of the foregoing certificate from Parent, the Company Stockholder shall have a right to audit the books and records of the Company to verify Company Gross Revenue for the Earnout Period.
(v) . If the Company Stockholder disagrees with Parent's calculation of the Earnout Consideration payable to the Company Stockholder for the Earnout Period, the Company Stockholder shall deliver to Parent, by the date 45 days after the date on which Parent shall have delivered to the Company Stockholder the certificate indicating the amount of Company Gross Revenue and any applicable Earnout Consideration payable to the Company Stockholder for the Earnout Period (the ""), a reasonably detailed statement describing its objections (if any) to Parent's calculations and its assertion of the appropriate calculation of Earnout Consideration. If the Company Stockholder timely objects to such calculations from Parent and offers its own calculation, such objections shall be resolved as follows:
Disagreements over Earnout Consideration
Objection Deadline Date
(A) Parent and the Company Stockholder shall first use reasonable efforts to resolve such objections.
(B) If Parent and the Company Stockholder do not reach a resolution of all objections set forth on the Company Stockholder's statement of objections within 30 days after delivery of such statement of objections, Parent and the Company Stockholder shall, within 30 days following the expiration of such 30-day period, engage an Arbitrating Accountant (as defined below), pursuant to an engagement agreement executed by Parent, the Company Stockholder and the Arbitrating Accountant, to resolve any remaining objections set forth on the Company Stockholder's statement of objections and its calculation (the ""). "" shall mean an accountant selected by Parent and reasonably acceptable to the Company Stockholder, which has not performed services for Parent or the Company Stockholder.
Unresolved Objections
Arbitrating Accountant
(C) Parent and the Company Stockholder shall jointly submit to the Arbitrating Accountant, within 10 days after the date of the engagement of the Arbitrating Accountant (as evidenced by the date of the engagement agreement), a copy of such calculations of the Earnout Consideration, a copy of the statement of objections delivered by the Company Stockholder to Parent, and a statement setting forth the resolution of any objections agreed to by Parent and the Company Stockholder. Each of Parent and the Company Stockholder shall
 
submit to the Arbitrating Accountant (with a copy delivered to the other party on the same day), within 45 days after the date of the engagement of the Arbitrating Accountant, a memorandum (which may include supporting exhibits) setting forth their respective positions on the Unresolved Objections. Each of Parent and the Company Stockholder may (but shall not be required to) submit to the Arbitrating Accountant (with a copy delivered to the other party on the same day), within 60 days after the date of the engagement of the Arbitrating Accountant, a memorandum responding to the initial memorandum submitted to the Arbitrating Accountant by the other party. Unless expressly requested in writing by the Arbitrating Accountant in a request made known to both Parent and the Company Stockholder, neither party may present any additional information or arguments to the Arbitrating Accountant, either orally or in writing.
(D) Within 90 days after the date of its engagement hereunder, the Arbitrating Accountant shall determine whether the objections raised by the Company Stockholder are valid in light of the definition of Company Gross Revenue contained herein and the calculation of Earnout Consideration under Section 2.01(e)(iii) and shall issue a ruling which shall include a calculation of the Earnout Consideration for the Earnout Period in accordance with Section 2.01(e), as adjusted pursuant to any resolutions to objections agreed upon by Parent and the Company Stockholder and pursuant to the Arbitrating Accountant's resolution of the Unresolved Objections. Such calculation of the Earnout Consideration for the Earnout Period shall be deemed to be final.
(E) The resolution by the Arbitrating Accountant of the Unresolved Objections shall be conclusive and binding upon Parent and the Company Stockholder. Parent and the Company Stockholder agree that the procedure set forth in this Section 2.01(e)(v) for resolving disputes with respect to the payout of the Earnout Consideration for the Earnout Period shall be the sole and exclusive method for resolving any such disputes; provided that this provision shall not prohibit either party from instituting litigation to enforce the ruling of the Arbitrating Accountant.
(F) The fees and expenses of the Arbitrating Accountant shall be borne by Parent or the Company Securityholders depending on which party's calculation of the Earnout Consideration is furthest away from the final Earnout Consideration determined by the Arbitrating Accountant (and to the extent that the Company Stockholder's calculation of the Earnout Consideration is furthest away from that determined by the Arbitrating Accountant, Parent and the Company Stockholder shall cause the Escrow Agent to deduct such fees and expenses of the Arbitrating Accountant and to pay such amount to Parent).
(vi) . For purposes of this Agreement, "" for the Earnout Period shall be the aggregate amount of gross revenue, as determined in accordance with GAAP (as in effect on the Closing Date) and as consistently applied by the Company in the Company Financial Statements, of the Company from sales of the Earnout Products and Services in the Earnout Period. Any
Company Gross Revenue
Company Gross Revenue
 
subsequent change in GAAP that would adversely affect Company Gross Revenue shall not be taken into account for purposes of calculating Company Gross Revenue for purposes of this Agreement (regardless of how Company Gross Revenue is accounted for other purposes such as Parent's reporting or internal accounting). For purposes of determining Company Gross Revenue for the Earnout Period, Parent shall not impose on the Company any adjustment or charge in the nature of a general and administrative, management or similar adjustment or charge.
(vii) . For purposes of this Agreement, "" shall mean each of the products and services currently produced, manufactured, marketed, licensed, sold or distributed by the Company and its Subsidiaries, other than the Gastrodiagnostic Products.
Earnout Products and Services
Earnout Products and Services
(viii) . Parent, the Company and the Company Stockholder acknowledge and agree that from and after the Closing Date each of Erik Jensen, Alex Sigal and Phillip Moses (the "") will oversee the management of the business and affairs of the Company as it relates to the marketing and sales of the Earnout Products and Services during the Earnout Period, and that the following shall govern the relationship of Parent and the Management Team with respect to the foregoing during the Earnout Period:
Operation of the Company during the Earnout Period
Management Team
(A) The Company and its Subsidiaries shall be maintained and accounted for as free-standing subsidiaries of Parent and shall not be combined with any other current business operations of Parent. The foregoing shall not prohibit Parent from consolidating back office activities into other operating groups so as to achieve improved efficiency, lower costs and improved operating margins.
(B) The business and affairs of the Company relating to the marketing and sales of the Earnout Products and Services shall be managed by or under the direction of the Management Team in substantially the same manner and with the same rights and authority each such member of the Management Team possessed as of the date of this Agreement in accordance with past management and operating policies.
(C) The Management Team shall have the authority and discretion to make strategic and operating decisions in accordance with past management and operating policies regarding the marketing and sales of the Earnout Products during the Earnout Period, including, but not limited to, the right to (i) enter into contracts with new or continuing customers of the Company and (ii) continue (during the Earnout Period) arrangements relating to supply and sourcing requirements for contracts of the Company; provided, however, that such full authority and discretion on the part of the Management Team shall not be deemed to include the ability to require expenditures from Parent, the Surviving Corporation or any of their respective Subsidiaries relating to the marketing and sales of such Earnout Products and Services that are beyond the historic levels of such expenditures; provided, further, that in connection with the marketing and sales of the Earnout Products and Services the Management Team, or each of the
 
Surviving Corporation, its Subsidiaries and the Management Team, as the case may be, shall effect sales of the Earnout Products and Services at approximately the same pricing and gross profit level that have historically been made by the Company and its Subsidiaries as reflected in the Company Financial Statements and the Company Pro Forma Financial Statements.
(D) Parent shall allow the Company to retain sufficient cash from the conduct of its business to enable the Company to continue to conduct its operations consistent with past practice. Parent shall allow the Management Team to communicate and consult with John Arnott, and shall allow John Arnott to communicate and consult with the Management Team, regarding any and all matters identified in subparagraphs (B) and (C) immediately above.
(E) Parent shall not during the Earnout Period (i) take any action with respect to the operation of the Company that is in bad faith for the purpose of decreasing Company Gross Revenue for, or negatively impacting sales of Earnout Products and Services in, the Earnout Period, or otherwise designed to avoid the payment of the Earnout Consideration; (ii) take any action that would result in the sale, lease, exchange, distribution or mortgage of any assets of the Neurodiagnostic Business comprised of Earnout Products and Services (other than as may be required by Parent's primary bank credit facility with respect to the targets of Parent's acquisitions delivering subsidiary guaranties and pledging certain of their assets as security therefor); or (iii) cause any reorganization, merger, consolidation, dissolution or liquidation of the Company or make any sale, transfer, assignment or other disposition of the shares of capital stock of the Company without the prior written consent of the Company Stockholder.
(F) The Company and its Subsidiaries shall continue to sell and market Earnout Products and Services until the expiration of the Earnout Period, and Parent shall not take any action to discontinue such sales and marketing activities during the Earnout Period.
(G) Parent, during the Earnout Period, (1) shall not terminate the employment of any member of the sales team who is an employee of the Company and its Subsidiaries responsible for sales and marketing of Earnout Products and Services (each, a "") and shall continue during the Earnout Period to provide base compensation or wages for each Sales Rep at no less than the rate of compensation or wages paid by the Company to such Sales Rep as of the Agreement Date; (2) shall maintain and honor during the Earnout Period all incentive and commission plans in effect as of the Agreement Date with respect to the Sales Reps; and (3) shall not announce or otherwise communicate during the Earnout Period any intention or plan to reduce (1) the size of the sales team comprised of the Sales Reps of the Company and its Subsidiaries or (2) the compensation or wages or the incentive or commission plans of the Sales Reps; provided, however, that Parent may terminate any Sales Reps with the prior written consent of the Company Stockholder (which consent will not be unreasonably withheld or delayed).
Sales Rep
 
(H) The parties shall be entitled to equitable relief to enjoin any actual or threatened breach or violation of the terms of this . Notwithstanding the foregoing, all legal and equitable remedies shall be available on a cumulative basis and no remedy will be deemed exclusive.
Section 2.01(e)(viii)
(ix) . Notwithstanding any other provision of this Agreement, in the event that at any point prior to the end of the Earnout Period either:
Acceleration of Earnout Payment
(A) Parent or an entity controlling, controlled by or under common control with Parent ceases to be (either directly, or indirectly through one or more wholly owned subsidiaries) the owner of the controlling interest in the outstanding capital stock of or other equity interests in the Company; or
(B) any person or group of persons shall have acquired beneficial ownership of more than 50% of the outstanding voting securities of Parent (within the meaning of Sections 13(d) or 14(d) of the Exchange Act (a "");
Change of Control
then immediately upon the occurrence of any such Change of Control, Parent shall irrevocably become liable to pay to the Company Stockholder aggregate Earnout Consideration in an amount equal to $3,750,000.
2.02
Company Options.
Parent is not assuming, and shall not assume, any obligations or Liabilities under (a) any option or similar plan of the Company, (b) any outstanding Company Options, or (c) any other direct or indirect rights to acquire shares of Company Capital Stock (other than to make the payments contemplated under Section 2.01(b)). On the Closing Date, any option or similar plan of the Company, the Company Options, and any other direct or indirect rights to acquire shares (or Company Options) of Company Capital Stock from the Company shall be terminated without further obligation or Liability of the Company, Parent or the Surviving Corporation. Parent shall not substitute any equivalent option or right for any such terminated Company Option or right.
2.03
Escrow.
At the Effective Time, Parent shall withhold the Escrow Cash from the cash payable pursuant to Sections 2.01(b)(i) and 2.01(b)(ii) to the holders of Company Common Stock and Company Series A Stock (as the case may be) as of immediately prior to the Effective Time (other than Company Stockholder who only hold shares of Company Capital Stock which constitute and remain Dissenting Shares), on a pro rata basis (based upon the amount of cash each such holder is entitled to receive pursuant to Sections 2.01(b)(i) and 2.01(b)(ii) and with respect to their shares of Company Common Stock and Company Series A Stock (as the case may be) (other than Dissenting Shares)). Simultaneously with the execution and delivery of this Agreement, Parent, the Company Stockholder and the Escrow Agent shall enter into an escrow agreement (the "") which will provide the terms and conditions for the release of the Escrow Cash to the Company Stockholder after the first anniversary of the Closing Date subject to the terms of this Agreement and the Escrow Agreement. On the Closing Date, Parent
Escrow Agreement
 
shall cause the Escrow Cash to be deposited with the Escrow Agent. The Escrow Agent shall hold the Escrow Cash as security for the indemnification rights under Article VIII. A portion of the Escrow Cash will be treated as imputed interest to the extent required under the Code.
2.04
Intentionally Omitted.
2.05 At and upon the Effective Time:
Effects of the Merger.
(a) the separate existence of Merger Sub shall cease and Merger Sub shall be merged with and into the Company, and the Company shall be the surviving corporation of the Merger pursuant to the terms of this Agreement and a certificate, or articles, of merger (as required by the DGCL) (the "") which shall have been filed with the Secretary of State of the State of Delaware;
Certificate of Merger
(b) the certificate of incorporation of the Surviving Corporation shall be amended in its entirety to read as set forth in the Certificate of Merger;
(c) the bylaws of the Surviving Corporation shall be amended in its entirety to read as the bylaws of Merger Sub;
(d) the officers of Merger Sub immediately prior to the Effective Time shall be appointed as the officers of the Surviving Corporation immediately after the Effective Time until their respective successors are duly appointed;
(e) the members of the Board of Directors of Merger Sub immediately prior to the Effective Time shall be elected as the members of the Board of Directors of the Surviving Corporation immediately after the Effective Time until their respective successors are duly elected or appointed and qualified; and
(f) the Merger shall, from and after the Effective Time, have all of the effects provided by the DGCL.
2.06
Tax Consequences and Withholding.
(a) The parties intend that the Merger shall be treated as a taxable purchase of securities of the Company pursuant to the Code and each party shall report the transactions contemplated hereby consistently with such intent. However, no party hereto makes any representation or warranty regarding the Tax consequences of any transaction contemplated by this Agreement.
(b) Parent or Parent's agent shall be entitled to deduct and withhold from the Merger Consideration payable to the Company Stockholder the amounts required to be deducted and withheld under the Code, or any applicable provision of state, local or foreign tax law, with respect to the making of such payment. To the extent that amounts are so withheld and properly remitted to the appropriate Governmental Authority, such withheld amounts shall be (i) treated for all purposes of this Agreement as having been paid to the Company Stockholder and (ii) deposited on the Company Stockholder's behalf with the appropriate taxing authorities.
 
(c) Notwithstanding anything in this agreement to the contrary, each party (and its representatives, agents and employees) may consult any tax advisor regarding the U.S. federal tax treatment and U.S. federal tax structure of the transactions contemplated hereby and may disclose to any person, without limitation of any kind, the U.S. federal tax treatment and U.S. federal tax structure of the transactions contemplated hereby and all materials (including opinions or other tax analyses) that are provided relating to such treatment or structure.
2.07
Further Assurances.
If at any time before or after the Effective Time Parent reasonably believes or is advised that any further instruments, deeds, assignments or assurances are reasonably necessary or desirable to consummate the Merger or to carry out the purposes and intent of this Agreement at or after the Effective Time, then the Company, Parent, the Surviving Corporation and their respective officers or directors shall execute and deliver all such proper deeds, assignments, instruments and assurances and do all other things reasonably necessary or desirable to consummate the Merger and to carry out the purposes and intent of this Agreement.
2.08
Dissenting Shares.
(a) Notwithstanding any provision of this Agreement to the contrary, shares of Company Capital Stock that are outstanding immediately prior to the Effective Time and that are held by Company Stockholder who shall have neither voted in favor of the Merger nor consented thereto in writing and who shall have demanded properly in writing appraisal for such shares in accordance with Section 262 of the DGCL (collectively, the "") shall not be converted into, or represent the right to receive, the Merger Consideration. Such Company Stockholder shall be entitled to receive payment of the appraised value of such Company Capital Stock held by them in accordance with the provisions of such Section 262, except that all Dissenting Shares held by Company Stockholder who shall have failed to perfect or who effectively shall have withdrawn or lost their rights to appraisal of such shares under such Section 262 shall thereupon be deemed to have been converted into, and to have become exchangeable for, as of the Effective Time, the right to receive the Merger Consideration, without any interest thereon, upon surrender of the certificate or certificates, if any, that formerly evidenced such shares.
Dissenting Shares
(b) The Company shall give Parent (i) prompt notice of any demands for appraisal received by the Company, withdrawals of such demands, and any other instruments served pursuant to the DGCL and received by the Company and (ii) the opportunity to participate in all negotiations and proceedings with respect to demands for appraisal under the DGCL.
2.09
Retained Assets; Retained Liabilities.
The parties acknowledge and agree that (i) the Company caused certain assets historically owned by the Company and its Subsidiaries in respect of the Gastrodiagnostic Business, as set forth in of to this Agreement, to be spun off and contributed to Gastro Company by virtue of the Gastrodiagnostic Business Distribution on September 4, 2009 (the ""), (ii) after the Spin-Off Date and immediately prior to the Closing Date, the
Part A
Schedule I
Spin-Off Date
 
Company caused certain assets in respect of the Second Spin Business and assets of the Company or its Subsidiaries used to operate the Second Spin Business, as set forth in of to this Agreement (such retained assets and businesses collectively referred to herein as the ""), to be spun off and contributed to New Co. by virtue of the Second Spin and Distribution on the Second Spin-Off Date, and (iii) notwithstanding any provision to the contrary contained in this Agreement, the Gastrodiagnostic Business Distribution Documents, the Second Spin and Distribution Documents, or any other document governing or effectuating the Gastrodiagnostic Business Distribution, Second Spin and Distribution or the Company Reorganization, as the case may be, Parent shall not assume by operation of law, as a consequence of the Merger or otherwise, and the Company Stockholder as of immediately prior to the Spin-Off Date shall retain and be responsible for, any and all Liabilities of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries arising out of, related to or in connection with the Retained Assets, the Gastrodiagnostic Business, the Gastrodiagnostic Business Distribution, the Second Spin Business, the Second Spin and Distribution and the Company Reorganization and such other Liabilities set forth in of this Agreement (collectively, the "").
Part B
Schedule I
Retained Assets
Schedule II
Retained Liabilities
2.10
Transaction Fees.
Each of Parent, on the one hand, and the Company Stockholder, on the other hand, shall bear and pay all fees, costs and expenses (including all legal fees and expenses) that have been incurred or that are in the future incurred respectively by or on behalf of it or them, as the case may be, in connection with the transactions contemplated hereby, whether or not the Merger is consummated. Parent and the Company agree that the Company Stockholder shall pay Winston & Strawn LLP the amount of legal fees due to Winston & Strawn LLP at the Closing for services rendered to the Company or the Company Stockholder in connection with the transactions contemplated by this Agreement.
As an inducement to Parent and Merger Sub to enter into this Agreement, and except as disclosed in the disclosure schedule prepared by the Company and delivered by the Company to Parent and Merger Sub simultaneously with the execution and delivery of this Agreement (the ""), the Company hereby represents and warrants to Parent and Merger Sub that:
Disclosure Schedule
3.01
Organization and Qualification.
(a) The Company is a corporation duly incorporated and validly existing and in good standing under the laws of Delaware and has the requisite corporate power and authority and all necessary governmental approvals to own, lease and operate its properties and to carry on its business as it is now being conducted, except where the failure to be so incorporated or validly existing or to have such power, authority and governmental approvals would not prevent or materially delay consummation of the Merger and would not reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect. The Company is duly qualified or licensed as a foreign legal entity to do business, and is in good standing, in each jurisdiction where the character of the properties
 
owned, leased or operated by it or the nature of its business makes such qualification or licensing necessary, except for such failures to be so qualified or licensed and in good standing that would not prevent or materially delay consummation of the Merger and would not reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect.
(b) Section 3.01(b) of the Disclosure Schedule sets forth a true, correct and complete list of each Subsidiary of the Company. Each Subsidiary of the Company is a corporation or other business entity duly organized and validly existing under the laws of its jurisdiction of organization and has the requisite corporate or other organizational power and authority and all necessary governmental approvals to own, lease and operate its properties and to carry on its business as it is now being conducted, except where the failure to be so organized or existing or to have such power, authority and governmental approvals would not prevent or materially delay consummation of the Merger and would not reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect. Each Subsidiary of the Company is duly qualified or licensed as a foreign legal entity to do business, and is in good standing, in each jurisdiction where the character of the properties owned, leased or operated by it or the nature of its business makes such qualification or licensing necessary, except for such failures to be so qualified or licensed and in good standing that would not prevent or materially delay consummation of the Merger and would not reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect. Except as otherwise set forth on Section 3.01(b) of the Disclosure Schedule, the Company is the direct or indirect owner of all of the issued and outstanding shares of capital stock or other equity ownership interests of each Subsidiary, free and clear of all Encumbrances, and all such shares are duly authorized, validly issued, fully paid and nonassessable and are not subject to any preemptive right or right of first refusal created by statute, the certificate or articles of incorporation and bylaws or other equivalent organizational or governing documents, as applicable, of such Subsidiary or any contract to which such Subsidiary is a party or by which it is bound. For those Subsidiaries where the Company does not directly or indirectly own all of the issued and outstanding shares of capital stock or other equity ownership interests of such Subsidiary, Section 3.01(b) of the Disclosure Schedule sets forth an accurate list of all outstanding shares of capital stock or other units of equity ownership and the number of shares or other units owned by the Company and each Subsidiary of the Company and by each other person owning capital stock or other units of such entity. Except as set forth on Section 3.01(b) of the Disclosure Schedule, there are no outstanding subscriptions, options, warrants, "put" or "call" rights, exchangeable or convertible securities or other contracts of any character relating to the issued or unissued capital stock or other securities of any Subsidiary of the Company or otherwise obligating the Company or any Subsidiary of the Company to issue, transfer, sell, purchase, redeem or otherwise acquire or sell any such securities. Except with respect to the Subsidiaries of the Company set forth in Section 3.01(b), the Company does not directly or indirectly own any equity or similar interest in, or any interest convertible into or exchangeable or exercisable for any equity or similar interest in, any corporation, partnership, joint venture or other business association or entity.
3.02
Certificate of Incorporation and Bylaws.
The Company has heretofore made available to Parent a true, correct and complete copy of the Certificate of Incorporation (the "") and the bylaws (the "") of the Company, and the equivalent organizational and governing instrument or
Certificate of Incorporation
Bylaws
 
documents of each Subsidiary of the Company, in each case as amended to date. Such Certificate of Incorporation and Bylaws and such other equivalent organizational and governing instruments or documents of each Subsidiary are in full force and effect. Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary is in violation of any of the provisions of the Certificate of Incorporation and Bylaws, or equivalent organizational and governing instrument or documents, as the case may be.
3.03
Capitalization.
(a) The authorized Company Capital Stock is comprised of 60,000,000 shares of Company Common Stock and 40,000,000 shares of Company Preferred Stock. There are (i) (A) 6,518,939 shares of Company Common Stock issued and outstanding, and (B) 35,965,995.5 shares of Company Series A Stock issued and outstanding, (ii) no shares of Company Common Stock held in the treasury of the Company, (iii) (A) 6,422,499 shares of Company Common Stock reserved for issuance under the Company's 2007 Stock Incentive Plan (the ""), (B) 3,442,962 shares of Company Common Stock reserved for future issuance pursuant to outstanding Company Options issued under the 2007 Incentive Plan, (C) 571,500 shares of Company Common Stock reserved for issuance under the Company's 2005 Equity Incentive Plan (the "" and, together with the 2007 Incentive Plan, collectively referred to as the ""), and (D) 500,000 shares of Company Common Stock reserved for future issuance pursuant to outstanding Company Options issued under the 2005 Incentive Plan, and (iv) 325,000 shares of Company Common Stock reserved for future issuance pursuant to outstanding warrants (the ""). All outstanding Company Options (other than the Company Warrants) have been granted pursuant to the Company Option Plan. Except for the Company Options, there are no options, warrants, convertible securities or other rights, agreements, arrangements or commitments of any character relating to the issued or unissued Company Capital Stock, or obligating the Company to issue or sell any shares of such capital stock, or other equity interests in, the Company. Section 3.03 of the Disclosure Schedule sets forth the following information with respect to each Company Option outstanding on the date of this Agreement: (i) the name of the Company Option recipient; (ii) the number of shares of Company Common Stock subject to such Company Option; (iii) the exercise or purchase price of such Company Option; (vi) the date on which such Company Option expires; (vii) the tax status; and (viii) whether the exercisability of, or right to repurchase, such Company Option will be accelerated in any way by the transactions contemplated by this Agreement. The Company has made available to Parent accurate and complete copies of the Company Option Plan and the form of all stock option agreements evidencing such Company Options. All shares of Company Capital Stock subject to issuance as aforesaid, upon issuance on the terms and conditions specified in the instruments pursuant to which they are issuable, will be duly authorized, validly issued, fully paid and nonassessable. There are no outstanding contractual obligations of the Company to repurchase, redeem or otherwise acquire any shares of Company Capital Stock or to provide funds to, or make any investment (in the form of a loan, capital contribution or otherwise) in, any other person. Except as set forth on Section 3.03(a) of the Disclosure Schedule, there are no commitments or agreements of any character to which the Company is bound obligating the Company to accelerate the vesting of any Company Stock Option as a result of the Merger. All outstanding shares of Company Capital Stock and all outstanding Company Options have been issued and granted in compliance in all material respects with all requirements set forth in any contract, agreement or instrument to which the Company is party. The Company Stockholder is the sole owner or holder of all outstanding shares of Company Common Stock and Company Preferred Stock.
2007 Incentive Plan
2005 Incentive Plan,
Company Option Plan
Company Warrants
 
(b) The Company Options that are cancelled and terminated by virtue of the Merger as contemplated by Section 2.01(d) may be cancelled and terminated without the consent of the holders of such Company Options and without the payment of any consideration to the holders of such Company Options.
3.04
Authority Relative to this Agreement.
The Company or its applicable Subsidiary has all necessary corporate power and authority to execute and deliver this Agreement, to perform its obligations hereunder and to consummate each of the Gastrodiagnostic Business Distribution, the Second Spin and Distribution and the Company Reorganization and the Merger. The execution and delivery of this Agreement by the Company and the consummation by the Company or its applicable Subsidiary of the Gastronomic Business Distribution, the Second Spin and Distribution, the Company Reorganization and the Merger have been duly and validly authorized by all necessary corporate action on the part of the Company or such Subsidiary, and no other corporate proceedings on the part of the Company or such Subsidiary are necessary to authorize this Agreement or to consummate the Merger (other than, with respect to the Merger, the adoption of this Agreement by the holders of a majority of the outstanding shares of Company Capital Stock ("") and the filing and recordation of appropriate merger documents as required by DGCL). This Agreement has been duly and validly executed and delivered by the Company and, assuming the due authorization, execution and delivery by Parent and Merger Sub, constitutes the legal, valid and binding obligation of the Company, enforceable against the Company in accordance with its terms, subject to laws of general application relating to the public policy, bankruptcy, insolvency and relief of debtors and rules of law governing specific performance, injunctive relief and other equitable remedies. The Board of the Company has approved this Agreement and the Merger.
Company Securityholder Approval
3.05
No Conflict; Required Filings and Consents.
(a) Except as set forth on Section 3.05(a) of the Disclosure Schedule, the Gastrodiagnostic Business Distribution, the Second Spin and Distribution, and the Company Reorganization did not, and the execution and delivery of this Agreement, and the performance of this Agreement, by the Company, and the consummation of the Merger, shall not, (i) conflict with or violate the Certificate of Incorporation, Bylaws or any resolution, currently in effect, adopted by the Board of the Company (or any committee thereof) or the Company Stockholder, (ii) assuming that all consents, approvals and other authorizations described in Section 3.05(b) have been obtained and that all filings and other actions described in Section 3.05(b) have been made or taken, violate any United States or non-United States national, state, provincial, municipal or local statute, law, ordinance, regulation, rule, code, executive order, injunction, judgment, decree or other order ("") applicable to the Company or by which any property or asset of the Company is bound or affected, or (iii) result in any breach of, or constitute a default (or an event which, with notice or lapse of time or both, would become a default) under, or give to others any right of termination, amendment, acceleration or cancellation of, or result in the
Law
 
creation of a lien or other encumbrance on any material property or asset of the Company pursuant to, any material note, bond, mortgage, indenture, contract, agreement, lease, license, permit, franchise or other instrument or obligation to which the Company is a party or by which the Company or any material property or asset of the Company is bound or affected.
(b) The execution and delivery of this Agreement by the Company do not, and the performance of this Agreement by the Company will not, require any consent, approval, authorization or permit of, or filing with or notification to, any United States or non-United States national, state, provincial, municipal or local government, governmental, regulatory or administrative authority, agency, instrumentality or commission or any court, tribunal, or judicial or arbitral body (a "") that shall not have been obtained or filed as of the Closing, except for the filing and recordation of appropriate merger documents and as required by the DGCL.
Governmental Authority
3.06
Permits; Compliance.
(a) Section 3.06 of the Disclosure Schedule contains a complete and accurate list of all material franchises, grants, authorizations, licenses, permits, easements, variances, exceptions, consents, certificates, approvals and orders of any Governmental Authority necessary for the Company to own, lease and operate its properties or to carry on its business as it is now being conducted (the "") and identifies which, if any, of such Permits pertains solely to the Gastrodiagnostic Business. No suspension or cancellation of any of the Permits is pending or, to the knowledge of the Company, threatened. The Company is not, in any material respect, in default, breach or violation of, (i) any Law applicable to the Company or by which any property or asset of the Company is bound or affected, including, without limitation, with respect to design, labeling, testing and inspection of the Company's products, and any Law of the United States Food and Drug Administration, or (ii) any material note, bond, mortgage, indenture, contract, agreement, lease, license, Permit, franchise or other instrument or obligation to which the Company is a party or by which the Company or any property or asset of the Company is bound.
Permits
(b) Except as set forth in Section 3.06 of the Disclosure Schedule, the Company has not received, at any time since August 1, 2007, any formal written notice or other formal written communication from any Governmental Authority or any other person regarding (i) any actual, alleged, possible, or potential violation of or failure to comply with any term or requirement of any Permit, or (ii) any actual, proposed, possible, or potential revocation, withdrawal, suspension, cancellation, termination of, or modification to any Permit. All applications required to have been filed for the renewal of any Permit have been duly filed on a timely basis with the appropriate Governmental Authority, and all other filings required to have been made with respect to any such Permit have been duly made on a timely basis with the appropriate Governmental Authority.
3.07
Financial Statements.
(a) Section 3.07 of the Disclosure Schedule includes the Company Financial Statements and the Company Pro Forma Financial Statements. The Company Financial Statements (i) are derived from and in accordance with the books and records of the Company
 
and its Subsidiaries, (ii) complied as to form in all material respects with applicable accounting requirements with respect thereto as of their respective dates, (iii) have been prepared in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles ("") applied on a consistent basis throughout the periods indicated and consistent with each other (except that the financial statements as of and for the period ended June 30, 2009 do not include all notes required in year-end financial statements), and (iv) fairly present in all material respects the financial position of the Company and its Subsidiaries at the dates therein indicated and the results of operations and cash flows of the Company and its Subsidiaries for the periods therein specified. The Company Pro Forma Financial Statements (i) are derived from and in accordance with the books and records of the Company and its Subsidiaries, (ii) complied as to form in all material respects with applicable accounting requirements with respect thereto as of their respective dates, and (iii) fairly present in all material respects the financial position of the Company and its Subsidiaries at the dates therein indicated and the results of operations and cash flows of the Company and its Subsidiaries for the periods therein specified, in each case giving effect to the Gastrodiagnostic Business Distribution, the Second Spin and Distribution and the Company Reorganization as though it had occurred on the last day of the fiscal year preceding the fiscal year that ended on December 31, 2008.
GAAP
(b) Except as and to the extent set forth on the unaudited balance sheet of the Company at June 30, 2009, including the notes thereto included in the Company Financial Statements (the ""), the Company does not have any Liability, other than those incurred after June 30, 2009 in the ordinary course of the Company's business consistent with past practice and that do not result from any breach of contract, tort or violation of law and that were not required to be set forth in the 2009 Balance Sheet in accordance with GAAP .
2009 Balance Sheet
(c) The Company maintains a standard system of accounting established and administered in accordance with GAAP. The Company maintains a system of internal accounting controls for the Company and its Subsidiaries sufficient to provide reasonable assurance that (i) transactions are executed in accordance with management's general or specific authorizations, (ii) transactions are recorded as necessary to permit preparation of financial statements in conformity with GAAP and to maintain asset accountability, (iii) access to assets is permitted only in accordance with management's general or specific authorization, and (iv) the recorded accountability for assets is compared with the existing assets at reasonable intervals and appropriate action is taken with respect to any differences. Section 3.07(c) of the Disclosure Schedule lists, and the Company has made available to Parent complete and correct copies of, all written descriptions of, and all policies, manuals and other documents promulgating, such internal accounting controls.
(d) All accounts receivable of the Company and its Subsidiaries reflected on the June 30, 2009 balance sheet included in the Company Pro Forma Financial Statements or arising thereafter have arisen from bona fide transactions in the ordinary course of business consistent with past practices.
(e) Section 3.07(e)(i) of the Disclosure Schedule sets forth the names and locations of all banks, trust companies, savings and loan associations and other financial institutions at which the Company and its Subsidiaries maintain accounts of any nature and the names of all persons authorized to draw thereon or make withdrawals therefrom. Section 3.07(e)(ii) of the Disclosure Schedule further lists those deposits or other amounts of cash of the Company and its Subsidiaries as of the Closing Date that are restricted cash.
 
(f) The Company has sufficient surplus, as defined by the DGCL, to complete the Gastrodiagnostic Business Distribution in accordance with the DGCL.
(g) Notwithstanding the foregoing representations and warranties of the Company set forth in this Section 3.07, the parties acknowledge that Financial Interpretation No. 48, "Accounting for Uncertainty in Income Taxes  an Interpretation of FASB Statement No. 109 ("")" does not apply to the preparation of the Company Financial Statements and the Company Pro Forma Financial Statements and that, if Parent records reserves for Taxes of the Company and its Subsidiaries following the Closing due to the application of FIN 48 to financial statements prepared by Parent, the recording of such reserves will not constitute a violation of, or failure of the representation and warranty set forth in, this Section 3.07.
FIN 48
(h) The aggregate amount of prepayments received from customers of Stellate Systems Inc. and its Subsidiaries for orders of product for which the ordered product has not been shipped by Stellate Systems Inc. or the applicable Subsidiary to the ordering customer as of the Closing Date is $0.
3.08
Absence of Certain Changes or Events.
Since June 30, 2009, except as set forth in Section 3.08 of the Disclosure Schedule, or as expressly contemplated by this Agreement, (a) each of the Company and each Subsidiary has conducted its businesses only in the ordinary course and in a manner substantially consistent with past practice, (b) there has not been any Material Adverse Effect, and (c) neither the Company nor any Subsidiary has taken any action that, if taken after the date of this Agreement, would constitute a breach of any of the covenants set forth in . Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary of the Company has substantially increased in the two-month period immediately prior to the Agreement Date the compensation, wages, incentive or commission plans, as the case may be, of any Sales Reps from such levels of compensation, wages, incentive or commission plans that were in place for such Sales Reps (or to the extent a Sales Rep was hired in the last year by the Company or any Subsidiary of the Company, that were in place for similarly situated Sales Reps) in the last year.
Article V
3.09
Absence of Litigation.
There is no litigation, suit, claim, action, proceeding or investigation (an "") pending or, to the knowledge of the Company, threatened against the Company or any Subsidiary, or any property or asset of the Company or any Subsidiary, before any Governmental Authority nor is there any Action pending that seeks to materially delay or prevent the consummation of the Merger. Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary nor any property or asset of the Company or any Subsidiary is subject to any continuing order of, consent decree, settlement agreement or similar written agreement with, or, to the knowledge of the Company, continuing investigation by, any Governmental Authority, or any order, writ, judgment, injunction, decree, determination or award of any Governmental Authority. Nothing in this Section 3.09 represents any representation or warranty regarding any Action with respect to Taxes.
Action
 
3.10
Employee Benefit Plans.
(a) Section 3.10(a) of the Disclosure Schedule lists (i) all employee benefit plans (as defined in Section 3(3) of the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, as amended ("")) and all bonus, stock option, stock purchase, restricted stock, incentive, deferred compensation, retiree medical or life insurance, supplemental retirement, severance or other material benefit plans, programs or arrangements, and all employment, termination, severance or other material contracts or agreements, to which the Company or any of its Subsidiaries is a party, with respect to which the Company or any of its Subsidiaries has any obligation or which are maintained, contributed to or sponsored by the Company or any of its Subsidiaries for the benefit of any current or former employee, officer or director of, or any current or former consultant to, the Company or any of its Subsidiaries, (ii) each employee benefit plan for which the Company or any of its Subsidiaries could incur liability under Section 4069 of ERISA in the event such plan has been or were to be terminated, (iii) any plan in respect of which the Company or any of its Subsidiaries could incur liability under Section 4212(c) of ERISA, and (iv) any contracts (including loan agreements) or arrangements between the Company and/or any of its Subsidiaries and any employee of the Company and/or such Subsidiary relating to the provision of services by such employee for the Company and/or such Subsidiary (collectively, the ""), and no such plans or similar arrangements maintained for the benefit of the employees of the Company and its Subsidiaries prior to the Spin-Off Date or the Second Spin-Off Date, as applicable, were assumed by Gastro Company, New Co. or any other party in connection with the Gastrodiagnostic Business Distribution, the Second Spin and Distribution or the Company Reorganization. Each Plan is in writing and the Company has furnished to Parent a true and complete copy of each Plan (and all amendments and restatements thereto and any resolutions executed in connection with such documents), including any welfare benefit plan (as defined in Section 3(1) of ERISA) that is self-insured, clearly identified as such, and any stop-loss insurance policies pertaining to such plan, and has delivered to Parent a true and complete copy of each material document, if any, prepared in connection with each such Plan, including, without limitation, (i) a copy of each trust or other funding arrangement, (ii) each summary plan description, summary of material modifications, and material employee communications, (iii) the three most recently filed Internal Revenue Service (the "") Forms 5500, including all Forms 5558 (extension of time to file), attachments, schedules, financial statements, and accountants' opinions (including any recommendations to management) prepared in connection with such Forms 5500, (iv) the most recently received opinion, advisory, notification and/or determination letter, as applicable, from the IRS for each such Plan, and (v) the most recently prepared actuarial report and financial statement in connection with each such Plan. The Company does not have any commitment (i) to create, incur liability with respect to or cause to exist any other employee benefit plan, program or arrangement, (ii) to enter into any contract or agreement to provide compensation or benefits to any individual, or (iii) to modify, change or terminate any Plan, other than with respect to a modification, change or termination required by ERISA or the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended (the "") or other applicable Law, other than the termination of the Alpine Biomed Corporation Employee Savings & Investment Plan prior to the Closing. Gastro Company's or New Co.'s assumption of any employee benefit plans maintained by the Company and its Subsidiaries for the benefit of their
ERISA
Plans
IRS
Code
 
respective employees prior to the Spin-Off Date or the Second Spin-Off Date, as the case may be, in accordance with the Gastrodiagnostic Business Distribution Documents or the Second Spin and Distribution Documents, and the completion of each of the Gastrodiagnostic Business Distribution, the Second Spin and Distribution and the Company Reorganization have been completed in accordance with the provisions of, and do not constitute a breach or violation of, any such plan or of applicable law. Neither the Company nor any of its Subsidiaries shall have any Liability in respect of any employee benefit plans so assumed by Gastro Company or New Co., as the case may be, or as a result of such company's assumption of any such employee benefit plans or the completion of the Gastrodiagnostic Business Distribution, the Second Spin and Distribution and the Company Reorganization.
(b) Except as set forth in Section 3.10(b) of the Disclosure Schedule, none of the Plans (i) provides for the payment of separation, severance or termination benefits to any person, (ii) obligates the Company or any of its Subsidiaries to pay separation, severance or termination benefits solely or partially as a result of any transaction contemplated by this Agreement, or (iii) obligates the Company or any of its Subsidiaries to make any payment or provide any benefit as a result of a "change in control", within the meaning of such term under Section 280G of the Code. None of the Plans provides for or promises retiree medical, disability or life insurance benefits to any current or former employee, officer or director of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries. Except as set forth in Section 3.10(b) of the Disclosure Schedule, each of the Plans is subject only to the Laws of the United States or a political subdivision thereof.
(c) Each Plan is now and always has been operated in all material respects in accordance with its terms and the requirements of all applicable Laws including, without limitation, ERISA and the Code. Each of the Company and each of its Subsidiaries has performed all obligations required to be performed by it under, is not in any respect in default under or in violation of, and has no knowledge of any default or violation by any party to, any Plan. No Action is pending or, to the knowledge of the Company, threatened with respect to any Plan (other than claims for benefits in the ordinary course) and, to the knowledge of the Company, no fact or event exists that could reasonably be expected to give rise to any such Action.
(d) With respect to each Plan that is intended to be qualified under Section 401(a) of the Code, (i) each of the Company and each of its Subsidiaries, as applicable, has timely received a favorable opinion, advisory, notification and/or determination letter, as applicable, that such Plan satisfies the requirement of the Code and is so qualified, and nothing has occurred since issuance of such opinion, advisory, notification and/or determination letter, as applicable, which would reasonably be expected to cause the loss or the tax-qualified status of such Plan; (ii) each of the Company and each of its Subsidiaries, as applicable, has applied timely to the Internal Revenue Service for such letter or has a remaining period of time to apply for such letter, or (iii) the Company relies on a favorable Internal Revenue Service opinion letter or advisory letter issued to the master and prototype or volume submitter plan sponsor of such Plan. Each trust established in connection with any Plan which is intended to be exempt from federal income taxation under Section 501(a) of the Code has received a determination or opinion letter from the IRS that it is so exempt. No fact or event has occurred since the date of such determination or opinion letter or letters from the IRS which could reasonably be expected to adversely affect the qualified status of any such Plan or the exempt status of any such trust.
 
(e) To the knowledge of the Company, no suit, administrative proceeding, action or other litigation has been brought, or is threatened, against or with respect to any such Plan, including any audit or inquiry by the IRS or United States Department of Labor.
(f) No Plan is subject to any surrender fees or service fees upon termination other than the normal and reasonable administrative fees associated with the termination of benefit plans.
(g) Neither the Company nor any of its Subsidiaries has any self-insured Plans.
(h) All individuals who, pursuant to the terms of any Plan, are entitled to participate in such Plan are currently participating in such Plan or have been offered an opportunity to do so and have declined.
(i) There has not been any prohibited transaction (within the meaning of Section 406 of ERISA or Section 4975 of the Code) with respect to any Plan for which the Company has any Liability. None of the Plans is subject to Title IV of ERISA and neither the Company nor any Subsidiary has incurred, or could reasonably be expected to incur, any liability under, arising out of or by operation of Title IV of ERISA.
(j) All contributions, premiums or payments required to be made with respect to any Plan have been timely made under the terms of the applicable Plan, ERISA, the Code, and any other applicable law. All such contributions have been fully deducted for income tax purposes and no such deduction has been challenged or disallowed by any Governmental Authority and no fact or event exists which could reasonably be expected to give rise to any such challenge or disallowance.
(k) There has been no termination or partial termination of any Plan within the meaning of Section 411(d)(3) of the Code.
(l) Except as set forth in Section 3.10(l) of the Disclosure Schedule, no benefit payable or that may become payable by the Company or any of its Subsidiaries pursuant to any agreement or arrangement or as a result of, in connection with or arising under this Agreement or the Certificate of Merger shall constitute a "parachute payment" (as defined in Section 280G(b)(2) of the Code) that is subject to the imposition of an excise tax under Section 4999 of the Code or that would not be deductible by reason of Section 280G of the Code. Except as set forth in Section 3.10(l) of the Disclosure Schedule, the Company is not a party to any: (i) contract agreement or arrangement with any person (A) the benefits of which are contingent, or the terms of which are materially altered, upon the occurrence of a transaction involving the Company in the nature of the Merger or any of the other transactions contemplated by this Agreement, (B) providing any material term of employment or compensation guarantee, or (C) providing severance benefits or other benefits after the termination of employment of such employee regardless of the reason for such termination of employment; or (ii) benefit plan or arrangement, any of the benefits of which shall be increased, or the vesting of benefits of which shall be accelerated, by the occurrence of the Merger or any of the other transactions contemplated by this Agreement, or any event subsequent to the Merger such as the termination
 
of employment of any person, or the value of any of the benefits of which shall be calculated on the basis of any of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement. Neither the Company nor any of its Subsidiaries has any obligation to pay any material amount or provide any material benefit to any former employee or officer.
(m) Neither the Company nor any of its Subsidiaries has any benefit plan which constitutes, or has since the enactment of ERISA, constituted, (i) a "multiemployer plan" as defined in Section 3(37) of ERISA, (ii) a "multiple employer plan" as defined in ERISA or Code Section 413(c), or (iii) a "funded welfare plan" within the meaning of Code Section 419. No pension plan of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries is subject to Title IV of ERISA.
(n) Except as set forth in Section 3.10(n) of the Disclosure Schedule, neither the Company nor any of its Subsidiaries has any benefit plan or arrangement that has been established or maintained, or that is required to be maintained or contributed to by the law or applicable custom or rule of the relevant jurisdiction, outside of the United States.
(o) Each Plan, to the extent applicable, is in compliance with the continuation coverage requirements of Section 4980B of the Code, Sections 601 through 608 of ERISA, the Age Discrimination in Employment Act of 1967, as amended, the Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990, the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996, the Women's Health and Cancer Rights Act of 1998, and the Family Medical Leave Act of 1993, and the Newborns' and Mothers' Health Protection Act of 1996 (including any amendments to or regulations or other guidance promulgated under any of the foregoing acts), or any similar provisions of state law, as such requirements affect the Company, any of its Subsidiaries and their employees. The Company and each applicable Subsidiary of the Company is in compliance with the applicable health care continuation and notice provisions of the Consolidation Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act of 1985, as amended ("") and the regulations (including any proposed regulations) thereunder, or any similar state statute and there are no outstanding, uncorrected COBRA violations, with respect to any Plan, covered employees or qualified beneficiaries that would be reasonably likely to result in a material Liability to the Company, any of its Subsidiaries, or Parent. No Plan (other than life insurance arrangements) provides post-termination or retiree welfare benefits to any person for any reason, except as may be required by COBRA or other applicable law.
COBRA
(p) There has been no amendment to, written interpretation or announcement (whether or not written) by the Company relating to, or change in employee participation or coverage under, any Plan that would increase materially the expense of maintaining such Plan above the level of the expensive incurred in respect thereof during the most recent fiscal year.
(q) of the Disclosure Schedule lists all "nonqualified deferred compensation plans" (within the meaning of Section 409A of the Code) to which the Company or any of its Subsidiaries is a party. Each such nonqualified deferred compensation plan to which the Company or such Subsidiary is a party complies with the requirements of paragraphs (2), (3) and (4) of Section 409A(a) of the Code by its terms and has been operated in accordance with such requirements. No event has occurred that would be treated by Section 409A(b) as a transfer of property for purposes of Section 83 of the Code. The exercise price of all Company Options is at least equal to the fair market value of the Company Common Stock on the date such Company Options were granted and neither the Company nor Parent has incurred or will incur any liability under Section 409A of the Code upon the vesting of any such Company Options.
Section 3.10(q)
 
3.11
Labor and Employment Matters.
(a) Section 3.11(a) of the Disclosure Schedule lists each employee of the Company and all Subsidiaries of the Company, whether such person is employed on a full-time or part-time basis. Those employees of the Company (exclusive of the former employees of the Company and its Subsidiaries who became employees of Gastro Company or New Co.) are sufficient to conduct the operations of the Company, other than the Gastrodiagnostic Business, as currently conducted and as conducted as of the Spin-Off Date. Except as set forth in Section 3.11(a) of the Disclosure Schedule, (i) there are no controversies pending or, to the knowledge of the Company, threatened between the Company or any of its Subsidiaries and any of their respective employees and (ii) neither the Company nor any Subsidiary is a party to any collective bargaining agreement or other labor union contract applicable to persons employed by the Company or such Subsidiary, nor, to the knowledge of the Company, are there any activities or proceedings of any labor union to organize any such employees.
(b) Each of the Company and each of its Subsidiaries is in compliance in all material respects with all applicable laws relating to the employment of labor, including those related to wages, hours, immigration and naturalization, collective bargaining and the payment and withholding of taxes and other sums as required by the appropriate Governmental Authority and have withheld and paid to the appropriate Governmental Authority or are holding for payment not yet due to such Governmental Authority all amounts required to be withheld from employees of the Company or such Subsidiary, as the case may be, and is not liable for any arrears of wages, taxes, penalties or other sums for failure to comply with any of the foregoing. Each of the Company and each of its Subsidiaries has paid in full to all employees or adequately accrued for in accordance with GAAP consistently applied all wages, salaries, commissions, bonuses, benefits and other compensation due to or on behalf of such employees and there is no claim with respect to payment of wages, salary or overtime pay that has been asserted or is now pending or, to the knowledge of the Company, threatened against the Company or any Subsidiary before any Governmental Authority with respect to any persons currently or formerly employed by the Company or such Subsidiary, as the case may be. Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary is a party to, or otherwise bound by, any consent decree with, or citation by, any Governmental Authority relating to employees or employment practices. There is no charge or proceeding with respect to a violation of any occupational safety or health standards that has been asserted or is now pending or, to the knowledge of the Company, threatened with respect to the Company or any of its Subsidiaries. There is no charge of discrimination in employment or employment practices, for any reason, including, without limitation, age, gender, race, religion or other legally protected category, which has been asserted or is now pending or, to the Company's knowledge, threatened before the United States Equal Employment Opportunity Commission, or any other Governmental Authority in any jurisdiction in which the Company has employed, employs or has been alleged to employ any person that, if adversely determined, would individually or in the aggregate, result in any material Liability to the Company.
 
(c) To the knowledge of the Company, no employee or consultant of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries is in material violation of (i) any contract or agreement with the Company or such Subsidiary, as the case may be, or (ii) any restrictive covenant relating to the right of any such employee or consultant to be employed by the Company or such Subsidiary or to use trade secrets or proprietary information of others.
(d) In the past two years, there has been no, nor will any action to be taken by the Company or any of its Subsidiaries pursuant to this Agreement constitute a, "mass layoff," "employment loss," or "plant closing" as defined by the federal Worker Adjustment and Retraining Notification Act (""), nor any equivalent notice triggering event under any analogous and applicable state WARN laws, in respect of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries.
WARN
(e) All directors, officers, management employees and technical and professional employees of the Company and its Subsidiaries are under written obligation to the Company or such Subsidiary, as the case may be, to maintain in confidence all confidential or proprietary information acquired by them in the course of their employment and to assign to the Company all inventions made by them within scope of their employment during such employment and for a reasonable period thereafter.
3.12
Proxy Statement.
The proxy statement (if any) sent to the Company Stockholder in connection with the Stockholders' Meeting (if applicable) (as defined in Section 5.01) (such proxy statement, as amended or supplemented, being referred to herein as the ""), did not, at the date the Proxy Statement (or any amendment or supplement thereto) was first mailed to the Company Stockholder and at the time of the Stockholders' Meeting, contain any statement which, at the time and in light of the circumstances under which it was made, is false or misleading with respect to any material fact, or which omits to state any material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein not false or misleading or necessary to correct any statement in any earlier communication with respect to the solicitation of proxies for the Stockholders' Meeting which shall have become false or misleading. Notwithstanding the foregoing, the Company makes no representation or warranty with respect to any information supplied in writing by Parent, Merger Sub or any of Parent's or Merger Sub's representatives expressly for inclusion in the foregoing documents, if any.
Proxy Statement
3.13
Absence of Real Property; Title to Assets.
(a) The Company does not own nor has the Company ever owned real property.
(b) Section 3.13(b) of the Disclosure Schedule lists each parcel of real property currently leased or subleased by the Company or any of its Subsidiaries, with the name of the lessor and the date of the lease, sublease, assignment of the lease, any guaranty given or leasing commissions payable by the Company or any of its Subsidiaries in connection therewith and each amendment to any of the foregoing (collectively, the ""). Section 3.13(b) of the Disclosure Schedule further identifies any lease or sublease that was assigned to
Lease Documents
 
and assumed by Gastro Company pursuant to the Gastrodiagnostic Business Distribution Documents and/or by New Co. pursuant to the Second Spin and Distribution Documents. True and complete copies of all Lease Documents have been delivered to Parent. All such current leases and subleases are in full force and effect, are valid and effective in accordance with their respective terms, and there is not, under any of such leases, any existing material default or event of default (or event which, with notice or lapse of time, or both, would constitute a default) by the Company or any of its Subsidiaries or, to the Company's knowledge, by the other party to such lease or sublease, or person in the chain of title to such leased premises. The premises and facilities subject to the leases and subleases comprising the Lease Documents, other than those subject to leases and subleases assigned to Gastro Company or New Co., as the case may be, pursuant to the applicable Gastrodiagnostic Business Distribution Documents or Second Spin and Distribution Documents, are sufficient for the conduct of the operations of the Company and its Subsidiaries, other than the Gastrodiagnostic Business and the Second Spin Business, as currently conducted and as conducted as of the Spin-Off Date.
(c) There are no contractual or legal restrictions that preclude or restrict the ability to use any real property leased by the Company for the purposes for which it is currently being used. To the knowledge of the Company, there are no material latent defects or material adverse physical conditions affecting the real property, and improvements thereon, leased by the Company.
(d) The Company has good and valid title to, or, in the case of leased properties and assets, valid leasehold or subleasehold interests in, all of its material properties and assets, tangible and intangible, real, personal and mixed, used or held for use in its business, free and clear of any liens, except for such imperfections of title, if any, that do not materially interfere with the present value of the subject property and liens for taxes not yet due and payable.
(e) Each of of this Agreement setting forth the Retained Assets and Section 3.14(a) of the Disclosure Schedule of the Agreement setting forth the Owned Intellectual Property and the Licensed Intellectual Property comprising the Gastrodiagnostic Business and the Second Spin Business together with any related products and services of the Company and its Subsidiaries is true, correct and complete in all respects.
Schedule I
3.14
Intellectual Property.
(a) Section 3.14(a) of the Disclosure Schedule sets forth a true and complete list of (i) all Registered Intellectual Property, including the owner(s) of each such item of Registered Intellectual Property and the jurisdictions in which each such item of Intellectual Property has been issued or registered or in which any application for such issuance and registration has been filed, or in which any other filing or recordation has been made, and all (A) actions that are required to be taken by the Company or its Subsidiaries within one hundred eighty (180) days of the date of this Agreement with respect to any of the Registered Intellectual Property, and (B) proceedings or actions before any governmental body (including the United States Patent and Trademark Office or equivalent authority anywhere else in the world) related to any of the Registered Intellectual Property, including without limitation any (x) interference, reissue, reexamination or similar proceedings pertaining to the scope, validity and/or ownership
 
of any of the patents of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries, (y) trademark opposition proceedings, or (z) proceedings relating to Internet domain names, (ii) any other items of Owned Intellectual Property that are material to the business of the Company and its Subsidiaries, and (iii) all Licenses (other than Licenses in respect of Shrink Wrap Software that have an acquisition cost of less than $20,000). Section 3.14(a) of the Disclosure Schedule further identifies in separate captions the items of Intellectual Property and the agreements related to Intellectual Property and IT Systems assigned, transferred and conveyed to Gastro Company pursuant to the Gastrodiagnostic Business Distribution Documents and to New Co. pursuant to the Second Spin Distribution Documents.
(b) The conduct of the business of the Company and its Subsidiaries as currently conducted (including with respect to the Gastrodiagnostic Business, the Second Spin Business and the Retained Assets as conducted by the Company and its Subsidiaries prior to the Spin-Off Date and the Second Spin-Off Date, as the case may be) does not conflict with, infringe upon, misappropriate or otherwise violate the Intellectual Property rights of any third party. No Actions are pending or, to the knowledge of the Company, threatened in writing against the Company or any of its Subsidiaries alleging any of the foregoing. Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary has received any opinion of counsel that any Neurodiagnostic Product or Gastrodiagnostic Product or the operation of the business of the Company or any Subsidiary, as previously or currently conducted, or as currently proposed to be conducted by the Company or any Subsidiary (including with respect to the Gastrodiagnostic Business and the Retained Assets as conducted by the Company and its Subsidiaries prior to the Spin-Off Date), infringes or misappropriates any Intellectual Property rights of any third party. To the knowledge of the Company, no person is engaging in any activity that infringes upon, misappropriates or otherwise violates the Owned Intellectual Property or Licensed Intellectual Property (other than generally commercially available software licenses pursuant to shrink-wrap or click-wrap licenses).
(c) The Company and its Subsidiaries own and have good and exclusive title to each item of Owned Intellectual Property, free and clear of any liens and encumbrances. Each of the Company and each of its Subsidiaries has the valid right to use the Owned Intellectual Property and Licensed Intellectual Property in the continued operation of its business as presently conducted.
(d) All necessary registration, maintenance and renewal fees currently due in connection with Registered Intellectual Property owned by the Company or any of its Subsidiaries have been made and all necessary documents, recordations and certificates in connection with such Intellectual Property have been filed with the relevant governmental bodies in the United States or those foreign jurisdictions in which applications for such Registered Intellectual Property have been filed, as the case may be, for the purposes of prosecuting, maintaining or perfecting such Registered Intellectual Property. No Owned Intellectual Property or, to the knowledge of the Company, no Licensed Intellectual Property, is subject to any outstanding decree, order, injunction, judgment or ruling restricting the use of such Intellectual Property or that would impair the validity or enforceability of such Intellectual Property. The Owned Intellectual Property and, to the knowledge of the Company, the Licensed Intellectual Property, are subsisting, valid and enforceable, and have not been adjudged invalid or unenforceable in whole or part.
 
(e) The Owned Intellectual Property and the Licensed Intellectual Property include all of the Intellectual Property currently used in the operation of the business of the Company and its Subsidiaries, and there are no other items of Intellectual Property that are material to the operation of the business of the Company and its Subsidiaries as currently conducted. The Owned Intellectual Property and the Licensed Intellectual Property to be retained by the Company after the assignment, transfer and conveyance of the Retained Assets include all of the Intellectual Property currently used in the operation of the business of the Company other than the Gastrodiagnostic Business, and there are no other items of Intellectual Property that are material to the operation of the business of the Company and its Subsidiaries, other than the Gastrodiagnostic Business, as currently conducted by the Company and its Subsidiaries.
(f) To the knowledge of the Company, (i) each License is valid and enforceable, is binding on all parties thereto, and is in full force and effect; (ii) no party to any License is in material breach thereof or default thereunder; and (iii) neither the execution of this Agreement nor the consummation of the Merger shall adversely affect any of the rights of the Company with respect to the Owned Intellectual Property or Licensed Intellectual Property, other than the effects of the assignment, transfer and conveyance of the Owned Intellectual Properly and Licensed Intellectual Property to Gastro Company or New Co. as part of the Retained Assets pursuant to the Gastrodiagnostic Business Distribution Documents and the Second Spin and Distribution Documents.
(g) Each of the Company and each of its Subsidiaries has taken all commercially reasonable steps in accordance with normal industry practice to maintain the confidentiality of the trade secrets of the Company and other confidential or non-public information included in the Owned Intellectual Property or Licensed Intellectual Property (""). To the knowledge of the Company, (i) there has been no misappropriation by any person of any Confidential Information; (ii) no employee, former employee, independent contractor or agent of the Company or any Subsidiary has misappropriated any trade secrets of any other person in the course of performance as an employee, independent contractor or agent of the Company; and (iii) no employee, former employee, independent contractor or agent of the Company is in default or breach of any term of any employment agreement, nondisclosure agreement, assignment of invention agreement or similar agreement or contract relating in any way to the protection, ownership, development, use or transfer of Intellectual Property or Confidential Information. Without limiting the foregoing, each of the Company and each of its Subsidiaries has and enforces policies requiring each employee and contractor involved in proprietary aspects of the business or with Intellectual Property or who have or may have access to Confidential Information to execute nondisclosure and proprietary information agreements. All persons who have contributed to the creation, invention, modification or improvement of any Intellectual Property owned by the Company or any of its Subsidiaries, in whole or in part, have signed written agreements ensuring that all such Intellectual Property is assigned to and owned exclusively by the Company or such Subsidiary, as the case may be, and a list of all persons executing such agreements is set forth in Section 3.14(g) of the Disclosure Schedule.
Confidential Information
 
(h) To the knowledge of the Company, the Company's products and services, including without limitation the Neurodiagnostic Products, are free of all viruses, worms, and other known contaminants, and do not contain any errors or problems, that would (i) disrupt the ordinary operation of such products and services, or (ii) have an adverse impact on the operation of other Software, operating systems or otherwise of the business of the Company. The Company's products and services, including without limitation the Neurodiagnostic Products, do not incorporate or use any software or other material that is distributed as "free software," "open source software" or under a similar license or distribution terms. The access and use of the Company's products and services, including without limitation the Neurodiagnostic Products, by the Company and its Subsidiaries and, to the knowledge of the Company, any customer thereof (to the extent applicable) in connection with the operation of the business of the Company and its Subsidiaries as currently conducted do not violate any applicable Laws in any material respect.
(i) Upon the consummation of the Merger and at the Effective Time, the Owned Intellectual Property of the Company, the Licensed Intellectual Property of the Company and the other assets and properties of the Company and its Subsidiaries (other than the Retained Assets) will provide Parent with all Intellectual Property and IT Systems sufficient to conduct the Neurodiagnostic Business as currently conducted by the Company or any of its Subsidiaries.
3.15
Taxes.
Except as specifically disclosed in Section 3.15 of the Disclosure Schedule:
(a) Each of the Company and each of its Subsidiaries (i) has filed all Tax Returns required to be filed by the Company or such Subsidiary prior to the Closing Date; and (ii) has timely paid or adequately reserved on its books and records all Taxes required to be paid prior to the Closing Date (whether or not shown on any Tax Return). All Tax Returns filed by the Company and its Subsidiaries prior to the Closing Date are true, correct and complete in all material respects to the extent relevant to computing the amount of Taxes payable to the applicable Governmental Authority for the period covered by the Tax Return. To the knowledge of the Company, the net operating loss for U.S. federal income tax purposes as of the end of the year ending on the Closing Date for the consolidated group the common parent of which is the Company that is available to be carried forward into a subsequent Tax year (the use of which is subject to the limitations under the Code including potentially under Code sections 269, 382, 383, 384 and 1502) is not less than $4,500,000. No deficiencies for any Tax have been proposed or assessed in writing against the Company or any of its Subsidiaries. Neither the Company nor any of its Subsidiaries has received any notification from the IRS or any other taxing authority regarding any material issues that (i) are currently pending before the IRS or any other taxing agency or authority (including any sales or use taxing authority) regarding the Company or such Subsidiary or (ii) have been raised by the IRS or other taxing agency or authority and not yet finally resolved. To the knowledge of the Company, no Tax Return of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries is under audit by the IRS or any other taxing agency or authority and any such past audits (if any) have been completed and fully resolved to the satisfaction of the applicable taxing agency or authority conducting such audit and all Taxes finally determined as a result of such audit to be due from the Company or such Subsidiary have been paid in full. Neither the Company nor any of its Subsidiaries has granted any waiver of any statute of limitations with respect to, or any extension of a period for the assessment of, any Tax that is still effective.
 
(b) Each of the Company and each of its Subsidiaries has withheld and paid (and until the Effective Time will withhold and pay) all Taxes required to have been withheld and paid (including withholding of taxes pursuant to Sections 1441, 1442, 1445 and 1446 of the Code or similar provisions under any foreign law) in connection with any amounts paid or owing to any employee, independent contractor, creditor, Company Stockholder, holder of any equity interests in such Subsidiary or other third party, and have timely filed all withholding Tax Returns. Neither the Company nor any of its Subsidiaries (i) has liability for the Taxes of any other person (other than the Company or such Subsidiary) by reason of having joined in the filing of a consolidated, combined or unitary Tax Return, by contract, by transferee liability or otherwise; (ii) is a party to or bound by any Tax sharing, Tax indemnity, or Tax allocation agreement; (iii) has filed any disclosures under Section 6662 of the Code or comparable provisions of state, local or foreign law to prevent the imposition of penalties with respect to any Tax reporting position taken on any Tax Return; (iv) has consummated or participated in, and is currently participating in any transaction which, to the knowledge of the Company, was or is a "tax shelter" transaction as defined in Sections 6662, 6011, 6012 or 6111 of the Code or the Treasury Regulations promulgated thereunder; (v) has been a member of a consolidated, combined, unitary or aggregate group of which the Company or such Subsidiary was not the ultimate parent corporation; (vi) has been a "distributing corporation" or a "controlled corporation" in a distribution intended to qualify under Section 355(e) of the Code within the past five years; (vii) has received any notice from a taxing authority for a jurisdiction in which a Tax Return has not been filed asserting that the filing of such a Tax Return may be required; (viii) has been a member of any partnership (other than Gastro Company) or the holder of a beneficial interest in any trust for any period for which the statute of limitations for any Tax has not expired.
(c) Neither the Company nor any of its Subsidiaries nor any "dual resident corporation" (within the meaning of Section 1503(d) of the Code) in which the Company or such Subsidiary is considered to hold an interest has incurred a dual consolidated loss within the meaning of Section 1503 of the Code. Each of the Company and each of its Subsidiaries has not been nor will the Company or such Subsidiary be required to include any item of income in, or exclude any item of deduction from, taxable income for any taxable period (or portion thereof) ending after the Merger as a result of any: (i) Code Section 481 inclusion as a result of a change in method of accounting for a taxable period ending on or prior to the Merger; (ii) "closing agreement" as described in Section 7121 of the Code (or any corresponding or similar provision of state, local or foreign income Tax law) executed on or prior to the Merger; (iii) intercompany transaction or any excess loss account described in Treasury Regulation under Section 1502 of the Code (or any corresponding or similar provision of state, local or foreign income tax law); (iv) installment sale or open transaction disposition made on or prior to the Merger; or (v) prepaid amount received on or prior to the Merger.
(d) Each of the Company and each Subsidiary is not, and has not been at any time during the past five years, a United States real property holding corporation within the meaning of Section 897 of the Code.
(e) The representations and warranties in this Section 3.15 and those contained in Section 3.10 are the sole and exclusive representations and warranties regarding the Tax Returns and Tax liabilities of the Company and its Subsidiaries.
 
3.16
Environmental Matters.
Except as described in Section 3.16 of the Disclosure Schedule, to the knowledge of the Company, (a) each of the Company and each of its Subsidiaries is in material compliance with all Environmental Laws; (b) no portion of any property owned, leased or occupied by the Company or any of its Subsidiaries is Contaminated in any material respect; (c) neither the Company nor any of its Subsidiaries has received from any Governmental Authority or any other person notice that it has been named or may be named as a responsible or potentially responsible party under any Environmental Law for any site Contaminated by Hazardous Substances: (d) neither the Company nor any of its Subsidiaries has assumed the liability of any other person or entity for, nor agreed to indemnify any other person or entity against, claims arising out of the release of Hazardous Substances into the environment; (e) each of the Company and each of its Subsidiaries has all permits, licenses and other authorizations required under any Environmental Law for the operation of its business (""); and (f) each of the Company and each of its Subsidiaries is in material compliance with its Environmental Permits (if any).
Environmental Permits
3.17
No Rights Agreement.
Neither the Company nor any of its Subsidiaries has adopted any stockholders' rights plan or comparable arrangement.
3.18
Material Contracts.
(a) Subsections (i) through (xvii) of Section 3.18(a) of the Disclosure Schedule lists the following types of contracts and agreements to which the Company or any Subsidiary is a party (such contracts and agreements as are required to be set forth in Section 3.18(a) of the Disclosure Schedule being the "") (each reference to "the Company" in this Section 3.18 shall refer to the Company and each of its Subsidiaries, as the case may be):
Material Contracts
(i) each contract and agreement, whether or not made in the ordinary course of business, that contemplates an exchange of consideration with a value of more than $100,000 annually;
(ii) all contracts and agreements evidencing material indebtedness;
(iii) all joint venture, partnership, strategic alliance and business acquisition or divestiture agreements;
(iv) all agreements relating to issuances of securities of the Company;
(v) all agreements between the Company or any affiliate of the Company, on the one hand, and the Company or any affiliate of the Company, on the other hand;
 
(vi) all broker, distributor, dealer, manufacturer's representative, franchise, agency, sales promotion, market research, marketing consulting and advertising contracts and agreements to which the Company is a party and any other contract that compensates any person based on any sales by the Company;
(vii) all management contracts (excluding contracts for employment) and contracts with other consultants;
(viii) all contracts involving the payment of royalties or other amounts calculated based upon the revenues or income of the Company or income or revenues related to any product of the Company to which the Company is a party;
(ix) all contracts and agreements with any Governmental Authority to which the Company is a party;
(x) all Licenses other than Licenses for Shrink Wrap Software that have an individual acquisition cost of less than $20,000;
(xi) all licenses, sublicenses and other contracts pursuant to which the Company or any of its Subsidiaries has (A) granted any person any right or interest in any Intellectual Property or Licensed Intellectual Property, or (B) agreed to any restriction on the right of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries to use or enforce any Owned Intellectual Property or pursuant to which the Company or any of its Subsidiaries agrees to encumber, transfer or sell rights in or with respect to any Owned Intellectual Property;
(xii) all contracts and agreements that (A) limit, or purport to limit, the ability of the Company to compete in any line of business or with any person or in any business market, geographic area or during any period of time, (B) grant exclusive sales, distribution, marketing or other exclusive rights, rights of refusal, rights of first negotiation or similar rights and/or terms to any person, (C) contain a provision of the type commonly referred to as a "most favored nation" provision, or (D) otherwise limit the right of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries to sell, distribute or manufacture any products or services or to purchase or otherwise obtain any software, components, parts, subassemblies or services;
(xiii) any contract providing for the development of any product, product candidate, device, component, technology or Intellectual Property, independently or jointly, by or for the Company or any Subsidiary, including, but not limited to, any proof-of-concept, collaboration, development or co-development agreement, and any contract to license or authorize any third party to manufacture any of the foregoing;
(xiv) all agreements with the customers and suppliers identified in Section 3.19 of the Disclosure Schedule;
(xv) all material contracts or arrangements that result in any person or entity holding a power of attorney from the Company that relates to the Company or its businesses;
 
(xvi) all agreements related to professional services rendered to the Company in connection with the Merger and this Agreement; and
(xvii) all other contracts and agreements, the termination of which would be material to the Company.
Section 3.18(a) of the Disclosure Schedule further identifies which contracts and agreements of the Company and any of its Subsidiaries were assigned to and assumed by Gastro Company pursuant to the Gastrodiagnostic Business Distribution Documents and which contracts and agreements were assigned to and assumed by New Co. pursuant to the Second Spin and Distribution Documents.
(b)(i) Each Material Contract is a legal, valid and binding agreement of the Company; (ii) the Company has not received any claim of material default under or cancellation of any Material Contract and the Company is not, in any material respect, in breach or violation of, or default under, any Material Contract; and (iii) to the Company's knowledge, no other party is, in any material respect, in breach or violation of, or default under, any Material Contract. The Company has furnished or made available to Parent true and complete copies of all Material Contracts (or the forms thereof), including any material amendments thereto.
3.19
Customers and Suppliers.
Section 3.19 of the Disclosure Schedule sets forth a true and complete list of the Company's and its Subsidiaries' top ten customers and top ten suppliers in respect of the Neurodiagnostic Business (based on the revenue from such customer, or purchases from such supplier, as the case may be, during the 12-month period ended June 30, 2009). As of the date of this Agreement, none of the Company's and its Subsidiaries' customers listed in Section 3.19 of the Disclosure Schedule and no material supplier of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries, (i) has cancelled or otherwise terminated any contract with the Company or such Subsidiary prior to the expiration of the contract term, or (ii) to the Company's knowledge, has threatened, or indicated its intention, to cancel or otherwise terminate its relationship with the Company or such Subsidiary or to reduce substantially its purchase from or sale to the Company or such Subsidiary of any products, equipment, goods or services.
3.20
Inventory.
All inventory of the Company and its Subsidiaries, including consigned inventory, whether or not reflected in the 2009 Balance Sheet, consists of a quality and quantity usable and salable in the ordinary course of business and is sufficient for the operation of the business of the Company and its Subsidiaries in the ordinary course and consistent with past practice, except for obsolete items and items of below-standard quality, all of which have been written off or written down to net realizable value on the 2009 Balance Sheet or on the accounting records of the Company and its Subsidiaries as of the Effective Time, as the case may be. All inventories not written off have been priced at the lower of cost or net realizable value on a first in, first out basis. Section 3.20 of the Disclosure Schedule sets forth the location of all items of the Company's and each of its Subsidiaries' inventory, including consigned inventory as of the date of this Agreement and the Company's or such Subsidiary's procedures for tracking and controlling consigned inventory, and such procedures are adequate for such purposes and have been followed by the Company and such Subsidiary consistent with past practice.
 
3.21
Company Products and Services.
(a) Each product manufactured, sold, or leased by the Company or any of its Subsidiaries on or prior to the Closing Date has been in conformity in all material respects with all applicable contractual commitments, any applicable Law and all express and implied warranties, and each of the Company and each Subsidiary has no material Liabilities for replacement or repair thereof or other damages in connection therewith. Each of the Company and each of its Subsidiaries has not been required to file any notice or other report with, or provide information to, any product safety agency, commission, board or other Governmental Authority concerning actual or potential hazards with respect to any product manufactured by the Company or such Subsidiary other than routine filings required of all manufacturers similarly situated. To the knowledge of the Company, neither the Company nor any of its Subsidiaries has any material Liability arising out of any injury to persons or property as a result of the ownership, possession or use of any product manufactured, sold, leased or delivered by the Company or such Subsidiary.
(b) Since August 1, 2007, there have been no (i) recalls related to any product manufactured sold, leased or delivered by the Company, or (ii) withdrawals of any product manufactured sold, leased or delivered by the Company due to quality or safety issues.
3.22
Insurance.
Each of the Company and each Subsidiary of the Company maintains insurance policies of the types and for the amounts that are usual and customary in the context of the businesses and operations in which the Company and such Subsidiary is engaged.
3.23
Certain Business Practices.
None of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries or, to the Company's knowledge, any directors or officers, agents or employees of the Company or such Subsidiary, has (i) used any funds for unlawful contributions, gifts, entertainment or other unlawful expenses related to political activity; (ii) made any unlawful payment to foreign or domestic government officials or employees or to foreign or domestic political parties or campaigns or violated any provision of the Foreign Corrupt Practices Act of 1977, as amended; or (iii) made any payment in the nature of criminal bribery.
3.24
Government Regulation.
(a) To the knowledge of the Company, neither the Company or any of its Subsidiaries nor any of their respective managing employees, as defined in 42 C.F.R. Part 420 Subpart C, ("") has been, or is being investigated with respect to, any activity that constitutes a material violation of any Healthcare Law.
Managing Employees
(b) Since January 1, 2005, neither the Company or any of its Subsidiaries nor, to the knowledge of the Company, any of their respective Managing Employees active in their capacities as employees of the Company or such Subsidiary has engaged in any activity that contravenes or constitutes a material violation of any Healthcare Law.
 
(c) Each of the Company and each of its Subsidiaries has not: (i) had a material civil monetary penalty assessed against it under Section 1128A of the SSA or any regulations promulgated thereunder; or (ii) been convicted (as that term is defined in 42 C.F.R. Section 901.2) of any of the following categories of offenses as described in SSA Section 1128(a) and (b)(1), (2), (3), or any regulations promulgated thereunder: (A) criminal offenses relating to the delivery of an item or service under any state or federal healthcare program; (B) criminal offenses under federal or state law for misconduct in connection with the delivery of a healthcare item or service or with respect to any act or omission in a program operated by or financed in whole or in part by any federal, state or local government agency; or (C) federal or state laws relating to the interference with or obstruction of any investigation into any criminal offense described in this clause.
(d) Since January 1, 2005, neither the Company nor any of its Subsidiaries has received or been subject to: (i) any United States Food and Drug Administration ("") Form 483's relating to any product manufactured, sold, leased or delivered by the Company; (ii) any FDA Notices of Adverse Findings relating to any product manufactured, sold, leased or delivered by the Company; or (iii) any warning letters or other written correspondence from the FDA or any other Governmental Authority concerning any product manufactured, sold, leased or delivered by the Company in which the FDA or such other Governmental Authority asserted that the operations of the Company were not in compliance with applicable Law, regulations, rules or guidelines with respect to any product manufactured, sold, leased or delivered by the Company.
FDA
3.25
Brokers.
No broker, finder or investment banker is entitled to any brokerage, finder's or other fee or commission in connection with this Agreement or the Merger based upon arrangements made by or on behalf of the Company.
As an inducement to the Company to enter into this Agreement, Parent and Merger Sub hereby, jointly and severally, represent and warrant to the Company that:
4.01
Corporate Organization.
Each of Parent and Merger Sub is a corporation duly organized, validly existing and in good standing under the laws of the jurisdiction of its incorporation and has the requisite corporate power and authority and all necessary governmental approvals to own, lease and operate its properties and to carry on its business as it is now being conducted, except where the failure to be so organized, existing or in good standing or to have such power, authority and governmental approvals would not, individually or in the aggregate, prevent or delay consummation of the Merger.
 
4.02
Authority Relative to This Agreement.
Each of Parent and Merger Sub has all necessary corporate power and authority to execute and deliver this Agreement, to perform its obligations hereunder and to consummate the Merger. The execution and delivery of this Agreement by Parent and Merger Sub and the consummation by Parent and Merger Sub of the Merger have been duly and validly authorized by all necessary corporate action on the part of Parent and Merger Sub, and no other corporate proceedings on the part of Parent or Merger Sub are necessary to authorize this Agreement or to consummate the Merger (other than the filing and recordation of appropriate merger documents as required by DGCL). This Agreement has been duly and validly executed and delivered by Parent and Merger Sub and, assuming due authorization, execution and delivery by the Company, constitutes the legal, valid and binding obligation of each of Parent and Merger Sub enforceable against each of Parent and Merger Sub in accordance with its terms.
4.03
No Conflict; Required Filings and Consents.
(a) The execution and delivery of this Agreement by Parent and Merger Sub do not, and the performance of this Agreement by Parent and Merger Sub will not, and the consummation of the Merger by Parent and Merger Sub will not, (i) conflict with or violate the certificate of incorporation or bylaws of either Parent or Merger Sub, (ii) assuming that all consents, approvals and other authorizations described in Section 4.03(b) have been obtained and that all filings and other actions described in Section 4.03(b) have been made or taken, conflict with or violate any Law applicable to Parent or Merger Sub or by which any property or asset of either of them is bound or affected, or (iii) result in any breach of, or constitute a default (or an event which, with notice or lapse of time or both, would become a default) under, or give to others any rights of termination, amendment, acceleration or cancellation of, or result in the creation of a lien or other encumbrance on any property or asset of Parent or Merger Sub pursuant to, any note, bond, mortgage, indenture, contract, agreement, lease, license, permit, franchise or other instrument or obligation to which Parent or Merger Sub is a party or by which Parent or Merger Sub or any property or asset of either of them is bound or affected, except, with respect to clauses (ii) and (iii), for any such conflicts, violations, breaches, defaults or other occurrences which would not, individually or in the aggregate, prevent or materially delay consummation of the Merger.
(b) The execution and delivery of this Agreement by Parent and Merger Sub do not, and the performance of this Agreement by Parent and Merger Sub will not, require any consent, approval, authorization or permit of, or filing with or notification to, any Governmental Authority, except for (i) filings under the Exchange Act, (ii) the filing and recordation of appropriate merger documents as required by DGCL, and (iii) where the failure to obtain such consents, approvals, authorizations or permits, or to make such filings or notifications, would not prevent or materially delay consummation of the Merger.
4.04
Brokers.
No broker, finder or investment banker is entitled to any brokerage, finder's or other fee or commission in connection with the Merger based upon arrangements made by or on behalf of Parent or Merger Sub, other than any broker, finder or investment banker the fees of which will be payable solely by Parent or Merger Sub.
 
4.05
Proxy Statement Information.
Any information (if any) supplied by Parent, Merger Sub or any of Parent's or Merger Sub's representatives for inclusion in the Proxy Statement (if applicable) shall not, at the date the Proxy Statement (or any amendment or supplement thereto) is first mailed to Company Stockholder, at the time of the Stockholders' Meeting (if applicable) and at the Effective Time, contain any statement which, at the time and in light of the circumstances under which it was made, is false or misleading with respect to any material fact, or which omits to state any material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein not false or misleading or necessary to correct any statement in any earlier communication with respect to the solicitation of proxies for the Stockholders' Meeting which shall have become false or misleading.
4.06
Financing.
Parent has sufficient cash on hand, or has obtained the financing it needs, to consummate the transactions contemplated by this Agreement and to fund the working capital requirements of the acquired business after the Closing.
4.07
Litigation.
As of the date of this Agreement, there are no claims, actions, suits, proceedings or investigations of any nature pending or, to the knowledge of Parent, threatened against Parent or Merger Sub, or any properties or assets of Parent or Merger Sub, before any Governmental Authority that, if adversely determined, individually or in the aggregate, would prevent or delay consummation of the Merger or the other transactions contemplated hereby. As of the date of this Agreement, neither Parent nor Merger Sub nor any property or asset of Parent or Merger Sub is subject to any court order, writ, determination, judgment, decree, injunction, determination or award of any Governmental Authority which, individually or in the aggregate, would prevent or delay consummation of the Merger or the transactions contemplated hereby.
5.01
Stockholders' Meeting or Written Consent and Approval of the Company Stockholder.
(a) The Company shall take all action necessary in accordance with this Agreement, the Certificate of Incorporation and Bylaws of the Company and DGCL prior to the Closing Date or on and as of the Closing Date immediately prior to the Effective Time or otherwise prior to the Effective Time, as the case may be, to call, notice, convene, hold and conduct a meeting of the Company Stockholder (the "") for the purpose of voting upon approval of the Merger and adoption of this Agreement or otherwise to secure the written consent or approval of the requisite Company Stockholder in lieu of a meeting approving the Merger and adopting this Agreement (the "") and required in order to effectuate each of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement.
Stockholders' Meeting
Stockholder Consent
 
(b) The Board of the Company or any committee thereof (if applicable) shall have recommended to the Company Stockholder that the Company Stockholder vote in favor of the approval of the Merger and adoption of this Agreement at the Stockholders' Meeting or deliver a written consent in lieu of a meeting approving the Merger and adopting this Agreement. Neither the Board of the Company nor any committee thereof (if applicable) shall have withdrawn, amended or modified, or proposed or resolved to withdraw, amend or modify, in a manner adverse to Parent, the recommendation of the Company's Board or any committee thereof (if any) that the Company Stockholder vote or deliver a written consent in favor of and approve the Merger and adopt this Agreement.
(c) The Company shall have included in the Proxy Statement or the Stockholder Consent, as the case may be, a proposal to be voted on or consented to by the Company Stockholder as is required by the terms of Section 280G(b)(5)(B) of the Code (the "") so as to render the parachute payment provisions of Section 280G of the Code inapplicable to any and all payments and/or benefits provided pursuant to contracts or arrangements that might otherwise result, separately or in the aggregate, in the payment of any amount and/or the provision of any benefit that would not be deductible by reason of Section 280G of the Code, with such Company Stockholder approval to be obtained in a manner which satisfies all applicable requirements of such Section 280G(b)(5)(B) of the Code and the proposed Treasury Regulations thereunder, including Q-7 of Section 1.280G-1 of such proposed Treasury Regulations.
280G Proposal
5.02
Notification of Certain Matters.
The Company shall give prompt notice to Parent, and Parent shall give prompt notice to the Company, of (a) the occurrence, or non-occurrence, of any event the occurrence, or non-occurrence, of which reasonably could be expected to cause any representation or warranty contained in this Agreement and made by such person to be untrue or inaccurate in any material respect, (b) any failure of the Company, Parent or Merger Sub, as the case may be, to comply in all material respects with or satisfy any covenant or agreement to be complied with or satisfied by it hereunder and (c) any other material development relating to the business, financial condition or results of operations of the Company; , , that the delivery of any notice pursuant to this Section 5.02 shall not limit or otherwise affect the remedies available hereunder to the party receiving such notice under or Section 8.02.
provided
however
Article VI
5.03
Further Action; Reasonable Best Efforts.
(a) Neither party will take any action or omit to take any action that would cause the representations and warranties contained in or , as the case may be, to be untrue on and as of the Closing Date.
Article III
Article IV
(b) Upon the terms and subject to the conditions of this Agreement, each of the parties hereto shall use its reasonable best efforts to take, or cause to be taken, all appropriate action, and to do, or cause to be done, all things necessary, proper or advisable under applicable
 
Laws to consummate and make effective the Merger. In case, at any time after the Effective Time, any further action is necessary or desirable to carry out the purposes of this Agreement, the proper officers and directors of each party to this Agreement shall use their reasonable best efforts to take all such action.
5.04
Public Announcements.
Parent and the Company shall consult with each other before issuing any press release or otherwise making any public statements with respect to this Agreement or the Merger and shall not issue any such press release or make any such public statement prior to such consultation, except as may be required by Law or the rules or regulations of any United States or non-United States securities exchange. The parties have agreed upon the form of a joint press release announcing the execution of this Agreement.
5.05
Tax Certificate.
The Company shall provide the Parent and Merger Sub, on or not more than 30 days prior to the Effective Time, a certificate (in a form reasonably satisfactory to Parent and Merger Sub) meeting the requirements of Treasury regulation sections 1.897-2(h) and 1.1445-5(b)(4)(iii).
5.06
Termination of Certain Benefit Plans.
To the extent requested by Parent no later than two (2) business days prior to the Closing, the Company shall have taken (or caused to be taken) all actions necessary or appropriate to terminate, effective no later than the date immediately preceding the Closing in connection with and contingent upon the Closing, any Plan that contains a cash or deferred arrangement intended to qualify under Section 401(k) of the Code (each, a "") in accordance with the provisions of such Company 401(k) Plan and applicable Law. If Parent requests that any such Company 401(k) Plan be terminated, the Board of Directors of the Company or any committee thereof (as and if applicable) shall have adopted resolutions authorizing the termination of such Company 401(k) Plan effective no later than the day immediately preceding the Closing in connection with and contingent upon the Closing, such resolutions to be subject to reasonable review and approval by Parent's counsel.
Company 401(k) Plan
5.07
Certain Tax Matters.
(a) The Company Stockholder, at the sole cost of the Company Securityholders, shall prepare all U.S. federal and state income Tax Returns of the Company and each of its Subsidiaries for all periods ending on or before the Closing Date and which are due (after taking into all extensions) after the Closing Date (collectively, ""). The Company Stockholder shall submit all Pre-Closing Income Tax Returns to Parent at least thirty (30) days prior to the due date of such Pre-Closing Income Tax Return (after taking into account all extensions) and Parent shall cause the Company or the applicable Subsidiary to timely file such Pre-Closing Income Tax Return, in the form prepared by the Company Stockholder (without any changes, deletions, or additions other than nonmaterial changes, deletions, or additions or other than those approved by the Company Stockholder (which approval shall not be unreasonably withheld, conditioned or delayed)) with the appropriate Governmental Authority.
Pre-Closing Income Tax Returns
 
(b) Parent shall cause the Company and each Subsidiary to prepare and timely file all Tax Returns which begin before the Closing Date and end after the Closing Date. Such Tax Returns shall be prepared and filed timely and on a basis consistent with procedures, accounting methods, and practices of the Company and its Subsidiaries in effect as of the date of this Agreement with respect to the treatment of specific items on such Tax Returns unless otherwise required by applicable Law. Parent shall not, and shall not allow the Company or any Subsidiary, to file any amended Tax Return relating to any period (or portion thereof) ending on before the Closing Date without the prior written permission of the Company Stockholder (which shall not be unreasonably withheld, delayed, or conditioned).
(c) For purposes of determining the indemnification obligations under Section 8.07(v) for any period that begins before and ends after the Closing Date, in the case of any Taxes that are imposed on a periodic basis and are payable for a taxable period that includes (but does not end on) the Closing Date, the portion of such Tax which relates to the portion of such taxable period ending on the Closing Date shall (x) in the case of any Taxes other than Taxes based upon or related to income or receipts, be deemed to be the amount of such Tax for the entire taxable period multiplied by a fraction the numerator of which is the number of days in the taxable period ending on the Closing Date and the denominator of which is the number of days in the entire taxable period, and (y) in the case of any Tax based upon or related to income or receipts, be deemed equal to the amount which would be payable if the relevant taxable period ended on the Closing Date.
(d) If any Governmental Authority issues to the Company or any Subsidiary (i) a written notice of its intent to audit, examine or conduct another proceeding with respect to Taxes or Tax Returns of the Company or any Subsidiary for periods ending prior to the Closing Date or (ii) a written notice of deficiency, a written notice of reassessment, a written proposed adjustment, a written assertion of claim or written demand concerning Taxes or Tax Returns for periods ending on or prior to the Closing Date, Parent shall notify the Company Stockholder of its receipt of such communication from the Governmental Authority within ten (10) business days of receipt (collectively, a ""). Parent shall not allow the Company or any Subsidiary to settle or otherwise resolve any Tax Claim with respect to which any Company Securityholder could have a liability for Taxes under this Agreement without the prior written approval of the Company Stockholder. The Company Stockholder shall, at its expense, have the right to control (which shall include the exclusive right to settle or otherwise resolve the underlying claim) the contest of any Tax Claim for periods ending on or before the Closing Date (a "") (provided that the Company Stockholder shall keep Parent reasonably informed regarding the status of such Tax Contest) and Parent shall cause the Company to execute any power of attorney or other document requested by the Company Stockholder that it reasonably believe is necessary to permit the Company Stockholder to control such contest or to settle or otherwise resolve the underlying claim.
Tax Claim
Tax Contest
 
5.08
Directors' and Officers' Indemnification.
(a) If the Merger is consummated, then until the sixth anniversary of the Effective Time, Parent will and will cause the Surviving Corporation to fulfill and honor in all respects the obligations of the Company to its directors and officers as of immediately prior to the Effective Time (the "") pursuant to any indemnification provisions under the Company's Certificate of Incorporation or Bylaws as in effect on the Agreement Date and pursuant to any indemnification agreements between the Company and such Company Indemnified Parties existing as of the Agreement Date, with respect to claims arising out of matters occurring at or prior to the Effective Time. Any claims for indemnification made under this Section 5.08(a) on or prior to the sixth anniversary of the Effective Time shall survive such anniversary until the final resolution thereof. However, the foregoing covenants under this Section 5.08(a) shall not apply to any claim based on a claim for indemnification made by any Parent Indemnified Person pursuant to .
Company Indemnified Officers and Directors
Article VIII
(b) For a period of six years after the Effective Time, the Surviving Corporation shall not amend (and Parent shall cause the Surviving Corporation not to amend) subject to applicable Law the Certificate of Incorporation or Bylaws of the Company in a manner that would eliminate, reduce or terminate the benefit of the indemnification provisions in favor of the Company's directors and officers, as contained in the Certificate of Incorporation and Bylaws as in effect as of the Agreement Date, for actions or omissions on the part of such directors and officers prior to the Closing Date.
(c) The provisions of this Section 5.08 are intended to be for the benefit of, and shall be enforceable by, the Company Indemnified Officers and Directors.
5.09
Retention Agreements.
Parent shall enter into retention agreements, each substantially in the form of , with each of Erik Jensen and Alex Sigal.
Exhibit B
5.10
Restricted Cash.
Pursuant to Section 2.09, the cash of Alpine Biomed ApS in the amount of DKK 6,800,000 deposited in one or more bank accounts with Danske Bank in Copenhagen, Denmark and restricted pursuant to agreements with certain suppliers of Alpine Biomed ApS (the "") shall be a retained asset of the Company Stockholder. From and after the Closing Date, Parent and its affiliates (including, without limitation, Alpine Biomed ApS) shall use reasonable best efforts to take, or cause to be taken, all appropriate action, and to do, or cause to be done, all things necessary to arrange for the release as promptly as practicable of the Restricted Cash with appropriate instructions to remit such cash directly to the Company Stockholder in accordance with wire transfer instructions provided by the Company Stockholder. Notwithstanding the foregoing, on September 15, 2010, Parent or one or more of its affiliates shall remit to the Company Stockholder in accordance with wire transfer instructions provided by the Company Stockholder cash in an amount equal to (x) DKK 6,800,000 minus (y) the aggregate amount of the Restricted Cash previously remitted to the Company Stockholder by Parent and its affiliates.
Restricted Cash
 
6.01
Conditions to the Merger.
(a) The Company's obligations to consummate the Merger and take the other actions required to be taken by the Company at the Closing are subject to the fulfillment or satisfaction as of the Closing, of each of the following conditions (it being understood that (a) any one or more of the following conditions may be waived by the Company in a writing signed on behalf of the Company and (b) by proceeding with the Closing, the Company shall be deemed to have waived any of such conditions that remain unfulfilled or unsatisfied):
(i) . The representations and warranties of Parent and Merger Sub set forth in (a) that are qualified as to materiality shall be true and correct and (b) that are not qualified as to materiality shall be true and correct in all material respects, in each case on and as of the Closing (except for any such representations or warranties that by their terms speak only as of a specific date or dates, in which case such representations and warranties that are qualified as to materiality shall be true and correct, and such representations and warranties that are not qualified as to materiality shall be true and correct in all material respects, on and as of such specified date or dates), except to the extent the failure of such representations and warranties to be so true and correct does not have a material adverse effect on Parent's or Merger Sub's ability to consummate the Merger or to perform their respective obligations under this Agreement and at the Closing the Company shall have received a certificate to such effect executed by an officer of Parent.
Accuracy of Representations and Warranties
Article IV
(ii) . Parent shall have performed and complied in all material respects with all of its covenants contained in this Agreement on or before the Closing (to the extent that such covenants require performance by Parent on or before the Closing), except to the extent the failure to so perform and comply with such covenants does not have a material adverse effect on Parent's ability to consummate the Merger or to perform its obligations under this Agreement and at the Closing the Company shall have received a certificate to such effect executed by an officer of Parent.
Covenants
(iii) . There shall not be issued, enacted or adopted, or threatened in writing by any Governmental Authority, any order, decree, temporary, preliminary or permanent injunction, legislative enactment, statute, regulation, action or proceeding, or any judgment or ruling by any Governmental Authority that prohibits or renders illegal or imposes limitations on the Merger or any other material transaction contemplated by this Agreement.
Compliance with Law; No Legal Restraints; No Litigation
(iv) . There shall have been obtained at or prior to the Closing such permits or authorizations, and there shall have been taken all such other actions by any Governmental Authority or other regulatory authority having jurisdiction over the parties and the actions herein proposed to be taken, as may be required to lawfully consummate the Merger.
Government Consents
 
(v) .The Escrow Agreement shall have been executed and delivered by Parent, the Escrow Agent and the Company Stockholder.
Escrow Agreement
(vi) . The Merger and this Agreement shall have been duly and validly approved and adopted, as required by DGCL and the Company's Certificate of Incorporation and Bylaws, each as in effect on the date of such approval and adoption, by the requisite vote or written consent of the Company Stockholder.
Company Stockholder's Approval
(b) Parent's and Merger Sub's obligations to consummate the Merger and take the other actions required to be taken by them at the Closing are subject to the fulfillment or satisfaction, as of the Closing, of each of the following conditions (it being understood that (a) any one or more of the following conditions may be waived by Parent and Merger Sub in a writing signed by Parent and (b) by proceeding with the Closing, Parent and Merger Sub shall be deemed to have waived any of such conditions that remains unfulfilled or unsatisfied):
(i) .
Accuracy of Representations and Warranties
(a) The representations and warranties of the Company set forth in (other than in Section 3.03 and Section 3.04) shall be true and correct in all material respects (except for any statements in a representation or warranty that expressly include a standard of materiality, which statements shall be true and correct in all respects giving effect to such standard) as of the Closing, except that those representations and warranties which address matters only as of a particular date shall remain true and correct in all material respects (except for any statements in a representation or warranty that expressly include a standard of materiality, which statements shall be true and correct in all respects giving effect to such standard) as of such date (it being understood that, for purposes of determining the accuracy of such representations and warranties, any update of, or modification to, the Disclosure Schedule made or purported to have been made after the execution of this Agreement shall be given effect only if accepted in writing by Parent). Parent shall have received a certificate with respect to the foregoing signed on behalf of the Company by the Chief Executive Officer or Chief Financial Officer of the Company.
Article III
(b) The representations and warranties of the Company set forth in Section 3.03 and Section 3.04 shall be true and correct at and as of the Closing, and, at the Closing, Parent shall have received a certificate to such effect executed by the Chief Executive Officer of the Company.
(ii) . The Company shall have performed and complied in all material respects with all of its covenants contained in this Agreement at or before the Closing (to the extent that such covenants require performance by the Company at or before the Closing), and at the Closing Parent shall have received a certificate to such effect executed by the Company's President or Chief Executive Officer.
Covenants
 
(iii) . There shall not be issued, enacted or adopted, by any Governmental Authority, any order, decree, temporary, preliminary or permanent injunction, legislative enactment, statute, regulation, proceeding, judgment or ruling by any Governmental Authority that prohibits or renders illegal or imposes material limitations on: (a) the Merger or any other material transaction contemplated by this Agreement; or (b) Parent's right (or the right of any Subsidiary of Parent) to own, retain, use or operate any of its products, services, properties or assets (including equity, properties or assets of the Company) or conduct the Company Business as a result of the Merger or seeking a disposition or divestiture of any such properties or assets. No litigation or proceeding shall be pending for the purpose of enjoining or preventing the consummation of any of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement.
Compliance with Law; No Legal Restraints; No Litigation
(iv) . Parent shall have received from Winston & Strawn LLP, legal counsel to the Company, an opinion of counsel in substantially the form set forth in to this Agreement.
Opinion of Company's Legal Counsel
Exhibit C
(v) . The Merger and this Agreement shall have been duly and validly approved and adopted, as required by DGCL and the Company's Certificate of Incorporation and Bylaws, each as in effect on the date of such approval and adoption, by the requisite written consent or vote of the Company Stockholder in respect of all Company Capital Stock owned by it.
Company Stockholder Approvals
(vi) . Each person holding the position of a director of the Company immediately prior to the Effective Time, shall have resigned from such positions in writing effective as of the Effective Time, pursuant to forms of resignation in form and substance satisfactory to Parent.
Resignations of Directors
(vii) . Parent shall have received a certificate from the State of Delaware and the State of California certifying that each of the Company and Alpine Biomed Corp. is validly existing and in good standing in each such jurisdiction, and that all applicable taxes and fees of the Company and such Subsidiary have been paid.
Company Good Standing Certificate
(viii) . Parent shall have received a certificate dated as of the Closing Date and executed on behalf of the Company by its Secretary, certifying as to (a) the Company's Certificate of Incorporation, (b) Bylaws, (c) board resolutions approving the Merger and adopting this Agreement, (d) the Company Stockholder resolution approving the Merger and adopting this Agreement, and (e) a true and complete copy of resolutions adopted by the Board of Directors of the Company or any committee thereof (if any) authorizing the termination of the Company's 401(k) Plan and effective as of the day prior to the Closing Date.
Secretary's Certificate
(ix) . The Escrow Agreement shall have been executed and delivered by Parent, the Escrow Agent and the Company Stockholder.
Escrow Agreement
 
(x) . Those employees of the Company and its Subsidiaries immediately prior to the consummation of the Second Spin and Distribution and identified on Schedule 6.01(b)(x) shall have delivered a general release in favor of the Company and the Surviving Corporation in form agreed upon with Parent.
New Co. Employee Severance Liabilities
(xi) Parent shall have received an assignment and assumption agreement in form and substance satisfactory to Parent in respect of (A) the assignment and assumption of the Gastrodiagnostic Business Distribution Documents identified on Schedule 6.01(b)(xi)(A) from Alpine Biomed Corp. to New Co. and (B) the assignment and assumption of the Gastrodiagnostic Business Distribution Documents identified on Schedule 6.01(b)(xi)(B) from Alpine Biomed Corp. to Alpine Gastro Holdings LLC, a Delaware limited liability company, and, in each case, an acknowledgment by Gastro Company that Alpine Biomed Corp., the Company or any of their respective Subsidiaries has no Liability in respect of such agreements. Parent shall also have received a letter agreement executed by Gastro Company and New Co. in form and substance satisfactory to Parent in respect of New Co.'s assumption of certain obligations under that Gastrodiagnostic Business Distribution Document identified on Schedule 6.01(b)(xi)(C) from Alpine Biomed Corp. to New Co. and an acknowledgment by Gastro Company of the assignment and assumption contemplated thereunder.
Gastro Company and New Co.
(xii) . Parent shall have also received, the delivery of which is effective upon Parent's payment as contemplated by Section 7.02(c), acknowledgments of receipt of payment in full from those creditors receiving the Indebtedness Payoff Amount.
Payment Acknowledgments
7.01
The Closing.
Subject to termination of this Agreement as provided in , the closing of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement (the "") shall take place at the offices of Fenwick & West LLP, Silicon Valley Center, 801 California Street, Mountain View, California on September 14, 2009, or at such other date and time as may be mutually agreed in writing by the Company and Parent (sometimes referred to herein as the ""). Concurrently with the Closing, the Certificate of Merger shall be filed with the Secretary of State of Delaware in accordance with the DGCL. All documents delivered and actions taken at Closing shall be deemed to have been delivered or taken simultaneously, and no such delivery or action shall be considered effective or complete unless or until all other such deliveries or actions are completed or waived in writing by the party against whom such waiver is sought to be enforced.
Article VIII
Closing
Closing Date
 
7.02
Exchange.
(a) At the Effective Time, all outstanding Company Capital Stock shall, by virtue of the Merger and without further action, cease to exist, and all such securities shall be converted into the right to receive from Parent the cash amount to which the holder thereof is entitled pursuant to Section 2.01(b), subject to the provisions of Section 2.01(c) (regarding rights of holders of Dissenting Shares), Section 2.03 (regarding the withholding of the Escrow Cash) and Section 2.04 (regarding the Purchase Price Adjustment).
(b) On the Closing Date, Parent shall pay to the Company Stockholder cash in an amount to provide payment of the Aggregate Merger Consideration to which the Company Stockholder is entitled pursuant to Sections 2.01(b)(i) and (ii), subject to the provisions of Section 2.01(c) (regarding rights of holders of Dissenting Shares) and of Section 2.03 (regarding the withholding of Escrow Cash).
(c) On the Closing Date, Parent shall pay, or cause to be paid, on behalf of the Company by wire transfer of immediately available funds, to the existing lenders of the Company and its Subsidiaries such amounts as directed in writing by the Company necessary to repay any Company indebtedness (including all interest accrued thereunder and all fees and expenses required to satisfy such obligations) up to and including the Closing Date (the "").
Indebtedness Payoff Amount
(d) On the Closing Date, Parent shall pay, or cause to be paid, on behalf of the Company by wire transfer of immediately available funds, to the persons set forth on such amounts as directed in writing by the Company to pay the Transaction Expenses as of the Closing Date.
Schedule 7.02(d)
(e) After the Effective Time, there shall be no further registration of transfers on the stock transfer books of the Company or its transfer agent of any Company Capital Stock that were outstanding immediately prior to the Effective Time. If, after the Effective Time, any Company Certificates or Affidavits are presented for any reason, they shall be cancelled and exchanged as provided in this Section 7.02.
(f) Until Company Certificates are surrendered or an Affidavit is delivered pursuant to Section 7.02(b), such Company Certificates shall be deemed, for all purposes, to evidence ownership of the amount of cash which Company Capital Stock shall have been converted pursuant to Section 2.01(b), subject to the provisions of Section 2.01(c) (regarding rights of holders of Dissenting Shares) and Section 2.03 (regarding the withholding of the Escrow Cash).
7.03
Dissenting Shares.
If, in connection with the Merger, holders of Company Capital Stock are entitled to dissenters' rights pursuant to the DGCL, any Dissenting Shares shall not be converted into a right to receive cash as provided in Section 2.01(b), but shall be converted into the right to receive such consideration as may be determined to be due with respect to such Dissenting Shares pursuant to the DGCL. Each holder of Dissenting Shares who, pursuant to the provisions of the DGCL, becomes entitled to payment of the fair value of such shares shall receive payment therefor in accordance with the DGCL (but only after the value therefor shall have been agreed upon or finally determined pursuant to the DGCL). In the event that any Company Stockholder fails to make an effective demand for payment or fails to perfect its dissenters' rights as to its
 
shares of Company Capital Stock or any Dissenting Shares shall otherwise lose their status as Dissenting Shares, then any such shares shall immediately be converted into the right to receive the consideration issuable pursuant to in respect of such shares had such shares never been Dissenting Shares, and Parent shall issue and deliver to the holder thereof, at (or as promptly as reasonably practicable after) the applicable time or times specified in Section 7.02, following the satisfaction of the applicable conditions set forth in Section 7.02, the cash, without interest thereon, to which such Company Stockholder would have been entitled under Section 2.01(b) with respect to such shares, subject to the provisions of Section 2.03 (regarding the withholding of the Escrow Cash). The Company shall give Parent prompt notice (and in no event more than two business days) of any demand received by the Company for appraisal of Company Capital Stock or notice of exercise of a Company Stockholder's dissenters' rights. The Company agrees that, except with Parent's prior written consent, it shall not voluntarily make any payment or offer to make any payment with respect to, or settle or offer to settle, any such demand for appraisal or exercise of dissenters' rights.
Article II
8.01
Termination by Mutual Consent.
This Agreement may be terminated at any time prior to the Effective Time by the mutual written consent of Parent and the Company.
8.02
Unilateral Termination.
(a) Either Parent or the Company, by giving written notice to the other, may terminate this Agreement if a court of competent jurisdiction or other Governmental Authority shall have issued a nonappealable final order, decree or ruling or taken any other action, in each case having the effect of permanently restraining, enjoining or otherwise prohibiting the Merger or any other material transaction contemplated by this Agreement.
(b) Either Parent or the Company, by giving written notice to the other, may terminate this Agreement if the Merger shall not have been consummated by 5:00 p.m., Chicago time, on September 15, 2009; provided, however, that the right to terminate this Agreement pursuant to this Section 8.02(b) shall not be available to any party whose breach of a representation or warranty or covenant made under this Agreement by such party results in the failure of any condition set forth in to be fulfilled or satisfied on or before such date.
Article VI
8.03
Effect of Termination.
In the event of termination of this Agreement as provided in Section 8.02, this Agreement shall forthwith become void and, except as expressly provided in Section 8.03(ii), there shall be no liability or obligation whatsoever on the part of Parent, Merger Sub or the Company or their respective officers, directors, shareholders or affiliates; provided, however, that (i) the provisions of this Section 8.03 (Effect of Termination) and (General Provisions) shall remain in full force and effect and survive any termination of this Agreement, and (ii) nothing herein shall relieve any party hereto from liability in connection with any material breach of any of such party's covenants contained herein or intentional material breach of such party's representations and warranties.
Article XI
 
8.04
Amendment.
This Agreement may not be amended except by an instrument in writing signed by each of the parties hereto.
8.05
Waiver.
Subject to applicable law, at any time prior to the Effective Time, any party hereto may (a) extend the time for the performance of any obligation or other act of any other party hereto, (b) waive any inaccuracy in the representations and warranties of any other party contained herein or in any document delivered pursuant hereto and (c) waive compliance with any agreement of any other party or any condition to its own obligations contained herein. Any such extension or waiver shall be valid if set forth in an instrument in writing signed by the party or parties to be bound thereby.
8.06
Survival.
If the Merger is consummated, the representations and warranties of the Company contained in this Agreement shall survive the Effective Time and remain in full force and effect, regardless of any investigation or disclosure made by or on behalf of any of the parties to this Agreement, until the one year anniversary of the Effective Time, after which time the representations and warranties shall not form the basis for any claim for Damages (as defined below); provided, however, that the Special Representations (as defined below) (other than the Tax Representation (as defined below)) will remain operative and in full force and effect, regardless of any investigation or disclosure made by or on behalf of any of the parties to this Agreement, until the expiration of the applicable statute of limitations for claims against the Company Stockholder which seek recovery of Damages arising out of a failure of such representations and warranties to be true and correct; provided further that the Tax Representation and Damages covered by clause (v) of Section 8.07 will remain operative and in full force and effect, regardless of any investigation or disclosure made by or on behalf of any of the parties to this Agreement, until March 31, 2011; provided further, however, that no right to indemnification pursuant to this in respect of any claim based upon any failure of a representation or warranty to be true and correct that is set forth in a Notice of Claim delivered prior to the expiration date of such representation or warranty shall be affected by the expiration of such representation or warranty; and provided, further, that such expiration shall not affect the rights of any Parent Indemnified Person under this or otherwise to seek recovery of Damages arising out of any fraud, willful breach or intentional misrepresentation by the Company or Damages covered by clauses (ii) through (viii) of Section 8.07 (other than clause (v) of Section 8.07) until the expiration of the applicable statute of limitations. If the Merger is consummated, all covenants of the parties (including the covenants set forth in ) shall expire and be of no further force or effect as of the Effective Time, except to the extent such covenants provide that they are to be performed after the Effective Time, including any obligation to provide indemnification pursuant to this .
Article VIII
Article VIII
Article V
Article VIII
 
8.07
Agreement to Indemnify.
The Company Stockholder will indemnify and hold harmless Parent and its officers, directors, agents, representatives, stockholders and employees, and each person, if any, who controls or may control Parent within the meaning of the Securities Act (each hereinafter referred to individually as a "" and collectively as "") from and against any and all losses, costs, damages, Liabilities and expenses (including reasonable attorneys' fees, other professionals' and experts' fees, costs of investigation and court costs, but excluding incidental, special, consequential and punitive damages, other than any incidental, special, consequential and punitive damages payable by any Parent Indemnified Person to a third party), actually incurred and calculated net of actual recoveries under existing insurance policies (net of any applicable collection costs and reserves, deductibles, premium adjustments and retrospectively rated premiums) and net of actual recoveries received by a Parent Indemnified Person from a third party (hereinafter collectively referred to as ""), arising out of, resulting from or in connection with: (i) any failure of any representation or warranty made by the Company in this Agreement or the Disclosure Schedule (including the schedules thereto) to be true and correct as of the Closing Date; (ii) any failure of any certification, representation or warranty made by the Company in any certificate delivered to Parent pursuant to any provision of this Agreement to be true and correct as of the date such certificate is delivered to Parent; (iii) any breach of or default in connection with any of the covenants or agreements made by the Company in this Agreement or the Disclosure Schedule (including the schedules thereto); (iv) any Liability resulting or arising from or related to any of the Retained Assets, the Retained Liabilities, the Gastrodiagnostic Business, the Gastrodiagnostic Business Distribution, the Second Spin and Distribution or the Company Reorganization; (v) Liabilities in respect of any Taxes incurred by the Company or any of its Subsidiaries for any period (or portions thereof, as determined in accordance with Section 5.07(c)) on or prior to the Closing Date; (vi) any and all Taxes of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries (or Liabilities in respect of such Taxes) attributable to or in respect of the Gastrodiagnostic Business Distribution, the Second Spin and Distribution or the Company Reorganization (indemnification under this Section 8.07(vi) is referred to herein as the ""); (vii) any Dissenting Shares Excess Payments; or (viii) any unpaid Transaction Expenses (for the sake of clarification, any Transaction Expenses paid by Parent or the Surviving Corporation or any of their respective affiliates in excess of the amount paid by Parent pursuant to Section 7.02(d)).
Parent Indemnified Person
Parent Indemnified Persons
Damages
Tax Indemnification
8.08
Limitations.
(a) The Parent, the Merger Sub, the Company and the Company Stockholder agree that, to the fullest extent permitted by applicable law and except for claims of fraud, willful breach or intentional misrepresentation by the Company, or of a breach of Section 3.03 (Capitalization), 3.04 (Authority Relative to this Agreement), or 3.15 (Taxes) (the "") of this Agreement (the ""), or any claims covered by clauses (ii) through (viii) of Section 8.07, the indemnification provisions contained in this Article VIII and recovery from the Escrow Cash shall be the sole and exclusive remedy and recourse for damages (other than specific performance and injunctive relief) with respect to this Agreement or any of the transactions contemplated hereby or for any breach of this Agreement by any party hereto or thereto. Notwithstanding anything contained herein to the contrary, no Parent Indemnified Person shall have any claim for Damages in excess of the Aggregate Merger Consideration except in the case of fraud.
Tax Representation
Special Representations
 
(b) Notwithstanding anything contained herein to the contrary, no Parent Indemnified Person may recover in respect of any claim for indemnification that is made pursuant to clause (i) of Section 8.07 and does not involve fraud, willful breach or intentional misrepresentation by the Company unless and until Damages in an individual amount greater than $25,000 (the "") and in an aggregate amount greater than $250,000 (the "") have been incurred, paid or properly accrued, in which case the Parent Indemnified Persons may make claims for indemnification in respect of any Damages in excess of the Basket; provided that all claims for indemnification which individually exceed the De Minimis Threshold may be aggregated for purposes of determining whether the Basket has been reached, and that, for purposes of determining whether claims for indemnification individually exceed the De Minimis Threshold and whether such De Minimis Threshold has been reached, all claims for indemnification arising out of the same, similar or related set of facts, circumstances or events giving rise to an alleged breach or violation of the representations and warranties contained herein shall be aggregated; provided further, however, that any Damages arising from or relating to the Tax Indemnification (or any claim in respect thereof) or covered by clauses (ii) through (viii) of Section 8.07 or arising from or relating to a breach of any Special Representation are not subject to either of the De Minimis Threshold or the Basket and may be deducted from Escrow Cash on a dollar for dollar basis.
De Minimis Threshold
Basket
(c) No affiliate, or officer, director, employee or agent of the Company shall have any liability hereunder except as expressly agreed herein. The limitations in this Section 8.08(c) apply to all causes of action under or relating to this Agreement regardless of the form of action. The existence of one or more claims or suits will not enlarge any limit.
(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Agreement, other than the Tax Indemnification, the tax indemnification covered by clause (v) of Section 8.07, and a breach of Section 3.15(c), no Parent Indemnified Person shall be indemnified for Taxes incurring in any period beginning after the Closing Date.
8.09
Intentionally Omitted.
8.10
Notice of Claim.
As used herein, the term "" means a claim for indemnification of Parent or any other Parent Indemnified Person for Damages under this . Parent may give notice of a Claim under this Agreement, whether for its own Damages or for Damages incurred by any other Parent Indemnified Person, and Parent shall give written notice of a Claim executed by an officer of Parent (a "") to the Company Stockholder (with a copy to the Escrow Agent if the Claim involves recovery against the Escrow Cash) promptly after Parent becomes aware of the existence of any potential claim by an Parent Indemnified Person for indemnification from the Company Stockholder under this , arising from or relating to:
Claim
Article VIII
Notice of Claim
Article VIII
(a) Any matter specified in Section 8.07; or
 
(b) the assertion, whether orally or in writing, against Parent or any other Parent Indemnified Person of a claim, demand, suit, action, arbitration, investigation, inquiry or proceeding brought by a third party against Parent or such other Parent Indemnified Person (in each such case, a "") that is based on, arises out of or relates to any matter specified in Section 8.07.
Third-Party Claim
The period during which claims may be initiated (the "") for indemnification from the Escrow Cash shall commence at the Effective Time and terminate at the one year anniversary of the Effective Time. Notwithstanding anything contained herein to the contrary, any Claims for Damages specified in any Notice of Claim delivered to the Company Stockholder prior to expiration of the Claims Period with respect to facts and circumstances existing prior to expiration of the Claims Period shall remain outstanding until such Claims for Damages have been resolved or satisfied, notwithstanding the expiration of such Claims Period. Until the expiration of the Claims Period, no delay on the part of Parent in giving the Company Stockholder a Notice of Claim shall relieve the Company Stockholder from any of its obligations under this unless (and then only to the extent that) the Company Stockholder or the Company Stockholder are materially prejudiced thereby.
Claims Period
Article VIII
8.11
Defense of Third Party Claims.
(a) Parent shall determine and conduct the defense or settlement of any Third-Party Claim, and the costs and expenses incurred by Parent in connection with such defense or settlement (including reasonable attorneys' fees, other professionals' and experts' fees and court or arbitration costs) shall be included in the Damages for which Parent may seek indemnification pursuant to a Claim made by any Parent Indemnified Person hereunder.
(b) The Company Stockholder shall have the right to receive copies of all pleadings, notices and communications with respect to the Third-Party Claim to the extent that receipt of such documents by the Company Stockholder does not affect any privilege relating to the Parent Indemnified Person and may participate in, but not to determine or conduct, any defense of the Third-Party Claim or settlement negotiations with respect to the Third-Party Claim.
(c) Parent shall not, without the prior written consent of the Company Stockholder, which consent shall not be unreasonably withheld, conditioned or delayed, enter into any settlement with respect to a Third-Party Claim. In the event that the Company Stockholder has consented to the settlement of a Third-Party Claim, then Parent shall be entitled to recover the total amount of all Damages incurred in connection with settlement of such Third-Party Claim from the Escrow Cash and the Company Stockholder shall have no power or authority to object under any provision of this to such recovery.
Article VIII
(d) To the extent there is an inconsistency between this Section 8.11 and Section 5.07(d) with respect to any Tax Claim or Tax Contest, Section 5.07(d) shall control.
 
8.12
Contents of Notice of Claim.
Each Notice of Claim by Parent given pursuant to Section 8.10 shall contain the following information:
(a) that Parent or another Parent Indemnified Person has directly or indirectly incurred, paid or properly accrued (in accordance with GAAP) or, in good faith, believes it shall have to directly or indirectly incur, pay or accrue (in accordance with GAAP), Damages in an aggregate stated amount arising from such Claim (which amount may be the amount of damages claimed by a third party in an action brought against any Parent Indemnified Person based on alleged facts, which if true, would give rise to liability for Damages to such Parent Indemnified Person under this ); and
Article VIII
(b) a brief description, in reasonable detail (to the extent reasonably available to Parent), of the facts, circumstances or events giving rise to the alleged Damages based on Parent's good faith belief thereof, including the identity and address of any third-party claimant (to the extent reasonably available to Parent) and copies of any formal demand or complaint, the amount of Damages, the date each such item was incurred, paid or properly accrued, or the basis for such anticipated liability, and the specific nature of the breach to which such item is related.
8.13
Resolution of Notice of Claim.
Each Notice of Claim given by Parent shall be resolved as follows:
(a) . If, within 30 days after a Notice of Claim is received by the Company Stockholder, the Company Stockholder does not contest such Notice of Claim in writing to Parent as provided in Section 8.13(b), the Company Stockholder shall be conclusively deemed to have consented to the recovery by the Parent Indemnified Person of the full amount of Damages specified in the Notice of Claim in accordance with this , including the forfeiture of Escrow Cash, and, without further notice, to have stipulated to the entry of a final judgment for damages for such amount in any court having jurisdiction over the matter where venue is proper.
Uncontested Claims
Article VIII
(b) . If the Company Stockholder gives Parent written notice contesting all or any portion of a Notice of Claim (a "") (with a copy to the Escrow Agent) within the 30 day period specified in Section 8.13(a), then such Contested Claim shall be resolved by either (i) a written settlement agreement executed by Parent and the Company Stockholder (a copy of which shall be furnished to the Escrow Agent) or (ii) in the absence of such a written settlement agreement within 60 business days following receipt by Parent of the Contested Claim from the Company Stockholder, by binding litigation between Parent and the Company Stockholder in accordance with the terms and provisions of Section 8.13(c). If Parent receives written notice of a Contested Claim, Parent shall within five business days provide written notice of receipt to the Company Stockholder.
Contested Claims
Contested Claim
(c) . Either Parent or the Company Stockholder may bring suit to resolve the Contested Claim. Regardless of which party brings suit to resolve a matter, Parent shall bear the burden of proof by a preponderance of the evidence that Parent or other Parent Indemnified Persons are entitled to indemnification pursuant to this . The decision of the trial court as to the validity and amount of any claim in such Notice of Claim shall be nonappealable, binding and conclusive upon the parties to this Agreement and the Escrow Agent shall be entitled to act in accordance with such decision and make or withhold payments out of the Escrow Cash in accordance therewith. Judgment upon any award rendered by the trial court may be entered in any court having jurisdiction. For purposes of this Section 8.13(c), in any suit hereunder each party shall pay its own expenses, including attorneys' fees and costs.
Litigation of Contested Claims
Article VIII
 
8.14
Release of Remaining Escrow Cash.
Within five business days following the expiration of the Claims Period, Parent shall instruct the Escrow Agent to deliver to the Company Stockholder all of the remaining Escrow Cash (if any) in excess of any amount of Escrow Cash that is necessary to satisfy all unresolved, unsatisfied or disputed claims for Damages specified in any Notice of Claim delivered to the Company Stockholder before the expiration of the Claims Period. If any Claims for which Parent has delivered a Notice of Claim to the Company Stockholder before the expiration of the Claims Period are unresolved, unsatisfied or disputed as of the expiration of the Claims Period, then the Escrow Agent shall retain possession and custody of that amount of Escrow Cash that equals the total maximum amount of Damages then being claimed by Parent Indemnified Persons in all such unresolved, unsatisfied or disputed Claims, and as soon as all such Claims have been resolved, the Escrow Agent shall deliver to the Company Stockholder from whom Escrow Cash was withheld pursuant to Section 2.03 all remaining Escrow Cash (if any) not required to satisfy such Claims.
8.15
Computation of Damages.
For the purposes of this , all Damages of a Parent Indemnified Person as a result of an event or circumstance for which such Parent Indemnified Party is subject to indemnification under this shall be computed net of any Tax benefit that such Parent Indemnified Person actually realizes in the year it incurs the Damages as a result of being able to currently deduct the Damages for Tax purposes. For purposes of the prior sentence, the amount of any Tax benefit shall be reduced to the extent a Parent Indemnified Person or its Affiliate actually incurs any Tax detriment as a result of currently including an indemnification payment into income as required under applicable law.
Article VIII
Article VIII
8.16
Tax Consequences of Indemnification Payments and Earnout Payments.
(a) All payments (if any) made to a Parent Indemnified Person pursuant to any indemnification obligations under this will be treated as adjustments to the purchase price for tax purposes and such agreed treatment will govern for purposes of this Agreement, unless otherwise required by law.
Article VIII
(b) All payments (if any) of Earnout Consideration will be treated as additional purchase price and, except to the extent such payments are required to be treated as interest under Code Section 483 or analogous provisions of the Code or state or local law, such treatment shall govern for all Tax purposes.
 
9.01
Notices.
All notices, requests, claims, demands and other communications hereunder shall be in writing and shall be given (and shall be deemed to have been duly given upon receipt) by delivery in person, by overnight courier, by facsimile or by registered or certified mail (postage prepaid, return receipt requested) to the respective parties at the following addresses (or at such other address for a party as shall be specified in a notice given in accordance with this Section 9.01):
if to Parent or Merger Sub:
Natus Medical Incorporated
1501 Industrial Road
San Carlos, California 94070
Telecopier No.: (650) 802-6630
Attention: James B. Hawkins, President and
Chief Executive Officer
with a copy to:
Fenwick & West LLP
Silicon Valley Center
801 California Street
Mountain View, California 94041
Telecopier No.: (650) 938-5200
Attention: Daniel J. Winnike
if to the Company:
Alpine Biomed Holdings Corp.
c/o Water Street Healthcare Partners, LLC
333 West Wacker Drive
Telecopier No.: (312) 506-2901
Attention: Timothy A. Dugan and Ned Villers
with a copy to:
Winston & Strawn LLP
35 West Wacker Drive
Chicago, Illinois 60601
Telecopier No.: (312) 558-5700
Attention: Matthew F. Bergmann
 
9.02
Severability.
If any term or other provision of this Agreement is invalid, illegal or incapable of being enforced by any rule of law, or public policy, all other conditions and provisions of this Agreement shall nevertheless remain in full force and effect so long as the economic or legal substance of the Merger is not affected in any manner materially adverse to any party. Upon such determination that any term or other provision is invalid, illegal or incapable of being enforced, the parties hereto shall negotiate in good faith to modify this Agreement so as to effect the original intent of the parties as closely as possible in a mutually acceptable manner in order that the Merger be consummated as originally contemplated to the fullest extent possible.
9.03
Entire Agreement; Assignment.
This Agreement constitutes the entire agreement among the parties with respect to the subject matter hereof and supersedes all prior agreements and undertakings, both written and oral, among the parties, or any of them, with respect to the subject matter hereof. This Agreement shall not be assigned (whether pursuant to a merger, by operation of law or otherwise), except that Parent and Merger Sub may assign all or any of their rights and obligations hereunder to any affiliate of Parent, provided that no such assignment shall relieve the assigning party of its obligations hereunder if such assignee does not perform such obligations.
9.04
Parties in Interest.
This Agreement shall be binding upon and inure solely to the benefit of each party hereto, and nothing in this Agreement, express or implied, is intended to or shall confer upon any other person any right, benefit or remedy of any nature whatsoever under or by reason of this Agreement, other than Section 5.08 (which is intended to be for the benefit of the persons covered thereby and may be enforced by such persons).
9.05
Specific Performance.
The parties hereto agree that irreparable damage would occur in the event any provision of this Agreement were not performed in accordance with the terms hereof and that the parties shall be entitled to specific performance of the terms hereof, in addition to any other remedy at law or equity.
9.06
Governing Law and Consent to Jurisdiction.
This Agreement shall be governed by, and construed in accordance with, the laws of the State of Delaware applicable to contracts executed in and to be performed in that State (other than those provisions set forth herein that are required to be governed by DGCL). The parties hereto hereby irrevocably submit to the exclusive jurisdiction of the courts of the State of California and the Federal courts of the United States of America located within the County of San Francisco in the State of California solely in respect of the interpretation and enforcement of the provisions of this Agreement and of the documents referred to in this Agreement, and in respect of the transactions contemplated hereby and thereby (including resolution of disputes under Section 8.13(c)), and hereby waive, and agree not to assert, as a defense in any action, suit
 
or proceeding for the interpretation or enforcement hereof or thereof, that it is not subject thereto or that such action, suit or proceeding may not be brought or is not maintainable in said courts or that the venue thereof may not be appropriate or that this Agreement or any such document may not be enforced in or by such courts, and the parties hereto irrevocably agree that all claims with respect to such action or proceeding shall be heard and determined in such a California State or Federal court. The parties hereby consent to and grant any such court jurisdiction over the person of such parties and over the subject matter of such dispute and agree that mailing of process or other papers in connection with any such action or proceeding in the manner provided in Section 9.01 or in such other manner as may be permitted by applicable law, shall be valid and sufficient service thereof. With respect to any particular action, suit or proceeding, venue shall lie solely in San Francisco County, California.
9.07
Waiver of Jury Trial.
Each of the parties hereto hereby waives to the fullest extent permitted by applicable law any right it may have to a trial by jury with respect to any litigation directly or indirectly arising out of, under or in connection with this Agreement or the Merger. Each of the parties hereto (a) certifies that no representative, agent or attorney of any other party has represented, expressly or otherwise, that such other party would not, in the event of litigation, seek to enforce that foregoing waiver and (b) acknowledges that it and the other hereto have been induced to enter into this Agreement and the Merger, as applicable, by, among other things, the mutual waivers and certifications in this Section 9.07.
9.08
Headings.
The descriptive headings contained in this Agreement are included for convenience of reference only and shall not affect in any way the meaning or interpretation of this Agreement.
9.09
Counterparts.
This Agreement may be executed and delivered (including by facsimile transmission) in one or more counterparts, and by the different parties hereto in separate counterparts, each of which when executed shall be deemed to be an original but all of which taken together shall constitute one and the same agreement.
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, Parent, Merger Sub and the Company have caused this Agreement to be executed as of the date first written above by their respective officers thereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
Natus Medical to Acquire Alpine Biomed
- Acquisition Expands Neurology Product Lines and Adds Growth Opportunities
(Nasdaq:BABY) today announced that it has entered into an agreement to acquire Alpine Biomed Holdings Corp in a transaction that is expected to close today. Alpine Biomed, with corporate headquarters in Fountain Valley, California, is a leader in the development, manufacturing, and sales of devices for the diagnosis of neurological disorders. Alpine's broad range of products includes advanced electromyography systems for the diagnoses of peripheral nervous system dysfunctions as well as devices for routine EEG and long term epilepsy monitoring. Water Street Healthcare Partners, a leading private equity firm focused exclusively on the healthcare industry, was the majority stockholder of Alpine Biomed.
SAN CARLOS, Calif. (September 14, 2009)  Natus Medical Incorporated
Alpine Biomed has three neurology product divisions: diagnostic neurology devices under the Dantec brand, located in Copenhagen, Denmark; spike and seizure detection software applications and associated devices under the Stellate brand, located in Montreal, Canada; and neurology disposable products and accessories sold through the Alpine Biomed brand. These products are sold in the United States and in more than fifty countries around the globe.
Natus acquired all outstanding shares of Alpine Biomed capital stock for $43.2 million in cash, exclusive of direct costs of the acquisition. Alpine reported revenue of approximately $35 million in the twelve months ended June 30, 2009 through the neurology product divisions acquired by Natus; however, due to cross selling of Alpine and Natus products, Natus believes that third-party revenue was approximately $33 million during the period. Natus believes the acquisition will be accretive to earnings in the fourth quarter of 2009, exclusive of potential restructuring and other one-time charges.
"This acquisition affirms our position as the world-wide market leader in neurology," said Jim Hawkins, President and Chief Executive Officer of Natus. "Approximately two-thirds of Alpine's revenue is from outside the United States, and Alpine is the market leader in electromyography diagnostics, or EMG, in Europe with its well established Keypoint product line."
"In addition, we believe this acquisition signals that our business model that combines internal growth and accretive acquisitions is back on track. We anticipate that in 2010 we will return to the revenue and earnings growth that we achieved prior to the worldwide economic slowdown that started in the fourth quarter of 2008," said Hawkins.
"We plan to leverage our combined direct sales channels in the United States and Canada and provide new distribution for Stellate and Alpine products through the Natus international distribution organization, which operates in over 100 countries," added Hawkins.
"It is a testament to our success in building Alpine Biomed into a leading provider of specialty diagnostic devices that Natus acquired our neurodiagnostic business," said John Arnott, President and CEO of Alpine Biomed. "Together with Water Street, we created and executed a two-year strategic growth plan that has greatly enhanced Alpine Biomed's products and the markets we serve. Alpine's family of neurodiagnostic devices will benefit greatly from Natus' industry leadership position."
Natus funded the acquisition through available cash.
Financial Guidance
Natus intends to release its 2009 third quarter financial results on or about October 30, 2009, and will host a conference call the day of the release to discuss those results, the Alpine acquisition, and provide 2010 annual revenue and earnings guidance.
About Alpine Biomed
Alpine Biomed is a global leader in specialty diagnostic devices for the neurology clinical market. On September 4, 2009 it spun off its gastrodiagnostic business in a merger with Sierra Scientific Instruments, LLC, creating a leading provider of specialty diagnostic devices for the gastroenterology market. Natus was not involved in that transaction. For more information about Alpine Biomed, visit . For more information about Sierra Scientific, visit .
www.alpinebiomed.com
www.sierrainst.com
About Water Street Healthcare Partners
Water Street Healthcare Partners is a leading private equity firm focused exclusively on healthcare. With more than $1 billion of capital under management, Water Street is one of the most active investors in the healthcare industry. The firm has a strong record of building market-leading companies across key growth sectors in healthcare. It has partnered with some of the world's leading health care companies on its investments including Johnson & Johnson, Medtronic, and Smith & Nephew. Water Street's team is comprised of industry executives and private equity professionals with decades of experience investing in and operating global healthcare businesses. The firm is headquartered in Chicago. For more information about Water Street, visit .
www.wshp.com
About Natus Medical
Natus is a leading provider of healthcare products used for the screening, detection, treatment, monitoring and tracking of common medical ailments such as hearing impairment, neurological dysfunction, epilepsy, sleep disorders, and newborn care. Product offerings include computerized neurodiagnostic systems for audiology, neurology, polysomnography, and neonatology, as well as newborn care products such as hearing screening systems, phototherapy devices for the treatment of newborn jaundice, head-cooling products for the treatment of brain injury in newborns, and software systems for managing and tracking disorders and diseases for public health laboratories.
Additional information about Natus Medical can be found at .
www.natus.com
Cautionary Information Regarding Forward-Looking Statements - Natus
This press release contains forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, including statements regarding the acquisition being immediately accretive to Natus' earnings, Natus' anticipation of returning to revenue and earnings growth as was the case prior to the economic slowdown that commenced in the fourth quarter of 2008, and Natus operational plans for Alpine Biomed in the future. These statements relate to future events and involve known and unknown risks, uncertainties and other factors that may cause actual results to differ materially from those expressed or implied by the forward-looking statements. The future results of Natus could differ materially due to a number of factors, including the effects of competition, challenges incurred in integrating acquired companies, the demand for products and services, the ability to expand sales in international markets, the
ability to maintain current sales levels in a mature domestic market, the ability to control costs, and risks associated with bringing new products to market. Natus disclaims any obligation to update information contained in any forward-looking statement.
More information about potential risk factors that could affect the business and financial results of Natus is included in Natus' annual report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2008, and its subsequent quarterly reports on Form 10-Q, and in other reports filed from time to time by Natus with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission.
COMPANY CONTACT:
Natus Medical Incorporated
Steven J. Murphy
Chief Financial Officer
(650) 802-0400
InvestorRelations@Natus.com


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BABY/BABY-8K-20091102060627.txt.gz
TIME:20091102060627
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C.  20549
Form 8-K
Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported):
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 OR 15(d) of
The Securities Exchange Act of 1934
November 2, 2009
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 - 
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 - 
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 - 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 - 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
On November 2, 2009, Natus Medical Incorporated (the Company) is issuing a press release and holding a conference call regarding its financial results for the third fiscal quarter of 2009 ended September 30, 2009 and other financial information.  A copy of the press release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 to this Form 8-K.
The information in this Form 8-K and the exhibit attached hereto shall not be deemed filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the Exchange Act) or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that Section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
SIGNATURES
          Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Index to Exhibits

Exhibit 99.1
Natus Medical Announces 2009 Third Quarter Financial Results and Increases Fourth Quarter and Full Year 2009 Guidance
- Provides 2010 Guidance
SAN CARLOS, Calif.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--November 2, 2009-- (Nasdaq:BABY) today announced financial results for the three and nine months ended September 30, 2009.
Natus Medical Incorporated
For the third quarter ended September 30, 2009, Natus reported revenue of $44.3 million, compared to $41.7 million reported in the comparable quarter of the previous year. Net income was $3.7 million, or $0.13 per diluted share, for the third quarter of 2009, compared with net income of $4.8 million, or $0.17 per diluted share, for the third quarter of 2008.
For the nine months ended September 30, 2009, the Company reported net income of $6.8 million, or $0.24 per diluted share, compared to net income of $11.2 million, or $0.43 per diluted share, for the comparable period in 2008.
The results for the third quarter of 2009 included $460,000 of direct acquisition costs associated with the Companys acquisitions of Hawaii Medical and Alpine Biomed in July and September 2009, respectively. Excluding these direct costs, which were reported as a component of general and administrative expense, non-GAAP earnings were $4.0 million, or $0.14 per diluted share.
"We are pleased with our third quarter results as they exceeded our expectations, said Jim Hawkins, President and Chief Executive Officer of the Company. Demand for our products, which stabilized in our second quarter, improved among all our product lines throughout the third quarter, which is extremely satisfying since we believe hospitals continue to limit spending on capital equipment. I am also happy to report that we again generated cash during the quarter, adding more than $6 million through operations.
"We believe the acquisitions of Hawaii Medical and Alpine Biomed signify that our business model is on track. This, coupled with improved business conditions in our markets, gives us the opportunity to return to the growth rates we achieved in the years leading up to the 2008 recession, through a combination of organic growth, cost reduction, and accretive acquisitions," added Hawkins.
"We are currently working through the integration of Alpine Biomed and expect the contribution of Alpine to be accretive to our 2010 results," stated Hawkins.
As of September 30, 2009 the Company had cash, cash equivalents, and short-term investments of $29.6 million, stockholders' equity of approximately $238 million, and working capital of approximately $76 million.
Financial Guidance
Natus increased its financial guidance for the full year and fourth quarter 2009. For the full year 2009 the Company now expects revenue to range from $164 million to $165 million and earnings per share to range from $0.39 to $0.40. The Company had previously said it expected that revenue would range from $149 million to $151 million and earnings per share would range from $0.35 to $0.37.
For the fourth quarter of 2009, the Company now expects revenue to range from $49 million to $50 million and earnings per share to range from $0.15 to $0.16. The Company had previously said it expected that revenue would range from $40.3 million to $41.3 million and earnings per share would range from $0.14 to $0.15. This compares to revenue of $43.4 million and earnings of per share of $0.22 reported in the fourth quarter of 2008.
Natus also provided financial guidance for the full year 2010. The Company said it expects revenue to be approximately $196 million and earnings per share to range from $0.49 to $0.51.
The Companys fourth quarter 2009 and full year 2010 guidance is on a GAAP basis, including the impact of expensing employee equity based compensation. However, the Companys guidance does not include the impact of any future acquisition-related charges associated with the Hawaii Medical or Alpine Biomed acquisitions, other acquisition or restructuring related charges that may be incurred, and the impact any future potential acquisitions might have on the Companys results of operations. All earnings per share amounts are on a diluted basis.
Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures
In addition to disclosing financial results calculated in accordance with GAAP, this release contains non-GAAP financial measures that exclude direct costs associated with the companys acquisitions of Hawaii Medical and Alpine Biomed. The Company believes that the presentation of results excluding the acquisition-related charges provides meaningful supplemental information to both management and investors that is indicative of the Company's core operating results. Therefore, the Company believes these non-GAAP financial measures facilitate comparison of operating results across reporting periods. A reconciliation between the Company's results of operations on a GAAP and non-GAAP basis for the periods reported is included as part of the condensed consolidated statements of operations at the end of the Company's financial results release.
The Company believes that both management and investors benefit from referring to these non-GAAP financial measures in assessing the Company's performance and when planning, forecasting, and analyzing future periods. These non-GAAP financial measures also facilitate management's internal comparisons to the Company's historical performance. The non-GAAP financial measures disclosed by the Company should not be considered a substitute for or superior to financial measures calculated in accordance with GAAP, and the financial results calculated in accordance with GAAP and reconciliations to those financial statements should be carefully evaluated.
Conference Call
Natus has scheduled an investment-community conference call to discuss this announcement beginning at 10:00 a.m. Eastern Time today (7:00 a.m. Pacific Time). Individuals interested in listening to the conference call may do so by dialing (866) 700-7441 for domestic callers, or (617) 213-8839 for international callers, and entering reservation code 13698654. A telephone replay will be available for 48 hours following the conclusion of the call by dialing (888) 286-8010 for domestic callers, or 617-801-6888 for international callers, and entering reservation code 65677711.
The conference call also will be available real-time via the Internet at , and a recording of the call will be available on the Companys Web site for 90 days following the completion of the call.
http://investor.natus.com
About Natus Medical Incorporated
Natus is a leading provider of healthcare products used for the screening, detection, treatment, monitoring and tracking of common medical ailments such as hearing impairment, neurological dysfunction, epilepsy, sleep disorders, and newborn care. Product offerings include computerized neurodiagnostic systems for audiology, neurology, polysomnography, and neonatology, as well as newborn care products such as hearing screening systems, phototherapy devices for the treatment of newborn jaundice, head-cooling products for the treatment of brain injury in newborns, and software systems for managing and tracking disorders and diseases for public health laboratories.
Additional information about Natus Medical can be found at .
www.natus.com
This press release contains forward-looking statements as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, particularly statements regarding the expectations, beliefs, plans, intentions and strategies of Natus. These forward-looking statements include, but are not limited to, statements regarding anticipated revenue and profitability for the fourth quarter and full year 2009 and full year 2010, the potential to achieve historic growth rates through a combination of organic growth, cost reduction, and accretive acquisitions, and the accretive impact of the Alpine Biomed acquisition. These statements relate to current estimates and assumptions of our management as of the date of this press release, and future events or Natus' future financial performance or results, and involve known and unknown risks, uncertainties and other factors that may cause actual results, levels of activity, performance, or achievements to differ materially from those expressed or implied by the forward-looking statements. Forward-looking statements are only predictions and the actual events or results may differ materially. Natus cannot provide any assurance that its future results or the results implied by the forward-looking statements will meet expectations. Our future results could differ materially due to a number of factors, including the effects of competition, the demand for our products and services, the impact of adverse global economic conditions on our target markets, our ability to expand our sales in international markets, our ability to maintain current sales levels in a mature domestic market, our ability to control costs, and risks associated with bringing new products to market and integrating acquired businesses. Natus disclaims any obligation to update information contained in any forward-looking statement.
More information about potential risk factors that could affect the business and financial results of Natus is included in Natus' annual report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2008, and its quarterly reports on Form 10-Q, and in other reports filed from time to time by Natus with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission.
CONTACT: Natus Medical Incorporated Steven J. Murphy, 650-802-0400 Chief Financial Officer
InvestorRelations@Natus.com


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BABY/BABY-8K-20091221153705.txt.gz
TIME:20091221153705
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
At its December 17, 2009 meeting, the Compensation Committee of the Board of Directors of Natus Medical Incorporated (the "Company") approved a cash bonus plan for executive officers of the Company based on the Company achieving its budgeted income before provision for income tax for 2010 ("pre-tax profit"). The cash bonuses may range from 50% to a maximum of 150% of the target amount, based on the amount of actual pre-tax profit relative to the budgeted amount. The target bonus for Mr. Hawkins is 80% of 2010 base salary and for each of Messrs. Mince and Murphy and Dr. Chung is 45% of 2010 base salary. Mr. Traverso's compensation is comprised of (i) his 2010 base salary, (ii) payments made pursuant to a sales commission plan that is paid on a regular basis, and (iii) a bonus for which the terms are the same as the other executive officers of the Company, except that his target bonus is 32% of his 2010 base salary. The payment of bonuses pursuant to this plan is at the discretion of the Board of Directors.
Base salaries for the Company's executive officers were not changed for 2010
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BABY/BABY-8K-20100113071016.txt.gz
TIME:20100113071016
EVENTS:	Cost Associated with Exit or Disposal Activities	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Cost Associated with Exit or Disposal Activities
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported):
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C.  20549
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 OR 15(d) of
The Securities Exchange Act of 1934
January 13, 2010
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 - 
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 - 
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 - 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 - 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Item 2.05.    Costs Associated with Exit or Disposal Activities
On January 13, 2010, Natus Medical Incorporated (the Company) adopted a reorganization plan (the Plan) that is designed to eliminate redundant costs resulting from its acquisition of Alpine Biomed Holdings Corp. and to improve efficiencies in operations.  
Under the Plan, Alpine operations in Montreal, Canada will be transitioned to the Companys existing Xltek facility in Oakville, Ontario, Canada, and  Alpines sales organization will be merged into the Companys global sales organization.
In addition to the termination of employees, the Plan provides for the hiring of employees to staff up the required functions in other locations.
The Plan will result in a net staff reduction of approximately 50 employees for which Natus will record a restructuring charge of approximately $2.5 million during its first fiscal quarter of 2010. The amount of future cash expenditures associated with the Plan will be approximately the same as this charge.
The Company expects the reorganization of the sales groups will be substantially completed in January 2010, while the transfer of product development and production activities from Montreal to Oakville will occur over the course of the first half of 2010.
A copy of the press release announcing the Plan is attached as Exhibit 99.1 hereto.
In addition to historical information, this Current Report on Form 8-K contains forward-looking statements as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, particularly statements regarding the expectations, beliefs, plans, intentions and strategies of Natus. These forward-looking statements include, but are not limited to, statements regarding anticipated charges associated with the Plan and the  amount of related cash expenditure, the expected times of completion of elements of the Plan, and the benefits resulting from the reorganization. These statements relate to current estimates and assumptions of our management as of the date of this filing, and future events or Natus' future financial performance or results involve known and unknown risks, uncertainties and other factors that may cause actual results, levels of activity, performance, or achievements to differ materially from those expressed or implied by the forward-looking statements. Natus future results could differ materially from those expressed or implied by the forward-looking statements due to a number of factors, including the effects of competition, the demand for our products and services, the impact of adverse global economic conditions in our target markets, our ability to expand our sales in international markets, our ability to maintain current sales levels in a mature domestic market, our ability to control costs, and risks associated with bringing new products to market and integrating acquired businesses. Natus disclaims any obligation to update information contained in any forward looking statement.  
More information about potential risk factors that could affect the business and financial results of Natus is included in Natus' annual report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2008, and its quarterly reports on Form 10-Q, and in other reports filed from time to time by Natus with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission.
ITEM 9.01.    Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 (d)         Exhibits.
SIGNATURES
          Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Index to Exhibits

Exhibit 99.1
Natus Medical Announces Reorganization
- Company Integrating Alpine Biomed Organization
- Revises Full Year 2010 Guidance
- Provides 2010 non-GAAP Earnings Per Share Guidance of $0.60 to $0.62
SAN CARLOS, Calif.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--January 13, 2010-- (Nasdaq:BABY) today announced that it has adopted a reorganization plan that is designed to eliminate redundant costs resulting from the acquisition of Alpine Biomed Holdings Corp. which was completed on September 14, 2009.
Natus Medical Incorporated
Alpine Biomed is a leader in the development, manufacturing, and sales of devices for the diagnosis of neurological disorders. It currently has facilities in Denmark, Canada, France, and Germany and sells its products through direct sales organizations in those countries and the United States and through a distributor sales channel in more than fifty other countries around the globe.
The reorganization will result in the following changes to the combined organizations:
- - Alpine operations in Montreal, Canada will be transitioned to the Companys existing Xltek facility in Oakville, Ontario, Canada; and
- - Alpines sales organization will be merged into the Companys global sales organization.
The Company expects the reorganization of the sales groups will be substantially completed in January 2010, while the transfer of product development and production activities from Montreal to Oakville will occur over the course of the first half of 2010. The Company expects to record a restructuring charge associated with these activities of approximately $2.5 million in the first quarter of 2010.
Jim Hawkins, President and Chief Executive Officer of the Company commented, We believe that combining the worldwide sales organizations of Natus and Alpine Biomed will increase the sales productivity of our sales force and at the same time allow our customers to choose among a broader range of neurology products to better fit their applications and clinical requirements.
We expect that the integration of Alpines North American operations into the existing Natus organization will reduce costs, strengthen our customer support and field service, and provide our customers with an enhanced sales experience, said Hawkins.
Financial Guidance
On November 2, 2009 the Company communicated its financial guidance for the full year 2010, where it expected revenue to be approximately $196 million and earnings per share to range from $0.49 to $0.51. That guidance included anticipated cost savings from a reorganization of Alpine Biomed but excluded the impact of restructuring costs associated with any such reorganization. The Company is now revising its guidance for the full year 2010 to give effect to the restructuring charge, which will reduce earnings per share by $0.05, and to increase its 2010 revenue guidance to $198 million in light of the Companys perception of improved business conditions since early November 2009, with an associated positive impact on its earnings per share guidance of $0.01. The net impact of these two revisions is a reduction in the 2010 earnings per share guidance of $0.04, to a range to $0.45 to $0.47.
On a non-GAAP basis the Company expects earnings per share to range from $0.60 to $0.62. The non-GAAP earnings guidance excludes the restructuring charge as well as amortization expense associated with certain acquisition-related intangible assets. The Company has elected to provide non-GAAP information that excludes these items as this presentation is common among companies that are active acquirors and whose results are, accordingly, affected by them, because this information is used by management to evaluate operating results and because it believes this information will assist investors in making period to period comparisons of the Companys operating results.
The Company has included a reconciliation of its GAAP and non-GAAP 2010 financial guidance as a schedule to this press release.
Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures
The Company has excluded the following from its presentation of non-GAAP earnings per share:
Restructuring charges relate primarily to activities initiated by the Company associated with reorganization, integration, and expense reduction programs. Restructuring charges are excluded from non-GAAP financial measures because they are not considered to be part of core operating activities and the occurrence of such costs is infrequent. Although the Company has engaged in various restructuring activities in the past, each has been a discrete event based on a unique set of business objectives. The Company does not engage in restructuring activities in the ordinary course of business. As such, the Company believes it is appropriate to exclude restructuring charges from its non-GAAP financial measures, as doing so enhances the ability of investors to compare the Companys period-over-period operating results.
Restructuring charges:
Amortization of certain acquisition-related intangible assets relates primarily to core and developed technologies, customer relationships, and backlog associated with the acquisitions the Company has completed. The Company excludes the amortization of acquisition-related intangible assets because it believes this expense is not reflective of the Company's ongoing business. In accordance with GAAP, the Company generally recognizes expenses for most internally-developed intangible assets as they are incurred, notwithstanding the potential future benefit such assets may provide. Unlike internally-developed intangible assets, however, and also in accordance with GAAP, the Company generally capitalizes the cost of acquired intangible assets and the cost attributed to these intangibles, other than goodwill and indefinite-lived intangible assets, is amortized over the useful lives of the associated assets. As a result of this GAAP treatment, there is an inherent lack of comparability between the treatment of most internally-developed intangible assets and acquired intangible assets. Accordingly, the Company believes it is useful to provide, as a supplement to its GAAP operating results, a non-GAAP financial measure that excludes the amortization of acquired intangible assets.
Amortization of certain acquisition-related intangible assets:
The Company believes that the presentation of these non-GAAP financial measures provides meaningful supplemental information to both management and investors that is indicative of the Company's core operating results. Therefore, the Company believes these non-GAAP financial measures facilitate comparison of operating results across reporting periods.
The Company believes that both management and investors benefit from referring to these non-GAAP financial measures in assessing the Company's performance and when planning, forecasting, and analyzing future periods. These non-GAAP financial measures also facilitate management's internal comparisons to the Company's historical performance. The non-GAAP financial measures disclosed by the Company should not be considered a substitute for or superior to financial measures calculated in accordance with GAAP, and the financial results calculated in accordance with GAAP and reconciliations to the associated non-GAAP financial results should be carefully evaluated.
Management Presentation
Mr. Hawkins will make a presentation at the 12th Annual Needham Growth Stock Conference at 9:20 a.m. Eastern Time (6:20 a.m. PT) on Thursday, January 14, 2010. The conference is being held at The New York Palace Hotel in New York City. Investors may listen to the live webcast and view a copy of the slide presentation online via the Investors section of the Companys web site at . The recorded webcast will be accessible online for at least 30 days. Attendance at the 12th Annual Needham Growth Stock Conference is by invitation only.
http://investor.natus.com
About Natus Medical Incorporated
Natus is a leading provider of healthcare products used for the screening, detection, treatment, monitoring and tracking of common medical ailments such as hearing impairment, neurological dysfunction, epilepsy, sleep disorders, and newborn care. Product offerings include computerized neurodiagnostic systems for audiology, neurology, polysomnography, and neonatology, as well as newborn care products such as hearing screening systems, phototherapy devices for the treatment of newborn jaundice, head-cooling products for the treatment of brain injury in newborns, and software systems for managing and tracking disorders and diseases for public health laboratories.
Additional information about Natus Medical can be found at .
www.natus.com
This press release contains forward-looking statements as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, particularly statements regarding the expectations, beliefs, plans, intentions and strategies of Natus. These forward-looking statements include, but are not limited to, statements regarding anticipated revenue and earnings per share for 2010, severance costs associated with the reorganization, and benefits resulting from the reorganization. These statements relate to current estimates and assumptions of our management as of the date of this press release, and future events or Natus' future financial performance or results involve known and unknown risks, uncertainties and other factors that may cause actual results, levels of activity, performance, or achievements to differ materially from those expressed or implied by the forward-looking statements. Natus future results could differ materially from those expressed or implied by the forward-looking statements due to a number of factors, including the effects of competition, the demand for our products and services, the impact of adverse global economic conditions in our target markets, our ability to expand our sales in international markets, our ability to maintain current sales levels in a mature domestic market, our ability to control costs, and risks associated with bringing new products to market and integrating acquired businesses. Natus disclaims any obligation to update information contained in any forward looking statement.
More information about potential risk factors that could affect the business and financial results of Natus is included in Natus' annual report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2008, and its quarterly reports on Form 10-Q, and in other reports filed from time to time by Natus with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission.
CONTACT: Natus Medical Incorporated Steven J. Murphy, 650-802-0400 Chief Financial Officer
InvestorRelations@Natus.com


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BABY/BABY-8K-20100304070023.txt.gz
TIME:20100304070023
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported):
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C.  20549
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 OR 15(d) of
The Securities Exchange Act of 1934
March 4, 2010
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 - 
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 - 
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 - 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 - 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
ITEM 2.02          Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On March 4, 2010, Natus Medical Incorporated (the Company) is issuing a press release and holding a conference call regarding its financial results for the fourth fiscal quarter of 2009 ended December 31, 2009 and other financial information.  A copy of the press release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 to this Form 8-K.
The information in this Form 8-K and the exhibit attached hereto shall not be deemed filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the Exchange Act) or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that Section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
ITEM 9.01.          Financial Statements and Exhibits.
SIGNATURES
          Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Index to Exhibits

Exhibit 99.1
Natus Medical Announces 2009 Fourth Quarter and Full Year Financial Results
Provides First Quarter 2010 Guidance
SAN CARLOS, Calif.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--March 4, 2010-- (Nasdaq:BABY) today announced financial results for the fourth quarter and full year ended December 31, 2009.
Natus Medical Incorporated
For the fourth quarter ended December 31, 2009, Natus reported revenue of $51.6 million, compared to $43.4 million reported in the comparable quarter of the previous year. Net income was $4.3 million, or $0.15 per diluted share, for the fourth quarter of 2009, compared with net income of $6.3 million, or $0.22 per diluted share, for the fourth quarter of 2008.
For the year ended December 31, 2009, Natus reported revenue of $166.5 million, compared to $161.8 million reported in 2008. Net income was $11.1 million, or $0.39 per diluted share for the year ended December 31, 2009, compared to net income of $17.5 million, or $0.66 per diluted share in 2008.
Overall I am very satisfied with our fourth quarter and 2009 results, said Jim Hawkins, President and Chief Executive Officer of the Company. As we entered 2009, we were facing a rapidly weakening economy and significant uncertainty in the worldwide medical device capital equipment markets. As a result, hospitals were significantly reducing purchases of medical equipment. Confronted with this unprecedented environment, we lowered our performance expectations for the year and put on hold pending acquisitions as we were unable to comfortably assess the extent of the declining sales and economic conditions and how they might impact valuations.
Considering this difficult backdrop, I am pleased with the way the year progressed, as our revenue and earnings strengthened with each quarter and we generated more than $25 million of cash from operations. I am also pleased that in the second half of the year we completed two attractive acquisitions, Alpine Biomed and Hawaii Medical, said Hawkins. The integration of the Alpine sales group into the Natus worldwide sales organization went well and was completed in early January and the synergistic restructuring of our foreign operations that this acquisition facilitates will be completed by the second half of the year.
Although we were disappointed with our gross profit results for the fourth quarter, there were a number of specific contributing factors that will show improvement in 2010, including product mix and the impact of lower margins earned on Alpines products. As with our prior acquisitions, we expect over time to increase the gross profit margin on Alpines products. We expect to see this improvement beginning in the second half of 2010 after we complete the integration of Alpines Stellate operations located in Montreal into our Xltek facility near Toronto, added Hawkins.
We are looking to do additional acquisitions in the second half of 2010 as we continue to execute our business model of combining internal growth and accretive acquisitions, said Hawkins.
The results for the full year 2009 include $550,000 of direct acquisition costs associated with the Companys acquisitions of Hawaii Medical and Alpine Biomed in July and September 2009, respectively. Excluding these direct costs, which were reported as a component of general and administrative expense, non-GAAP earnings were $11.5 million, or $0.40 per diluted share.
As of December 31, 2009 the Company had cash, cash equivalents, and short-term investments of $33.5 million, stockholders' equity of approximately $243 million, and working capital of approximately $76 million.
Financial Guidance
Natus reiterated its financial guidance for the full year 2010 and also provided guidance for the first quarter of 2010.
On January 13, 2010 the Company communicated its financial guidance for the full year 2010, where it expected revenue to be approximately $198 million and earnings per share to range from $0.45 to $0.47. The Companys guidance gave effect to a restructuring charge that the Company will record in the first quarter of 2010 that is expected to reduce earnings per share by approximately $0.05.
For the first quarter of 2010, the Company expects revenue to range from $46 million to $47 million and earnings per share to range from a loss of ($0.01) to breakeven. This guidance gives effect to the aforementioned restructuring charge that will reduce first quarter earnings per share by $0.05. The Companys first quarter 2010 guidance compares to revenue of $33.4 million and earnings per share of $0.03 reported in the first quarter of 2009.
On a non-GAAP basis the Company expects earnings per share to range from $0.60 to $0.62 for the full year 2010 and to range from $0.06 to $0.07 for the first quarter of 2010. The non-GAAP earnings guidance excludes the restructuring charge as well as amortization expense associated with certain acquisition-related intangible assets. The Company expects that excluding the effect of these charges from net income will result in an increase to earnings per share of $0.15 for the full year 2010 and $0.07 for the first quarter of 2010. The Company has elected to provide non-GAAP information that excludes these items as this presentation is common among companies that are active acquirors and whose results are, accordingly, affected by them, because this information is used by management to evaluate operating results and because it believes this information will assist investors in making period to period comparisons of the Company's operating results.
The Company has included a reconciliation of its GAAP and non-GAAP 2010 financial guidance as a schedule to this press release.
Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures
In addition to disclosing financial results calculated in accordance with GAAP, this release contains non-GAAP financial measures that exclude direct costs associated with the companys acquisitions of Hawaii Medical and Alpine Biomed. The Company believes that the presentation of results excluding the acquisition-related charges provides meaningful supplemental information to both management and investors that is indicative of the Company's core operating results. Therefore, the Company believes these non-GAAP financial measures facilitate comparison of operating results across reporting periods. A reconciliation between the Company's results of operations on a GAAP and non-GAAP basis for the periods reported is included as part of the condensed consolidated statements of operations at the end of the Company's financial results release.
The Company believes that both management and investors benefit from referring to these non-GAAP financial measures in assessing the Company's performance and when planning, forecasting, and analyzing future periods. These non-GAAP financial measures also facilitate management's internal comparisons to the Company's historical performance. The non-GAAP financial measures disclosed by the Company should not be considered a substitute for or superior to financial measures calculated in accordance with GAAP, and the financial results calculated in accordance with GAAP and reconciliations to those financial statements should be carefully evaluated.
Conference Call
Natus has scheduled an investment-community conference call to discuss this announcement beginning at 11:00 a.m. Eastern Time today (8:00 a.m. Pacific Time). Individuals interested in listening to the conference call may do so by dialing (866) 730-5762 for domestic callers, or (857) 350-1586 for international callers, and entering reservation code 94499105. A telephone replay will be available for 48 hours following the conclusion of the call by dialing (888) 286-8010 for domestic callers, or (617) 801-6888 for international callers, and entering reservation code 28704719.
The conference call also will be available real-time via the Internet at , and a recording of the call will be available on the Companys Web site for 90 days following the completion of the call.
http://investor.natus.com
About Natus Medical Incorporated
Natus is a leading provider of healthcare products used for the screening, detection, treatment, monitoring and tracking of common medical ailments such as hearing impairment, neurological dysfunction, epilepsy, sleep disorders, and newborn care. Product offerings include computerized neurodiagnostic systems for audiology, neurology, polysomnography, and neonatology, as well as newborn care products such as hearing screening systems, phototherapy devices for the treatment of newborn jaundice, head-cooling products for the treatment of brain injury in newborns, and software systems for managing and tracking disorders and diseases for public health laboratories.
Additional information about Natus Medical can be found at .
www.natus.com
This press release contains forward-looking statements as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, particularly statements regarding the expectations, beliefs, plans, intentions and strategies of Natus. These forward-looking statements include, but are not limited to, statements regarding anticipated revenue and profitability for the first quarter and full year 2010, future improvement in gross profit margins, the timing and benefit of restructuring activities, achievement of internal growth, and the completion of acquisitions that will be accretive to earnings. These statements relate to current estimates and assumptions of our management as of the date of this press release, and future events or Natus' future financial performance or results, and involve known and unknown risks, uncertainties and other factors that may cause actual results, levels of activity, performance, or achievements to differ materially from those expressed or implied by the forward-looking statements. Forward-looking statements are only predictions and the actual events or results may differ materially. Natus cannot provide any assurance that its future results or the results implied by the forward-looking statements will meet expectations. Our future results could differ materially due to a number of factors, including the effects of competition, the demand for our products and services, the impact of adverse global economic conditions on our target markets, our ability to expand our sales in international markets, our ability to maintain current sales levels in a mature domestic market, our ability to control costs, and risks associated with bringing new products to market and integrating acquired businesses. Natus disclaims any obligation to update information contained in any forward-looking statement.
More information about potential risk factors that could affect the business and financial results of Natus is included in Natus' annual report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2008, and its quarterly reports on Form 10-Q, and in other reports filed from time to time by Natus with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission.
CONTACT: Natus Medical Incorporated Steven J. Murphy, 650-802-0400 Chief Financial Officer
InvestorRelations@Natus.com


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BABY/BABY-8K-20100308160526.txt.gz
TIME:20100308160526
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
The 2009 cash bonus plan (the "Plan") for the executive officers of Natus Medical Incorporated (the "Company") is described in a Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the Commission on January 21, 2009. The payment of bonuses under the Plan was based on the Company achieving its budgeted pre-tax profit included in the Company's operating plan approved by the Board of Directors of the Company in January 2009.
On March 3, 2010, the Compensation Committee of the Board of Directors of the Company approved cash bonus payments as listed below to the executive officers of the Company. The bonus payments were granted outside of the Plan because the actual 2009 pre-tax profit of the Company did not meet the threshold level of pre-tax profit. The bonus payments, which are at 68% of the target amount established in the Plan, were made in respect to the Company's performance for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2009.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BABY/BABY-8K-20100427151306.txt.gz
TIME:20100427151306
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
The text set forth below under Item 2.03 is incorporated into this Item by this reference.
 
On April 22, 2010, Natus Medical Incorporated (the "Company") entered into a Second Amended and Restated Credit Agreement (the "Credit Facility") with Wells Fargo Bank, National Association ("Wells Fargo"). The Credit Facility amends and restates the Company's existing credit facility with Wells Fargo that was scheduled to expire on April 30, 2010. The Credit Facility provides for a $50 million secured revolving credit facility.
Borrowings under the Credit Facility are guaranteed by the Company's personal property, including, without limitation, all of the Company's ownership interests in subsidiaries, accounts receivable, inventory, equipment and intellectual property now owned or hereafter acquired, but excluding interests as a lessee under real property and personal property leases and shares of voting stock of foreign subsidiaries that represent more than 65% of the voting stock of such foreign subsidiary.
At the Company's option, outstanding borrowings on the Credit Facility will bear interest at either (i) a variable base rate, which is the higher of the federal funds rate plus one-half of one percent, or the rate announced from time to time by Wells Fargo as its prime rate, or (ii) a one-, two-, three- or six-month fixed rate, as selected by the Company, that is based on LIBOR plus an applicable interest margin that ranges from 150 basis points to 200 basis points depending upon the leverage ratio of the Company and its subsidiaries on a consolidated basis.
The Credit Facility matures on April 30, 2012, at which time all principal amounts outstanding under the Credit Facility will be due and payable. Borrowings on the Credit Facility may be repaid at any time without premium or penalty.
The Credit Facility contains certain usual and customary representations and warranties and affirmative and negative covenants, which include financial covenants; limitations on liens, additional indebtedness, further negative pledges, investments, payment of dividends, mergers, sale of assets and restricted payments; and other limitations. The financial covenants include metrics for minimum adjusted EBITDA and quick ratio on a consolidated basis.
The foregoing description of the Credit Facility does not purport to be complete and is qualified in its entirety by reference to the Second Amended and Restated Credit Agreement attached hereto as Exhibit 10.1.
 
On April 27, 2010, the Company is issuing a press release announcing the entry into the Credit Facility. A copy of the press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated herein by reference.
 
(d) The following exhibits are filed herewith:
Exhibits.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 10.1
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
S
CHEDULES
 
 
T S A R C A (this ) is entered into as of April 22, 2010, by and between N M I, a Delaware corporation (), and W F B, N A ().
HIS
ECOND
MENDED
AND
ESTATED
REDIT
GREEMENT
"Agreement"
ATUS
EDICAL
NCORPORATED
"Borrower"
ELLS
ARGO
ANK
ATIONAL
SSOCIATION
"Bank"
W, Borrower and Bank are party to that certain Amended and Restated Credit Agreement, dated as of November 28, 2007 (as amended, restated, modified and/or supplemented prior to the date hereof, the ).
HEREAS
"Existing Agreement"
W, Borrower has requested that Bank (i) amend and restate the Existing Agreement and (ii) extend or continue credit to Borrower as described below, and Bank has agreed to provide such credit to Borrower on the terms and conditions contained herein.
HEREAS
N, T, for valuable consideration, the receipt and sufficiency of which are hereby acknowledged, Bank and Borrower hereby agree as follows:
OW
HEREFORE
S 1.1. C D T.
ECTION
ERTAIN
EFINED
ERMS
As used in this Agreement, the following terms shall have the meaning set forth below:
has the meaning ascribed to such term in Section 9.12(b) hereof.
"AAA"
means the entity or assets acquired by Borrower in an Acquisition, whether before or after the date of this Agreement.
"Acquired Business"
means any transaction or series of related transactions for the purpose of or resulting, directly or indirectly, in (a) the acquisition of all or substantially all of the assets of a Person, or of any business or division of a Person, (b) the acquisition of in excess of 50% of the capital stock, partnership interests, membership interests or equity of any Person, or (c) a merger or consolidation or any other combination with another Person provided that Borrower is the surviving entity.
"Acquisition"
has the meaning ascribed to such term in the introductory paragraph hereof.
"Agreement"
"" means Alpine Biomed Holdings Corp, a Delaware corporation.
Alpine Biomed
 
"" means cash based restructuring charges, as defined under GAAP, for Alpine Biomed; that in no event shall Alpine Cash Restructuring Charges exceed $3,200,000 in the aggregate during the term of this Agreement.
Alpine Cash Restructuring Charges
provided
"" means, from time to time, with respect to any Base Rate Loan, or LIBOR Loan, or with respect to the Unused Commitment Fees payable pursuant to Section 2.5(a), as the case may be, the applicable rate per annum set forth below (expressed in basis points) under the caption "LIBOR Spread," "Base Rate Spread" or "Unused Commitment Fee Rate," as the case may be, based upon, subject to Section 2.4(d), the Leverage Ratio as set forth in the most recent Compliance Certificate received by Bank pursuant to Section 6.3(d):
Applicable Rate
 
" means Financial Accounting Standards Board's Accounting Standards Codification Topic 805, (formerly SFAS 141R).
"ASC 805
Business Combinations
means, on any date of determination: (a) in respect of any capital lease of any Person, the capitalized amount thereof that would appear on a balance sheet of such Person prepared as of such date in accordance with GAAP; and (b) in respect of any Synthetic Lease Obligation, the capitalized amount of the remaining lease payments under the relevant lease that would appear on a balance sheet of such Person prepared as of such date in accordance with GAAP if such lease were accounted for as a capital lease.
"Attributable Indebtedness"
"" means the period from the Closing Date to the earlier of (i) the Revolving Credit Maturity Date and (ii) the date that Bank's commitment to make Revolving Credit Loans terminates pursuant to Section 8.2.
Availability Period
has the meaning ascribed to such term in the introductory paragraph hereof.
"Bank"
means the Bankruptcy Reform Act, Title 11 of the United States Code.
"Bankruptcy Code"
 
"" means, collectively: (a) the Bankruptcy Code; and (b) all other liquidation, conservatorship, bankruptcy, assignment for the benefit of creditors, moratorium, rearrangement, receivership, insolvency, reorganization, or similar debtor relief laws of the United States or other applicable jurisdictions from time to time in effect and affecting the rights of creditors generally.
Bankruptcy Laws
means the rate per annum for United States dollar deposits quoted by Bank as the Inter-Bank Market Offered Rate, with the understanding that such rate is quoted by Bank for the purpose of calculating effective rates of interest for loans making reference thereto, on the first day of an Interest Period for delivery of funds on said date for a period of time approximately equal to the number of days in such Interest Period and in an amount approximately equal to the principal amount to which such Interest Period applies. Borrower understands and agrees that Bank may base its quotation of the Inter-Bank Market Offered Rate upon such offers or other market indicators of the Inter-Bank Market as Bank in its discretion deems appropriate including, but not limited to, the rate offered for Dollar deposits on the London Inter-Bank Market.
"Base LIBOR"
"" means, for any day, a fluctuating rate per annum equal to the higher of: (a) the Federal Funds Rate one-half of one percent per annum; and (b) the per annum rate of interest in effect for such day as publicly announced from time to time by Bank as its "," such rate being the rate of interest most recently announced within Bank at its principal office as its "," with the understanding that Bank's "" is one of Bank's base rates and serves as the basis upon which effective rates of interest are calculated for those loans making reference thereto, and is evidenced by the recording thereof after its announcement in such internal publication or publications as Bank may designate. Any change in Bank's "" as announced by Bank shall take effect at the opening of business on the day specified in the public announcement of such change.
Base Rate
plus
Prime Rate
Prime Rate
Prime Rate
Prime Rate
"" means a Loan that bears interest based upon the Base Rate.
Base Rate Loan
" means Biologic Systems Corporation Limited, an Israeli corporation.
"Biologic Israel
has the meaning ascribed to such term in the introductory paragraph hereof.
"Borrower"
"" means any day except a Saturday, Sunday or any other day on which commercial banks in California are authorized or required by law to close; that, if any such day relates to LIBOR or any LIBOR Loan, such day must also be a day on which dealings in Dollar deposits are conducted by and between banks in the London interbank offered market.
Business Day
provided
"" means cash based restructuring charges, as defined under GAAP, for any entity that is the subject of a Permitted Acquisition; that in no event shall Cash Restructuring Charges exceed $5,000,000 in the aggregate during the term of this Agreement.
Cash Restructuring Charges
provided
 
"" means the occurrence, after the date of this Agreement, of: (a) the adoption or taking effect of any law, rule, regulation or treaty; (b) any change in any law, rule, regulation or treaty or in the administration, interpretation or application thereof by any Governmental Authority; or (c) the making or issuance of any request, guideline or directive (whether or not having the force of law) by any Governmental Authority.
Change in Law
"" means an event or series of events by which any "person" or "group" (as such terms are used in Sections 13(d) and 14(d) of the Exchange Act, but excluding any employee benefit plan of such person or its subsidiaries, and any person or entity acting in its capacity as trustee, agent or other fiduciary or administrator of any such plan) becomes the "beneficial owner" (as defined in Rules 13d-3 and 13d-5 under the Exchange Act), directly or indirectly, of thirty percent or more of the Equity Interests of Borrower entitled to vote for members of the board of directors or equivalent governing body of Borrower on a fully-diluted basis (and taking into account all such securities that such person or group has the right to acquire pursuant to any option right).
Change of Control
means April 22, 2010.
"Closing Date"
"" means the Internal Revenue Code of 1986.
Code
"" means a certificate substantially in the form of .
Compliance Certificate
Exhibit C
means all non-public, confidential and/or proprietary information of Borrower, its Subsidiaries or any Subsidiary thereof, now or at any time hereafter provided to Bank by Borrower, or any of Borrower's officers, employees, agents or representatives, in connection with Bank's evaluation of Borrower's credit request and/or Bank's ongoing credit accommodations to Borrower, and shall include, without limitation, any and all financial, technical and/or business information relating to Borrower, its Subsidiaries or any Subsidiary thereof, including trade secrets, research and development test results, marketing or business plans and strategies, forecasts, budgets, projections, customer and supplier information, and any other analyses, computations or studies prepared by or for Borrower, any of its Subsidiaries or any Subsidiary thereof.
"Confidential Information"
means, for any period and as of any date of determination, for Borrower and its Subsidiaries on a consolidated basis, an amount equal to Consolidated Net Income for such period (a) the following to the extent deducted in calculating such Consolidated Net Income: (i) Consolidated Interest Expense for such period, (ii) the provision for United States federal, state, local and foreign income taxes payable by Borrower and its Subsidiaries for such period, (iii) depreciation and amortization expense, (iv) all non-cash expenses related to stock-based compensation deducted to arrive at Consolidated Net Income, (v) other non-recurring expenses of Borrower and its Subsidiaries reducing such Consolidated Net Income which do not represent a cash item in such period or any future period, (vi) Alpine Cash Restructuring Charges ( that the aggregate amount added to Consolidated Net Income for all periods pursuant to this clause (vi) shall not exceed $3,200,000), (vii) Cash Restructuring Charges ( that the aggregate amount of Cash Restructuring Charges Alpine Cash Restructuring Charges added to Consolidated Net Income for any twelve-month period pursuant to this clause (vii) and the above clause (vi) shall not exceed $5,000,000), and (viii) expenses created by contingent consideration or transaction costs related to a business combination or acquisition, to the extent required to be expensed by ASC 805, and (b) the following to the extent included in calculating such Consolidated Net Income: (i) interest income (ii) extraordinary or non-recurring non-cash income or gains, (iii) United States federal, state, local and foreign income tax credits of Borrower and its Subsidiaries for such period, (iv) all non-cash items increasing Consolidated Net Income for such period, and (v) adjustments to income created by contingent consideration related to a business combination or acquisition, to the extent required to be recognized by ASC 805.
"Consolidated EBITDA"
plus
provided
provided
plus
minus
 
means, as of any date of determination, for Borrower and its Subsidiaries on a consolidated basis, the sum of (a) the outstanding principal amount of all obligations, whether current or long-term, for borrowed money (including obligations hereunder) and all obligations evidenced by bonds, debentures, notes, loan agreements or other similar instruments, (b) all purchase money indebtedness, (c) all direct obligations arising under letters of credit (including standby and commercial), reimbursement agreements, bankers' acceptances, bank guaranties, surety bonds and similar instruments, (d) all obligations in respect of the deferred purchase price of property or services (other than trade accounts payable in the ordinary course of business), (e) Attributable Indebtedness in respect of capital leases and Synthetic Lease Obligations, (f) without duplication, all guarantees with respect to outstanding indebtedness of the types specified in clauses (a) through (e) above of Persons other than Borrower or any Subsidiary, and (g) all indebtedness of the types referred to in clauses (a) through (f) above of any partnership or joint venture (other than a joint venture that is itself a corporation or limited liability company) in which Borrower or a Subsidiary is a general partner or joint venturer, unless such indebtedness is expressly made non-recourse to Borrower or such Subsidiary.
"Consolidated Funded Indebtedness"
means, for any period, for Borrower and its Subsidiaries on a consolidated basis, an amount equal to the sum of all interest charges (including imputed interest charges with respect to capitalized lease obligations and all amortization of debt discount and expense) of such Persons for such period.
"Consolidated Interest Expense"
means, for any period, for Borrower and its Subsidiaries on a consolidated basis, the net income of Borrower and its Subsidiaries from continuing operations (excluding gains or losses from dispositions of assets) for such period.
"Consolidated Net Income"
"" means any event or condition that constitutes an Event of Default or that, with the giving of notice, the passage of time, or both, would constitute an Event of Default.
Default
"" means a per annum interest rate equal to the sum of: (i) the Base Rate; (ii) the Applicable Rate, if any, applicable to Base Rate Loans; (iii) four hundred basis points per annum; that, with respect to a LIBOR Loan, the Default Rate shall be a per annum interest rate equal to the sum of: (A) the interest rate (including any Applicable Rate) otherwise applicable to such Loan; (B) four hundred basis points per annum.
Default Rate
plus
plus
provided
plus
"" and "" mean lawful money of the United States.
Dollar
$
means any Subsidiary that is not a Foreign Subsidiary.
"Domestic Subsidiary"
 
means any business engaged primarily in the sale of medical devices and associated supplies.
"Eligible Line of Business"
"" means all claims, however asserted, by any Governmental Authority or other Person alleging Environmental Liabilities.
Environmental Claims
"" means any and all United States federal, state, local, and foreign statutes, laws, regulations, ordinances, rules, judgments, orders, decrees, permits, concessions, grants, franchises, licenses, agreements or governmental restrictions relating to pollution and the protection of the environment or the release of any materials into the environment, including those related to hazardous substances or wastes, air emissions and discharges to waste or public systems.
Environmental Laws
"" means any liability, contingent or otherwise (including any liability for damages, costs of environmental remediation, fines, penalties or indemnities), of Borrower, any Guarantor or any of their respective Subsidiaries directly or indirectly resulting from or based upon: (a) violation of any Environmental Law; (b) the generation, use, handling, transportation, storage, treatment or disposal of any Hazardous Materials; (c) exposure to any Hazardous Materials; (d) the release or threatened release of any Hazardous Materials into the environment; or (e) any contract, agreement or other consensual arrangement pursuant to which liability is assumed or imposed with respect to any of the foregoing.
Environmental Liability
"" means, with respect to any Person, all of the shares of capital stock of (or other ownership or profit interests in) such Person, all of the warrants, options or other rights for the purchase or acquisition from such Person of shares of capital stock of (or other ownership or profit interests in) such Person, all of the securities convertible into or exchangeable for shares of capital stock of (or other ownership or profit interests in) such Person or warrants, rights or options for the purchase or acquisition from such Person of such shares (or such other interests), and all of the other ownership or profit interests in such Person (including partnership, member or trust interests therein), whether voting or nonvoting, and whether or not such shares, warrants, options, rights or other interests are outstanding on any date of determination.
Equity Interests
means the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974.
"ERISA"
"" means any trade or business (whether or not incorporated) under common control with Borrower or any Subsidiary thereof within the meaning of Section 414(b) or (c) of the Code (and Sections 414(m) and (o) of the Code for purposes of provisions relating to Section 412 of the Code).
ERISA Affiliate
"" means any of the following: (a) a Reportable Event with respect to a Pension Plan; (b) a withdrawal by Borrower or any ERISA Affiliate from a Pension Plan subject to Section 4063 of ERISA during a plan year in which it was a substantial employer (as defined in Section 4001(a)(2) of ERISA) or a cessation of operations that is treated as such a withdrawal under Section 4062(e) of ERISA; (c) a complete or partial withdrawal by Borrower or any ERISA Affiliate from a Multiemployer Plan or notification that a Multiemployer Plan is in reorganization; (d) the filing of a notice of intent to terminate, the treatment of a Plan amendment as a termination under Sections 4041 or 4041A of ERISA, or the commencement of proceedings by the PBGC to terminate a Pension Plan or Multiemployer Plan; (e) an event or condition that constitutes grounds under Section 4042 of ERISA for the termination of, or the appointment of a trustee to administer, any Pension Plan or Multiemployer Plan; or (f) the imposition of any liability under Title IV of ERISA, other than for PBGC premiums due but not delinquent under Section 4007 of ERISA, upon Borrower or any ERISA Affiliate.
ERISA Event
 
has the meaning ascribed to such term in Article VIII hereof.
"Event of Default"
"" mean Excel-Tech Ltd. USA, a Delaware corporation.
Excel-Tech
"" means the Securities Exchange Act of 1934.
Exchange Act
"" means, for any day, the rate per annum equal to the weighted average of the rates on overnight United States federal funds transactions with members of the Federal Reserve System arranged by United States federal funds brokers on such day, as published by the Federal Reserve Bank of New York on the Business Day next succeeding such day; that: (a) if such day is not a Business Day, then the Federal Funds Rate for such day shall be such rate on such transactions on the next preceding Business Day as so published on the next succeeding Business Day; and (b) if no such rate is so published on such next succeeding Business Day, then the Federal Funds Rate for such day shall be the average rate (rounded upward, if necessary, to a whole multiple of one-hundredth of one percent) charged to Bank on such day on such transactions as determined by Bank.
Federal Funds Rate
provided
means the letter agreement, dated October 1, 2007, between Borrower and Bank regarding certain fees to be paid by Borrower in connection with the transactions contemplated by the Loan Documents.
"Fee Letter"
"" means the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System of the United States.
FRB
means any Subsidiary organized under the laws of a country (or political subdivision thereof) other than the United States (or political subdivision thereof).
"Foreign Subsidiary"
means generally accepted accounting principles applicable in the United States set forth in the opinions and pronouncements of the Accounting Principles Board and the American Institute of Certified Public Accountants and statements and pronouncements of the Financial Accounting Standards Board or such other principles as may be approved by a significant segment of the accounting profession in the United States, that are applicable to the circumstances as of the date of determination, consistently applied.
"GAAP"
"" means the government of the United States or any other nation, or of any political subdivision thereof, whether state or local, and any agency, authority, instrumentality, regulatory body, court, central bank or other entity exercising executive, legislative, judicial, taxing, regulatory or administrative powers or functions of or pertaining to government (including any supra-national bodies such as the European Union or the European Central Bank).
Governmental Authority
 
or have the meanings ascribed to such terms in Section 2.9 hereof.
"Guarantor"
"Guarantors"
or have the meanings ascribed to such terms in Section 2.9 hereof.
"Guaranty"
"Guaranties"
"" means all explosive or radioactive substances or wastes and all hazardous or toxic substances, wastes or other pollutants, including petroleum or petroleum distillates, asbestos or asbestos-containing materials, polychlorinated biphenyls, radon gas, infectious or medical wastes and all other substances or wastes of any nature regulated pursuant to any Environmental Law.
Hazardous Materials
means the acquisition of the capital stock or other equity interests of a Person through a tender offer or similar solicitation of the owners of such capital stock or other equity interests which has not been approved (prior to such acquisition) by resolutions of the board of directors of such Person or by similar action if such Person is not a corporation, or as to which such approval has been withdrawn.
"Hostile Acquisition"
"" has the meaning ascribed thereto in Section 9.3(b).
Indemnitees
"" means: (a) with respect to (i) a LIBOR Loan, the last day of each Interest Period applicable thereto; that, if any such Interest Period exceeds three months, the date that falls three months after the beginning of such Interest Period shall also be an Interest Payment Date; and (ii) a Base Rate Loan, the last Business Day of each calendar month; and (b) in the case of Revolving Credit Loans, the Revolving Credit Maturity Date.
Interest Payment Date
provided
"" means, as to each LIBOR Loan, the period commencing on the date such LIBOR Loan is disbursed or converted to or continued as a LIBOR Loan and ending on the date one, two, three or six months thereafter, as selected by Borrower in its related Loan Notice; that: (a) any Interest Period that would otherwise end on a day that is not a Business Day shall be extended to the next succeeding Business Day unless such Business Day falls in another calendar month, in which case such Interest Period shall end on the next preceding Business Day; (b) any Interest Period that begins on the last Business Day of a calendar month (or on a day for which there is no numerically corresponding day in the calendar month at the end of such Interest Period) shall end on the last Business Day of the calendar month at the end of such Interest Period; and (c) no Interest Period for any Revolving Credit Loan shall extend beyond the Revolving Credit Maturity Date.
Interest Period
provided
"" means, as to any Person, any direct or indirect acquisition or investment by such Person, whether by means of (a) the purchase or other acquisition of capital stock or other securities of another Person, (b) a loan, advance or capital contribution to, guarantee or assumption of debt of, or purchase or other acquisition of any other debt or equity participation or interest in, another Person, including any partnership or joint venture interest in such other Person and any arrangement pursuant to which the investor guarantees Indebtedness of such other Person, or (c) the purchase or other acquisition (in one transaction or a series of transactions) of assets of another Person that constitute a business unit. For purposes of covenant compliance, the amount of any Investment shall be the amount actually invested, without adjustment for subsequent increases or decreases in the value of such Investment.
Investment
 
means, as of any date of determination, for Borrower and its Subsidiaries on a consolidated basis, the ratio of: (a) Consolidated Funded Indebtedness as of such date to (b) Consolidated EBITDA for the four consecutive fiscal quarters ending on such date.
"Leverage Ratio"
means the rate per annum (rounded upward, if necessary, to the nearest whole 1/16 of 1%) and determined pursuant to the following formula:
"LIBOR"
 
means a Loan that bears interest based upon LIBOR.
"LIBOR Loan"
means the reserve percentage prescribed by the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System (or any successor) for (as defined in Regulation D of the Federal Reserve Board, as amended), adjusted by Bank for expected changes in such reserve percentage during the applicable Interest Period.
"LIBOR Reserve Percentage"
"Eurocurrency Liabilities"
"" means any Revolving Credit Loan.
Loan
"" means this Agreement, the Second Amended and Restated Revolving Line of Credit Note, the Security Agreements, the Guaranties, the Pledge Agreements, and each other contract, instrument and document required by or delivered to Bank in connection with this Agreement.
Loan Documents
"" means a notice, pursuant to Section 2.2(a), of: (a) a borrowing of Loans; (b) a conversion of Loans from one Type to the other; or (c) a continuation of LIBOR Loans; which, if in writing, shall be substantially in the form of .
Loan Notice
Exhibit B
"" means a material adverse effect on (i) the business operations or financial condition of Borrower and its Subsidiaries taken as a whole, (ii) the ability of Borrower to repay all debt, principal, interest, expenses and other amounts owed to Bank by Borrower pursuant to this Agreement, the Second Amended and Restated Revolving Line of Credit Note and the other Loan Documents, or to otherwise perform its material obligations under the Loan Documents, or (iii) Borrower's interest in, or the value, perfection or priority of Bank's security interest or lien in, the collateral described in Section 2.8 hereof.
Material Adverse Effect
"" means any employee benefit plan of the type described in Section 4001(a)(3) of ERISA to which Borrower or any ERISA Affiliate makes or is obligated to make contributions, or during the preceding five plan years, has made or been obligated to make contributions.
Multiemployer Plan
 
"" means the Second Amended and Restated Revolving Line of Credit Note.
Note
"" means all advances, debts, liabilities, obligations, covenants and duties of Borrower or any Guarantor under any Loan Document or otherwise, whether with respect to any Loan or otherwise, whether direct or indirect (including those acquired by assumption), absolute or contingent, due or to become due, now existing or hereafter arising and including interest and fees that accrue after the commencement by or against Borrower or any Guarantor or any affiliate thereof of any proceeding under any Bankruptcy Law naming such Person as the debtor in such proceeding, regardless of whether such interest and fees are allowed claims in such proceeding.
Obligations
"" means the Pension Benefit Guaranty Corporation.
PBGC
"" means any "employee pension benefit plan" (as that term is defined in Section 3(2) of ERISA), other than a Multiemployer Plan, that is subject to Title IV of ERISA and is sponsored or maintained by Borrower or any ERISA Affiliate or to which Borrower or any ERISA Affiliate contributes or has an obligation to contribute, or in the case of a multiple employer or other plan described in Section 4064(a) of ERISA, has made contributions at any time during the immediately preceding five plan years.
Pension Plan
means any Acquisition with respect to which all of the following conditions shall have been satisfied:
"Permitted Acquisition"
(a) the Acquired Business is in an Eligible Line of Business;
(b) the Acquisition shall not be a Hostile Acquisition;
(c) the financial statements of the Acquired Business shall be in form and substance satisfactory to Bank and shall have undergone review of a scope satisfactory to Bank;
(d) the Total Consideration for the Acquired Business shall not exceed $15,000,000 and, when taken together with the Total Consideration for all Acquired Businesses acquired after the date of this Agreement, shall not exceed $60,000,000 in the aggregate;
(e) Borrower shall have notified Bank not less than 30 days prior to any such Acquisition and furnished to Bank at such time reasonable details as to such Acquisition (including sources and uses of funds therefor), and 3-year historical financial information and 3-year pro forma financial forecasts of the Acquired Business on a stand alone basis as well as of Borrower on a consolidated basis after giving effect to the Acquisition and covenant compliance calculations reasonably satisfactory to Bank demonstrating satisfaction of the condition described in clause (f) below;
 
(f) after giving effect to the Acquisition, no Default or Event of Default shall exist, including with respect to the financial covenants contained in Section 6.9 hereof on a pro forma basis; and
(g) the Acquisition shall have been approved by Borrower's board of directors and (if necessary) owners, and all necessary legal and regulatory approvals with respect to the Acquisition shall have been obtained.
means:
"Permitted Indebtedness"
(a) the liabilities of Borrower to Bank under this Agreement and the other Loan Documents;
(b) any other liabilities of Borrower existing as of the Closing Date and listed on ;
Schedule 1.1-A
(c) unsecured indebtedness to trade creditors incurred in the ordinary course of business;
(d) guaranty obligations of Borrower with respect to indebtedness of Subsidiaries of Borrower permitted under Section 7.6;
(e) indebtedness secured by Permitted Liens identified in paragraphs (d), (e), (f), (g) (but solely with respect to Permitted Liens permitted under such paragraph (g) that are related to extensions, renewals or refinancings of indebtedness secured by liens identified in paragraph (d) of the definition of Permitted Liens) and (j) of the definition of Permitted Liens; and
(f) extensions, refinancings, modifications, amendments and restatements of any items of Permitted Indebtedness identified in (a) through (d) above, that the principal amount is not increased nor the terms modified to impose more burdensome terms upon Borrower or its Subsidiaries, as the case may be.
provided
means:
"Permitted Investments"
(a) Investments by Borrower existing as of the Closing Date and listed on ;
Schedule 1.1-B
(b) Investments by Borrower in (i) marketable direct obligations issued or unconditionally guaranteed by the United States or any agency or any state thereof maturing within one year from the date of acquisition thereof, (ii) commercial paper maturing no more than one year from the date of creation thereof and currently having rating of at least A-2 or P-2 from either Standard & Poor's Corporation or Moody's Investors Service, (iii) Bank's certificates of deposit maturing no more than one year from the date of investment therein, (iv) Bank's money market accounts, and (v) in conformance with Borrower's "Investment Policy," as in effect on the Closing Date (or as amended from time to time, subject to the approval of Bank), a copy of which has previously been provided to Bank;
 
(c) Investments by Borrower consisting of the endorsement of negotiable instruments for deposit or collection or similar transactions in the ordinary course of business of Borrower;
(d) Investments by Borrower consisting of deposit accounts in which Bank has a first priority perfected security interest;
(e) Investments by Borrower constituting Permitted Acquisitions;
(f) Investments by Borrower not to exceed at any time $250,000.00 in the aggregate consisting of (i) travel advances and employee relocation loans and other employee loans and advances in the ordinary course of business, and (ii) loans to employees, officers or directors relating to the purchase of equity securities of Borrower pursuant to employee stock purchase plans or agreements approved by Borrower's board of directors;
(g) Investments (including debt obligations) by Borrower not to exceed $50,000.00 in the aggregate outstanding at any time received in connection with the bankruptcy or reorganization of customers or suppliers and in settlement of delinquent obligations of, and other disputes with, customers or suppliers arising in the ordinary course of business; and
(h) Investments by Borrower not to exceed $50,000.00 in the aggregate outstanding at any time consisting of notes receivable of, or prepaid royalties and other credit extensions to, customers and suppliers who are not affiliates, in the ordinary course of business; provided that this paragraph (h) shall not apply to investments of Borrower in any Subsidiary.
"Permitted Liens" means:
(a) liens and security interests in favor of Bank created under any Loan Document;
(b) liens and security interests existing as of the Closing Date and listed on ;
Schedule 1.1-C
(c) liens for taxes, fees, assessments or other government charges or levies, either not delinquent or being contested in good faith by appropriate proceedings promptly instituted and diligently conducted and for which Borrower maintains adequate reserves in accordance with GAAP;
(d) purchase money liens securing indebtedness not to exceed $2,000,000.00 in the aggregate incurred after the Closing Date (i) on equipment acquired or held by Borrower incurred for financing the acquisition of such equipment, or (ii) existing on equipment when acquired, if the lien is confined to the property so acquired and improvements thereon, and the proceeds of such equipment;
 
(e) statutory liens arising in the ordinary course of business and not overdue for a period of more than thirty days or being contested in good faith by appropriate proceedings promptly instituted and diligently conducted and for which Borrower maintains adequate reserves in accordance with GAAP, not to exceed $500,000.00 in the aggregate, securing claims or demands of materialmen, mechanics, carriers, warehousemen, landlords and other persons imposed without action of such parties;
(f) liens to secure payment of workers' compensation, employment insurance, old-age pensions, social security and other like obligations incurred in the ordinary course of business not delinquent or being contested in good faith by appropriate proceedings promptly instituted and diligently conducted and for which Borrower maintains adequate reserves in accordance with GAAP;
(g) liens incurred in the extension, renewal or refinancing of the indebtedness secured by liens identified in paragraphs (b) and (d) of this definition, so long as such indebtedness is Permitted Indebtedness, that any extension, renewal or replacement lien shall be limited to the property encumbered by the existing lien and the principal amount of the indebtedness being extended, renewed or refinanced does not increase;
provided
(h) leases or subleases of real property entered into as sublessee or lessee in the ordinary course of business, and leases; and subleases, non-exclusive licenses or sublicenses of property (other than real property or intellectual property) entered into as licensee or sublicensee in the ordinary course of Borrower's business;
(i) non-exclusive licenses of intellectual property entered into as licensee with third parties in the ordinary course of business; and
(j) liens in favor of financial institutions other than Bank arising in connection with Borrower's deposit and/or securities accounts held at such institutions, provided that (i) Bank has a first priority perfected security interest in the amounts held in such deposit and/or securities accounts (excluding liens identified in the following clause (ii)) and (ii) such liens secure Borrower's payment of normal fees and charges related to the maintenance of such deposit and/or securities accounts and not indebtedness related to credit extended by such financial institutions to Borrower.
" means any natural person, corporation, limited liability company, trust, joint venture, association, company, partnership, Governmental Authority or other entity.
"Person
"" means any "employee benefit plan" (as such term is defined in Section 3(3) of ERISA) established by Borrower or, with respect to any such plan that is subject to Section 412 of the Code or Title IV of ERISA, any ERISA Affiliate.
Plan
 
means (i) that certain Pledge Agreement, dated as of April 22, 2010, executed by Borrower and each Subsidiary pledging capital stock for the benefit of Bank as of the Closing Date and (ii) any pledge agreement executed by a Domestic Subsidiary pursuant to .
"Pledge Agreement"
Section 6.12
means, as of any date of determination, for Borrower and its Subsidiaries on a consolidated basis, the ratio of: (a) the sum of (i) unrestricted cash (ii) unrestricted short-term marketable securities (iii) net accounts receivable to (b) current liabilities.
"Quick Ratio"
plus
plus
"" means any of the events set forth in Section 4043(c) of ERISA, other than events for which the thirty-day notice period has been waived.
Reportable Event
means the chief executive officer, the president, the chief financial officer, any vice president, the general counsel and/or secretary, the assistant secretary, the controller of Borrower, the director of finance of Borrower, or any other officer of Borrower having substantially the same authority and responsibility as any of the foregoing.
"Responsible Officer"
"" means a borrowing of a Revolving Credit Loan of a particular Type.
Revolving Credit Borrowing
"" has the meaning ascribed thereto in Section 2.1(a).
Revolving Credit Loan
"" means April 30, 2012.
Revolving Credit Maturity Date
has the meaning ascribed to such term in Section 2.1(a).
"Revolving Line of Credit"
has the meaning ascribed to such term in Section 9.12(b) hereof.
"Rules"
means (i) that certain Amended and Restated Security Agreement, dated as of April 22, 2010, executed by Borrower and each Domestic Subsidiary in existence as of the Closing Date in favor of Bank and (ii) any security agreement executed by a Domestic Subsidiary pursuant to .
"Security Agreement"
Section 6.12
" means Stellate Systems USA, Inc., a Delaware corporation.
"Stellate
of a Person means a corporation, partnership, joint venture, limited liability company or other business entity of which a majority of the shares of securities or other interests having ordinary voting power for the election of directors or other governing body (other than securities or interests having such power only by reason of the happening of a contingency) are at the time beneficially owned, or the management of which is otherwise controlled, directly, or indirectly through one or more intermediaries, or both, by such Person. Unless otherwise specified, all references herein to a "" or to "" shall refer to a Subsidiary or Subsidiaries of Borrower.
"Subsidiary"
Subsidiary
Subsidiaries
means the monetary obligation of a Person under either: (a) a so-called synthetic, off-balance sheet or tax retention lease; or (b) an agreement for the use or possession of property creating obligations that do not appear on the balance sheet of such Person but which, upon the insolvency or bankruptcy of such Person, would be characterized as the indebtedness of such Person (without regard to accounting treatment).
"Synthetic Lease Obligation"
 
has the meaning ascribed to such term in Section 8.1(d) hereof.
"Third Party Obligor"
means, with respect to an Acquisition, the sum (but without duplication) of (a) cash paid in connection with such Acquisition, (b) indebtedness payable to the seller in connection with such Acquisition, (c) the fair market value of any equity securities, including any warrants or options therefor, delivered in connection with such Acquisition, (d) the amount of contingent consideration or transaction costs related to such Acquisition, to the extent required to be expensed by ASC 805, (e) the present value of covenants not to compete entered into in connection with such Acquisition or other future payments which are required to be made over a period of time and are not contingent upon Borrower meeting financial performance objectives (exclusive of salaries paid in the ordinary course of business) (discounted at the Base Rate in effect on the date of such Acquisition), but only to the extent not included in clause (a), (b), (c) or (d) above, and (f) the amount of indebtedness assumed in connection with such Acquisition.
"Total Consideration"
"" means, with respect to any Loan, its character as a Base Rate Loan or a LIBOR Loan.
Type
S 1.2. C R C.
ECTION
ERTAIN
ULES
OF
ONSTRUCTION
(a) Unless the context requires otherwise, the meaning of a defined term is applicable equally to the singular and plural forms thereof.
(b) The words "," "," "" and similar words refer to this Agreement as a whole and not to any particular provision of this Agreement; and, unless otherwise specified, Article, Section, subsection, clause, Schedule and Exhibit references are to this Agreement.
hereof
herein
hereunder
(c) (i) The term "" includes instruments, documents, agreements, certificates, indentures, notices and other writings, however evidenced.
documents
(ii) The terms "" and "" are not limiting.
include
including
(iii) In the computation of periods of time from a specified date to a later specified date, the word "" means ""; the words "" and "" each mean "" and the word "" means "."
from
from and including
to
until
to but excluding
through
to and including
(iv) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the terms "," "," "" and "" refer to both personal property (whether tangible or intangible) and real property.
property
properties
asset
assets
 
(d) Unless otherwise expressly provided herein: (i) references to documents (including this Agreement) shall be deemed to include all subsequent amendments and other modifications thereto, but only to the extent such amendments and other modifications are not prohibited by the terms of any Loan Document; and (ii) references to any statute or regulation are to be construed as including all statutory and regulatory provisions consolidating, amending, replacing, supplementing or interpreting the statute or regulation.
(e) Unless otherwise specified, all references herein to times of day shall be references to Pacific time (daylight or standard, as applicable).
(f) The captions and headings of this Agreement are for convenience of reference only and shall not affect the interpretation of this Agreement.
(g) This Agreement and the other Loan Documents may use several different limitations, tests or measurements to regulate the same or similar matters. All such limitations, tests and measurements are cumulative and shall be performed in accordance with their respective terms.
(h) This Agreement and the other Loan Documents are the result of negotiations among, and have been reviewed by counsel to, Borrower, the Guarantors and Bank and are the products of all parties. Accordingly, they shall not be construed against Bank merely because of the involvement of any or all of the preceding Persons in their preparation.
(i) Unless the context otherwise clearly requires, all accounting terms not expressly defined herein shall be construed, and all financial computations required under this Agreement shall be made, in accordance with GAAP. If at any time any change in GAAP would affect the computation of any financial ratio or requirement set forth in any Loan Document, and Bank shall so request, Bank and Borrower shall negotiate in good faith to amend such ratio or requirement to preserve the original intent thereof in light of such change in GAAP; that, until so amended: (i) such ratio or requirement shall continue to be computed in accordance with GAAP prior to such change therein; and (ii) Borrower shall provide to Bank financial statements and other documents required under this Agreement or as reasonably requested hereunder setting forth a reconciliation between calculations of such ratio or requirement made before and after giving effect to such change in GAAP.
provided
(j) References herein to "" refer to the fiscal year of Borrower.
fiscal year
(k) Any financial ratios required to be maintained by Borrower pursuant to the Loan Documents shall be calculated by dividing the appropriate component by the other component, carrying the result to one place more than the number of places by which such ratio is expressed herein and rounding the result up or down to the nearest number using the common  or symmetric arithmetic  method of rounding (in other words, rounding-up if there is no nearest number).
 
S 2.1. R L C.
ECTION
EVOLVING
INE
OF
REDIT
(a) . Subject to the terms and conditions of this Agreement, Bank hereby agrees to make loans (each such loan, a "") to Borrower from time to time on any Business Day during the Availability Period, not to exceed at any time the aggregate principal amount of Fifty Million Dollars ($50,000,000.00) (the ""). The proceeds of the initial advance under the Revolving Line of Credit shall be used to refinance all outstanding indebtedness owing under the Existing Agreement (with any such advances having the same characteristics, including, without limitation, Type and remaining Interest Period, if applicable, as the indebtedness refinanced thereby) and the proceeds of all other advances under the Revolving Line of Credit shall be used for working capital and general corporate purposes. Borrower's obligation to repay advances under the Revolving Line of Credit shall be evidenced by a promissory note dated April 22, 2010 (the ""), in the form attached hereto as , all terms of which are incorporated herein by this reference.
Revolving Line of Credit
Revolving Credit Loan
Revolving Line of Credit
Second Amended and Restated Revolving Line of Credit Note
Exhibit A
(b) Borrower may from time to time during the Availability Period, partially or wholly repay its outstanding borrowings under the Revolving Line of Credit, and reborrow, subject to all of the limitations, terms and conditions contained herein; that, the total outstanding borrowings under the Revolving Line of Credit shall not at any time exceed the maximum principal amount available thereunder, as set forth above. On the Revolving Credit Maturity Date, Borrower shall repay to Bank in full the aggregate outstanding principal balance of all Revolving Credit Loans, together with all accrued and unpaid interest due thereon.
Borrowing and Repayment.
provided
S 2.2. P F B.
ECTION
ROCEDURES
OR
ORROWING
(a) Each Revolving Credit Borrowing, each conversion of Loans from one Type to the other and each continuation of LIBOR Loans shall be made upon Borrower's irrevocable notice to Bank, which may be given by telephone or by approved electronic communications. Each such notice must be received by Bank not later than 11:00 a.m. on the requested date of any Revolving Credit Borrowing, conversion or continuation. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained herein, any telephonic notice or other electronic communication by Borrower pursuant to this Section 2.2(a) may be given by an individual who has been authorized in writing to do so by an appropriate Responsible Officer of Borrower. Each such telephonic notice or other electronic communication must be confirmed promptly by delivery to Bank of a written Loan Notice, appropriately completed and signed by an appropriate Responsible Officer of Borrower.
(b) Each Revolving Credit Borrowing of, conversion to or continuation of LIBOR Loans shall be in a principal amount of $1,000,000 or a whole multiple of $100,000 in excess thereof. Each Revolving Credit Borrowing of or conversion to Base Rate Loans shall be in a principal amount of $1,000,000 or a whole multiple of $100,000 in excess thereof.
 
(c) Each Loan Notice (whether telephonic or written) shall specify: (i) whether Borrower is requesting: (A) a Revolving Credit Borrowing; (B) a conversion of outstanding Loans from one Type to the other; or (C) a continuation of LIBOR Loans; (ii) the requested date of such Revolving Credit Borrowing, conversion or continuation, as the case may be (which shall be a Business Day); (iii) the principal amount of the Loans to be borrowed, converted or continued; (iv) the Type of Loans to be borrowed or to which existing Loans are to be converted; and (v) if applicable, the duration of the Interest Period with respect thereto. If Borrower fails to specify a Type of Loan in a Loan Notice or if Borrower fails to give a timely notice requesting a conversion or continuation, then the applicable Loan(s) shall be made as, or converted to, Base Rate Loans. Any such automatic conversion to Base Rate Loans shall be effective as of the last day of the Interest Period then in effect with respect to the applicable LIBOR Loans. If Borrower requests a Revolving Credit Borrowing of, conversion to, or continuation of LIBOR Loans in any such Loan Notice, but fails to specify an Interest Period, it will be deemed to have specified an Interest Period of one month.
(d) Except as otherwise provided herein, a LIBOR Loan may be continued or converted only on the last day of an Interest Period for such LIBOR Loan. During the existence of an Event of Default: (i) no Loans may be requested as, converted to or continued as LIBOR Loans without the consent of Bank; and (ii) Bank may demand that any or all of the then outstanding Revolving Credit Loans that are LIBOR Loans be converted immediately to Base Rate Loans, whereupon Borrower shall pay any amounts due under Section 3.4 in accordance with the terms thereof due to any such conversion.
(e) Bank shall promptly notify Borrower of the interest rate applicable to any Interest Period for LIBOR Loans upon determination of such interest rate.
(f) After giving effect to all Revolving Credit Borrowings, all conversions of Loans from one Type to the other, and all continuations of Loans as the same Type, there shall not be more than five Interest Periods in effect with respect to the Revolving Credit Loans.
S 2.3. P P P.
ECTION
RINCIPAL
AYMENTS
AND
REPAYMENTS
Borrower may, upon notice to Bank, at any time or from time to time voluntarily prepay Loans in whole or in part without premium or penalty but subject to Section 3.4; that: (A) such notice must be received by Bank not later than 11:00 a.m.: (1) three Business Days prior to any date of prepayment of Loans that are LIBOR Loans; and (2) one Business Day prior to the date of prepayment of Loans that are Base Rate Loans; and (B) any prepayment of any Loans that are: (1) LIBOR Loans shall be in a principal amount of $5,000,000 or a whole multiple of $1,000,000 in excess thereof, or, if less, the entire principal amount thereof then outstanding; and (2) Base Rate Loans shall be in a principal amount of $1,000,000 or a whole multiple of $1,000,000 in excess thereof, or, if less, the entire principal amount thereof then outstanding. Each such notice shall specify the date and amount of such prepayment and the Type(s) of Loans to be prepaid. If Borrower gives such notice, then Borrower's prepayment obligation shall be irrevocable, and Borrower shall make such prepayment and the payment amount specified in such notice shall be due and payable on the date specified therein. Any prepayment of a Loan that is a LIBOR Loan shall be accompanied by all accrued interest on the amount prepaid, together with any additional amounts required pursuant to Section 3.4.
provided
 
S 2.4. I/A R.
ECTION
NTEREST
PPLICABLE
ATES
(a) Subject to the provisions of subsection Section 2.4(b): (i) each LIBOR Loan shall bear interest on the outstanding principal amount thereof for each Interest Period at a rate per annum equal to LIBOR for such Interest Period the Applicable Rate; and (ii) each Base Rate Loan shall bear interest on the outstanding principal amount thereof from the applicable borrowing date at a rate per annum equal to the Base Rate the Applicable Rate.
plus
plus
(b) (i) If any amount of principal of any Loan is not paid when due (without regard to any applicable grace periods), whether at stated maturity, by acceleration or otherwise, such amount shall thereafter bear interest at a fluctuating interest rate per annum at all times equal to the Default Rate to the fullest extent permitted by applicable laws.
(ii) If any amount (other than principal of any Loan) payable by Borrower under any Loan Document is not paid when due (without regard to any applicable grace periods), whether at stated maturity, by acceleration or otherwise, then such amount shall thereafter bear interest at a fluctuating interest rate per annum at all times equal to the Default Rate to the fullest extent permitted by applicable laws.
(iii) While any Event of Default exists, Borrower shall pay interest on the principal amount of all outstanding Obligations hereunder at a fluctuating interest rate per annum at all times equal to the Default Rate to the fullest extent permitted by applicable laws.
(iv) Accrued and unpaid interest on past due amounts (including interest on past due interest) shall be due and payable upon demand.
(c) Interest on each Loan shall be due and payable in arrears on each Interest Payment Date applicable thereto and at such other times as may be specified herein. Interest hereunder shall be due and payable in accordance with the terms hereof before and after judgment, and before and after the commencement of any proceeding under any Bankruptcy Law.
(d) Any increase or decrease in any Applicable Rate resulting from a change in the Leverage Ratio shall become effective as of the first day of the month immediately following the month in which Borrower is required to deliver a Compliance Certificate in accordance with Section 6.3(d) for a given period (each such date, a ""); that the Applicable Rate in effect from the Closing Date to the first day of the month immediately following receipt by Bank of a timely delivered Compliance Certificate with respect to the fiscal quarter ending March 31, 2010 shall be determined based upon Tier 3 (as indicated in the definition of ); that, if any Compliance Certificate required to be delivered in accordance with Section 6.3(d) for any given period is not delivered to Bank on or before the related calculation date, then Tier 1 (as indicated in the definition of ) shall apply, effective on the related calculation date until two Business Days after such Compliance Certificate is actually received by Bank.
calculation date
provided
"Applicable Rate"
provided further
"Applicable Rate"
 
Notwithstanding the foregoing and for the avoidance of doubt, if for any period and for any reason, the actual Leverage Ratio is higher than that reported in the Compliance Certificate, Borrower shall immediately, without the requirement of notice or demand from any Person, pay to Bank an amount equal to the excess of: (A) the amount of interest or fees that would have accrued had the Applicable Rates for the relevant period been based upon the actual Leverage Ratio for the prior period rather than the Leverage Ratio reported in the Compliance Certificate delivered for such prior period; (B) the amount of interest or fees that was actually paid by Borrower based upon the Leverage Ratio reported in the Compliance Certificate delivered for such period.
over
S 2.5. F.
ECTION
EES
(a) . Borrower shall pay to Bank unused commitment fees (each, an ) equal to the Applicable Rate the average daily unused amount of the Revolving Line of Credit. Unused Commitment Fees shall accrue at all times during Prior to the Revolving Credit Maturity Date, and shall be due and payable quarterly in arrears on the last Business Day of each March, June, September and December, commencing with the first such date to occur after the Closing Date, and on the Revolving Credit Maturity Date. Unused Commitment Fees shall be calculated quarterly in arrears, and if there is any change in the Applicable Rate during any quarter, the actual daily amount shall be computed and the Applicable Rate separately for each period during such quarter that such Applicable Rate was in effect.
Unused Commitment Fee
"Unused Commitment Fee"
multiplied by
multiplied by
S 2.6. C I F.
ECTION
OMPUTATIONS
OF
NTEREST
AND
EES
All computations of interest for Base Rate Loans shall be made on the basis of a year of 365 or 366 days, as the case may be, and actual days elapsed. All other computations of interest and fees hereunder shall be made on the basis of a year of 360 days and actual days elapsed. Interest shall accrue on each Loan for the day on which the Loan is made, and shall not accrue on a Loan, or any portion thereof, for the day on which the Loan or such portion is paid, that any Loan that is repaid on the same day on which it is made shall bear interest for one day. Each determination by Bank of an interest rate or fee hereunder shall be conclusive and binding for all purposes, absent manifest error.
provided
S 2.7. P G; C P.
ECTION
AYMENTS
ENERALLY
OLLECTION
OF
AYMENTS
(a) . All payments to be made by Borrower shall be made without condition or deduction for any counterclaim, defense, recoupment or setoff. Except as otherwise expressly provided herein, all payments by Borrower hereunder shall be made to Bank in Dollars and in immediately available funds not later than 4:00 p.m. on the date specified herein. All payments received by Bank after 4:00 p.m. shall be deemed received on the next succeeding Business Day and any applicable interest or fee shall continue to accrue. If any payment to be made by Borrower shall come due on a day other than a Business Day, payment shall be made on the next following Business Day, and such extension of time shall be reflected in computing interest or fees, as the case may be.
General
 
(b) . Borrower authorizes Bank to collect all principal, interest and fees due under each credit created by the Loan Documents by charging Borrower's deposit account number 4121261853 with Bank, or any other deposit account maintained by Borrower with Bank, for the full amount thereof. Should there be insufficient funds in any such deposit account to pay all such sums when due, the full amount of such deficiency shall be immediately due and payable by Borrower.
Collection of Payments
S 2.8. C.
ECTION
OLLATERAL
As security for all indebtedness of Borrower to Bank created by the Loan Documents, Borrower hereby grants to Bank security interests of first priority (except for Permitted Liens that are senior to Bank's security interests), and shall cause each Domestic Subsidiary to grant to Bank security interests of first priority, in all of Borrower's and each such Domestic Subsidiary's personal property (including, without limitation, all of Borrower's ownership interests in Subsidiaries, accounts receivable, inventory, equipment and intellectual property now owned or hereafter acquired), but excluding interests as a lessee under real property and personal property leases and shares of voting stock of each Foreign Subsidiary that represent more than 65% of the voting stock of such Foreign Subsidiary.
As additional security for all indebtedness of Borrower to Bank created by the Loan Documents, Borrower shall cause each Domestic Subsidiary to grant to Bank security interests of first priority in all such Domestic Subsidiary's ownership interest in any Domestic Subsidiary or Foreign Subsidiary, but excluding shares of voting stock of each Foreign Subsidiary that represent more than 65% of the voting stock of such Foreign Subsidiary and, with respect to each Foreign Subsidiary, subject to the time frames established in Section 6.12(b) hereof.
All of the foregoing shall be evidenced by and subject to the terms of such security agreements, financing statements, deeds or mortgages, and other documents as Bank shall reasonably require, all in form and substance satisfactory to Bank. Borrower shall reimburse Bank immediately upon demand for all costs and expenses incurred by Bank in connection with any of the foregoing security, including without limitation, filing and recording fees and costs of appraisals, audits and title insurance.
 
S 2.9. G. Subject to the time frames established in Section 6.12(a) hereof, all Obligations shall be guaranteed jointly and severally by each Domestic Subsidiary (each a and, collectively, the ), as evidenced by and subject to the terms of guaranties (each a and, collectively, the ) in form and substance satisfactory to Bank.
ECTION
UARANTIES
"Guarantor"
"Guarantors"
"Guaranty"
"Guaranties"
S 3.1. I.
ECTION
LLEGALITY
If Bank, in its reasonable judgment, determines that any law has made it unlawful, or that any Governmental Authority has asserted that it is unlawful, for Bank to make, maintain or fund LIBOR Loans, or to determine or charge interest rates based upon LIBOR, or any Governmental Authority has imposed material restrictions on the authority of Bank to purchase or sell, or to take deposits of, Dollars in the London interbank offered market, then, on notice thereof by Bank to Borrower, any obligation of Bank to make or continue LIBOR Loans or to convert Revolving Credit Loans that are Base Rate Loans to LIBOR Loans shall be suspended until Bank notifies Borrower that the circumstances giving rise to such determination no longer exist, which notification Bank shall give to Borrower promptly after Bank, it its reasonable judgment, makes such determination. Upon receipt of such first notice, Borrower shall, upon demand from Bank, prepay or, if applicable, convert all LIBOR Loans to Base Rate Loans, either on the last day of the Interest Period therefor, if Bank may lawfully continue to maintain such LIBOR Loans to such day, or immediately, if Bank may not lawfully continue to maintain such LIBOR Loans. Upon any such prepayment or conversion, Borrower shall also pay accrued interest on the amount so prepaid or converted and all amounts due under Section 3.4 in accordance with the terms thereof due to such prepayment or conversion.
S 3.2. I D R.
ECTION
NABILITY
TO
ETERMINE
ATES
If Bank determines in connection with any request for a LIBOR Loan or a conversion to or continuation thereof that (a) Dollar deposits are not being offered to banks in the London interbank offered market for the applicable amount and Interest Period of such LIBOR Loan, (b) adequate and reasonable means do not exist for determining LIBOR for any requested Interest Period with respect to a proposed LIBOR Loan, or (c) LIBOR for any requested Interest Period with respect to a proposed LIBOR Loan does not adequately and fairly reflect the cost to Bank of funding such Loan, then Bank will promptly so notify Borrower. Thereafter, the obligation of Bank to make or maintain LIBOR Loans shall be suspended until Bank revokes such notice. Upon receipt of such notice, Borrower may revoke any pending request for a Revolving Credit Borrowing of, conversion to or continuation of LIBOR Loans or, failing that, will be deemed to have converted such request into a request for a Revolving Credit Borrowing consisting of Base Rate Loans in the amount specified therein.
 
S 3.3. I C.
ECTION
NCREASED
OSTS
(a) . If any Change in Law shall:
Increased Costs Generally
(i) impose, modify or deem applicable any reserve, special deposit, compulsory loan, insurance charge or similar requirement against assets of, deposits with or for the account of, or credit extended or participated in by, Bank (except any reserve requirement reflected in LIBOR);
(ii) subject Bank to any tax of any kind whatsoever with respect to this Agreement or any LIBOR Loan made by it, or change the basis of taxation of payments to Bank in respect thereof (except for taxes covered by paragraph (c) below); or
(iii) impose on Bank or the London interbank market any other condition, cost or expense affecting this Agreement or LIBOR Loans made by Bank;
and the result of any of the foregoing shall be to increase the cost to Bank of making or maintaining any LIBOR Loan (or of maintaining its obligation to make any such Loan), or to reduce the amount of any sum received or receivable by Bank hereunder (whether of principal, interest or any other amount), then, upon request of Bank, Borrower will pay to Bank such additional amount or amounts as will compensate Bank for such additional costs incurred or reduction suffered.
(b) . If Bank determines that any Change in Law affecting Bank or Bank's holding company, if any, regarding capital requirements has or would have the effect of reducing the rate of return on Bank's capital or on the capital of Bank's holding company, if any, as a consequence of this Agreement or the Loans made by Bank, to a level below that which Bank or Bank's holding company could have achieved but for such Change in Law (taking into consideration Bank's policies and the policies of Bank's holding company with respect to capital adequacy), then from time to time Borrower will pay to Bank such additional amount or amounts as will compensate Bank or Bank's holding company for any such reduction suffered.
Capital Requirements
(c) . Borrower shall pay to Bank immediately upon demand, in addition to any other amounts due or to become due hereunder, any and all withholdings, interest equalization taxes, stamp taxes or other taxes (except income and franchise taxes) imposed by any domestic or foreign governmental authority and related in any manner to LIBOR. In determining which of the foregoing are attributable to any LIBOR option available to Borrower hereunder, any reasonable allocation made by Bank among its operations shall be conclusive and binding upon Borrower.
Taxes
(d) . A certificate of Bank setting forth the amount or amounts necessary to compensate Bank or its holding company, as the case may be, as specified in subsection (a), (b) or (c) of this Section, as well as a reasonably detailed description of the computation of such amount and the basis for determining such amount or amounts, and delivered to Borrower shall be conclusive absent manifest error. Borrower shall pay Bank the amount shown as due on any such certificate within ten days after receipt thereof.
Certificates for Reimbursement
 
(e) . Failure or delay on the part of Bank to demand compensation pursuant to the foregoing provisions of this Section shall not constitute a waiver of Bank's right to demand such compensation, provided that Borrower shall not be required to compensate Bank pursuant to the foregoing provisions of this Section for any increased costs incurred or reductions suffered more than six months prior to the date that Bank notifies Borrower of the Change in Law giving rise to such increased costs or reductions and of Bank's intention to claim compensation therefor (except that, if the Change in Law giving rise to such increased costs or reductions is retroactive, then the six-month period referred to in this subsection shall be extended to include the period of retroactive effect thereof).
Delay in Requests
S 3.4. C L.
ECTION
OMPENSATION
FOR
OSSES
Upon demand of Bank from time to time, Borrower shall promptly compensate Bank for and hold Bank harmless from any loss, cost or expense incurred by it as a result of:
(a) any continuation, conversion, payment or prepayment of any Loan other than a Base Rate Loan on a day other than the last day of the Interest Period for such Loan (whether voluntary, mandatory, automatic, by reason of acceleration, or otherwise); or
(b) any failure by Borrower (for a reason other than the failure of Bank to make a Loan) to prepay, borrow, continue or convert any Loan other than a Base Rate Loan on the date or in the amount notified by Borrower;
including any loss of anticipated profits and any loss or expense arising from the liquidation or reemployment of funds obtained by it to maintain such Loan or from fees payable to terminate the deposits from which such funds were obtained. Borrower shall also pay any customary administrative fees charged by Bank in connection with the foregoing. For purposes of calculating amounts payable by Borrower to Bank under this Section 3.4, Bank shall be deemed to have funded each LIBOR Loan made by it by a matching deposit or other borrowing in the London interbank offered market for a comparable amount and for a comparable period, whether or not such LIBOR Loan was in fact so funded.
S 3.5. S.
ECTION
URVIVAL
All obligations of Borrower under this Article III shall survive repayment, satisfaction or discharge of all the Obligations.
Borrower makes the following representations and warranties to Bank, which representations and warranties shall survive the execution of this Agreement and shall continue in full force and effect until the full and final payment, and satisfaction and discharge, of all obligations of Borrower to Bank created by the Loan Documents.
 
S 4.1. L S. Borrower and each of its Subsidiaries, and each Subsidiary of a Subsidiary (except Excel-Tech), is a corporation, partnership or limited liability company, duly organized and existing and in good standing under the laws of the jurisdiction of its incorporation, organization or formation, and is qualified or licensed to do business (and is in good standing as a foreign entity, if applicable) in all jurisdictions in which such qualification or licensing is required or in which the failure to so qualify or to be so licensed would reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect. All of the Subsidiaries of Borrower in existence as of the Closing Date are listed on hereto.
ECTION
EGAL
TATUS
Schedule 4.1
S 4.2. A V. This Agreement and each of the Loan Documents have been duly authorized, and upon their execution and delivery in accordance with the provisions hereof will constitute legal, valid and binding agreements and obligations of Borrower or the party which executes the same, enforceable in accordance with their respective terms.
ECTION
UTHORIZATION
AND
ALIDITY
S 4.3. N V. The execution, delivery and performance by Borrower and the Guarantors of each of the Loan Documents do not violate any provision of any law or regulation, or contravene any provision of such Person's organizational documents, or result in any breach of or default under any contract, obligation, indenture or other instrument to which any such Person is a party or may be bound which violation contravention, breach or default would individually or in the aggregate reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect.
ECTION
O
IOLATION
S 4.4. L. There are no pending, or to the best of Borrower's knowledge threatened, actions, claims, investigations, suits or proceedings by or before any governmental authority, arbitrator, court or administrative agency, against Borrower, any Subsidiary, or any Subsidiary of a Subsidiary, which would reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect, other than those disclosed on .
ECTION
ITIGATION
Schedule 4.4
S 4.5. C F S. The consolidated financial statement of Borrower dated December 31, 2009, a true copy of which has been delivered by Borrower to Bank prior to the date hereof, (a) is complete and correct and presents fairly the financial condition of Borrower, (b) discloses all liabilities of Borrower that are required to be reflected or reserved against under GAAP, whether liquidated or unliquidated, fixed or contingent, and (c) has been prepared in accordance with GAAP. Since the date of such financial statement there has been no material adverse change in the financial condition of Borrower, nor (exclusive of Permitted Liens) has Borrower mortgaged, pledged, granted a security interest in or otherwise encumbered any of its assets or properties except in favor of Bank or as otherwise permitted by Bank in writing.
ECTION
ORRECTNESS
OF
INANCIAL
TATEMENT
S 4.6. I T R. Borrower has no knowledge of any pending assessments or adjustments of its income tax payable with respect to any year.
ECTION
NCOME
AX
ETURNS
S 4.7. N S. There is no agreement, indenture, contract or instrument to which Borrower is a party or by which Borrower may be bound that requires the subordination in right of payment of any of Borrower's or any Guarantor's obligations created by the Loan Documents to any other obligation of Borrower or such Guarantor.
ECTION
O
UBORDINATION
 
S 4.8. P, F. Borrower and each of its Subsidiaries, and each Subsidiary of a Subsidiary, possess, and will hereafter possess, all permits, consents, approvals, franchises and licenses required and rights to all trademarks, trade names, patents, and fictitious names, if any, necessary to enable it to conduct the business in which it is now engaged in compliance with applicable law.
ECTION
ERMITS
RANCHISES
S 4.9. E C. As of the Closing Date: (a) each Plan is in compliance with the applicable provisions of ERISA, the Code and other federal or state law. Each Plan which is intended to qualify under subsection 401(a) of the Code has received a favorable determination letter from the Internal Revenue Service and nothing has occurred that would cause the loss of such qualification. As of the Closing Date, Borrower and each ERISA Affiliate have made all required contributions to any Plan subject to Section 412 of the Code, and no application for a funding waiver or an extension of any amortization period pursuant to Section 412 of the Code has been made with respect to any Plan; (b) there are no pending or, to the best knowledge of Borrower, threatened claims, actions or lawsuits, or action by any Governmental Authority. As of the Closing Date, there has been no prohibited transaction or violation of the fiduciary responsibility rules with respect to any Plan; and (c) (i) no ERISA Event has occurred or is reasonably expected to occur; and (ii) no event or circumstance has occurred or exists that, if such event or circumstance had occurred or arisen after the Closing Date, would create an Event of Default under Section 8.1(j).
ECTION
RISA
OMPLIANCE
S 4.10. O O. None of Borrower or any Subsidiary (including any Subsidiary of a Subsidiary) is in default on any obligation for borrowed money, any purchase money obligation or any other material lease, commitment, contract, instrument or obligation.
ECTION
THER
BLIGATIONS
S 4.11. E M. Except as disclosed on , Borrower is in compliance in all material respects with all applicable federal or state environmental, hazardous waste, health and safety statutes, and any rules or regulations adopted pursuant thereto, which govern or affect any of Borrower's operations and/or properties, including without limitation, the Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation and Liability Act of 1980, the Superfund Amendments and Reauthorization Act of 1986, the Federal Resource Conservation and Recovery Act of 1976, and the Federal Toxic Substances Control Act, as any of the same may be amended, modified or supplemented from time to time. None of the operations of Borrower is the subject of any federal or state investigation evaluating whether any remedial action involving a material expenditure is needed to respond to a release of any toxic or hazardous waste or substance into the environment. Borrower has no material contingent liability in connection with any release of any toxic or hazardous waste or substance into the environment.
ECTION
NVIRONMENTAL
ATTERS
Schedule 4.11
 
S 5.1. C I E C. The obligation of Bank to extend any credit contemplated by this Agreement is subject to the fulfillment to Bank's satisfaction of all of the following conditions:
ECTION
ONDITIONS
OF
NITIAL
XTENSION
OF
REDIT
(a) . All legal matters incidental to the extension of credit by Bank shall be satisfactory to Bank's counsel.
Approval of Bank Counsel
(b) . Bank shall have received, in form and substance satisfactory to Bank, each of the following, duly executed:
Documentation
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
(c) . There shall have been no material adverse change, as determined by Bank, in the financial condition or business of Borrower and its Subsidiaries, nor any material decline, as determined by Bank, in the market value of any collateral required hereunder or a substantial or material portion of the assets of Borrower.
Financial Condition
(d) . Borrower shall have delivered to Bank evidence of insurance coverage on all Borrower's property, in form, substance, amounts, covering risks and issued by companies satisfactory to Bank, and where required by Bank, with loss payable endorsements in favor of Bank.
Insurance
 
S 5.2. C E E C. The obligation of Bank to make each extension of credit requested by Borrower hereunder shall be subject to the fulfillment to Bank's satisfaction of each of the following conditions:
ECTION
ONDITIONS
OF
ACH
XTENSION
OF
REDIT
(a) . The representations and warranties contained herein and in each of the other Loan Documents shall be true on and as of the date of the signing of this Agreement and on the date of each extension of credit by Bank pursuant hereto, with the same effect as though such representations and warranties had been made on and as of each such date, and on each such date, no Event of Default as defined herein, and no condition, event or act which with the giving of notice or the passage of time or both would constitute such an Event of Default, shall have occurred and be continuing or shall exist.
Compliance
(b) . Bank shall have received all additional documents that may be required in connection with such extension of credit.
Documentation
Borrower covenants that so long as Bank remains committed to extend credit to Borrower pursuant hereto, or any liabilities (other than contingent indemnification obligations under Section 9.3) of Borrower to Bank under any of the Loan Documents remain outstanding, and until payment in full of all obligations of Borrower created by the Loan Documents, Borrower shall, and shall (except in the case of the covenants set forth in Section 6.3 and Section 6.10) cause each of its Subsidiaries (including Subsidiaries of Subsidiaries) to, unless Bank otherwise consents in writing:
S 6.1. P P. Punctually pay all principal, interest, fees or other liabilities due under any of the Loan Documents at the times and place and in the manner specified therein.
ECTION
UNCTUAL
AYMENTS
S 6.2. A R; C E. Maintain adequate books and records in accordance with GAAP, and permit any representative of Bank, at any reasonable time, to inspect, audit and examine such books and records, to make copies of the same, and to inspect its properties. From time to time, as Bank shall require in the exercise of its reasonable discretion, permit Bank, or its employees, accountants, attorneys or agents, to conduct, with respect to each such Person, examinations and inspections of any collateral required hereby or any other property of Borrower or such Subsidiary, as applicable. Such examination and inspection shall be conducted during ordinary business hours and upon one Business Day's advance notice (unless an Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing, in which case no notice shall be required).
ECTION
CCOUNTING
ECORDS
OLLATERAL
XAMS
S 6.3. F S. Provide to Bank all of the following, in form and detail satisfactory to Bank:
ECTION
INANCIAL
TATEMENTS
(a) not later than 90 days after and as of the end of each fiscal year, audited annual consolidated and consolidating financial statements of Borrower examined by, and with the unqualified opinion of, independent certified public accountants selected by Borrower and acceptable to Bank, which financial statements shall include Borrower's balance sheet as of the end of such fiscal year and the related statements of Borrower's income, reconciliation of retained earnings and cash flows for the fiscal year then ended, all in reasonable detail and prepared in accordance with GAAP;
 
(b) promptly after the sending or filing thereof, but in no event later than 45 days after the end of each fiscal quarter of Borrower, copies of each Form 10-Q report filed by Borrower with the United States Securities and Exchange Commission or any successor agency;
(c) not later than 15 days after the beginning of each fiscal year, projected consolidated and consolidating balance sheets and income statements for each quarter of such year for Borrower, each in reasonable detail, representing Borrower's good faith projections and certified by the chief financial officer of Borrower as being Borrower's good faith projections and identical to the projections to be used by Borrower for internal planning purposes, together with a statement of underlying assumptions and such supporting schedules and information as Bank may in its discretion require;
(d) concurrently with the delivery of the financial statements referred to in subsections (a) and (b) of this Section a duly completed Compliance Certificate signed by an appropriate Responsible Officer of Borrower; and
,
(e) from time to time such other information as Bank may reasonably request.
S 6.4. C. Preserve and maintain all licenses, permits, governmental approvals, rights, privileges and franchises necessary for the conduct of its business; and comply with the provisions of all documents pursuant to which it is organized and/or which govern its continued existence and with the requirements of all laws, rules, regulations and orders of any governmental authority applicable to it and/or its business.
ECTION
OMPLIANCE
S 6.5. I. Maintain and keep in force insurance of the types and in amounts customarily carried in lines of business similar to that of such Person, including but not limited to fire, extended coverage, public liability, flood, property damage and workers' compensation, with all such insurance carried with companies and in amounts satisfactory to Bank, and deliver to Bank from time to time at Bank's request schedules setting forth all insurance then in effect.
ECTION
NSURANCE
S 6.6. F. Keep all properties useful or necessary to such Person's business in good repair and condition, and from time to time make necessary repairs, renewals and replacements thereto so that such properties shall be fully and efficiently preserved and maintained.
ECTION
ACILITIES
S 6.7. T O L. Pay and discharge when due any and all indebtedness, obligations, assessments and taxes, both real or personal, including without limitation federal and state income taxes and state and local property taxes and assessments, except such (a) as such Person may in good faith contest or as to which a bona fide dispute may arise, and (b) for which such Person has made provision, to Bank's satisfaction, for eventual payment thereof in the event such Person is obligated to make such payment.
ECTION
AXES
AND
THER
IABILITIES
 
S 6.8. L. Promptly give notice in writing to Bank of any litigation pending or threatened against Borrower or any of its Subsidiaries with a claim in excess of $250,000.00.
ECTION
ITIGATION
S 6.9. F C. Maintain Borrower's financial condition as follows using GAAP (except to the extent modified by the definitions herein), with compliance determined commencing with Borrower's financial statements for the period ending March 31, 2010:
ECTION
INANCIAL
ONDITION
(a) As of each fiscal quarter end of Borrower, Consolidated EBITDA, determined on a rolling four-quarter basis, not less than the amounts set forth below:
 
(b) Quick Ratio not less than: (i) as of each fiscal quarter ending on or before March 31, 2011, 0.90 to 1.00, and (ii) as of each fiscal quarter ending after March 31, 2011, 1.00 to 1.00.
S 6.10. N B. Promptly (but in no event more than five (5) business days after a Responsible Officer becomes, or should become, aware of the occurrence of each such event or matter) give written notice to Bank in reasonable detail of: (a) the occurrence of any Event of Default, or any condition, event or act which with the giving of notice or the passage of time or both would constitute an Event of Default; (b) any change in the name or the organizational structure of Borrower; (c) the occurrence and nature of any Reportable Event or Prohibited Transaction, each as defined in ERISA, or any funding deficiency with respect to any Plan; or (d) any termination or cancellation of any insurance policy which Borrower is required to maintain, or any uninsured or partially uninsured loss through liability or property damage, or through fire, theft or any other cause affecting Borrower's property in excess of an aggregate of $250,000.00.
ECTION
OTICE
TO
ANK
S 6.11. M A B. At all times maintain its primary depository accounts with Bank pursuant to account agreements and terms mutually acceptable to such Person and Bank.
ECTION
AINTENANCE
OF
CCOUNTS
WITH
ANK
 
S 6.12. S.
ECTION
UBSIDIARIES
(a) . By not later than (i) with respect to each Domestic Subsidiary in existence as of the Closing Date (except Stellate and Excel-Tech), the Closing Date, (ii) with respect to each Domestic Subsidiary formed or acquired on or after the Closing Date, twenty (20) calendar days after the formation or acquisition of such Domestic Subsidiary, (iii) with respect to Stellate or Excel-Tech, ninety (90) calendar days after the Closing Date, unless on or before such date Stellate or Excel-Tech, as applicable, has merged into Borrower or dissolved, cause such Domestic Subsidiary to execute and deliver to Bank (A) a Guaranty in satisfaction of the requirements of Section 2.9 hereof, (B) a Security Agreement and, if pledging ownership interests in another entity, a Pledge Agreement in satisfaction of the requirements of Section 2.8 hereof and (C) such other documents as Bank shall reasonably request, in form and substance satisfactory to Bank, evidencing the authority of such Domestic Subsidiary to execute and deliver such Guaranty, Security Agreement and Pledge Agreement, and the incumbency of the Persons executing such Guaranty, Security Agreement and Pledge Agreement on behalf of such Domestic Subsidiary.
Domestic Subsidiaries
(b) . By not later than (i) with respect to each Foreign Subsidiary in existence as of the Closing Date and owned, in whole or in part, by Borrower or a Domestic Subsidiary, the Closing Date, (ii) with respect to each Foreign Subsidiary formed or acquired on or after the Closing Date and owned, in whole or in part, by Borrower or a Domestic Subsidiary, forty-five (45) calendar days after the formation or acquisition of such Foreign Subsidiary, and (iii) with respect to Biologic Israel, ninety (90) calendar days after the Closing Date, unless on or before such date, Biologic Israel has merged into Borrower or dissolved, execute, or cause to be executed, a Pledge Agreement and such further agreements, documents or instruments, or take such other actions, as Bank reasonably deems necessary in order to effectuate the pledge to Bank of security interests in Borrower's, and/or Borrower's Domestic Subsidiaries', ownership interest in such Foreign Subsidiary (such pledge exclusive of shares of voting stock of such Foreign Subsidiary that represent more than 65% of the voting stock of such Foreign Subsidiary, as described in Section 2.8 hereof), including, without limitation, (A) executing and delivering to each such Foreign Subsidiary, a notice of the pledge of Borrower's and/or Borrower's Subsidiaries' interests therein to Bank, and (B) causing such Foreign Subsidiary to execute and deliver to Bank an acknowledgment of pledge related to Borrower's and/or such Subsidiaries' pledge of its or their interest in such Foreign Subsidiary, in each case, in form in substance satisfactory to Bank.
Foreign Subsidiaries
(c) Upon the request of Bank, with respect to Borrower's ownership interests in Subsidiaries pledged to Bank as collateral under the Loan Documents, Borrower shall promptly deliver stock certificates (or other comparable certificates) for all certificated securities now or at any time constituting such collateral, duly endorsed in blank for transfer or accompanied by an appropriate assignment or assignments or an appropriate undated stock power or powers, in every case sufficient to transfer title thereto.
S 6.13. T CIT F S. By not later than forty-five (45) days after the Closing Date, Borrower shall provide evidence to Bank of the filing of a UCC-3 termination statement with regard to that certain UCC-1 financing statement naming Borrower as debtor and CIT Financial USA, Inc. as secured party, which was initially filed with the Secretary of State of the State of California on June 7, 2005 and bears file number 51736173.
ECTION
ERMINATION
OF
INANCING
TATEMENT
 
Borrower further covenants that so long as Bank remains committed to extend credit to Borrower pursuant hereto, or any liabilities (other than contingent indemnification obligations under Section 9.3) of Borrower to Bank under any of the Loan Documents remain outstanding, and until payment in full of all obligations of Borrower created by the Loan Documents, Borrower will not, and will not permit any Subsidiary (including Subsidiaries of Subsidiaries) of Borrower to, without Bank's prior written consent:
S 7.1. U F. Use any of the proceeds of any credit extended hereunder except for the purposes stated in Article II hereof.
ECTION
SE
OF
UNDS
S 7.2. C E. Make any additional investment in fixed assets in any fiscal year such that, after giving effect to such investment, the aggregate investments in fixed assets in such year made by Borrower and all Subsidiaries would exceed $5,000,000.00.
ECTION
APITAL
XPENDITURES
S 7.3. L E. Incur operating lease expense in any fiscal year such that, after giving effect to such operating lease expense, the aggregate operating lease expense incurred by Borrower and all Subsidiaries in such year is in excess of $4,000,000.00.
ECTION
EASE
XPENDITURES
S 7.4. O I. Create, incur, assume or permit to exist any indebtedness resulting from borrowings, loans or advances, whether secured or unsecured, matured or unmatured, liquidated or unliquidated, joint or several, other than Permitted Indebtedness.
ECTION
THER
NDEBTEDNESS
S 7.5. M, C, T A. Merge into or consolidate with any other entity, other than pursuant to a Permitted Investment; make any substantial change in the nature of such Person's business as conducted as of the date hereof; acquire all or substantially all of the assets of any other entity, other than pursuant to a Permitted Investment; nor sell, lease, transfer or otherwise dispose of all or a substantial or material portion of such Person's assets except in the ordinary course of its business; that Borrower or any Subsidiary may sell, lease or transfer assets to Borrower or any wholly-owned Domestic Subsidiary of Borrower that is a Guarantor.
ECTION
ERGER
ONSOLIDATION
RANSFER
OF
SSETS
provided
S 7.6. G. Guarantee or become liable in any way as surety, endorser (other than as endorser of negotiable instruments for deposit or collection in the ordinary course of business), accommodation endorser or otherwise for, nor pledge or hypothecate any assets of such Person as security for, any liabilities or obligations of any other person or entity, except any of the foregoing in favor of Bank and guaranties by Borrower of real property lease obligations of its Subsidiaries not exceeding in the aggregate $500,000.00 outstanding at any time.
ECTION
UARANTIES
S 7.7. L, A, I. Make any loans or advances to or investments in any person or entity, other than Permitted Investments; that, so long as no Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing, Borrower shall be permitted to make contractually required earn-out payments related to a Permitted Acquisition if all of the following conditions shall have been satisfied at the time of any such earn-out payment: (a) Borrower shall have provided Bank pro forma financial forecasts of Borrower on a consolidated basis after giving effect to such payment and covenant compliance calculations reasonably satisfactory to Bank demonstrating satisfaction of the condition described in Section 7.7(b); and (b) after giving effect to such earn-out payment, no Default or Event of Default shall exist, including with respect to the financial covenants contained in Section 6.9 hereof on a pro forma basis.
ECTION
OANS
DVANCES
NVESTMENTS
provided
 
S 7.8. D, D. Declare or pay any dividend or distribution either in cash, stock or any other property on such Person's stock now or hereafter outstanding, nor redeem, retire, repurchase or otherwise acquire any shares of any class of such Person's stock now or hereafter outstanding; that each Subsidiary may declare or pay dividends or distributions to Borrower or any wholly-owned Domestic Subsidiary of Borrower that is a Guarantor.
ECTION
IVIDENDS
ISTRIBUTIONS
provided
S 7.9. P A. Mortgage, pledge, grant or permit to exist a security interest in, or lien upon, all or any portion of such Person's assets now owned or hereafter acquired, other than Permitted Liens.
ECTION
LEDGE
OF
SSETS
S 7.10. S L. Enter into any arrangement, directly or indirectly, with any other Person whereby Borrower or such Subsidiary, as applicable, shall sell or transfer any real or personal property, whether now owned or hereafter acquired, and then or thereafter rent or lease as lessee such property or any part thereof or any other property which Borrower or such Subsidiary, as applicable, intends to use for substantially the same purpose or purposes as the property being sold or transferred.
ECTION
ALE
AND
EASEBACKS
S 7.11. T A. Enter into any transaction of any kind with any affiliate of Borrower, irrespective of whether in the ordinary course of business, other than on fair and reasonable terms substantially as favorable to Borrower or a Subsidiary of Borrower as would be obtainable by such Person at the time in a comparable arm's-length transaction with a Person other than an affiliate, that the foregoing restriction shall not apply to transactions between or among Borrower or any Guarantor or between or among Guarantors.
ECTION
RANSACTIONS
WITH
FFILIATES
provided
S 8.1. E D. The occurrence of any of the following shall constitute an under this Agreement:
ECTION
VENTS
OF
EFAULT
"Event of Default"
(a) Borrower shall fail to pay when due any principal, interest, fees or other amounts payable under any of the Loan Documents; or
(b) Any financial statement or certificate furnished to Bank in connection with, or any representation or warranty made by Borrower, any Subsidiary or any other party under this Agreement or any other Loan Document, shall prove to be incorrect, false or misleading in any material respect when furnished or made; or
 
(c) Any default in the performance of or compliance with any obligation, agreement or other provision contained herein or in any other Loan Document (other than those referred to in subsections (a) and (b) above), and with respect to any such default which by its nature can be cured, such default shall continue for a period of twenty (20) days from the date Borrower receives notice thereof or any Responsible Officer of Borrower becomes aware thereof; that if the default cannot by its nature be cured within the twenty (20) day period or cannot after diligent attempts by Borrower be cured within such twenty (20) day period, and such default is likely to be cured within a reasonable time, then Borrower shall have an additional reasonable period (which shall not in any case exceed twenty (20) days) to attempt to cure such default; that during such additional reasonable time period the failure to have cured such default shall not be deemed an Event of Default, however, no further advances under the Revolving Line of Credit will be made; or
provided
provided, further,
(d) Any default in the payment or performance of any material obligation, or any defined event of default, under the terms of any contract or instrument (other than any of the Loan Documents) pursuant to which Borrower, any Subsidiary of Borrower or any general partner or joint venturer in any Borrower or Subsidiary of Borrower which is a partnership or joint venture (with each such Subsidiary, general partner and/or joint venturer referred to herein as a ) has incurred any debt or other material liability to any person or entity, including Bank, and such default or event shall continue for a period of time without cure sufficient to permit the acceleration of the maturity of any such indebtedness or the enforcement of remedies with respect to such liability; or
"Third Party Obligor"
(e) The filing of a notice of judgment lien against Borrower or any Third Party Obligor; or the recording of any abstract of judgment against Borrower or any Third Party Obligor in any county in which Borrower or such Third Party Obligor has an interest in real property; or the service of a notice of levy and/or of a writ of attachment or execution, or other like process, against the assets of Borrower or any Third Party Obligor; or the entry of a judgment against Borrower or any Third Party Obligor; and, in any such case, the same shall remain unsatisfied, unvacated and unstayed pending appeal for a period of twenty (20) days after the entry thereof; or
(f) Borrower or any Third Party Obligor shall become insolvent, or shall suffer or consent to or apply for the appointment of a receiver, trustee, custodian or liquidator of itself or any of its property, or shall generally fail to pay its debts as they become due, or shall make a general assignment for the benefit of creditors; Borrower or any Third Party Obligor shall file a voluntary petition in bankruptcy, or seeking reorganization, in order to effect a plan or other arrangement with creditors or any other relief under the Bankruptcy Code, or under any state or federal law granting relief to debtors, whether now or hereafter in effect; or any involuntary petition or proceeding pursuant to the Bankruptcy Code or any other applicable state or federal law relating to bankruptcy, reorganization or other relief for debtors is filed or commenced against Borrower or any Third Party Obligor and is not dismissed within 45 days after its filing, or Borrower or any Third Party Obligor shall file an answer admitting the jurisdiction of the court and the material allegations of any involuntary petition; or Borrower or any Third Party Obligor shall be adjudicated a bankrupt, or an order for relief shall be entered against Borrower or any Third Party Obligor by any court of competent jurisdiction under the Bankruptcy Code or any other applicable state or federal law relating to bankruptcy, reorganization or other relief for debtors; or
 
(g) There shall exist or occur any event or condition which Bank in good faith believes would reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect; or
(h) The dissolution or liquidation of any Borrower or Third Party Obligor which is a corporation, partnership, joint venture or other type of entity; or Borrower or any such Third Party Obligor, or any of its directors, stockholders or members, shall take action seeking to effect the dissolution or liquidation of such Borrower or Third Party Obligor; or
(i) There shall exist a material deficiency in any collateral required hereunder, as identified by Bank pursuant to one or more of the collateral examinations and inspections referenced in Section 6.2 hereof; or
(j)(i) An ERISA Event occurs with respect to a Pension Plan or Multiemployer Plan which has resulted or could reasonably be expected to result in liability of Borrower under Title IV of ERISA to the Pension Plan, Multiemployer Plan or the PBGC in an aggregate amount in excess of $1,000,000; or (ii) Borrower or any ERISA Affiliate fails to pay when due, after the expiration of any applicable grace period, any installment payment with respect to its withdrawal liability under Section 4201 of ERISA under a Multiemployer Plan in an aggregate amount in excess of $1,000,000; or
(k) Any Loan Document or any provision thereof, at any time after its execution and delivery and for any reason other than as expressly permitted hereunder or thereunder or satisfaction in full of all the Obligations, ceases to be in full force and effect; or Borrower or any Subsidiary contests in any manner the validity or enforceability of any Loan Document or any provision thereof; or Borrower or any Subsidiary denies that it has any or further liability or obligation under any Loan Document, or purports to revoke, terminate or rescind any Loan Document or any provision thereof; or
(l) A Change of Control occurs.
S 8.2. R. Upon the occurrence of any Event of Default: (a) all indebtedness of Borrower under each of the Loan Documents, any term thereof to the contrary notwithstanding, shall at Bank's option and without notice become immediately due and payable without presentment, demand, protest or notice of dishonor, all of which are hereby expressly waived by each Borrower; (b) the obligation, if any, of Bank to extend any further credit under any of the Loan Documents shall immediately cease and terminate; and (c) Bank shall have all rights, powers and remedies available under each of the Loan Documents, or accorded by law, including without limitation the right to resort to any or all security for any credit created by the Loan Documents and to exercise any or all of the rights of a beneficiary or secured party pursuant to applicable law. All rights, powers and remedies of Bank may be exercised at any time by Bank and from time to time after the occurrence of an Event of Default, are cumulative and not exclusive, and shall be in addition to any other rights, powers or remedies provided by law or equity.
ECTION
EMEDIES
 
S 9.1. N W. No delay, failure or discontinuance of Bank in exercising any right, power or remedy under any of the Loan Documents shall affect or operate as a waiver of such right, power or remedy; nor shall any single or partial exercise of any such right, power or remedy preclude, waive or otherwise affect any other or further exercise thereof or the exercise of any other right, power or remedy. Any waiver, permit, consent or approval of any kind by Bank of any breach of or default under any of the Loan Documents must be in writing and shall be effective only to the extent set forth in such writing.
ECTION
O
AIVER
S 9.2. N. All notices, requests and demands which any party is required or may desire to give to any other party under any provision of this Agreement must be in writing delivered to each party at the following address:
ECTION
OTICES
 
or to such other address as any party may designate by written notice to all other parties. Each such notice, request and demand shall be deemed given or made as follows: (a) if sent by hand delivery, upon delivery; (b) if sent by mail, upon the earlier of the date of receipt or three (3) days after deposit in the U.S. mail, first class and postage prepaid; and (c) if sent by telecopy, upon receipt.
S 9.3. E; I; D W.
ECTION
XPENSES
NDEMNITY
AMAGE
AIVER
(a) Borrower shall pay to Bank immediately upon demand the full amount of all payments, advances, charges, costs and expenses, including reasonable attorneys' fees (to include outside counsel fees and all allocated costs of Bank's in-house counsel), expended or incurred by Bank in connection with (i) the negotiation and preparation of this Agreement and the other Loan Documents, Bank's continued administration hereof and thereof, and the preparation of any amendments and waivers hereto and thereto, (ii) the enforcement of Bank's rights and/or the collection of any amounts which become due to Bank under any of the Loan Documents, and (iii) the prosecution or defense of any action in any way related to any of the Loan Documents, including without limitation, any action for declaratory relief, whether incurred at the trial or appellate level, in an arbitration proceeding or otherwise, and including any of the foregoing incurred in connection with any bankruptcy proceeding (including without limitation, any adversary proceeding, contested matter or motion brought by Bank or any other person) relating to any Borrower or any other person or entity.
 
(b) Borrower shall indemnify Bank and Bank's affiliates and the partners, members, directors, officers, employees, agents and advisors of Bank and Bank's affiliates (each such Person being called an "") against, and hold each Indemnitee harmless from, any and all losses, claims, damages, liabilities and related expenses (including the fees, charges and disbursements of any counsel for any Indemnitee), and shall indemnify and hold harmless each Indemnitee from all fees and time charges and disbursements for attorneys, who may be employees of any Indemnitee, incurred by any Indemnitee or asserted against any Indemnitee by any third party or by Borrower or any Guarantor, or any Subsidiary of Borrower or any Guarantor, arising out of, in connection with, or as a result of: (i) the execution or delivery of this Agreement, any other Loan Document or any document contemplated hereby or thereby, the performance by the parties hereto of their respective obligations hereunder or thereunder or the consummation of the transactions contemplated hereby or thereby; (ii) any Loan or the use or proposed use of the proceeds therefrom; (iii) any actual or alleged presence or release of Hazardous Materials on or from any property owned or operated by Borrower, any Guarantor or any Subsidiary of Borrower or any Guarantor, or any Environmental Claim or Environmental Liability related in any way to Borrower, any Guarantor or any Subsidiary of Borrower or any Guarantor; or (iv) any actual or prospective claim, litigation, investigation or proceeding relating to any of the foregoing, whether based on contract, tort or any other theory, whether brought by a third party or by Borrower, any Guarantor or any Subsidiary of Borrower or any Guarantor, and regardless of whether any Indemnitee is a party thereto, in all cases, whether or not caused by or arising, in whole or in part, out of the comparative, contributory or sole negligence of the Indemnitee; that such indemnity shall not, as to any Indemnitee, be available to the extent that such losses, claims, damages, liabilities or related expenses result from the gross negligence or willful misconduct of such Indemnitee.
Indemnitee
provided
(c) To the fullest extent permitted by applicable law, Borrower shall not assert, and hereby waives, any claim against any Indemnitee, on any theory of liability, for special, indirect, consequential or punitive damages (as opposed to direct or actual damages) arising out of, in connection with, or as a result of, this Agreement, any other Loan Document or any document contemplated hereby, the transactions contemplated hereby or thereby, any Loan or the use of the proceeds thereof. No Indemnitee referred to in Section 9.3(b) shall be liable for any damages arising from the use by unintended recipients of any information or other materials distributed by it through telecommunications, electronic or other information transmission systems in connection with this Agreement or the other Loan Documents or the transactions contemplated hereby or thereby.
(d) The agreements in this Section 9.3 shall survive the termination of Bank's commitment to make Loans and the repayment, satisfaction or discharge of all other Obligations.
S 9.4. S, A. This Agreement shall be binding upon and inure to the benefit of the heirs, executors, administrators, legal representatives, successors and assigns of the parties; that Borrower may not assign or transfer its interest hereunder without Bank's prior written consent. Bank reserves the right to sell, assign, transfer, negotiate or grant participations in all or any part of, or any interest in, Bank's rights and benefits under each of the Loan Documents.
ECTION
UCCESSORS
SSIGNMENT
provided
 
S 9.5. C. The Confidential Information will be used by Bank solely for the purpose of evaluating Borrower's credit request and/or Bank's ongoing credit accommodations to Borrower. Bank will keep all the Confidential Information confidential, and will not disclose any of the Confidential Information to any person or entity, except disclosures: (a) to federal and state bank examiners, and other regulatory officials having jurisdictions over Bank; (b) to Bank's legal counsel and auditors; (c) to other professional advisors to Bank; (d) to Bank's representatives (which shall include, without limitation, all other banks and companies affiliated with Wells Fargo & Company) who need to know the Confidential Information for the purpose of evaluating Borrower's credit request and/or Bank's ongoing credit accommodations to Borrower, it being expressly understood and agreed that such representatives shall be informed of the confidential nature of the Confidential Information, and shall be required by Bank to treat the Confidential Information as confidential in accordance with the terms and conditions hereof; (e) as otherwise required by law or legal process; or (f) as otherwise authorized by Borrower in writing. In the event that Bank or any of its representatives becomes legally compelled to disclose any of the Confidential Information pursuant to clause (e) of the preceding sentence, then Bank, except as otherwise required by law, will provide notice thereof to Borrower so that Borrower, at its sole option (but without obligation to do so), may attempt to seek a protective order or other appropriate remedy and/or waive compliance with the provisions of this Agreement. The confidentiality requirement set forth herein shall not extend to any portion of the Confidential Information that: (x) is or becomes generally available to the public other than as a result of a disclosure by Bank or its representatives; (y) is or becomes available to Bank on a non-confidential basis by Borrower or any officer, employee, agent or representative of Borrower prior to its disclosure by Bank; or (z) is or becomes available to Bank on a non-confidential basis from a source other than Borrower.
ECTION
ONFIDENTIALITY
S 9.6. E A; A. This Agreement and the other Loan Documents constitute the entire agreement between Borrower and Bank with respect to each credit created by the Loan Documents and supersede all prior negotiations, communications, discussions and correspondence concerning the subject matter hereof. This Agreement may be amended or modified only in writing signed by each party hereto.
ECTION
NTIRE
GREEMENT
MENDMENT
S 9.7. N T P B. This Agreement is made and entered into for the sole protection and benefit of the parties hereto and their respective permitted successors and assigns, and no other person or entity shall be a third party beneficiary of, or have any direct or indirect cause of action or claim in connection with, this Agreement or any other of the Loan Documents to which it is not a party.
ECTION
O
HIRD
ARTY
ENEFICIARIES
S 9.8. T. Time is of the essence of each and every provision of this Agreement and each other of the Loan Documents.
ECTION
IME
 
S 9.9. S P. If any provision of this Agreement shall be prohibited by or invalid under applicable law, such provision shall be ineffective only to the extent of such prohibition or invalidity without invalidating the remainder of such provision or any remaining provisions of this Agreement.
ECTION
EVERABILITY
OF
ROVISIONS
S 9.10. C. This Agreement may be executed in any number of counterparts, each of which when executed and delivered shall be deemed to be an original, and all of which when taken together shall constitute one and the same Agreement.
ECTION
OUNTERPARTS
S 9.11. G L. This Agreement shall be governed by and construed in accordance with the laws of the State of California.
ECTION
OVERNING
AW
S 9.12. A.
ECTION
RBITRATION
(a) . The parties hereto agree, upon demand by any party, to submit to binding arbitration all claims, disputes and controversies between or among them (and their respective employees, officers, directors, attorneys, and other agents), whether in tort, contract or otherwise in any way arising out of or relating to (i) any credit subject hereto, or any of the Loan Documents, and their negotiation, execution, collateralization, administration, repayment, modification, extension, substitution, formation, inducement, enforcement, default or termination; or (ii) requests for additional credit.
Arbitration
(b) . Any arbitration proceeding will (i) proceed in a location in California selected by the American Arbitration Association (); (ii) be governed by the Federal Arbitration Act (Title 9 of the United States Code), notwithstanding any conflicting choice of law provision in any of the documents between the parties; and (iii) be conducted by the AAA, or such other administrator as the parties shall mutually agree upon, in accordance with the AAA's commercial dispute resolution procedures, unless the claim or counterclaim is at least $1,000,000.00 exclusive of claimed interest, arbitration fees and costs in which case the arbitration shall be conducted in accordance with the AAA's optional procedures for large, complex commercial disputes (the commercial dispute resolution procedures or the optional procedures for large, complex commercial disputes to be referred to herein, as applicable, as the ). If there is any inconsistency between the terms hereof and the Rules, the terms and procedures set forth herein shall control. Any party who fails or refuses to submit to arbitration following a demand by any other party shall bear all costs and expenses incurred by such other party in compelling arbitration of any dispute. Nothing contained herein shall be deemed to be a waiver by any party that is a bank of the protections afforded to it under 12 U.S.C. 91 or any similar applicable state law.
Governing Rules
"AAA"
"Rules"
(c) . The arbitration requirement does not limit the right of any party to (i) foreclose against real or personal property collateral; (ii) exercise self-help remedies relating to collateral or proceeds of collateral such as setoff or repossession; or (iii) obtain provisional or ancillary remedies such as replevin, injunctive relief, attachment or the appointment of a receiver, before during or after the pendency of any arbitration proceeding. This exclusion does not constitute a waiver of the right or obligation of any party to submit any dispute to arbitration or reference hereunder, including those arising from the exercise of the actions detailed in sections (i), (ii) and (iii) of this paragraph.
No Waiver of Provisional Remedies, Self-Help and Foreclosure
 
(d) . Any arbitration proceeding in which the amount in controversy is $5,000,000.00 or less will be decided by a single arbitrator selected according to the Rules, and who shall not render an award of greater than $5,000,000.00. Any dispute in which the amount in controversy exceeds $5,000,000.00 shall be decided by majority vote of a panel of three arbitrators; that all three arbitrators must actively participate in all hearings and deliberations. The arbitrator will be a neutral attorney licensed in the State of California or a neutral retired judge of the state or federal judiciary of California, in either case with a minimum of ten years experience in the substantive law applicable to the subject matter of the dispute to be arbitrated. The arbitrator will determine whether or not an issue is arbitratable and will give effect to the statutes of limitation in determining any claim. In any arbitration proceeding the arbitrator will decide (by documents only or with a hearing at the arbitrator's discretion) any pre-hearing motions which are similar to motions to dismiss for failure to state a claim or motions for summary adjudication. The arbitrator shall resolve all disputes in accordance with the substantive law of California and may grant any remedy or relief that a court of such state could order or grant within the scope hereof and such ancillary relief as is necessary to make effective any award. The arbitrator shall also have the power to award recovery of all costs and fees, to impose sanctions and to take such other action as the arbitrator deems necessary to the same extent a judge could pursuant to the United States federal Rules of Civil Procedure, the California Rules of Civil Procedure or other applicable law. Judgment upon the award rendered by the arbitrator may be entered in any court having jurisdiction. The institution and maintenance of an action for judicial relief or pursuit of a provisional or ancillary remedy shall not constitute a waiver of the right of any party, including the plaintiff, to submit the controversy or claim to arbitration if any other party contests such action for judicial relief.
Arbitrator Qualifications and Powers
provided, however,
(e) . In any arbitration proceeding discovery will be permitted in accordance with the Rules. All discovery shall be expressly limited to matters directly relevant to the dispute being arbitrated and must be completed no later than 20 days before the hearing date. Any requests for an extension of the discovery periods, or any discovery disputes, will be subject to final determination by the arbitrator upon a showing that the request for discovery is essential for the party's presentation and that no alternative means for obtaining information is available.
Discovery
(f) . No party hereto shall be entitled to join or consolidate disputes by or against others in any arbitration, except parties who have executed any Loan Document, or to include in any arbitration any dispute as a representative or member of a class, or to act in any arbitration in the interest of the general public or in a private attorney general capacity.
Class Proceedings and Consolidations
(g) . The arbitrator shall award all costs and expenses of the arbitration proceeding.
Payment Of Arbitration Costs And Fees
 
(h) . Notwithstanding anything herein to the contrary, no dispute shall be submitted to arbitration if the dispute concerns indebtedness secured directly or indirectly, in whole or in part, by any real property unless (i) the holder of the mortgage, lien or security interest specifically elects in writing to proceed with the arbitration, or (ii) all parties to the arbitration waive any rights or benefits that might accrue to them by virtue of the single action rule statute of California, thereby agreeing that all indebtedness and obligations of the parties, and all mortgages, liens and security interests securing such indebtedness and obligations, shall remain fully valid and enforceable. If any such dispute is not submitted to arbitration, the dispute shall be referred to a referee in accordance with California Code of Civil Procedure Section 638 et seq., and this general reference agreement is intended to be specifically enforceable in accordance with said Section 638. A referee with the qualifications required herein for arbitrators shall be selected pursuant to the AAA's selection procedures. Judgment upon the decision rendered by a referee shall be entered in the court in which such proceeding was commenced in accordance with California Code of Civil Procedure Sections 644 and 645.
Real Property Collateral; Judicial Reference
(i) . To the maximum extent practicable, the AAA, the arbitrators and the parties shall take all action required to conclude any arbitration proceeding within 180 days of the filing of the dispute with the AAA. No arbitrator or other party to an arbitration proceeding may disclose the existence, content or results thereof, except for disclosures of information by a party required in the ordinary course of its business or by applicable law or regulation. If more than one agreement for arbitration by or between the parties potentially applies to a dispute, the arbitration provision most directly related to the Loan Documents or the subject matter of the dispute shall control. This arbitration provision shall survive termination, amendment or expiration of any of the Loan Documents or any relationship between the parties.
Miscellaneous
(j) . Notwithstanding anything herein to the contrary, each party retains the right to pursue in Small Claims Court any dispute within that court's jurisdiction. Further, this arbitration provision shall apply only to disputes in which either party seeks to recover an amount of money (excluding attorneys' fees and costs) that exceeds the jurisdictional limit of the Small Claims Court.
Small Claims Court
S 9.13. N N. This Agreement amends and restates the Existing Agreement in its entirety, effective as of the Closing Date, and is not intended to constitute a novation of the obligations thereunder. Nothing contained herein shall terminate any security interests, liens, guaranties or subordinations in favor of Bank and all such security interests, guaranties and subordinations shall continue in full force and effect.
ECTION
O
OVATION
S 9.14. T A. This Agreement shall terminate (other than with respect to contingent indemnification obligations under Section 9.3) when all monetary Obligations (including, without limitation, the repayment of all Loans) have been satisfied in full and Bank has no further commitment to make credit extensions or accommodations under this Agreement.
ECTION
ERMINATION
OF
GREEMENT
 
I W W, the parties hereto have caused this Second Amended and Restated Credit Agreement to be executed as of the day and year first written above.
N
ITNESS
HEREOF
 
Date: ,
        
    
        
 
Ladies and Gentlemen:
Reference is hereby made to that certain Second Amended and Restated Credit Agreement, dated as of April 22, 2010 (as amended, restated, extended, supplemented or otherwise modified in writing from time to time, the ), between N M I ("") and W F B, N A. Unless otherwise defined herein, each capitalized term used herein has the meaning ascribed thereto in the Agreement.
"Agreement"
ATUS
EDICAL
NCORPORATED
Borrower
ELLS
ARGO
ANK
ATIONAL
SSOCIATION
The undersigned Borrower hereby requests (select one):
 
The Revolving Credit Borrowing, if any, requested herein complies with of the Agreement.
Section 2.1
 
 
This Compliance Certificate is delivered this day of , 20, by the undersigned, as a senior financial officer of Borrower to Bank in accordance with of the Credit Agreement.
    
            
    
Section 6.3(d)
The undersigned hereby certifies that:
1. Attached hereto are the consolidated and consolidating annual audited or consolidated quarterly unaudited financial statements of Borrower, as applicable, presented fairly in accordance with GAAP that are required to be delivered pursuant to or of the Credit Agreement for the period ending , 20 (the "").
Section 6.3(a)
6.3(b)
            
    
End Date
2. As of the date of this Compliance Certificate, no Default or Event of Default had occurred and was continuing.
3. The financial condition covenants and other compliance calculations and information set forth on attached hereto are true, complete and accurate on and as of the date of this Compliance Certificate.
Schedule 1
The foregoing certifications, together with the computations set forth in hereto, are made and delivered, and the financial statements referenced above are made or posted, as applicable, this day of , 200, pursuant to the provisions of the Credit Agreement.
Schedule 1
    
            
    
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
Natus Medical Increases Revolving Credit Facility to $50 Million
 (Nasdaq:BABY) today announced that it has entered into a $50 million revolving credit facility with Wells Fargo Bank, National Association. The credit facility, which matures on April 30, 2012, amends and restates the Company's existing $25 million credit facility that was scheduled to mature on April 30, 2010.
SAN CARLOS, Calif. (April 27, 2010)
Natus Medical Incorporated
Jim Hawkins, President and Chief Executive officer of the Company said, "Given that credit markets are still restrictive, we view the increase in our borrowing capacity to $50 million as evidence of the strength of our business. We are pleased to have such a good relationship with Wells Fargo Bank."
"As we currently have sufficient working capital and believe we will generate positive operating cash flows during the term of the facility, we expect that any borrowings under the credit facility will be used for strategic acquisitions," added Hawkins.
Additional information concerning changes to the financial covenant ratios, pricing, and other changes to the credit agreement, including a copy of the amended and restated credit agreement, can be found in the Company's related Form 8-K, that will be filed today with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
About Natus Medical Incorporated
Natus is a leading provider of healthcare products used for the screening, detection, treatment, monitoring and tracking of common medical ailments such as hearing impairment, neurological dysfunction, epilepsy, sleep disorders, and newborn care. Product offerings include computerized neurodiagnostic systems for audiology, neurology, polysomnography, and neonatology, as well as newborn care products such as hearing screening systems, phototherapy devices for the treatment of newborn jaundice, head-cooling products for the treatment of brain injury in newborns, and software systems for managing and tracking disorders and diseases for public health laboratories.
Additional information about Natus Medical can be found at www.natus.com.
This press release contains forward-looking statements as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, particularly statements regarding the expectations, beliefs, plans, intentions and strategies of Natus. These forward-looking statements include, but are not limited to, statements regarding the strength of the Company's business and generation of positive operating cash flows. These statements relate to current estimates and assumptions of our management as of the date of this press release, and future events or Natus' future financial performance or results, and involve known and unknown risks, uncertainties and other factors that may cause actual results, levels of activity, performance, or achievements to differ materially from those expressed or implied by the forward-looking statements. Forward-looking statements are only predictions and the actual events or results may differ materially. Natus cannot provide any assurance that its future results or the results implied by the forward-looking statements will meet expectations. Our future results could differ materially due to a number of factors, including the effects of competition, the demand for our products and services, the impact of adverse global economic conditions on our target markets, our ability to expand our sales in international markets, our ability to maintain current sales levels in a mature domestic market, our ability to control costs, and risks associated with bringing new products to market and integrating acquired businesses. Natus disclaims any obligation to update information contained in any forward looking statement.
More information about potential risk factors that could affect the business and financial results of Natus is included in Natus' annual report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2009, and its quarterly reports on Form 10-Q, and in other reports filed from time to time by Natus with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission.
COMPANY CONTACT:
Natus Medical Incorporated
Steven J. Murphy
Chief Financial Officer
(650) 802-0400
InvestorRelations@Natus.com


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BABY/BABY-8K-20100429070428.txt.gz
TIME:20100429070428
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported):
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C.  20549
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 OR 15(d) of
The Securities Exchange Act of 1934
April 29, 2010
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 - 
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 - 
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 - 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 - 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
ITEM 2.02         Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On April 29, 2010, Natus Medical Incorporated (the Company) is issuing a press release and holding a conference call regarding its financial results for the first fiscal quarter of 2010 ended March 31, 2010 and other financial information.  A copy of the press release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 to this Form 8-K.
The information in this Form 8-K and the exhibit attached hereto shall not be deemed filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the Exchange Act) or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that Section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
ITEM 9.01.         Financial Statements and Exhibits.
SIGNATURES
          Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Index to Exhibits

Exhibit 99.1
Natus Medical Announces 2010 First Quarter Financial Results
- Increases 2010 Revenue and Earnings Guidance
- First Quarter non-GAAP Earnings per Share Increases 80%
SAN CARLOS, Calif.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--April 29, 2010-- (Nasdaq:BABY) today announced financial results for the three months ended March 31, 2010.
Natus Medical Incorporated
For the first quarter ended March 31, 2010, revenue increased 47% to $49.2 million, compared to $33.4 million in the comparable quarter of the previous year. The Company incurred a net loss of $303,000, or $(0.01) per diluted share for the first quarter of 2010, compared with net income of $787,000, or $0.03 per diluted share, for the first quarter of 2009.
The results for the first quarter of 2010 included a restructuring charge of $3.0 million to eliminate redundant personnel costs resulting from the recent acquisition of Alpine Biomed Holdings Corp, which were reported as a component of general and administrative expense, and $1.2 million of amortization expense associated with certain acquisition-related intangible assets. Excluding these charges, non-GAAP earnings per share for the quarter was $0.09 per diluted share, an increase of 80% from non-GAAP earnings per share of $0.05 for the same quarter last year.
I am very pleased with our first quarter results, with both our revenue and earnings exceeding our expectations, said Jim Hawkins, President and Chief Executive Officer of the Company. While we saw strong demand in all of our product categories, most notable was the rebound in our domestic neurology business where we shipped numerous large orders. Following a slowdown in hospital capital spending in early 2009, orders began to increase in the middle of the year and accelerated through the first quarter of this year. We believe the return of these large orders signifies that hospital spending has not only stabilized, but is returning to previous levels.
We are also pleased that our gross profit margin has improved to 60% in the first quarter. We anticipate that our gross profit will improve to previous levels over the course of the year, said Hawkins.
We believe our business model is on track as we intend to do an additional acquisition in the second half of 2010 and continue to execute on our business model of combining internal growth with accretive acquisitions, added Hawkins.
Natus announced the Alpine restructuring in a press release issued January 13, 2010, wherein the Company said it expected to record a charge of $2.5 million or approximately $0.05 per share. The actual restructuring charge was $3.0 million, reducing GAAP earnings per share by $0.07, or an additional two cents per share. The restructuring charge was greater primarily because severance benefits for employees in foreign jurisdictions were higher than previously expected.
As of March 31, 2010, the Company had cash, cash equivalents, and short-term investments of $39.4 million, stockholders' equity of approximately $243 million, and working capital of approximately $77 million.
Financial Guidance on a GAAP and non-GAAP Basis
Natus increased its revenue and earnings guidance for the full year 2010.
For the full year 2010, the Company now expects revenue to be approximately $205 million and earnings per share to range from $0.47 to $0.49. The Company had previously said it expected that revenue would be approximately $198 million and earnings per share would range from $0.45 to $0.47.
Natus also announced revenue and earnings guidance for the second quarter of 2010. For the second quarter 2010, the Company expects revenue to range from $50 million to $51 million and earnings per share to range from $0.11 to $0.12. This compares to revenue of $37.3 million and earnings per share of $0.08 reported in the second quarter of 2009.
On a non-GAAP basis the Company expects earnings per share to range from $0.64 to $0.66 for the full year and $0.13 to $0.14 for the second quarter of 2010. The Company had earlier said that non-GAAP earnings per share for the full year would range from $0.60 to $0.62. The non-GAAP earnings guidance excludes the restructuring charge as well as amortization expense associated with certain acquisition-related intangible assets. The Company has elected to provide its guidance on a non-GAAP basis that excludes these items as this presentation is common among companies that are active acquirors and whose results are, accordingly, affected by such charges, because this information is used by management to evaluate operating results and because it believes this information will assist investors in making period to period comparisons of the Company's operating results.
The Companys GAAP-based guidance includes the impact of expensing employee equity based compensation. All earnings per share amounts are on a diluted basis.
Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures
In addition to disclosing financial results calculated in accordance with GAAP, this release contains non-GAAP financial measures that exclude a restructuring charge as well as amortization expense associated with certain acquisition-related intangible assets. The Company believes that the presentation of results excluding these charges provides meaningful supplemental information to both management and investors that are indicative of the Company's core operating results. Therefore, the Company believes these non-GAAP financial measures facilitate comparison of operating results across reporting periods. A reconciliation between the Company's results of operations on a GAAP and non-GAAP basis for the periods reported is included as part of the condensed consolidated statements of operations at the end of the Company's financial results release.
The Company believes that both management and investors benefit from referring to these non-GAAP financial measures in assessing the Company's performance and when planning, forecasting, and analyzing future periods. These non-GAAP financial measures also facilitate management's internal comparisons to the Company's historical performance. The non-GAAP financial measures disclosed by the Company should not be considered a substitute for or superior to financial measures calculated in accordance with GAAP, and the financial results calculated in accordance with GAAP and reconciliations to those financial statements should be carefully evaluated.
Conference Call
Natus has scheduled an investment-community conference call to discuss this announcement beginning at 11:00 a.m. Eastern Time today (8:00 a.m. Pacific Time). Individuals interested in listening to the conference call may do so by dialing 800-573-4842 for domestic callers, or 1-617-224-4327 for international callers, and entering reservation code 24416747. A telephone replay will be available for 48 hours following the conclusion of the call by dialing 888-286-8010 for domestic callers, or 1-617-801-6888 for international callers, and entering reservation code 97684604.
The conference call also will be available real-time via the Internet at , and a recording of the call will be available on the Companys Web site for 90 days following the completion of the call.
http://investor.natus.com
About Natus Medical Incorporated
Natus is a leading provider of healthcare products used for the screening, detection, treatment, monitoring and tracking of common medical ailments such as hearing impairment, neurological dysfunction, epilepsy, sleep disorders, and newborn care. Product offerings include computerized neurodiagnostic systems for audiology, neurology, polysomnography, and neonatology, as well as newborn care products such as hearing screening systems, phototherapy devices for the treatment of newborn jaundice, head-cooling products for the treatment of brain injury in newborns, and software systems for managing and tracking disorders and diseases for public health laboratories.
Additional information about Natus Medical can be found at .
www.natus.com
This press release contains forward-looking statements as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, particularly statements regarding the expectations, beliefs, plans, intentions and strategies of Natus. These forward-looking statements include, but are not limited to, statements regarding anticipated revenue and profitability for the second quarter and full year 2010 on a GAAP and non-GAAP basis, stabilization of hospital spending, future improvement in gross profit margins, achievement of internal growth, and the completion of acquisitions that will be accretive to earnings. These statements relate to current estimates and assumptions of our management as of the date of this press release, and future events or Natus' future financial performance or results, and involve known and unknown risks, uncertainties and other factors that may cause actual results, levels of activity, performance, or achievements to differ materially from those expressed or implied by the forward-looking statements. Forward-looking statements are only predictions and the actual events or results may differ materially. Natus cannot provide any assurance that its future results or the results implied by the forward-looking statements will meet expectations. Our future results could differ materially due to a number of factors, including the effects of competition, the demand for our products and services, the impact of adverse global economic conditions on our target markets, our ability to expand our sales in international markets, our ability to maintain current sales levels in a mature domestic market, our ability to control costs, and risks associated with bringing new products to market and integrating acquired businesses. Natus disclaims any obligation to update information contained in any forward-looking statement.
More information about potential risk factors that could affect the business and financial results of Natus is included in Natus' annual report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2009, and its quarterly reports on Form 10-Q, and in other reports filed from time to time by Natus with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission.
CONTACT: Natus Medical Incorporated Steven J. Murphy, 650-802-0400 Chief Financial Officer
InvestorRelations@Natus.com


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BABY/BABY-8K-20100607105608.txt.gz
TIME:20100607105608
EVENTS:	Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders
TEXT:
ITEM: Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On June 3, 2010, Natus Medical Incorporated (the "Company") held its annual meeting of stockholders. At this meeting, James B. Hawkins, President and Chief Executive Officer and Director of the Company, and Robert A. Gunst, Chairman of the Board of Directors, were both re-elected to serve on the Board of Directors for a three-year term until 2013. Additionally, shareholders ratified the appointment of Deloitte & Touche LLP as the Company's independent registered public accounting firm for the fiscal year ending December 31, 2010
The number of shares represented in person or in proxy and constituting a quorum was 24,610,037, or approximately 87 % of the Company's shares outstanding. The results of the shareholder vote are as follows:
Proposal 1: Election of Directors
 
Proposal 2: Ratification of Deloitte & Touche LLP as Auditors
 
No other matters were considered or voted upon at the meeting.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BABY/BABY-8K-20100729070020.txt.gz
TIME:20100729070020
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported):
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C.  20549
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 OR 15(d) of
The Securities Exchange Act of 1934
July 29, 2010
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 - 
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 - 
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 - 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 - 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
ITEM 2.02.     Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On July 29, 2010, Natus Medical Incorporated (the Company) is issuing a press release and holding a conference call regarding its financial results for the second fiscal quarter of 2010 ended June 30, 2010 and other financial information.  A copy of the press release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 to this Form 8-K.
The information in this Form 8-K and the exhibit attached hereto shall not be deemed filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the Exchange Act) or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that Section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
ITEM 9.01.     Financial Statements and Exhibits.
SIGNATURES
          Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Index to Exhibits

Exhibit 99.1
Natus Medical Announces 2010 Second Quarter Financial Results
- Increases 2010 Revenue and non-GAAP EPS Guidance
SAN CARLOS, Calif.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--July 29, 2010-- (Nasdaq:BABY) today announced financial results for the three and six months ended June 30, 2010.
Natus Medical Incorporated
For the second quarter ended June 30, 2010, Natus reported revenue of $52.7 million, compared to $37.3 million reported in the comparable quarter of the previous year. Net income was $3.1 million, or $0.11 per diluted share, for the second quarter of 2010, compared with net income of $2.3 million, or $0.08 per diluted share, for the second quarter of 2009.
For the six months ended June 30, 2010, the Company reported net income of $2.8 million, or $0.10 per diluted share, compared to net income of $3.1 million, or $0.11 per diluted share, for the comparable period in 2009.
On a non-GAAP basis the Company reported net income $4.3 million, or $0.15 per diluted share, for the second quarter of 2010, compared with net income of $2.9 million, or $0.10 per diluted share, for the second quarter of 2009. The non-GAAP results for the second quarter of 2010 excluded $1.2 million of amortization expense associated with certain acquisition-related intangible assets, a charge of $758,000 associated with the discontinuance of the Clarity newborn hearing screening product line, and a restructuring charge of $77,000, adjusting the charge previously recorded in connection with a reorganization plan the company adopted in January 2010.
Natus discontinued the Sonamed Clarity screener and associated disposable supplies in the second quarter of 2010 and began converting users to the Companys other newborn hearing screening products. The non-recurring charge reduced reported gross profit by 0.9 percentage points and increased operating expenses by $300,000.
"I am pleased with our second quarter results as we exceeded our expectations in both revenue and non-GAAP earnings, said Jim Hawkins, President and Chief Executive Officer of the Company. We saw strong demand in all of our product categories in the United States and throughout the world. We continued to see an acceleration of large orders in the United States in the second quarter and believe this signifies the improving financial strength of hospitals. We also shipped a $1.6 million order directly to the Iraq Ministry of Health for our NeoBLUE phototherapy product, an order we had been working on for over a year.
"Also of note is an order for 80 Cool-Caps we recently received from Saudi Arabia, suggesting they have chosen selective head cooling as a standard of care for the treatment of HIE in newborns. As we discussed in a press release earlier this week, the Saudi order for our newborn care products is valued at $2.8 million in total and also includes our ALGO newborn hearing screeners and disposable supplies, as well as Cerebral Function Monitors. We expect to ship that order in the second half of 2010, added Hawkins. We are very pleased to see countries in the Middle East putting this strong emphasis on newborn care and we are hopeful that this will continue throughout the region and elsewhere.
HIE is an abbreviation for Hypoxic-Ischemic Encephalopathy, a condition resulting from an interruption of blood flow and oxygen supply during labor and delivery. HIE is a serious condition that causes significant mortality and long-term morbidity. Results of the clinical study for the Cool-Cap confirmed that when head cooling therapy was administered to patients within the first six hours of life, thereby lowering the body temperature two to three degrees centigrade, the severity of brain injury was significantly decreased compared to the untreated control group. In the United States, the Cool-Cap is the only FDA-approved device for the treatment of HIE in term newborns.
As of June 30, 2010 the Company had cash, cash equivalents, and short-term investments of $39.9 million, stockholders' equity of approximately $249 million, and working capital of approximately $83 million.
Financial Guidance on a GAAP and non-GAAP Basis
Natus updated its revenue and earnings guidance for the full year 2010.
On a GAAP basis for the full year 2010, the Company now expects revenue to be approximately $211 million and earnings per share to range from $0.46 to $0.48. The Company had previously said it expected that revenue would be approximately $205 million and earnings per share would range from $0.47 to $0.49. The Companys previous guidance did not take into account the charge for the discontinuance of the Clarity hearing screener, which reduced second quarter GAAP earnings per share by $0.02.
Natus also announced revenue and earnings guidance for the third and fourth quarters of 2010.
For the third quarter of 2010, the Company expects revenue to be approximately $54 million and earnings per share to range from $0.16 to $0.17. This compares to revenue of $44.3 million and earnings per share of $0.13 reported in the third quarter of 2009.
For the fourth quarter of 2010, the Company expects revenue to be approximately $55.0 million and earnings per share to range from $0.20 to $0.21. This compares to revenue of $51.6 million and earnings per share of $0.15 reported in the fourth quarter of 2009.
On a non-GAAP basis the Company expects earnings per share to range from $0.65 to $0.67 for the full year 2010, $0.18 to $0.19 for the third quarter of 2010, and $0.23 to $0.24 for the fourth quarter of 2010. The Company had earlier said that non-GAAP earnings per share for the full year would range from $0.64 to $0.66. The non-GAAP earnings guidance excludes amortization expense associated with certain acquisition-related intangible assets, the charge associated with the discontinuance of the Clarity hearing screener and associated disposable supplies, and the restructuring charge. The Company has elected to provide its guidance on a non-GAAP basis that excludes the amortization of acquisition related intangibles as this presentation is common among companies that are active acquirors and whose results are, accordingly, affected by such charges. The Company also excludes these charges, charges related to the product discontinuance, and restructuring charges because this information is used by management to evaluate operating results and because it believes this information will assist investors in making period to period comparisons of the Company's operating results.
The Companys GAAP-based guidance includes the impact of expensing employee equity based compensation. All earnings per share amounts are on a diluted basis.
Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures
In addition to disclosing financial results calculated in accordance with GAAP, this release contains non-GAAP financial measures that exclude amortization of acquisition related intangibles, charges related to product discontinuance, and restructuring charges. The Company believes that the presentation of results excluding amortization and these other charges provides meaningful supplemental information to both management and investors that is indicative of the Company's core operating results. Therefore, the Company believes these non-GAAP financial measures facilitate comparison of operating results across reporting periods. A reconciliation between the Company's results of operations on a GAAP and non-GAAP basis for the periods reported is included as part of the condensed consolidated statements of operations at the end of the Company's financial results release.
The Company believes that both management and investors benefit from referring to these non-GAAP financial measures in assessing the Company's performance and when planning, forecasting, and analyzing future periods. These non-GAAP financial measures also facilitate management's internal comparisons to the Company's historical performance. The non-GAAP financial measures disclosed by the Company should not be considered a substitute for or superior to financial measures calculated in accordance with GAAP, and the financial results calculated in accordance with GAAP and reconciliations to those financial statements should be carefully evaluated.
Conference Call
Natus has scheduled an investment-community conference call to discuss this announcement beginning at 11:00 a.m. Eastern Time today (8:00 a.m. Pacific Time). Individuals interested in listening to the conference call may do so by dialing 866-314-4865 for domestic callers, or 1-617-213-8050 for international callers, and entering reservation code 10066240. A telephone replay will be available for 48 hours following the conclusion of the call by dialing 888-286-8010 for domestic callers, or 1-617-801-6888 for international callers, and entering reservation code 41276438.
The conference call also will be available real-time via the Internet at , and a recording of the call will be available on the Companys Web site for 90 days following the completion of the call.
http://investor.natus.com
About Natus Medical Incorporated
Natus is a leading provider of healthcare products used for the screening, detection, treatment, monitoring and tracking of common medical ailments such as hearing impairment, neurological dysfunction, epilepsy, sleep disorders, and newborn care. Product offerings include computerized neurodiagnostic systems for audiology, neurology, polysomnography, and neonatology, as well as newborn care products such as hearing screening systems, phototherapy devices for the treatment of newborn jaundice, head-cooling products for the treatment of brain injury in newborns, and software systems for managing and tracking disorders and diseases for public health laboratories.
ALGO, Cool-Cap, and neoBLUE are registered trademarks of Natus Medical Incorporated.
Additional information about Natus Medical can be found at .
www.natus.com
This press release contains forward-looking statements as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, particularly statements regarding the expectations, beliefs, plans, intentions and strategies of Natus. These forward-looking statements include, but are not limited to, statements regarding anticipated revenue and profitability for the third quarter, fourth quarter, and full year 2010, improving financial strength of hospitals, and the fulfillment of the Saudi Arabia order. These statements relate to current estimates and assumptions of our management as of the date of this press release, and future events or Natus' future financial performance or results, and involve known and unknown risks, uncertainties and other factors that may cause actual results, levels of activity, performance, or achievements to differ materially from those expressed or implied by the forward-looking statements. Forward-looking statements are only predictions and the actual events or results may differ materially. Natus cannot provide any assurance that its future results or the results implied by the forward-looking statements will meet expectations. Our future results could differ materially due to a number of factors, including the effects of competition, the demand for our products and services, the impact of adverse global economic conditions on our target markets, our ability to expand our sales in international markets, our ability to maintain current sales levels in a mature domestic market, our ability to control costs, and risks associated with bringing new products to market, integrating acquired businesses, and our ability to fulfill product orders on a timely basis. Natus disclaims any obligation to update information contained in any forward-looking statement.
More information about potential risk factors that could affect the business and financial results of Natus is included in Natus' annual report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2009, and its quarterly reports on Form 10-Q, and in other reports filed from time to time by Natus with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission.
CONTACT: Natus Medical Incorporated Steven J. Murphy, 650-802-0400 Chief Financial Officer
InvestorRelations@Natus.com


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BABY/BABY-8K-20101015140149.txt.gz
TIME:20101015140149
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Completion of Acquisition or Disposition of Assets	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Completion of Acquisition or Disposition of Assets
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Stock Purchase Agreement
On October 12, 2010 Natus Medical Incorporated ("Natus", the "Company") executed a Stock Purchase Agreement between the Company and the shareholders of Medix Industrial y Commercial S.A., an Argentine International Private Company ("Medix") providing for the Company's acquisition of all of the outstanding shares of capital stock of Medix for a cash price paid at closing of $14 million.
The Stock Purchase Agreement includes an earnout provision that provides for the payment of up to $5 million of additional cash consideration if certain post-acquisition sales targets are met. The potential earnout payments consist of two $2.0 million earnout payments depending upon sales for the two fiscal years ending October 31, 2011 and 2012, and one potential $1.0 million supplemental earnout payment depending on sales for the single fiscal year ending October 31, 2011.
Medix, based in Argentina, manufactures incubators for use in hospital nurseries and neonatal intensive care units, transport incubators for use in ambulances and other emergency vehicles, infant warmers, and LED based phototherapy devices, primarily in Latin American.
Financing for the transaction was provided by Natus' existing cash balances, and based on cash and short-term investments held at June 30, 2010, Natus retains cash of approximately $25 million before giving any effect to potential earnout payments in the transaction.
Amendment to Credit Facility
On October 12, 2010, the Company executed the First Amendment (the "Amendment") to its Second Amended and Restated Credit Agreement with Wells Fargo Bank, National Association. The Amendment authorized the Company to consummate the Medix acquisition and to assume associated indebtedness of Medix secured by real estate, accounts receivable, and inventory. Other terms of the credit facility remain unchanged.
 
On October 13, 2010, the Company completed the acquisition of Medix pursuant to the Stock Purchase Agreement. The description of the acquisition transaction is provided in Item 1.01 above and is incorporated into this item 2.01 by this reference. Direct costs associated with the acquisition cannot be reasonably determined at this time.
On October 13, 2010, the Company issued a press release announcing the Stock Purchase Agreement and other details of the acquisition, a copy of which is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1.
 
On October 13, 2010, the Company issued a press release regarding its expected revenue for the third fiscal quarter ended September 30, 2010. A copy of the press release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 to this Form 8-K.
 
The information in this item 2.02 of this Current Report on Form 8-K and the information regarding the expected revenue for the third fiscal quarter ended September 30, 2010 and for the full year 2010 included in the exhibit attached hereto shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act") or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that Section, nor shall such information be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
 
(d) The following exhibits are filed herewith:
Exhibits.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 

 
Exhibit 99.1
Natus Acquires Medix - Leading Newborn Care Company in Latin America
- Releases Preliminary Third Quarter 2010 Revenue Results and Updates 2010 Revenue Guidance
(Nasdaq:BABY) today announced that it has acquired Medix, a leader in the development, manufacturing, and sales of devices for newborn care in Latin America. Medix, based in Argentina, manufactures incubators for use in hospital nurseries and neonatal intensive care units, transport incubators for use in ambulances and other emergency vehicles, infant warmers, and LED based phototherapy devices.
SAN CARLOS, Calif. (October 13, 2010)  Natus Medical Incorporated
Natus acquired all outstanding shares of Medix capital stock for $14 million in cash, exclusive of direct costs of the acquisition, with the potential for additional purchase consideration if certain revenue targets are met in 2011 and 2012. Natus expects the acquisition will be accretive to earnings in the first quarter of 2011, exclusive of potential restructuring and other one-time charges. Medix expects to record approximately $26 million of revenue for its fiscal year ending October 31, 2010.
"The Medix acquisition affirms our leadership position in newborn care products sold into the hospital," said Jim Hawkins, President and Chief Executive Officer of Natus. "Expanding into the incubator and infant warmer markets enlarges our footprint in both the nursery and neonatal intensive care units of hospitals around the globe."
"In addition, this acquisition positions Natus as a leader in newborn care in the growing Latin America marketplace. We believe this acquisition will allow us an efficient entry into the Brazilian market, which represents the seventh largest economy in the world," added Hawkins. "Having this presence in South America will assist Natus in other markets in the region as well. We plan to retain the Medix executive team, as they have demonstrated the ability to effectively manage the business, maintaining both growth and profitability."
"We plan to leverage our worldwide sales and distribution organization, as Medix currently generates less than ten percent of its revenue from outside of South America. We believe the Medix product lines are ideal for many markets around the world. In addition, because many of their products have current FDA clearance, we may bring their products into the US market through our direct sales force," said Hawkins.
"We are also pleased to report that with the acquisition of Medix, we expect to substantially achieve two of our long-standing corporate goals: exiting 2010 with a revenue run rate of $250 million and generating approximately 50% of our revenue from international markets," noted Hawkins.
Natus funded the acquisition through available cash.
Third Quarter 2010 Revenue Results and Updated 2010 Revenue Guidance
Natus also released preliminary third quarter 2010 revenue results and updated its revenue guidance for the full year 2010, giving effect to the Medix acquisition.
For the third quarter ended September 30, 2010, Natus expects to report revenue of approximately $53.4 million. The Company had earlier said it expected revenue to be approximately $54 million for the period.
"We had expected the receipt of several large orders in the last weeks of the third quarter," added Hawkins. "Although those orders were delayed, we expect to receive them during the fourth quarter. In noting this, we are reiterating our previously announced annual revenue guidance for 2010, exclusive of the contribution of Medix."
For the full year 2010, the Company now expects to report revenue of approximately $217 million, including the contribution of Medix in the fourth quarter. The Company had earlier said it expected 2010 revenue would be approximately $211 million.
Financial Results Conference Call
The Company intends to release its full 2010 third quarter financial results before the market opens on Thursday, October 28, 2010. Natus management will host an investment-community conference call the same day beginning at 11:00 a.m. Eastern Time (8:00 a.m. Pacific Time) to discuss those results, the Medix acquisition, and to answer questions.
Individuals interested in listening to the conference call may do so by dialing 800-659-1942 for domestic callers, or 1- 617-614-2710 for international callers, and entering reservation code 99278684. A telephone replay will be available for 48 hours following the conclusion of the call by dialing 888-286-8010 for domestic callers, or 1-617-801-6888 for international callers, and entering reservation code 58205263.
The conference call also will be available real-time via the Internet at http://investor.natus.com, and a recording of the call will be available on the Company's Web site for 90 days following the completion of the call.
About Medix
Medix is a medical device company located in Argentina. Since 1972 Medix has developed, manufactured and marketed intensive care infant incubators, transport incubators, infant radiant warmers and phototherapy lamps as well as accessories and complementary equipment for neonatology. Medix also markets imported products for the neonatal, pediatric, and adult intensive care markets.
Additional information about Medix can be found at .
http://www.medix.com.ar
About Natus Medical
Natus is a leading provider of healthcare products used for the screening, detection, treatment, monitoring and tracking of common medical ailments in newborn care, hearing impairment, neurological dysfunction, epilepsy, sleep disorders, and balance and mobility disorders. Product offerings include computerized neurodiagnostic systems for audiology, neurology, polysomnography, and neonatology, as well as newborn care products such as hearing screening systems, phototherapy devices for the treatment of newborn jaundice, head-cooling products for the treatment of brain injury in newborns, and software systems for managing and tracking disorders and diseases for public health laboratories.
This press release contains forward-looking statements as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, particularly statements regarding the expectations, beliefs, plans, intentions and strategies of Natus. These forward-looking statements include, but are not limited to, statements regarding the receipt of several large orders in the fourth quarter 2010, expected revenue in the third quarter and full
year 2010, expansion into other markets, the anticipated revenue run rate of Natus, and the geographic breakdown of revenue. These statements relate to current estimates and assumptions of our management as of the date of this press release. Future events or Natus' future financial performance or results involve known and unknown risks, uncertainties, and other factors that may cause actual results, levels of activity, performance, or achievements to differ materially from those expressed or implied by the forward-looking statements, including the ability to successfully integrate and operate the Medix business, competitive factors in our markets, general economic conditions in our markets, and our ability to produce and ship products in a timely manner. Natus disclaims any obligation to update information contained in any forward looking statement.
More information about potential risk factors that could affect the business and financial results of Natus is included in Natus' annual report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2009, and its quarterly reports on Form 10-Q, and in other reports filed from time to time by Natus with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission.
Additional information about Natus Medical can be found at .
www.natus.com
COMPANY CONTACT:
Natus Medical Incorporated
Steven J. Murphy
Chief Financial Officer
(650) 802-0400
InvestorRelations@Natus.com


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BABY/BABY-8K-20101028074218.txt.gz
TIME:20101028074218
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported):
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C.  20549
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 OR 15(d) of
The Securities Exchange Act of 1934
October 28, 2010
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 - 
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 - 
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 - 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 - 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
ITEM 2.02.      Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On October 28, 2010, Natus Medical Incorporated (the Company) is issuing a press release and holding a conference call regarding its financial results for the third fiscal quarter of 2010 ended September 30, 2010 and other financial information.  A copy of the press release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 to this Form 8-K.
The information in this Form 8-K and the exhibit attached hereto shall not be deemed filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the Exchange Act) or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that Section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
ITEM 9.01.     Financial Statements and Exhibits.
SIGNATURES
          Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Index to Exhibits

Exhibit 99.1
Natus Medical Announces 2010 Third Quarter Financial Results
- Updates Earnings Per Share Guidance
SAN CARLOS, Calif.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--October 28, 2010-- (Nasdaq:BABY) today announced financial results for the three and nine months ended September 30, 2010.
Natus Medical Incorporated
For the third quarter ended September 30, 2010, Natus reported revenue of $53.3 million, compared to $44.3 million reported in the comparable quarter of the previous year. Net income was $3.7 million, or $0.13 per diluted share, for the third quarter of both 2010 and 2009.
For the nine months ended September 30, 2010, the Company reported net income of $6.5 million, or $0.22 per diluted share, compared to net income of $6.8 million, or $0.24 per diluted share, for the comparable period in 2009.
On a non-GAAP basis the Company reported net income $4.9 million, or $0.17 per diluted share, for the third quarter of 2010, compared with net income of $4.1 million, or $0.14 per diluted share, for the third quarter of 2009. The non-GAAP results for the third quarter of 2010 exclude $1.2 million of amortization expense associated with acquisition-related intangible assets, a charge of $323,000 associated with the discontinuance of the Clarity newborn hearing screening product line, and $179,000 of direct costs incurred in the third quarter associated with the Companys acquisition of Medix on October 12, 2010.
On October 13, 2010, we announced our expected revenue results for the quarter as several large orders we expected to ship during the last weeks of the quarter were delayed. As a result, our third quarter revenue was approximately $700,000 below our expectation and our non-GAAP earnings per share were off a penny from our guidance, said Jim Hawkins, President and Chief Executive Officer of the Company.
Our hearing screening business continues to do well in all our markets, with third quarter revenue up 11% over last year, said Hawkins. We also received a $2.9 million order from Saudi Arabia in the third quarter for our ALGO newborn hearing systems, Cool-Caps, and Olympic Cerebral Function Monitors. If the hearing screening program is fully implemented in Saudi Arabia, with approximately 700,000 births per year, we anticipate a significant disposable revenue stream in future years. Approximately half of this order was shipped in the third quarter and we expect the remainder to ship in the fourth quarter.
In October 2010 we acquired Medix, a leader in the development, manufacturing, and sales of incubators, infant warmers, and LED-based phototherapy devices in Latin America. Expanding Natus into these new products and markets will enlarge our footprint into both the nursery and neonatal intensive care units of hospitals around the globe. We are very excited about the Medix acquisition and expect it to be accretive to our earnings in 2011, exclusive of any restructuring charges. Because Medix sells primarily through distributors in Latin America they will have a lower gross profit margin than our corporate average; however, we expect our operating margin will improve next year with the contribution of Medix, added Hawkins.
During the third quarter we experienced cost issues, both internal and external, that affected our profitability. Our gross profit was 59% versus our expectation of 61.5%. This was due to three factors: growth in our lower gross margin international business, increased product costs, and product mix. Although we were able to partially offset these increased production costs through operating expense control, we have continued to invest in our organization and infrastructure to support our continuing growth, most recently by hiring a President of Natus Europe and adding key personnel to our finance and IT groups worldwide, including Argentina. We expect that our operating costs, exclusive of the costs of Medix, will increase in the fourth quarter, and thus we are reducing our fourth quarter earnings per share guidance accordingly, said Hawkins.
We continue to be very optimistic about the future of Natus. With the acquisition of Medix, we now expect to substantially achieve two of our long standing goals: exiting 2010 with a revenue run rate of approximately $250 million and generating approximately 50% of our revenue from international markets, added Hawkins.
As of September 30, 2010 the Company had cash, cash equivalents, and short-term investments of $43.6 million, stockholders' equity of approximately $256 million, and working capital of approximately $91 million. These figures do not give effect to the Medix acquisition.
Financial Guidance on a GAAP and non-GAAP Basis
Natus reiterated its revenue guidance and updated its earnings guidance for the full year 2010.
On a GAAP basis for the full year 2010, the Company expects revenue to be approximately $217 million and earnings per share to range from $0.41 to $0.43. The Company had previously said it expected that earnings per share would range from $0.46 to $0.48. The Companys previous guidance did not take into account the third quarter charges of $500,000 for the discontinuance of the Clarity hearing screener and direct costs of the Medix acquisition.
Natus also reiterated its revenue guidance and updated its earnings guidance for the fourth quarter of 2010.
For the fourth quarter of 2010, the Company expects revenue to be approximately $62 million and earnings per share to range from $0.18 to $0.20. The company had previously said revenue would be approximately $55 million, exclusive of Medix, and earnings per share would range from $0.20 to $0.21.
On a non-GAAP basis the Company expects earnings per share to range from $0.62 to $0.64 for the full year 2010 and $0.21 to $0.23 for the fourth quarter of 2010. The Company had earlier said that non-GAAP earnings per share for the full year would range from $0.65 to $0.67 and for the fourth quarter $0.23 to $0.24.
The full year non-GAAP earnings guidance excludes amortization expense associated with acquisition-related intangible assets, the charge associated with the discontinuance of the Clarity hearing screener and associated disposable supplies, a restructuring charge, and direct costs of the Medix acquisition. The Company has elected to provide its guidance on a non-GAAP basis that excludes the amortization of acquisition related intangibles as this presentation is common among companies that are active acquirors and whose results are, accordingly, affected by such charges. The Company also excludes these charges, charges related to the product discontinuance, restructuring charges, and acquisition related costs because this information is used by management to evaluate operating results and because it believes this information will assist investors in making period to period comparisons of the Company's operating results.
The Companys GAAP and non-GAAP guidance include the impact of expensing employee share based compensation. However, the Companys guidance does not include the impact of any future acquisition-related charges associated with the Medix acquisition, other acquisition or restructuring related charges that may be incurred, or the impact any future potential acquisitions might have on the Companys results of operations. All earnings per share amounts are on a diluted basis.
Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures
In addition to disclosing financial results calculated in accordance with GAAP, this release contains non-GAAP financial measures that exclude amortization of acquisition related intangibles, other acquisition-related charges, charges related to product discontinuance, and restructuring charges. The Company believes that the presentation of results excluding amortization and these other charges provides meaningful supplemental information to both management and investors that is indicative of the Company's core operating results. Therefore, the Company believes these non-GAAP financial measures facilitate comparison of operating results across reporting periods. A reconciliation between the Company's results of operations on a GAAP and non-GAAP basis for the periods reported is included as part of the condensed consolidated statements of operations at the end of the Company's financial results release.
The Company believes that both management and investors benefit from referring to these non-GAAP financial measures in assessing the Company's performance and when planning, forecasting, and analyzing future periods. These non-GAAP financial measures also facilitate management's internal comparisons to the Company's historical performance. The non-GAAP financial measures disclosed by the Company should not be considered a substitute for or superior to financial measures calculated in accordance with GAAP, and the financial results calculated in accordance with GAAP and reconciliations to those financial statements should be carefully evaluated.
Conference Call
Natus has scheduled an investment-community conference call to discuss this announcement beginning at 11:00 a.m. Eastern Time today (8:00 a.m. Pacific Time). Individuals interested in listening to the conference call may do so by dialing 800-659-1942 for domestic callers, or 1-617-614-2710 for international callers, and entering reservation code 99278684. A telephone replay will be available for 48 hours following the conclusion of the call by dialing 888-286-8010 for domestic callers, or 1-617-801-6888 for international callers, and entering reservation code 58205263.
The conference call also will be available real-time via the Internet at , and a recording of the call will be available on the Companys Web site for 90 days following the completion of the call.
http://investor.natus.com
About Natus Medical Incorporated
Natus is a leading provider of healthcare products used for the screening, detection, treatment, monitoring and tracking of common medical ailments such as hearing impairment, neurological dysfunction, epilepsy, sleep disorders, and newborn care. Product offerings include computerized neurodiagnostic systems for audiology, neurology, polysomnography, and neonatology, as well as newborn care products such as hearing screening systems, phototherapy devices for the treatment of newborn jaundice, head-cooling products for the treatment of brain injury in newborns, and software systems for managing and tracking disorders and diseases for public health laboratories.
Additional information about Natus Medical can be found at .
www.natus.com
This press release contains forward-looking statements as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, particularly statements regarding the expectations, beliefs, plans, intentions and strategies of Natus. These forward-looking statements include, but are not limited to, statements regarding the achievement of historic profit levels in 2011, the fulfillment of the remainder of the Saudi Arabia order in the fourth quarter 2010, the benefit of the Medix acquisition and its impact on operating margins, and anticipated revenue and profitability for the fourth quarter and full year 2010. These statements relate to current estimates and assumptions of our management as of the date of this press release, and future events or Natus' future financial performance or results, and involve known and unknown risks, uncertainties and other factors that may cause actual results, levels of activity, performance, or achievements to differ materially from those expressed or implied by the forward-looking statements. Forward-looking statements are only predictions and the actual events or results may differ materially. Natus cannot provide any assurance that its future results or the results implied by the forward-looking statements will meet expectations. Our future results could differ materially due to a number of factors, including the effects of competition, the demand for our products and services, the impact of adverse global economic conditions on our target markets, our ability to expand our sales in international markets, our ability to maintain current sales levels in a mature domestic market, our ability to control costs, and risks associated with bringing new products to market, integrating acquired businesses, and our ability to fulfill product orders on a timely basis. Natus disclaims any obligation to update information contained in any forward-looking statement.
More information about potential risk factors that could affect the business and financial results of Natus is included in Natus' annual report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2009, and its quarterly reports on Form 10-Q, and in other reports filed from time to time by Natus with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission.
CONTACT: Natus Medical Incorporated Steven J. Murphy, 650-802-0400 Chief Financial Officer
InvestorRelations@Natus.com


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BABY/BABY-8K-20101221163205.txt.gz
TIME:20101221163205
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
At its December 15, 2010 meeting, the Compensation Committee of the Board of Directors of Natus Medical Incorporated (the "Company") approved the base salaries and bonus program for the Company's executive officers for the period beginning January 1, 2011 and ending December 31, 2011.
The Compensation Committee approved the base salary amounts set forth in the table below:
 
The Compensation Committee also approved a cash bonus plan for executive officers of the Company for 2011 under the same terms as that for 2010. The plan is based on the Company achieving its budgeted income before provision for income tax for 2011 ("pre-tax profit"). The cash bonuses may range from 50% to a maximum of 150% of the target amount, based on the amount of actual pre-tax profit relative to the budgeted amount. The target bonus for Mr. Hawkins is 80% of 2011 base salary and for each of Messrs. Mince and Murphy and Dr. Chung is 45% of 2011 base salary. Mr. Traverso's compensation is comprised of (i) his 2011 base salary, (ii) payments made pursuant to a sales commission plan that is paid on a regular basis, and (iii) a bonus for which the terms are the same as the other executive officers of the Company, except that his target bonus is 32% of his 2011 base salary. The payment of bonuses pursuant to this plan is at the discretion of the Board of Directors.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BABY/BABY-8K-20110209070430.txt.gz
TIME:20110209070430
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 5.02. Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers.
On February 4, 2011 Natus Medical Incorporated appointed John T. Buhler to the new position of President and Chief Operating Officer. Mr. Buhler is expected to commence his employment with the Company on February 14, 2011. Jim Hawkins, who previously held the title of President and Chief Executive Officer, will continue to serve as CEO and as a member of the Board of Directors.
Mr. Buhler was employed by Avantis Medical Systems as President and Chief Executive officer from January 2011 to February 2011. He held various positions at SenoRx from May 2008 through July 2010, including President and Chief Executive Officer from March 2010 through July 2010, President and Chief Operating Officer from October 2009 to March 2010, Senior Vice President and Chief Commercial Officer from April 2009 to October 2009, Vice President of Global Sales and Business Development from October 2008 until April 2009, and Vice President of International Sales and Business Development from May 2008 until October 2008. From August 2005 to May 2008, Mr. Buhler served as President and Chief Executive Officer at Ultrasonix Medical Corporation, a privately held manufacturer of diagnostic ultrasound imaging equipment. From 1998 to 2005, Mr. Buhler held various positions at General Electric, last serving as Vice President and General Manager of GE's Ultrasound Performance Technologies Division in Shanghi, China.
Mr. Buhler will receive an annual base salary of $325,000 and receive an equity award of 120,000 options and 60,000 shares of restricted stock that will vest over a four-year period. He will also be eligible for a cash bonus under the same terms as for the other executive officers of the Company as described in the Company's Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the Commission on December 21, 2010, with a target bonus of 50% of base salary.
A copy of the press release announcing Mr. Buhler's appointment is attached as exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
Natus Medical Appoints John T. Buhler as President and COO
(Nasdaq:BABY) today announced the appointment of John T. Buhler as President and Chief Operating Officer of the Company. Over his 28 year career, Mr. Buhler has overseen and directed rapidly growing enterprises both big and small within the medical device industry, recently as President and CEO of SenoRx, Inc. (Nasdaq:SENO) prior to its acquisition in July 2010. His experience includes senior management positions at General Electric, last serving as VP and GM of GE's $500 million Ultrasound Performance Technologies Division covering China and Asia; President and CEO of Ultrasonix Medical Corp. in Canada; and VP of Operations for Diasonics Inc.
SAN CARLOS, Calif. (February 9, 2011)  Natus Medical Incorporated
"I am pleased to have John join the Natus management team in the new position of President and Chief Operating Officer," said Jim Hawkins, Chief Executive Officer of Natus. "During the past six years, our business has grown from $36 million in annual revenue to our current $250 million annual revenue run rate. By bringing in an experienced executive like John to report to me and manage our day-to-day operations, I will be better able to focus on our strategic growth opportunities and accretive acquisitions. This should better enable us to achieve our current goal of reaching $500 million of annual revenue in 2014 and further success thereafter."
"Natus has achieved tremendous growth and success over the past six years, becoming a leading provider of healthcare products in the markets it serves and with operations on three continents," said Buhler. "I look forward to joining this successful team and helping to drive Natus to even greater levels of profitability in the years to come."
About Natus Medical Incorporated
Natus is a leading provider of healthcare products used for the screening, detection, treatment, monitoring and tracking of common medical ailments in newborn care, hearing impairment, neurological dysfunction, epilepsy, sleep disorders, and balance and mobility disorders. Product offerings include computerized neurodiagnostic systems for audiology, neurology, polysomnography, and neonatalogy, as well as newborn care products such as hearing screening systems, phototherapy devices for the treatment of newborn jaundice, head-cooling products for the treatment of brain injury in newborns, incubators to control the newborn's environment, and software systems for managing and tracking disorders and diseases for public health laboratories.
Additional information about Natus Medical can be found at www.natus.com.
This press release contains forward-looking statements as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, particularly statements regarding the expectations, beliefs, plans, intentions and strategies of Natus. These forward-looking statements include statements regarding the achievement of a $500 million revenue goal in 2014. These statements relate to current estimates and assumptions of our management as of the date of this press release, and future events or Natus' future financial performance or results, and involve known and unknown risks, uncertainties and other factors that may cause actual results, levels of activity, performance, or achievements to differ materially from those expressed or implied by the forward-looking statements. Forward-looking statements are only predictions and the actual events or results may differ materially. Natus cannot provide any assurance that its future results or the results implied by the forward-looking statements will meet expectations. Our future results could differ materially due to a number of factors, including the effects of competition, the demand for our products and services, the impact of adverse global economic conditions on our target markets, our ability to expand our sales in international markets, our ability to maintain current sales levels in a mature domestic market, our ability to control costs, and risks associated with bringing new products to market, integrating acquired businesses, and our ability to fulfill product orders on a timely basis. Natus disclaims any obligation to update information contained in any forward looking statement.
More information about potential risk factors that could affect the business and financial results of Natus is included in Natus' annual report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2009, and its quarterly reports on Form 10-Q, and in other reports filed from time to time by Natus with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission.
COMPANY CONTACT:
Natus Medical Incorporated
Steven J. Murphy
Chief Financial Officer
(650) 802-0400
InvestorRelations@Natus.com


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BABY/BABY-8K-20110301070036.txt.gz
TIME:20110301070036
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
ITEM 2.02.         Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
 
On March 1, 2011, Natus Medical Incorporated (the Company) is issuing a press release and holding a conference call regarding its financial results for the fourth fiscal quarter of 2010 ended December 31, 2010 and other financial information.  A copy of the press release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 to this Form 8-K.
 
The information in this Form 8-K and the exhibit attached hereto shall not be deemed filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the Exchange Act) or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that Section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
 
ITEM 9.01.        Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 
 

 
Exhibit 99.1
 
 
Natus Medical Announces Fourth Quarter and Full Year 2010 Results
(Nasdaq:BABY) today announced financial results for the fourth quarter and full year ended December 31, 2010.
 Natus Medical Incorporated
SAN CARLOS, Calif. (March 1, 2011)
For the fourth quarter ended December 31, 2010, Natus reported revenue of $63.2 million, compared to $51.4 million reported in the comparable quarter of the previous year. Net income was $5.2 million, or $0.18 per diluted share, for the fourth quarter of 2010, compared with net income of $4.0 million, or $0.14 per diluted share, for the fourth quarter of 2009. On a non-GAAP basis the Company reported net income of $7.0 million, or $0.24 per diluted share, for the fourth quarter of 2010, compared with net income of $4.8 million, or $0.17 per diluted share, for the fourth quarter of 2009.
For the year ended December 31, 2010, Natus reported revenue of $218.7 million, compared to $166.4 million reported in 2009. Net income was $12.0 million, or $0.41 per diluted share for the year ended December 31, 2010, compared to net income of $11.3 million, or $0.40 per diluted share in 2009. On a non-GAAP basis the Company reported net income of $19.1 million, or $0.65 per diluted share, for the full year 2010, compared with net income of $14.5 million, or $0.51 per diluted share, for the full year 2009.
I am very pleased with our fourth quarter and 2010 results, as we exceeded our expectations in both revenue and earnings, said Jim Hawkins, Chief Executive Officer of Natus. We experienced strong demand in all of our product categories, particularly newborn care, newborn hearing, and neurology in both the United States and International markets.
Our non-GAAP gross profit of approximately 60% in the fourth quarter was especially satisfying considering the impact on the quarter of our October 2010 acquisition of Medix, which has a historical gross profit percentage in the mid-forties. Early this year, we instituted price increases across all our product lines that will take effect throughout the first half of the year. While we have experienced increased costs, we believe these price increases will allow Natus to achieve a gross profit of 60% or higher for the full year 2011. However, for our first quarter, with seasonally lower revenues, we expect that gross profit will be less than 60%, said Hawkins.
We have substantially completed the integration of Medix. Medix manufactures and markets incubators and warmers, with 90% of its revenue historically coming from Latin America. In January, we brought Medix products into our international sales organization and are now selling them throughout the world, exclusive of the United States. We look to bring these products into the U.S. during 2012.We look forward to strong revenue growth from Medix in the years ahead as their products expand into markets outside of Latin America, added Hawkins.
I am excited and optimistic about our prospects in 2011 as we look to continue to drive our strategy of combining internal growth with accretive acquisitions to continue to build a focused and highly profitable medical device company, said Hawkins.
 
Financial Guidance
Natus reiterated the 2011 financial guidance that it previously provided. For the full year 2011, the Company expects to report revenue of $247 million to $250 million and non-GAAP earnings per share of $0.77 to $0.80. For the first quarter of 2011, the Company expects to report revenue of $56.5 million to $58.5 million and non-GAAP earnings per share of $0.10 to $0.12.
 
 
 
 
 
 
The Company's full year and first quarter 2011 non-GAAP earnings per share guidance excludes amortization expense associated with acquisition-related intangible assets, which the Company expects to be approximately $5 million and $1.2 million for the full year and first quarter 2011, respectively, and which the Company expects will reduce GAAP earnings per share by approximately $0.11 and $0.03 in the respective periods. The non-GAAP earnings per share guidance for both periods also excludes the effects of restructuring charges that the Company expects it may incur in 2011, the amount and timing of which have not yet been determined, as well as the impact any future acquisitions might have on its results of operations.
The Company's non-GAAP guidance includes the impact of expensing employee share based compensation. All earnings per share amounts are on a diluted basis.
The Companys 2011 financial guidance excludes amortization of acquisition related intangible assets, restructuring charges, and the impact future potential acquisitions may have on results of operations. The Company believes that the presentation of financial guidance excluding these factors provides meaningful information to both management and investors that is indicative of the Company's core operating results. Therefore, the Company believes its non-GAAP financial guidance facilitates comparison of operating results across reporting periods.
Use of non-GAAP Financial Measures
The Companys non-GAAP results for 2010 exclude amortization expense associated with certain acquisition-related intangible assets, a restructuring charge to eliminate redundant personnel costs resulting from the acquisition of Alpine Biomed Holdings Corp in September 2009, charges associated with the discontinuance of the Clarity newborn hearing screening product line, and costs associated with the acquisition of Medix, including severance costs and direct costs of the acquisition.
The Company believes that the presentation of results excluding amortization and these other charges provides meaningful supplemental information to both management and investors that is indicative of the Company's core operating results. Therefore, the Company believes these non-GAAP financial measures facilitate comparison of operating results across reporting periods. A reconciliation between the Company's results of operations on a GAAP and non-GAAP basis for the periods reported is included as part of the condensed consolidated statements of operations at the end of the Company's financial results release.
The Company believes that both management and investors benefit from referring to these non-GAAP financial measures in assessing the Company's performance and when planning, forecasting, and analyzing future periods. These non-GAAP financial measures also facilitate management's internal comparisons to the Company's historical performance. The non-GAAP financial measures disclosed by the Company should not be considered a substitute for or superior to financial measures calculated in accordance with GAAP, and the financial results calculated in accordance with GAAP and reconciliations to those financial statements should be carefully evaluated.
 
Conference Call
Natus has scheduled an investment-community conference call to discuss this announcement beginning at 11:00 a.m. Eastern Time today (8:00 a.m. Pacific Time). Individuals interested in listening to the conference call may do so by dialing 800-291-9234 for domestic callers, or 1-617-614-3923 for international callers, and entering reservation code 89357820. A telephone replay will be available for 48 hours following the conclusion of the call by dialing 888-286-8010 for domestic callers, or 1-617-801-6888 for international callers, and entering reservation code 56964324.
 
 
 
 
 
The conference call also will be available real-time via the Internet at http://investor.natus.com and a recording of the call will be available on the Company's Web site for 90 days following the completion of the call.
About Natus Medical Incorporated
 
Natus is a leading provider of healthcare products used for the screening, detection, treatment, monitoring and tracking of common medical ailments in newborn care, hearing impairment, neurological dysfunction, epilepsy, sleep disorders, and balance and mobility disorders. Product offerings include computerized neurodiagnostic systems for audiology, neurology, polysomnography, and neonatalogy, as well as newborn care products such as hearing screening systems, phototherapy devices for the treatment of newborn jaundice, head-cooling products for the treatment of brain injury in newborns, incubators to control the newborns environment, and software systems for managing and tracking disorders and diseases for public health laboratories.
Additional information about Natus Medical can be found at www.natus.com.
This press release contains forward-looking statements as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, particularly statements regarding the expectations, beliefs, plans, intentions and strategies of Natus. These forward-looking statements include statements regarding revenue and non-GAAP profitability in the first quarter and full year 2011, the achievement of a 60 percent gross profit in 2011, the impact of amortization expense associated with acquisition-related intangible assets, the potential for future restructuring charges, the potential for future acquisitions, revenue growth of Medix, and the intent to bring Medix products into the United Sates. These statements relate to current estimates and assumptions of our management as of the date of this press release, and future events or Natus' future financial pe rformance or results, and involve known and unknown risks, uncertainties and other factors that may cause actual results, levels of activity, performance, or achievements to differ materially from those expressed or implied by the forward-looking statements. Forward-looking statements are only predictions and the actual events or results may differ materially. Natus cannot provide any assurance that its future results or the results implied by the forward-looking statements will meet expectations. Our future results could differ materially due to a number of factors, including the effects of competition, the demand for our products and services, the impact of adverse global economic conditions on our target markets, our ability to expand our sales in international markets, our ability to maintain current sales levels in a mature domestic market, our ability to control costs, and risks associated with bringing new products to market, integrating acquired businesses, and our ability to fulfill product orders o n a timely basis. Natus disclaims any obligation to update information contained in any forward looking statement.
More information about potential risk factors that could affect the business and financial results of Natus is included in Natus' annual report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2009, and its quarterly reports on Form 10-Q, and in other reports filed from time to time by Natus with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Note:
The Company has elected to provide non-GAAP financial results that exclude the items below as this presentation is common among companies that are active acquirors and whose results are, accordingly, affected by such charges, because this information is used by management to evaluate operating results and because it believes this information will assist investors in making period to period comparisons of the Company's operating results.
 
 
 
 
COMPANY CONTACT:
Natus Medical Incorporated
Steven J. Murphy
Chief Financial Officer
(650) 802-0400
InvestorRelations@Natus.com


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BABY/BABY-8K-20110428080221.txt.gz
TIME:20110428080221
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C.  20549
Form 8-K
Current Report
Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported):  
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
April 28, 2011
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (
see
General Instruction A.2. below):
          
 - 
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
          
 - 
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
          
 - 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
          
 - 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
ITEM 2.02.      Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On April 28, 2011, Natus Medical Incorporated (the Company) is issuing a press release and holding a conference call regarding its financial results for the first fiscal quarter of 2011 ended March 31, 2011 and other financial information.  A copy of the press release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 to this Form 8-K.
The information in this Form 8-K and the exhibit attached hereto shall not be deemed filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the Exchange Act) or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that Section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
ITEM 9.01.     Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d) Exhibits.
SIGNATURES
          Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Exhibit Index

Exhibit 99.1
Natus Medical Announces 2011 First Quarter Financial Results
- First Quarter Non-GAAP Net Income Increased 55%
- Company Increases 2011 Non-GAAP Earnings per Share Guidance
SAN CARLOS, Calif.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--April 28, 2011-- (Nasdaq:BABY) today announced financial results for the three months ended March 31, 2011.
Natus Medical Incorporated
For the first quarter ended March 31, 2011, revenue increased 20% to $59.1 million, compared to $49.3 million in the comparable quarter of the previous year. Net income was $3.1 million, or $0.11 per diluted share, compared with a net loss of $331,000, or $(0.01) per diluted share in for the first quarter of 2010.
The Company reported non-GAAP earnings per share of $0.13 per diluted share for the first quarter 2011 compared to $0.09 per share diluted share for the first quarter of 2010. Non-GAAP net income increased 55% to $3.9 million compared to $2.5 million reported in 2010. The non-GAAP results in both periods exclude amortization expense associated with certain acquisition-related intangible assets.
I am very pleased with our first quarter 2011 results as we exceeded our expectations in both revenue and earnings, said Jim Hawkins, Chief Executive Officer of the Company. We experienced strong demand in our Neurology business and our Newborn Care business remained solid. Our Domestic Neurology business had an exceptional first quarter.
We continue to see an increase in large orders in the first quarter and believe this indicates that hospital spending continues to improve in both the United States and the rest of the world, said Hawkins.
I am also pleased with the quarters non-GAAP gross profit of 59.7% as it includes the results of Medix, which has a gross profit percentage currently in the forties. During the quarter, we completed the integration of Medix into Natus and we anticipate that the Medix gross profit will improve throughout 2011, added Hawkins. We remain enthusiastic about our opportunities in Latin America over the coming years.
I remain very excited about our prospects in 2011 as we look to execute on our strategy of combining internal growth with accretive acquisitions, said Hawkins.
As of March 31, 2011, the Company had cash, cash equivalents, and short-term investments of $33.9 million, stockholders' equity of approximately $270 million, and working capital of approximately $92 million.
Financial Guidance
Natus updated its 2011 financial guidance. For the full year 2011, the Company expects to report revenue of approximately $250 million and non-GAAP earnings per share of $0.80 to $0.81. The Company had earlier said that it expected to report revenue of $247 million to $250 million and non-GAAP earnings per share of $0.77 to $0.80.
The Company expects to report revenue of $62 million to $64 million and non-GAAP earnings per share of $0.17 to $0.18 in the second quarter of 2011. This compares to revenue of $52.7 million and non-GAAP earnings per share of $0.15 reported in the second quarter of 2010.
The Company's full year and second quarter 2011 non-GAAP earnings per share guidance excludes amortization expense associated with acquisition-related intangible assets, which the Company expects to be approximately $5.2 million and $1.3 million for the full year and second quarter 2011, respectively, and which the Company expects will reduce GAAP earnings per share by approximately $0.11 and $0.03 in the respective periods. The non-GAAP earnings per share guidance for both periods also excludes the effects of restructuring charges that the Company expects it may incur in 2011, the amount and timing of which have not yet been determined, as well as the impact any future acquisitions might have on its results of operations.
The Company's non-GAAP guidance includes the impact of expensing employee share based compensation. All non-GAAP earnings per share amounts are on a diluted basis.
The Company's 2011 financial guidance excludes amortization of acquisition-related intangible assets, restructuring charges, and the impact that any future acquisitions may have on results of operations. The Company believes that the presentation of financial guidance excluding these factors provides meaningful information to both management and investors that is indicative of the Company's core operating results. Therefore, the Company believes its non-GAAP financial guidance facilitates comparison of operating results across reporting periods.
Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures
The Company's non-GAAP results for the first quarter 2011 exclude amortization expense associated with certain acquisition-related intangible assets.
The Company believes that the presentation of results excluding this amortization provides meaningful supplemental information to both management and investors that is indicative of the Company's core operating results. Therefore, the Company believes these non-GAAP financial measures facilitate comparison of operating results across reporting periods. A reconciliation between the Company's results of operations on a GAAP and non-GAAP basis for the periods reported is included as part of the condensed consolidated statements of operations at the end of this release.
The Company believes that both management and investors benefit from referring to these non-GAAP financial measures in assessing the Company's performance and when planning, forecasting, and analyzing future periods. These non-GAAP financial measures also facilitate management's internal comparisons to the Company's historical performance. The non-GAAP financial measures disclosed by the Company should not be considered a substitute for or superior to financial measures calculated in accordance with GAAP, and the financial results calculated in accordance with GAAP and reconciliations to those financial statements should be carefully evaluated.
Conference Call
Natus has scheduled an investment-community conference call to discuss this announcement beginning at 11:00 a.m. Eastern Time today (8:00 a.m. Pacific Time). Individuals interested in listening to the conference call may do so by dialing 800-329-0097 for domestic callers, or 1-617-614-4929 for international callers, and entering reservation code 95807908. A telephone replay will be available for 48 hours following the conclusion of the call by dialing 888-286-8010 for domestic callers, or 1-617-801-6888 for international callers, and entering reservation code 15489883.
The conference call also will be available real-time via the Internet at , and a recording of the call will be available on the Companys Web site for 90 days following the completion of the call.
http://investor.natus.com
About Natus Medical Incorporated
Natus is a leading provider of healthcare products used for the screening, detection, treatment, monitoring and tracking of common medical ailments in newborn care, hearing impairment, neurological dysfunction, epilepsy, sleep disorders, and balance and mobility disorders. Product offerings include computerized neurodiagnostic systems for audiology, neurology, polysomnography, and neonatalogy, as well as newborn care products such as hearing screening systems, phototherapy devices for the treatment of newborn jaundice, head-cooling products for the treatment of brain injury in newborns, incubators to control the newborn's environment, and software systems for managing and tracking disorders and diseases for public health laboratories.
Additional information about Natus Medical can be found at .
www.natus.com
This press release contains forward-looking statements as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, particularly statements regarding the expectations, beliefs, plans, intentions and strategies of Natus. These forward-looking statements include statements regarding revenue and non-GAAP profitability in the second quarter and full year 2011, the impact of amortization expense associated with acquisition-related intangible assets, the potential for future restructuring charges, the potential for future acquisitions, and opportunities in Latin America. These statements relate to current estimates and assumptions of our management as of the date of this press release, and future events or Natus' future financial performance or results, and involve known and unknown risks, uncertainties and other factors that may cause actual results, levels of activity, performance, or achievements to differ materially from those expressed or implied by the forward-looking statements. Forward-looking statements are only predictions and the actual events or results may differ materially. Natus cannot provide any assurance that its future results or the results implied by the forward-looking statements will meet expectations. Our future results could differ materially due to a number of factors, including the effects of competition, the demand for our products and services, the impact of adverse global economic conditions on our target markets, our ability to expand our sales in international markets, our ability to maintain current sales levels in a mature domestic market, our ability to control costs, risks associated with bringing new products to market and integrating acquired businesses, and our ability to fulfill product orders on a timely basis. Natus disclaims any obligation to update information contained in any forward looking statement.
More information about potential risk factors that could affect the business and financial results of Natus is included in Natus' annual report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2010, and its quarterly reports on Form 10-Q, and in other reports filed from time to time by Natus with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission.
CONTACT: Natus Medical Incorporated Steven J. Murphy, 650-802-0400 Chief Financial Officer
InvestorRelations@Natus.com


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BABY/BABY-8K-20110603141535.txt.gz
TIME:20110603141535
EVENTS:	Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders
TEXT:
ITEM: Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On June 2, 2011, Natus Medical Incorporated (the "Company") held its annual meeting of stockholders. At this meeting, Mark D. Michael and Kenneth E. Ludlum were both re-elected to serve on the Board of Directors for three-year terms until 2014. Additionally, stockholders ratified the appointment of Deloitte & Touche LLP as the Company's independent registered public accounting firm for the fiscal year ending December 31, 2011. Stockholders also held an advisory vote on the issue of executive compensation and further voted to hold such advisory vote on an annual basis. Stockholders also ratified the Company's 2011 Stock Awards Plan and 2011 Employee Stock Purchase Plan.
The number of shares represented in person or in proxy and constituting a quorum was approximately 90% of the Company's 29,002,050 shares outstanding on the record date April 8, 2011, including broker non-votes. The results of the shareholder vote are as follows:
Proposal 1: Election of Directors
Noiminee
 
Proposal 2: Ratification of Deloitte & Touche LLP as Auditors
 
Proposal 3: Advisory Vote Regarding Executive Compensation
 
Proposal 4: Advisory Vote on the Frequency with which and Advisory Vote on Executive Compensation should be held
 
Proposal 5: Approval of the 2011 Stock Awards Plan
 
Proposal 6: Approval of the 2011 Employee Stock Purchase Plan
 
No other matters were considered or voted upon at the meeting.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BABY/BABY-8K-20110707073025.txt.gz
TIME:20110707073025
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C.  20549
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported):
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
July 7, 2011
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 - 
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 - 
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 - 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 - 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
ITEM 2.02.      Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
Attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1 and incorporated by reference herein is information regarding the Companys press release of July 7, 2011 announcing preliminary second quarter 2011 revenue results.
ITEM 9.01.     Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d) Exhibits.
SIGNATURES
          Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Exhibit Index

Exhibit 99.1
Natus Medical Announces Preliminary 2011 Second Quarter Revenue Results
- Financial Results Conference Call Scheduled for July 28, 2011
SAN CARLOS, Calif.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--July 7, 2011-- (Nasdaq:BABY) today announced that it expects to report revenue for the second quarter of 2011 of approximately $58 million, up 10% from revenue in the same period last year, but below the $62 million to $64 million guidance provided earlier.
Natus Medical Incorporated
While we achieved record second quarter revenue, it was lower than we had anticipated, said Jim Hawkins, Chief Executive Officer of the Company. Revenue was below our expectations in both the United States and international markets. Sales activity was solid throughout the quarter; however, several large orders that we had expected to receive late in the quarter were not placed.
We are continuing to evaluate whether the factors that led to the revenue shortfall will impact our operating results for the full year 2011 and intend to discuss our outlook for the remainder of 2011 in our second quarter financial results conference call on July 28th, added Hawkins.
We remain committed to our goal of achieving annual revenue of $500 million in 2014, and look to accomplish this through a combination of internal growth and accretive acquisitions, said Hawkins.
Conference Call
Natus expects to report its complete 2011 second quarter financial results on July 28, 2011 and will hold a conference call on that day to discuss those results and its 2011 guidance. Dial-in and webcast access information will be made available prior to the call.
About Natus Medical Incorporated
Natus is a leading provider of healthcare products used for the screening, detection, treatment, monitoring and tracking of common medical ailments in newborn care, hearing impairment, neurological dysfunction, epilepsy, sleep disorders, and balance and mobility disorders. Product offerings include computerized neurodiagnostic systems for audiology, neurology, polysomnography, and neonatalogy, as well as newborn care products such as hearing screening systems, phototherapy devices for the treatment of newborn jaundice, head-cooling products for the treatment of brain injury in newborns, incubators to control the newborn's environment, and software systems for managing and tracking disorders and diseases for public health laboratories.
Additional information about Natus Medical can be found at .
www.natus.com
This press release contains forward-looking statements as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, particularly statements regarding the expectations, beliefs, plans, intentions and strategies of Natus. These forward-looking statements include revenue expectations in 2014, organic revenue growth, and the completion of accretive acquisitions. These statements relate to current estimates and assumptions of our management as of the date of this press release, and future events or Natus' future financial performance or results, and involve known and unknown risks, uncertainties and other factors that may cause actual results, levels of activity, performance, or achievements to differ materially from those expressed or implied by the forward-looking statements. Forward-looking statements are only predictions and the actual events or results may differ materially. Natus cannot provide any assurance that its future results or the results implied by the forward-looking statements will meet expectations. Our future results could differ materially due to a number of factors, including the effects of competition, the demand for our products and services, the impact of adverse global economic conditions on our target markets, our ability to expand our sales in international markets, our ability to maintain current sales levels in a mature domestic market, our ability to control costs, risks associated with bringing new products to market and integrating acquired businesses, and our ability to fulfill product orders on a timely basis. Natus disclaims any obligation to update information contained in any forward looking statement.
More information about potential risk factors that could affect the business and financial results of Natus is included in Natus' annual report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2010, and its quarterly reports on Form 10-Q, and in other reports filed from time to time by Natus with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission.
CONTACT: Natus Medical Incorporated Steven J. Murphy, 650-802-0400 Chief Financial Officer
InvestorRelations@Natus.com


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BABY/BABY-8K-20110728071022.txt.gz
TIME:20110728071022
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C.  20549
Form 8-K
Current Report
Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported):  
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
July 28, 2011
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
          
 - 
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
          
 - 
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
          
 - 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
          
 - 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
ITEM 2.02.      Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On July 28, 2011, Natus Medical Incorporated (the Company) is issuing a press release and holding a conference call regarding its financial results for its second quarter ended June 30, 2011 and other financial information.  A copy of the press release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 to this Form 8-K.
The information in this Form 8-K and the exhibit attached hereto shall not be deemed filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the Exchange Act) or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that Section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
ITEM 9.01.     Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d) Exhibits.
SIGNATURES
          Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Exhibit Index

Exhibit 99.1
Natus Medical Announces 2011 Second Quarter Financial Results
Company Updates 2011 Revenue and Non-GAAP Earnings per Share Guidance
SAN CARLOS, Calif.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--July 28, 2011-- (Nasdaq:BABY) today announced financial results for the three and six months ended June 30, 2011.
Natus Medical Incorporated
For the second quarter ended June 30, 2011, the Company reported revenue of $58.1 million, an increase of 10% over revenue of $53.0 million in the comparable quarter of the previous year. Net income was $2.3 million or $0.08 per diluted share, compared to net income of $3.4 million or $0.12 per diluted share for the second quarter of 2010.
For the six months ended June 30, 2011, the Company reported net income of $5.4 million, or $0.18 per diluted share, compared to net income of $3.0 million, or $0.10 per diluted share, for the comparable period in 2010.
The Company reported non-GAAP earnings per share of $0.13 per diluted share for the second quarter of 2011 compared to $0.16 per share diluted share for the same period in 2010. Non-GAAP net income was $3.8 million in the 2011 period compared to $4.6 million in 2010. For the six months ended June 30, 2011 non-GAAP net income was $7.8 million compared to $7.4 million in the same period in 2010. Non-GAAP earnings per share was $0.26 for the six-month periods in both 2011 and 2010.
In commenting on the second quarter revenue results, Jim Hawkins, Chief Executive Officer of the Company said, We were disappointed with our second quarter results, as orders did not materialize as we expected in both the United States and our international markets.
In our business planning for 2011, we had targeted to receive certain large international orders throughout the year for our newborn care products, just as we had in 2010 when we delivered four large orders into the Middle East, Canada, and Australia, said Hawkins. While we still expect these orders to come in, our latest indications are that customers may defer some or all of them until 2012. This, coupled with a revised relatively flat second half domestic revenue forecast, has led us to revise our guidance for the remainder of 2011.
With regard to the lower than expected non-GAAP gross profit margin of 57.9% for the second quarter 2011, Mr. Hawkins said, Our second quarter operating results were also impacted by lower than expected gross margins. In addition to the lower gross margin we had expected from the Medix business, unexpected changes in our product mix during the second quarter adversely affected our margins, and market conditions prevented the full realization of price increases that had been planned.
We were pleased that our neurology business remained solid during the second quarter, with organic growth of approximately 6% on a year-over-year basis, as we continued to grow in this market segment in both the United States and international markets, added Hawkins. We also continue our active pursuit of acquisition opportunities and plan to complete a transaction in 2011, as we have in virtually every year since 2004.
During the last seven years Natus has grown from $36 million in revenue to our revised expectation of approximately $236 million this year. We believe our proven business model will continue to show strong growth in the years ahead, notwithstanding what looks to be a challenging 2011. We remain committed to our goal of achieving annual revenue of $500 million in 2014, and look to accomplish this through a combination of internal growth and accretive acquisitions, said Hawkins.
As of June 30, 2011, the Company had cash, cash equivalents, and short-term investments of $37.7 million, stockholders' equity of approximately $275 million, and working capital of approximately $97 million.
Financial Guidance
Natus updated its 2011 financial guidance. For the full year 2011, the Company expects to report revenue of approximately $236 million and non-GAAP earnings per share of $0.58 to $0.60. The Company had earlier said that it expected to report revenue of approximately $250 million and non-GAAP earnings per share of $0.80 to $0.81.
The Company expects to report revenue of approximately $58 million and non-GAAP earnings per share of $0.13 to $0.14 in the third quarter of 2011. This compares to revenue of $53.2 million and non-GAAP earnings per share of $0.16 reported in the third quarter of 2010.
For the fourth quarter 2011, the Company expects to report revenue of approximately $61 million and non-GAAP earnings per share of $0.19 to $0.20. This compares to revenue of $63.2 million and non-GAAP earnings per share of $0.24 reported in the fourth quarter of 2010.
The Company's third quarter, fourth quarter, and full year 2011 non-GAAP earnings per share guidance excludes amortization expense associated with acquisition-related intangible assets, which the Company expects to be approximately $5.2 million and $1.3 million for the full year and each of the third and fourth quarters 2011, respectively, and which the Company expects will reduce GAAP earnings per share by approximately $0.11 for the full year and $0.03 in each quarterly period. The non-GAAP earnings per share guidance for those periods also excludes the effects of restructuring charges that the Company expects it may incur in the remainder of 2011, the amount and timing of which have not yet been determined, as well as the impact any future acquisitions might have on its results of operations.
The Company's non-GAAP guidance includes the impact of expensing employee share based compensation. All non-GAAP earnings per share amounts are on a diluted basis.
The Company's 2011 non-GAAP financial guidance excludes amortization of acquisition-related intangible assets, restructuring charges, and the impact that any future acquisitions may have on results of operations. The Company believes that the presentation of financial guidance excluding these factors provides meaningful information to both management and investors that is indicative of the Company's core operating results. Therefore, the Company believes its non-GAAP financial guidance facilitates comparison of operating results across reporting periods.
Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures
The Company's non-GAAP results for the three and six months ended June 30, 2011 exclude amortization expense associated with certain acquisition-related intangible assets and a restructuring charge associated primarily with severance costs tied to the acquisition of Medix in the fourth quarter 2010.
The Company believes that the presentation of results excluding amortization and the severance costs provides meaningful supplemental information to both management and investors that is indicative of the Company's core operating results. Therefore, the Company believes these non-GAAP financial measures facilitate comparison of operating results across reporting periods. A reconciliation between the Company's results of operations on a GAAP and non-GAAP basis for the periods reported is included as part of the condensed consolidated statements of operations at the end of this release.
The Company believes that both management and investors benefit from referring to these non-GAAP financial measures in assessing the Company's performance and when planning, forecasting, and analyzing future periods. These non-GAAP financial measures also facilitate management's internal comparisons to the Company's historical performance. The non-GAAP financial measures disclosed by the Company should not be considered a substitute for or superior to financial measures calculated in accordance with GAAP, and the financial results calculated in accordance with GAAP and reconciliations to those financial statements should be carefully evaluated.
Conference Call
Natus has scheduled an investment-community conference call to discuss this announcement beginning at 11:00 a.m. Eastern Time today (8:00 a.m. Pacific Time). Individuals interested in listening to the conference call may do so by dialing 800-920-8624 for domestic callers, or 1-617-597-5430 for international callers, and entering reservation code 79975603. A telephone replay will be available for 48 hours following the conclusion of the call by dialing 888-286-8010 for domestic callers, or 1-617-801-6888 for international callers, and entering reservation code 35776360.
The conference call also will be available real-time via the Internet at , and a recording of the call will be available on the Companys Web site for 90 days following the completion of the call.
http://investor.natus.com
About Natus Medical Incorporated
Natus is a leading provider of healthcare products used for the screening, detection, treatment, monitoring and tracking of common medical ailments in newborn care, hearing impairment, neurological dysfunction, epilepsy, sleep disorders, and balance and mobility disorders. Product offerings include computerized neurodiagnostic systems for audiology, neurology, polysomnography, and neonatology, as well as newborn care products such as hearing screening systems, phototherapy devices for the treatment of newborn jaundice, head-cooling products for the treatment of brain injury in newborns, incubators to control the newborn's environment, and software systems for managing and tracking disorders and diseases for public health laboratories.
Additional information about Natus Medical can be found at .
www.natus.com
This press release contains forward-looking statements as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, particularly statements regarding the expectations, beliefs, plans, intentions and strategies of Natus. These forward-looking statements include statements regarding revenue and non-GAAP profitability in the third quarter, fourth quarter, and full year 2011, the likelihood of receiving and the timing of large international orders in the future, the impact of amortization expense associated with acquisition-related intangible assets, the potential for future restructuring charges, and the potential for future acquisitions including the plan to complete an acquisition in 2011. These statements relate to current estimates and assumptions of our management as of the date of this press release, and future events or Natus' future financial performance or results, and involve known and unknown risks, uncertainties and other factors that may cause actual results, levels of activity, performance, or achievements to differ materially from those expressed or implied by the forward-looking statements. Forward-looking statements are only predictions and the actual events or results may differ materially. Natus cannot provide any assurance that its future results or the results implied by the forward-looking statements will meet expectations. Our future results could differ materially due to a number of factors, including the effects of competition, the demand for our products and services, the impact of adverse global economic conditions on our target markets, our ability to expand our sales in international markets, our ability to maintain current sales levels in a mature domestic market, our ability to control costs, risks associated with bringing new products to market and integrating acquired businesses, and our ability to fulfill product orders on a timely basis. Natus disclaims any obligation to update information contained in any forward looking statement.
More information about potential risk factors that could affect the business and financial results of Natus is included in Natus' annual report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2010, and its quarterly reports on Form 10-Q, and in other reports filed from time to time by Natus with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission.
CONTACT: Natus Medical Incorporated Steven J. Murphy, 650-802-0400 Chief Financial Officer
InvestorRelations@Natus.com


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BABY/BABY-8K-20110909060451.txt.gz
TIME:20110909060451
EVENTS:	Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders
TEXT:
ITEM: Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Explanatory Note
This Current Report on Form 8-K/A is being filed as an amendment ("Amendment No. 1") to the Current Report on Form 8-K filed by Natus Medical Incorporated (the "Company") with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission on June 3, 2011 ("Original Filing"). The sole purpose of this Amendment No. 1 is to disclose the Company's decision as to how frequently it will conduct future stockholder votes on executive compensation. No other changes have been made to the Original Filing.
 
At the Company's 2011 Annual Stockholders' Meeting held on June 2, 2011, the Company's stockholders voted on, among other matters, a proposal on the frequency of future stockholder votes on executive compensation. As previously reported by the Company, a frequency of every "One Year" received the highest number of votes on the proposal. Based on these results and other factors considered by the Company's Board of Directors, the Company will conduct stockholder votes on executive compensation every year until the next required vote on the frequency of stockholder votes on executive compensation. The Company is required to hold votes on frequency every six years.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BABY/BABY-8K-20111011070018.txt.gz
TIME:20111011070018
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C.  20549
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported):
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
October 10, 2011
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 - 
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 - 
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 - 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 - 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
ITEM 2.02.     Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
Attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1 and incorporated by reference herein is information regarding the Companys press release of October 10, 2011 announcing preliminary third quarter 2011 revenue results and other financial information.
ITEM 9.01.     Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d) Exhibits.
SIGNATURES
          Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Exhibit Index

Exhibit 99.1
Natus Medical Announces Preliminary 2011 Third Quarter Revenue Results
- Updates 2011 Full Year and Fourth Quarter Financial Guidance
- Financial Results Conference Call Scheduled for October 27, 2011
SAN CARLOS, Calif.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--October 10, 2011-- (Nasdaq:BABY) today announced that it expects to report revenue for the third quarter of 2011 of approximately $51.5 million, including approximately $1.5 million from Embla Systems, which the Company acquired on September 15, 2011. Revenue for the core business is below the $58 million that the Company projected in its financial results call in July 2011.
Natus Medical Incorporated
The revenue shortfall in the third quarter was primarily in our neurology business in both domestic and international markets where we experienced delays in orders and in the United States also a reduction in order size, said Jim Hawkins, Chief Executive Officer of the Company. Our Medix subsidiary, with newborn care products sold primarily in South America, also experienced a shortfall due to delayed orders.
Our other newborn care products, including our newborn hearing screening, newborn brain monitoring, and phototherapy product lines performed to expectations in the third quarter, said Hawkins. The integration of Embla Systems is also on track and we expect Embla to contribute $0.08 to non-GAAP earning per share in 2012. As we discussed in our last conference call, we are taking cost out of our core businesses in the fourth quarter and throughout 2012.
Financial Guidance
Natus updated its 2011 financial guidance.
The Company expects to report revenue of approximately $234 million and $65 million for the full year 2011 and fourth quarter 2011, respectively, including approximately $7.5 million from Embla Systems in the fourth quarter. The Company had earlier said that it expected to report revenue of approximately $236 million and $61 million for the respective periods.
For the fourth quarter 2011, the Company expects to report non-GAAP earnings per share of approximately $0.15. The Company had earlier said that it expected to report non-GAAP earnings per share of $0.19 to $0.20 for the fourth quarter of 2011.
The Company's fourth quarter 2011 non-GAAP earnings per share guidance excludes amortization expense associated with acquisition-related intangible assets, which the Company expects will fareduce GAAP earnings per share by approximately $0.03. The non-GAAP earnings per share guidance also does not give effect to any restructuring charges that the Company may incur in the fourth quarter 2011, the amount and timing of which have not yet been determined, as well as the impact of any future acquisitions.
The Company's non-GAAP guidance includes the impact of expensing employee share based compensation. All non-GAAP earnings per share amounts are on a diluted basis.
Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures
The Company's fourth quarter 2011 non-GAAP financial guidance excludes amortization of acquisition-related intangible assets, restructuring charges, and the impact that any future acquisitions may have on results of operations. The Company believes that the presentation of financial guidance excluding these factors provides meaningful information to both management and investors that is indicative of the Company's core operating results. Therefore, the Company believes its non-GAAP financial guidance facilitates comparison of operating results across reporting periods.
Conference Call
The Company intends to release its full 2011 third quarter financial results before the market opens on Thursday, October 27, 2011. Natus management will host an investment-community conference call the same day beginning at 11:00 a.m. Eastern Time (8:00 a.m. Pacific Time) to discuss those results and to answer questions.
Individuals interested in listening to the conference call may do so by dialing 866-277-1182 for domestic callers, or 1-617-597-5359 for international callers, and entering reservation code 23189279. A telephone replay will be available for 48 hours following the conclusion of the call by dialing 888-286-8010 for domestic callers, or 1-617-801-6888 for international callers, and entering reservation code 85016916.
The conference call also will be available real-time via the Internet at , and a recording of the call will be available on the Company's Web site for 90 days following the completion of the call.
http://investor.natus.com
About Natus Medical Incorporated
Natus is a leading provider of healthcare products used for the screening, detection, treatment, monitoring and tracking of common medical ailments in newborn care, hearing impairment, neurological dysfunction, epilepsy, sleep disorders, and balance and mobility disorders. Product offerings include computerized neurodiagnostic systems for audiology, neurology, polysomnography, and neonatology, as well as newborn care products such as hearing screening systems, phototherapy devices for the treatment of newborn jaundice, head-cooling products for the treatment of brain injury in newborns, incubators to control the newborn's environment, and software systems for managing and tracking disorders and diseases for public health laboratories.
Additional information about Natus Medical can be found at .
www.natus.com
This press release contains forward-looking statements as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, particularly statements regarding the expectations, beliefs, plans, intentions and strategies of Natus. These forward-looking statements include statements regarding revenue for the full year 2011, revenue and non-GAAP profitability in the fourth quarter, the impact of amortization expense associated with acquisition-related intangible assets, the potential for future restructuring charges, and the contribution of Embla Systems to earnings in 2012. These statements relate to current estimates and assumptions of our management as of the date of this press release, and future events or Natus' future financial performance or results, and involve known and unknown risks, uncertainties and other factors that may cause actual results, levels of activity, performance, or achievements to differ materially from those expressed or implied by the forward-looking statements. Forward-looking statements are only predictions and the actual events or results may differ materially. Natus cannot provide any assurance that its future results or the results implied by the forward-looking statements will meet expectations. Our future results could differ materially due to a number of factors, including the effects of competition, the demand for our products and services, the impact of adverse global economic conditions on our target markets, our ability to expand our sales in international markets, our ability to maintain current sales levels in a mature domestic market, our ability to control costs, risks associated with bringing new products to market and integrating acquired businesses, and our ability to fulfill product orders on a timely basis. Natus disclaims any obligation to update information contained in any forward looking statement.
More information about potential risk factors that could affect the business and financial results of Natus is included in Natus' annual report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2010, and its quarterly reports on Form 10-Q, and in other reports filed from time to time by Natus with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission.
CONTACT: Natus Medical Incorporated Steven J. Murphy, 650-802-0400 Chief Financial Officer
InvestorRelations@Natus.com


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BABY/BABY-8K-20111027070237.txt.gz
TIME:20111027070237
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C.  20549
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported):
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
October 27, 2011
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 - 
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 - 
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 - 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 - 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
ITEM 2.02.      Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On October 27, 2011, Natus Medical Incorporated (the Company) is issuing a press release and holding a conference call regarding its financial results for its third quarter ended September 30, 2011 and other financial information.  A copy of the press release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 to this Form 8-K.
The information in this Form 8-K and the exhibit attached hereto shall not be deemed filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the Exchange Act) or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that Section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
ITEM 9.01.     Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d) Exhibits.
SIGNATURES
          Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Exhibit Index

Exhibit 99.1
Natus Medical Announces 2011 Third Quarter Financial Results
- Company Updates 2011 Revenue and Non-GAAP Earnings per Share Guidance
SAN CARLOS, Calif.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--October 27, 2011-- (NASDAQ:BABY) today announced financial results for the three and nine months ended September 30, 2011.
Natus Medical Incorporated
The Company reported revenue of $51.3 million for the third quarter ended September 30, 2011, compared to revenue of $53.2 million reported in the comparable quarter of the previous year. Embla Systems, which the company acquired on September 15, 2011, contributed $1.3 million of revenue. Net income was $153,000 or $0.01 per diluted share, compared to net income of $3.6 million or $0.12 per diluted share for the third quarter of 2010.
For the nine months ended September 30, 2011, the Company reported net income of $5.6 million, or $0.19 per diluted share, compared to net income of $6.7 million, or $0.23 per diluted share, for the comparable period in 2010.
The Company reported non-GAAP earnings per share of $0.07 per diluted share for the third quarter of 2011 compared to $0.16 per diluted share for the same period in 2010. Non-GAAP net income was $2.1 million in the 2011 period compared to $4.8 million in the third quarter of 2010. For the nine months ended September 30, 2011 non-GAAP net income was $9.9 million, or $0.34 per share, compared to $12.0 million or $0.41 per share for the same period in 2010.
In commenting on the third quarter revenue results, Jim Hawkins, Chief Executive Officer of the Company said, The third quarter revenue shortfall, which is consistent with the expected results we announced on October 10th, was primarily attributable to our neurology business where we experienced order delays in both domestic and international markets and also a reduction in order size in the United States. Our Medix subsidiary, with newborn care products sold primarily in Latin America, also experienced a shortfall that was due to delayed orders. Our other newborn care products, including our newborn hearing screening, newborn brain monitoring, and phototherapy product lines performed to expectations in the third quarter.
In the third quarter we experienced a reduction in large capital equipment orders over $300,000, primarily in our domestic neurology business. Although some orders we expected were placed during the quarter at significantly reduced order size, other orders were not placed at all. We believe that the orders we were working on during the third quarter have not been lost, but have been merely delayed, and we expect that they will eventually be placed with Natus, added Hawkins. We experienced similar sales activity in late 2008 and early 2009 and then saw those delayed orders placed in following quarters.
We look forward to capitalizing on the opportunity that recently acquired Embla Systems brings to our neurology business as we are now a leader in the growing worldwide market for diagnostic sleep products, added Hawkins. We expect the Embla acquisition to be accretive to our earnings in 2012, adding approximately $0.08 to non-GAAP earnings per share.
As of September 30, 2011, the Company had cash, cash equivalents, and short-term investments of $30.8 million, stockholders' equity of approximately $275 million, and working capital of approximately $89 million.
Financial Guidance
Natus updated its 2011 financial guidance. For the full year 2011, the Company expects to report revenue of approximately $234 million and non-GAAP earnings per share of approximately $0.48.
For the fourth quarter 2011, the Company expects to report revenue of approximately $65 million and non-GAAP earnings per share of approximately $0.15. This compares to revenue of $63.2 million and non-GAAP earnings per share of $0.24 reported in the fourth quarter of 2010.
The Company's fourth quarter and full year 2011 non-GAAP earnings per share guidance excludes amortization expense associated with acquisition-related intangible assets, which the Company expects to be approximately $5.2 million and $1.3 million for the full year and fourth quarter 2011, respectively, and which the Company expects will reduce GAAP earnings per share by approximately $0.11 and $0.03 for the full year and quarter, respectively. The non-GAAP earnings per share guidance for those periods also excludes the effects of restructuring charges that the Company expects it may incur in the fourth quarter of 2011, the amount and timing of which have not yet been determined, as well as the impact any future acquisitions might have on its results of operations.
The Company's non-GAAP guidance includes the impact of expensing employee share based compensation. All non-GAAP earnings per share amounts are on a diluted basis.
Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures
The Company's non-GAAP results for the three and nine months ended September 30, 2011 exclude amortization expense associated with certain acquisition-related intangible assets, restructuring charges associated primarily with employee severance costs, and directs costs of the Embla acquisition, and its fourth quarter and full year guidance exclude such amortization expenses, restructuring charges, and acquisition costs, and the impact of any future acquisitions.
The Company believes that the presentation of historical results and guidance excluding these items provides meaningful supplemental information to both management and investors that is indicative of the Company's core operating results. Therefore, the Company believes these non-GAAP financial measures facilitate comparison of operating results across reporting periods. A reconciliation between the Company's historical results of operations on a GAAP and non-GAAP basis for the periods reported is included as part of the condensed consolidated statements of operations at the end of this release.
The Company believes that both management and investors benefit from referring to these non-GAAP financial measures in assessing the Company's performance and when planning, forecasting, and analyzing future periods. These non-GAAP financial measures also facilitate management's internal comparisons to the Company's historical performance. The non-GAAP financial measures disclosed by the Company should not be considered a substitute for or superior to financial measures calculated in accordance with GAAP, and the financial results calculated in accordance with GAAP and reconciliations to those financial statements should be carefully evaluated.
Conference Call
Natus has scheduled an investment-community conference call to discuss this announcement beginning at 11:00 a.m. Eastern Time (8:00 a.m. Pacific Time) today, October 27, 2011. Individuals interested in listening to the conference call may do so by dialing 866-277-1182 for domestic callers, or 1-617-597-5359 for international callers, and entering reservation code 23189279. A telephone replay will be available for 48 hours following the conclusion of the call by dialing 888-286-8010 for domestic callers, or 1-617-801-6888 for international callers, and entering reservation code 85016916.
The conference call also will be available real-time via the Internet at , and a recording of the call will be available on the Companys Web site for 90 days following the completion of the call.
http://investor.natus.com
About Natus Medical Incorporated
Natus is a leading provider of healthcare products used for the screening, detection, treatment, monitoring and tracking of common medical ailments in newborn care, hearing impairment, neurological dysfunction, epilepsy, sleep disorders, and balance and mobility disorders. Product offerings include computerized neurodiagnostic systems for audiology, neurology, polysomnography, and neonatology, as well as newborn care products such as hearing screening systems, phototherapy devices for the treatment of newborn jaundice, head-cooling products for the treatment of brain injury in newborns, incubators to control the newborn's environment, and software systems for managing and tracking disorders and diseases for public health laboratories.
Additional information about Natus Medical can be found at .
www.natus.com
This press release contains forward-looking statements as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, particularly statements regarding the expectations, beliefs, plans, intentions and strategies of Natus. These forward-looking statements include statements regarding revenue and non-GAAP profitability in the fourth quarter and full year 2011 and the accretive contribution to earnings per share of Embla Systems. These statements relate to current estimates and assumptions of our management as of the date of this press release, and future events or Natus' future financial performance or results, and involve known and unknown risks, uncertainties and other factors that may cause actual results, levels of activity, performance, or achievements to differ materially from those expressed or implied by the forward-looking statements. Forward-looking statements are only predictions and the actual events or results may differ materially. Natus cannot provide any assurance that its future results or the results implied by the forward-looking statements will meet expectations. Our future results could differ materially due to a number of factors, including the effects of competition, the demand for our products and services, the impact of adverse global economic conditions on our target markets, our ability to expand our sales in international markets, our ability to maintain current sales levels in a mature domestic market, our ability to control costs, risks associated with bringing new products to market and integrating acquired businesses, and our ability to fulfill product orders on a timely basis. Natus disclaims any obligation to update information contained in any forward looking statement.
More information about potential risk factors that could affect the business and financial results of Natus is included in Natus' annual report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2010, and its quarterly reports on Form 10-Q, and in other reports filed from time to time by Natus with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission.
CONTACT: Natus Medical Incorporated Steven J. Murphy, 650-802-0400 Chief Financial Officer
InvestorRelations@Natus.com


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BABY/BABY-8K-20120124163833.txt.gz
TIME:20120124163833
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 5.02. Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers.
At its January 18, 2012 meeting, the Compensation Committee of the Board of Directors of Natus Medical Incorporated (the "Company") approved a cash bonus plan for executive officers of the Company. The cash bonuses may range from 50% to a maximum of 175% of the target amount, based on the achievement of three metrics: (i) budgeted 2012 pre-tax earnings weighted at 60%, (ii) budgeted 2012 revenue weighted at 20%, and (iii) successful completion of five discrete operational goals in 2012 weighted at 20%. The target bonus for Mr. Hawkins is 80% of 2012 base salary, for Mr. Buhler is 50% of 2012 base salary, and for each of Messrs. Mince and Murphy and Dr. Chung is 45% of 2012 base salary. Mr. Traverso's compensation is comprised of (i) his 2012 base salary, (ii) payments made pursuant to a sales commission plan that is paid on a regular basis, and (iii) a bonus for which the terms are the same as the other executive officers of the Company, except that his target bonus is 32% of his 2012 base salary. The payment of bonuses pursuant to this plan is at the discretion of the Board of Directors.
Base salaries for the Company's executive officers were not changed for 2012.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BABY/BABY-8K-20120228080438.txt.gz
TIME:20120228080438
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C.  20549
Form 8-K
Current Report
Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported):
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
February 28, 2012
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 - 
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 - 
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 - 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 - 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
ITEM 2.02.      Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On February 28, 2012, Natus Medical Incorporated (the Company) is issuing a press release and holding a conference call regarding its financial results for its fourth quarter ended December 31, 2011 and other financial information.  A copy of the press release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 to this Form 8-K.
The information in this Form 8-K and the exhibit attached hereto shall not be deemed filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the Exchange Act) or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that Section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
ITEM 9.01.     Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d) Exhibits.
SIGNATURES
          Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Exhibit Index

Exhibit 99.1
Natus Medical Announces Fourth Quarter and Full Year 2011 Results
- Company Updates 2012 Revenue and Non-GAAP Earnings per Share Guidance
- $20 Million Goodwill Impairment Charge Recorded in Fourth Quarter
SAN CARLOS, Calif.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--February 28, 2012-- (Nasdaq:BABY) today announced financial results for the fourth quarter and full year ended December 31, 2011.
Natus Medical Incorporated
For the fourth quarter ended December 31, 2011, Natus reported revenue of $64.1 million, compared to $63.2 million reported in the comparable quarter of the previous year. The Company reported a loss of $17.3 million, or $0.60 per share, for the fourth quarter of 2011, compared with net income of $5.2 million, or $0.18 per diluted share, for the fourth quarter of 2010.
For the year ended December 31, 2011, Natus reported revenue of $232.7 million, compared to $218.7 million reported in 2010. Net loss was $11.7 million, or $0.41 per share for the year ended December 31, 2011, compared to net income of $11.9 million, or $0.41 per diluted share in 2010.
Results for the 2011 fourth quarter and full year include a $20 million non-cash goodwill impairment charge for the Companys European operations.
On a non-GAAP basis the Company reported net income of $4.1 million, or $0.14 per diluted share, for the fourth quarter of 2011, compared with net income of $7.0 million, or $0.24 per diluted share, for the fourth quarter of 2010, and net income of $14.0 million, or $0.47 per diluted share, for the full year 2011, compared with net income of $19.0 million, or $0.65 per diluted share, for the full year 2010.
In commenting on the fourth quarter revenue results, Jim Hawkins, Chief Executive Officer of the Company said, During the fourth quarter we experienced a strong rebound in our business with revenue of $64.1 million compared to $51.3 million reported for the third quarter and just shy of our $65 million guidance.
I am pleased to report that recently acquired Embla Systems had an excellent quarter as did our newborn care group, added Hawkins. We continue to expect Embla to be accretive to earnings in 2012, adding approximately eight cents to non-GAAP earnings per share.
Our fourth quarter gross profit came in lower than expected due to a combination of product mix and more of our overall revenue coming from international markets, where we experience lower gross profit margins because we sell primarily through distribution, said Hawkins.
As of December 31, 2011, the Company had cash, cash equivalents, and short-term investments of $32.9 million, stockholders' equity of approximately $258 million, and working capital of approximately $90 million.
Financial Guidance
In commenting on the Companys financial guidance for 2012, Hawkins said, During 2011 and continuing into the current year we have been confronted with a new dynamic in our worldwide markets that makes it more difficult for us to accurately predict the timing of orders from our customers. For several quarters our revenue has been lower than anticipated, not because of business lost to others, but because customers have chosen to delay placing orders out of near-term budgetary caution. We have therefore decided to update our 2012 guidance and provide for a range of results during the year. Accordingly, our first quarter 2012 guidance is revenue of $55 million to $60 million, with a range of non-GAAP earnings per share of breakeven to $0.07. We are also widening our full year 2012 guidance to revenue of $256 million to $262 million and non-GAAP earnings per share of $0.57 to $0.62.
For the full year 2012, we look for solid earnings growth as we continue to execute on our strategy of organic growth and accretive acquisitions. We expect our profitability to improve throughout 2012 as we benefit from continued cost cutting measures and the integration of Embla into our operations. As a company, we are focused on driving profitability and operating margins back to historic levels. Our guidance reflects our goal of at least a 13% pretax operating margin on a non-GAAP basis in the fourth quarter, added Hawkins.
The Company's quarterly and full year 2012 non-GAAP earnings per share guidance exclude the following charges:
- Amortization expense associated with acquisition-related intangible assets, which the Company expects to be approximately $1.3 million and $5.2 million for the first quarter and full year, respectively, and which the Company expects will reduce GAAP earnings per share by approximately $0.03 and $0.11 for the respective periods.
- The incremental accelerated depreciation of previously capitalized internally developed software costs due to the Companys implementation of a world-wide enterprise resource planning platform in 2012, which the Company expects to be approximately $450,000 in each of the first and second quarters, and $900,000 for the full year, and which the Company expects will reduce GAAP earnings per share by approximately $0.01 in each of the quarterly periods and $0.02 for the full year. The Company had earlier expected the charge would be recorded in the second half of 2012.
In addition, the non-GAAP earnings per share guidance excludes the effects of restructuring charges that the Company expects to incur in 2012 associated with recent acquisitions, the amount and timing of which have not yet been determined, as well as the impact any future acquisitions might have on its results of operations.
The Companys non-GAAP guidance includes the impact of expensing employee share based compensation. All earnings per share amounts are on a diluted basis.
Goodwill Impairment Charge
The Company recorded a $20 million goodwill impairment charge in the fourth quarter of 2011. The charge resulted from the Company's annual goodwill impairment testing required under generally accepted accounting principles and was related to the Company's European reporting unit. The outcome of the Companys annual impairment test as of October 1, 2011 was impacted primarily by the significant drop in the market capitalization of the Company as of the measurement date and the continuing deterioration of economic conditions in the fourth quarter 2011 within member states of the European Union, in particular the impact that expected austerity measures may have on future healthcare spending by ministries of health within the Union. The Company does not expect the non-cash charge will have a significant impact on its ongoing business operations, nor will it affect liquidity, cash flow from operations, or financial covenant compliance of the Company's credit facility.
Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures
The Company's non-GAAP results for the fourth quarter and full year ended December 31, 2011 exclude a goodwill impairment charge, amortization expense and an impairment charge associated with certain acquisition-related intangible assets, restructuring charges associated primarily with employee severance costs, and directs costs and inventory fair value adjustments associated with the Embla acquisition.
The Company believes that the presentation of historical results and guidance excluding these items provides meaningful supplemental information to both management and investors that is indicative of the Company's core operating results. Therefore, the Company believes these non-GAAP financial measures facilitate comparison of operating results across reporting periods. A reconciliation of the Company's historical results of operations on a GAAP and non-GAAP basis for the periods reported is included as part of the condensed consolidated statements of operations at the end of this release.
The Company believes that both management and investors benefit from referring to these non-GAAP financial measures in assessing the Company's performance and when planning, forecasting, and analyzing future periods. These non-GAAP financial measures also facilitate management's internal comparisons to the Company's historical performance. The non-GAAP financial measures disclosed by the Company should not be considered a substitute for or superior to financial measures calculated in accordance with GAAP, and the financial results calculated in accordance with GAAP and reconciliations to those financial statements should be carefully evaluated.
Conference Call
Natus has scheduled an investment-community conference call to discuss this announcement beginning at 11:00 a.m. Eastern Time (8:00 a.m. Pacific Time) today, February 28, 2012. Individuals interested in listening to the conference call may do so by dialing 800-901-5241 for domestic callers, or 1-617-786-2963 for international callers, and entering reservation code 18213103. A telephone replay will be available for 48 hours following the conclusion of the call by dialing 888-286-8010 for domestic callers, or 1-617-801-6888 for international callers, and entering reservation code 36378103.
The conference call also will be available real-time via the Internet at , and a recording of the call will be available on the Companys Web site for 90 days following the completion of the call.
http://investor.natus.com
About Natus Medical Incorporated
Natus is a leading provider of healthcare products used for the screening, detection, treatment, monitoring and tracking of common medical ailments in newborn care, hearing impairment, neurological dysfunction, epilepsy, sleep disorders, and balance and mobility disorders. Product offerings include computerized neurodiagnostic systems for audiology, neurology, polysomnography, and neonatology, as well as newborn care products such as hearing screening systems, phototherapy devices for the treatment of newborn jaundice, head-cooling products for the treatment of brain injury in newborns, incubators to control the newborn's environment, and software systems for managing and tracking disorders and diseases for public health laboratories.
Additional information about Natus Medical can be found at .
www.natus.com
This press release contains forward-looking statements as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, particularly statements regarding the expectations, beliefs, plans, intentions and strategies of Natus. These forward-looking statements include statements regarding revenue and non-GAAP profitability in the first quarter and full year 2012, the benefit of cost cutting measures, the contribution of Embla to earnings, and the impact the goodwill impairment charge may have on future results. These statements relate to current estimates and assumptions of our management as of the date of this press release, and future events or Natus' future financial performance or results, and involve known and unknown risks, uncertainties and other factors that may cause actual results, levels of activity, performance, or achievements to differ materially from those expressed or implied by the forward-looking statements. Forward-looking statements are only predictions and the actual events or results may differ materially. Natus cannot provide any assurance that its future results or the results implied by the forward-looking statements will meet expectations. Our future results could differ materially due to a number of factors, including the effects of competition, the demand for our products and services, the impact of adverse global economic conditions on our target markets, our ability to expand our sales in international markets, our ability to maintain current sales levels in a mature domestic market, our ability to control costs, risks associated with bringing new products to market and integrating acquired businesses, and our ability to fulfill product orders on a timely basis. Natus disclaims any obligation to update information contained in any forward looking statement.
More information about potential risk factors that could affect the business and financial results of Natus is included in Natus' annual report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2010, and its quarterly reports on Form 10-Q, and in other reports filed from time to time by Natus with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission.
CONTACT: Natus Medical Incorporated Steven J. Murphy, 650-802-0400 Chief Financial Officer
InvestorRelations@Natus.com


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BABY/BABY-8K-20120305103901.txt.gz
TIME:20120305103901
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 1.01 Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
The text set forth below under Item 2.03 is incorporated into this Item by this reference.
Item 2.03 Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant
On March 2, 2012, Natus Medical Incorporated (the "Company") entered into a Third Amended and Restated Credit Agreement (the "Credit Facility") with Wells Fargo Bank, National Association ("Wells Fargo"). The Credit Facility amends and restates the Company's existing credit facility with Wells Fargo that was scheduled to expire on April 30, 2012. The Credit Facility provides for a $50 million secured revolving credit facility.
Borrowings under the Credit Facility are guaranteed by the Company's personal property, including, without limitation, all of the Company's ownership interests in material domestic subsidiaries, accounts receivable, inventory, equipment and intellectual property now owned or hereafter acquired, but excluding interests as a lessee under real property and personal property leases and shares of voting stock of foreign subsidiaries that represent more than 65% of the voting stock of such foreign subsidiary.
At the Company's option, outstanding borrowings on the Credit Facility will bear interest at either (i) a variable base rate, which is the higher of the federal funds rate plus one-half of one percent, or the rate announced from time to time by Wells Fargo as its prime rate, or (ii) a one-, two-, three- or six-month fixed rate, as selected by the Company, that is based on LIBOR plus an applicable interest margin that ranges from 150 basis points to 175 basis points depending upon the leverage ratio of the Company and its subsidiaries on a consolidated basis.
The Credit Facility matures on March 2, 2015, at which time all principal amounts outstanding under the Credit Facility will be due and payable. Borrowings on the Credit Facility may be repaid at any time without premium or penalty.
The Credit Facility contains certain usual and customary representations and warranties and affirmative and negative covenants, which include financial covenants; limitations on liens, additional indebtedness, further negative pledges, investments, payment of dividends, mergers, sale of assets and restricted payments; and other limitations. The financial covenants include metrics for minimum adjusted EBITDA and quick ratio on a consolidated basis.
The foregoing description of the Credit Facility does not purport to be complete and is qualified in its entirety by reference to the Third Amended and Restated Credit Agreement attached hereto as Exhibit 10.1.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits
(d) The following exhibits are filed herewith:
Exhibits.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 10.1
E V
XECUTION
ERSION
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
S
CHEDULES
 
E
XHIBITS
 
 
T T A R C A (this ) is entered into as of March 2, 2012, by and among N M I, a Delaware corporation (), the Material Domestic Subsidiaries from time to time party hereto, and W F B, N A ().
HIS
HIRD
MENDED
AND
ESTATED
REDIT
GREEMENT
"Agreement"
ATUS
EDICAL
NCORPORATED
"Borrower"
ELLS
ARGO
ANK
ATIONAL
SSOCIATION
"Bank"
W, Borrower and Bank are party to that certain Second Amended and Restated Credit Agreement, dated as of April 22, 2010 (as amended, restated, modified and/or supplemented prior to the date hereof, the ).
HEREAS
"Existing Agreement"
W, Borrower has requested that Bank (i) amend and restate the Existing Agreement and (ii) extend or continue credit to Borrower as described below, and Bank has agreed to provide such credit to Borrower on the terms and conditions contained herein.
HEREAS
N, T, for valuable consideration, the receipt and sufficiency of which are hereby acknowledged, Bank and Borrower hereby agree as follows:
OW
HEREFORE
S 1.1. C D T . As used in this Agreement, the following terms shall have the meaning set forth below:
ECTION
ERTAIN
EFINED
ERMS
has the meaning ascribed to such term in Section 9.13(b) hereof.
"AAA"
means the entity or assets acquired by Borrower in an Acquisition, whether before or after the date of this Agreement.
"Acquired Business"
means any transaction or series of related transactions for the purpose of or resulting, directly or indirectly, in (a) the acquisition of all or substantially all of the assets of a Person, or of any business or division of a Person, (b) the acquisition of in excess of 50% of the capital stock, partnership interests, membership interests or equity of any Person, or (c) a merger or consolidation or any other combination with another Person provided that Borrower is the surviving entity.
"Acquisition"
has the meaning ascribed to such term in the introductory paragraph hereof.
"Agreement"
 
"" means, from time to time, with respect to any Base Rate Loan, or LIBOR Loan, or with respect to any Letter of Credit Fees payable pursuant to Section 2.5(b), as the case may be, the applicable rate per annum set forth below (expressed in basis points) under the caption "LIBOR Spread," "Base Rate Spread" or "Letter of Credit Fee Rate," as the case may be, based upon, subject to Section 2.4(d), the Leverage Ratio as set forth in the most recent Compliance Certificate received by Bank pursuant to Section 6.3(d):
Applicable Rate
 
means Financial Accounting Standards Board's Accounting Standards Codification Topic 740formerly SFAS 109
"ASC 740"
, (
Income Taxes
, )
Accounting for Income Taxes
" means Financial Accounting Standards Board's Accounting Standards Codification Topic 805, (formerly SFAS 141R).
"ASC 805
Business Combinations
means, on any date of determination: (a) in respect of any capital lease of any Person, the capitalized amount thereof that would appear on a balance sheet of such Person prepared as of such date in accordance with GAAP; and (b) in respect of any Synthetic Lease Obligation, the capitalized amount of the remaining lease payments under the relevant lease that would appear on a balance sheet of such Person prepared as of such date in accordance with GAAP if such lease were accounted for as a capital lease.
"Attributable Indebtedness"
" means the period from the Closing Date to the earlier of (i) the Revolving Credit Maturity Date and (ii) the date that Bank's commitment to make Revolving Credit Loans terminates pursuant to Section 8.2.
"Availability Period
has the meaning ascribed to such term in the introductory paragraph hereof.
"Bank"
means the Bankruptcy Reform Act, Title 11 of the United States Code.
"Bankruptcy Code"
"" means, collectively: (a) the Bankruptcy Code; and (b) all other liquidation, conservatorship, bankruptcy, assignment for the benefit of creditors, moratorium, rearrangement, receivership, insolvency, reorganization, or similar debtor relief laws of the United States or other applicable jurisdictions from time to time in effect and affecting the rights of creditors generally.
Bankruptcy Laws
means the rate per annum for United States dollar deposits quoted by Bank as the Inter-Bank Market Offered Rate, with the understanding that such rate is quoted by Bank for the purpose of calculating effective rates of interest for loans making reference thereto, on the first day of an Interest Period for delivery of funds on said date for a period of time approximately equal to the number of days in such Interest Period and in an amount approximately equal to the principal amount to which such Interest Period applies. Borrower understands and agrees that Bank may base its quotation of the Inter-Bank Market Offered Rate upon such offers or other market indicators of the Inter-Bank Market as Bank in its discretion deems appropriate including, but not limited to, the rate offered for Dollar deposits on the London Inter-Bank Market.
"Base LIBOR"
 
"" means, for any day, a fluctuating rate per annum equal to the higher of: (a) the Federal Funds Rate one-half of one percent per annum; and (b) the per annum rate of interest in effect for such day as publicly announced from time to time by Bank as its "," such rate being the rate of interest most recently announced within Bank at its principal office as its "," with the understanding that Bank's "" is one of Bank's base rates and serves as the basis upon which effective rates of interest are calculated for those loans making reference thereto, and is evidenced by the recording thereof after its announcement in such internal publication or publications as Bank may designate. Any change in Bank's "" as announced by Bank shall take effect at the opening of business on the day specified in the public announcement of such change.
Base Rate
plus
Prime Rate
Prime Rate
Prime Rate
Prime Rate
"" means a Loan that bears interest based upon the Base Rate.
Base Rate Loan
has the meaning ascribed to such term in the introductory paragraph hereof.
"Borrower"
"" means any day except a Saturday, Sunday or any other day on which commercial banks in California are authorized or required by law to close; that, if any such day relates to LIBOR or any LIBOR Loan, such day must also be a day on which dealings in Dollar deposits are conducted by and between banks in the London interbank offered market.
Business Day
provided
"" means cash based restructuring charges, as defined under GAAP, for any entity that is the subject of a Permitted Acquisition; that in no event shall Cash Restructuring Charges exceed $5,000,000 in the aggregate during the term of this Agreement.
Cash Restructuring Charges
provided
"" means any of the following occurring after the Closing Date: (a) the adoption or taking effect of any law, rule, regulation or treaty; (b) any change in any law, rule, regulation or treaty or in the administration, interpretation or application thereof by any Governmental Authority; or (c) the making or issuance of any request, guideline or directive (whether or not having the force of law) by any Governmental Authority; that, for purposes hereof, the Dodd-Frank Wall Street Reform and Consumer Protection Act and all requests, guidelines and directions in connection therewith are deemed to have been adopted and gone into effect after the Closing Date.
Change in Law
provided
"" means an event or series of events by which any "person" or "group" (as such terms are used in Sections 13(d) and 14(d) of the Exchange Act, but excluding any employee benefit plan of such person or its subsidiaries, and any person or entity acting in its capacity as trustee, agent or other fiduciary or administrator of any such plan) becomes the "beneficial owner" (as defined in Rules 13d-3 and 13d-5 under the Exchange Act), directly or indirectly, of thirty percent or more of the Equity Interests of Borrower entitled to vote for members of the board of directors or equivalent governing body of Borrower on a fully-diluted basis (and taking into account all such securities that such person or group has the right to acquire pursuant to any option right).
Change of Control
 
means March 2, 2012.
"Closing Date"
"" means the Internal Revenue Code of 1986.
Code
"" means a certificate substantially in the form of .
Compliance Certificate
Exhibit C
means all non-public, confidential and/or proprietary information of Borrower, its Subsidiaries or any Subsidiary thereof, now or at any time hereafter provided to Bank by Borrower, or any of Borrower's officers, employees, agents or representatives, in connection with Bank's evaluation of Borrower's credit request and/or Bank's ongoing credit accommodations to Borrower, and shall include, without limitation, any and all financial, technical and/or business information relating to Borrower, its Subsidiaries or any Subsidiary thereof, including trade secrets, research and development test results, marketing or business plans and strategies, forecasts, budgets, projections, customer and supplier information, and any other analyses, computations or studies prepared by or for Borrower, any of its Subsidiaries or any Subsidiary thereof.
"Confidential Information"
means, for any period and as of any date of determination, for Borrower and its Subsidiaries on a consolidated basis, an amount equal to Consolidated Net Income for such period (a) the following to the extent deducted in calculating such Consolidated Net Income: (i) Consolidated Interest Expense for such period, (ii) Consolidated Provision for Income Taxes for such period deducted to arrive at Consolidated Net Income, (iii) depreciation and amortization expense, (iv) all non-cash expenses related to stock-based compensation deducted to arrive at Consolidated Net Income, (v) other non-recurring expenses of Borrower and its Subsidiaries reducing such Consolidated Net Income which do not represent a cash item in such period or any future period, (vi) Cash Restructuring Charges ( that the aggregate amount of Cash Restructuring Charges added to Consolidated Net Income for any twelve-month period pursuant to this clause (vi) shall not exceed $5,000,000), and (vii) expenses created by contingent consideration or transaction costs related to a business combination or acquisition, to the extent required to be expensed by ASC 805, and (b) the following to the extent included in calculating such Consolidated Net Income: (i) interest income (ii) extraordinary or non-recurring non-cash income or gains, (iii) all non-cash items increasing Consolidated Net Income for such period, and (iv) adjustments to income created by contingent consideration related to a business combination or acquisition, to the extent required to be recognized by ASC 805.
"Consolidated EBITDA"
plus
provided
minus
means, as of any date of determination, for Borrower and its Subsidiaries on a consolidated basis, the sum of (a) the outstanding principal amount of all obligations, whether current or long-term, for borrowed money (including obligations hereunder) and all obligations evidenced by bonds, debentures, notes, loan agreements or other similar instruments, (b) all purchase money indebtedness, (c) all direct obligations arising under letters of credit (including standby and commercial), reimbursement agreements, bankers' acceptances, bank guaranties, surety bonds and similar instruments, (d) all obligations in respect of the deferred purchase price of property or services (other than trade accounts payable in the ordinary course of business), (e) Attributable Indebtedness in respect of capital leases and Synthetic Lease Obligations, (f) without duplication, all guarantees with respect to outstanding indebtedness of the types specified in clauses (a) through (e) above of Persons other than Borrower or any Subsidiary, and (g) all indebtedness of the types referred to in clauses (a) through (f) above of any partnership or joint venture (other than a joint venture that is itself a corporation or limited liability company) in which Borrower or a Subsidiary is a general partner or joint venturer, unless such indebtedness is expressly made non-recourse to Borrower or such Subsidiary.
"Consolidated Funded Indebtedness"
 
means, for any period, for Borrower and its Subsidiaries on a consolidated basis, an amount equal to the sum of all interest charges (including imputed interest charges with respect to capitalized lease obligations and all amortization of debt discount and expense) of such Persons for such period.
"Consolidated Interest Expense"
means, for any period, for Borrower and its Subsidiaries on a consolidated basis, the net income of Borrower and its Subsidiaries from continuing operations (excluding gains or losses from dispositions of assets) for such period.
"Consolidated Net Income"
"" means, for any period, for Borrower and its Subsidiaries on a consolidated basis, the provision for income taxes calculated in accordance with ASC 740.
Consolidated Provision for Income Taxes
"" means any event or condition that constitutes an Event of Default or that, with the giving of notice, the passage of time, or both, would constitute an Event of Default.
Default
"" means a per annum interest rate equal to the sum of: (i) the Base Rate; (ii) the Applicable Rate, if any, applicable to Base Rate Loans; (iii) four hundred basis points per annum; that, with respect to a LIBOR Loan, the Default Rate shall be a per annum interest rate equal to the sum of: (A) the interest rate (including any Applicable Rate) otherwise applicable to such Loan; (B) four hundred basis points per annum.
Default Rate
plus
plus
provided
plus
"" and "" mean lawful money of the United States.
Dollar
$
means any Subsidiary that is not a Foreign Subsidiary.
"Domestic Subsidiary"
means any business engaged primarily in the sale of medical devices and associated supplies.
"Eligible Line of Business"
"" means all claims, however asserted, by any Governmental Authority or other Person alleging Environmental Liabilities.
Environmental Claims
"" means any and all United States federal, state, local, and foreign statutes, laws, regulations, ordinances, rules, judgments, orders, decrees, permits, concessions, grants, franchises, licenses, agreements or governmental restrictions relating to pollution and the protection of the environment or the release of any materials into the environment, including those related to hazardous substances or wastes, air emissions and discharges to waste or public systems.
Environmental Laws
 
"" means any liability, contingent or otherwise (including any liability for damages, costs of environmental remediation, fines, penalties or indemnities), of Borrower, any Guarantor or any of their respective Subsidiaries directly or indirectly resulting from or based upon: (a) violation of any Environmental Law; (b) the generation, use, handling, transportation, storage, treatment or disposal of any Hazardous Materials; (c) exposure to any Hazardous Materials; (d) the release or threatened release of any Hazardous Materials into the environment; or (e) any contract, agreement or other consensual arrangement pursuant to which liability is assumed or imposed with respect to any of the foregoing.
Environmental Liability
"" means, with respect to any Person, all of the shares of capital stock of (or other ownership or profit interests in) such Person, all of the warrants, options or other rights for the purchase or acquisition from such Person of shares of capital stock of (or other ownership or profit interests in) such Person, all of the securities convertible into or exchangeable for shares of capital stock of (or other ownership or profit interests in) such Person or warrants, rights or options for the purchase or acquisition from such Person of such shares (or such other interests), and all of the other ownership or profit interests in such Person (including partnership, member or trust interests therein), whether voting or nonvoting, and whether or not such shares, warrants, options, rights or other interests are outstanding on any date of determination.
Equity Interests
means the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974.
"ERISA"
"" means any trade or business (whether or not incorporated) under common control with Borrower or any Subsidiary thereof within the meaning of Section 414(b) or (c) of the Code (and Sections 414(m) and (o) of the Code for purposes of provisions relating to Section 412 of the Code).
ERISA Affiliate
"" means any of the following: (a) a Reportable Event with respect to a Pension Plan; (b) a withdrawal by Borrower or any ERISA Affiliate from a Pension Plan subject to Section 4063 of ERISA during a plan year in which it was a substantial employer (as defined in Section 4001(a)(2) of ERISA) or a cessation of operations that is treated as such a withdrawal under Section 4062(e) of ERISA; (c) a complete or partial withdrawal by Borrower or any ERISA Affiliate from a Multiemployer Plan or notification that a Multiemployer Plan is in reorganization; (d) the filing of a notice of intent to terminate, the treatment of a Plan amendment as a termination under Sections 4041 or 4041A of ERISA, or the commencement of proceedings by the PBGC to terminate a Pension Plan or Multiemployer Plan; (e) an event or condition that constitutes grounds under Section 4042 of ERISA for the termination of, or the appointment of a trustee to administer, any Pension Plan or Multiemployer Plan; or (f) the imposition of any liability under Title IV of ERISA, other than for PBGC premiums due but not delinquent under Section 4007 of ERISA, upon Borrower or any ERISA Affiliate.
ERISA Event
has the meaning ascribed to such term in Article VIII hereof.
"Event of Default"
"" means the Securities Exchange Act of 1934.
Exchange Act
 
"" means, for any day, the rate per annum equal to the weighted average of the rates on overnight United States federal funds transactions with members of the Federal Reserve System arranged by United States federal funds brokers on such day, as published by the Federal Reserve Bank of New York on the Business Day next succeeding such day; that: (a) if such day is not a Business Day, then the Federal Funds Rate for such day shall be such rate on such transactions on the next preceding Business Day as so published on the next succeeding Business Day; and (b) if no such rate is so published on such next succeeding Business Day, then the Federal Funds Rate for such day shall be the average rate (rounded upward, if necessary, to a whole multiple of one-hundredth of one percent) charged to Bank on such day on such transactions as determined by Bank.
Federal Funds Rate
provided
means the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System of the United States.
"FRB
"
means any Subsidiary organized under the laws of a country (or political subdivision thereof) other than the United States (or political subdivision thereof).
"Foreign Subsidiary"
means generally accepted accounting principles applicable in the United States set forth in the opinions and pronouncements of the Accounting Principles Board and the American Institute of Certified Public Accountants and statements and pronouncements of the Financial Accounting Standards Board or such other principles as may be approved by a significant segment of the accounting profession in the United States, that are applicable to the circumstances as of the date of determination, consistently applied.
"GAAP"
"" means the government of the United States or any other nation, or of any political subdivision thereof, whether state or local, and any agency, authority, instrumentality, regulatory body, court, central bank or other entity exercising executive, legislative, judicial, taxing, regulatory or administrative powers or functions of or pertaining to government (including any supra-national bodies such as the European Union or the European Central Bank).
Governmental Authority
or means each Subsidiary Guarantor.
"Guarantor"
"Guarantors"
"" means all explosive or radioactive substances or wastes and all hazardous or toxic substances, wastes or other pollutants, including petroleum or petroleum distillates, asbestos or asbestos-containing materials, polychlorinated biphenyls, radon gas, infectious or medical wastes and all other substances or wastes of any nature regulated pursuant to any Environmental Law.
Hazardous Materials
means the acquisition of the capital stock or other equity interests of a Person through a tender offer or similar solicitation of the owners of such capital stock or other equity interests which has not been approved (prior to such acquisition) by resolutions of the board of directors of such Person or by similar action if such Person is not a corporation, or as to which such approval has been withdrawn.
"Hostile Acquisition"
 
"" means, as at any date of determination, any Domestic Subsidiary whose assets as of the end of the most recent fiscal year are less than five percent (5%) of the consolidated assets of Borrower and its Subsidiaries as of the last day of such fiscal year or whose gross revenues for such fiscal year are less than five percent (5%) of the consolidated gross revenues of Borrower and its Subsidiaries for such fiscal year.
Immaterial Domestic Subsidiary
"" has the meaning ascribed thereto in Section 9.3(b).
Indemnitees
"" means: (a) with respect to (i) a LIBOR Loan, the last day of each Interest Period applicable thereto; that, if any such Interest Period exceeds three months, the date that falls three months after the beginning of such Interest Period shall also be an Interest Payment Date; and (ii) a Base Rate Loan, the last Business Day of each calendar month; and (b) the Revolving Credit Maturity Date.
Interest Payment Date
provided
"" means, as to each LIBOR Loan, the period commencing on the date such LIBOR Loan is disbursed or converted to or continued as a LIBOR Loan and ending on the date one, two, three or six months thereafter, as selected by Borrower in its related Loan Notice; that: (a) any Interest Period that would otherwise end on a day that is not a Business Day shall be extended to the next succeeding Business Day unless such Business Day falls in another calendar month, in which case such Interest Period shall end on the next preceding Business Day; (b) any Interest Period that begins on the last Business Day of a calendar month (or on a day for which there is no numerically corresponding day in the calendar month at the end of such Interest Period) shall end on the last Business Day of the calendar month at the end of such Interest Period; and (c) no Interest Period for any Revolving Credit Loan shall extend beyond the Revolving Credit Maturity Date.
Interest Period
provided
"" means, as to any Person, any direct or indirect acquisition or investment by such Person, whether by means of (a) the purchase or other acquisition of capital stock or other securities of another Person, (b) a loan, advance or capital contribution to, guarantee or assumption of debt of, or purchase or other acquisition of any other debt or equity participation or interest in, another Person, including any partnership or joint venture interest in such other Person and any arrangement pursuant to which the investor guarantees Indebtedness of such other Person, or (c) the purchase or other acquisition (in one transaction or a series of transactions) of assets of another Person that constitute a business unit. For purposes of covenant compliance, the amount of any Investment shall be the amount actually invested, without adjustment for subsequent increases or decreases in the value of such Investment.
Investment
"" means an agreement entered into by a Material Domestic Subsidiary of Borrower following the date hereof to join in the Guaranty set forth in Section 9.6 or in any other form approved by Bank.
Joinder Agreement
"" has the meaning ascribed thereto in Section 2.1(b).
Letter of Credit
"" means each application and agreement relating to a Letter of Credit that Bank may require in connection with any request for the issuance of a Letter of Credit.
Letter of Credit Agreement
 
"" has the meaning ascribed thereto in Section 2.5(b).
Letter of Credit Fee
"Leverage Ratio" means, as of any date of determination, for Borrower and its Subsidiaries on a consolidated basis, the ratio of: (a) Consolidated Funded Indebtedness as of such date to (b) Consolidated EBITDA for the four consecutive fiscal quarters ending on such date.
means the rate per annum (rounded upward, if necessary, to the nearest whole 1/16 of 1%) and determined pursuant to the following formula:
"LIBOR"
 
means a Loan that bears interest based upon LIBOR.
"LIBOR Loan"
means the reserve percentage prescribed by the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System (or any successor) for (as defined in Regulation D of the Federal Reserve Board, as amended), adjusted by Bank for expected changes in such reserve percentage during the applicable Interest Period.
"LIBOR Reserve Percentage"
"Eurocurrency Liabilities"
"" means any Revolving Credit Loan.
Loan
"" means this Agreement, the Note, the Security Agreement, the Pledge Agreement, each Letter of Credit Agreement, any Letter of Credit and each other contract, instrument and document required by or delivered to Bank in connection with this Agreement.
Loan Documents
"" means a notice, pursuant to Section 2.2(a), of: (a) a borrowing of Loans; (b) a conversion of Loans from one Type to the other; or (c) a continuation of LIBOR Loans; which, if in writing, shall be substantially in the form of .
Loan Notice
Exhibit B
"" means a material adverse effect on (i) the business operations or financial condition of Borrower and its Subsidiaries taken as a whole, (ii) the ability of Borrower to repay all debt, principal, interest, expenses and other amounts owed to Bank by Borrower pursuant to this Agreement, the Note and the other Loan Documents, or to otherwise perform its material obligations under the Loan Documents, or (iii) Borrower's interest in, or the value, perfection or priority of Bank's security interest or lien in, the collateral described in Section 2.8 hereof.
Material Adverse Effect
"" means, as at any date of determination, (i) any Domestic Subsidiary other than an Immaterial Domestic Subsidiary; that in the event the assets as of the last day of the most recent fiscal year of all Immaterial Domestic Subsidiaries as of such date that have not become a party to this Agreement as a Subsidiary Guarantor are in excess of 10% of the consolidated assets of Borrower and its Subsidiaries as of the last day of such fiscal year or the gross revenues for the most recent fiscal year of all Immaterial Domestic Subsidiaries as of such date that have not become a party to this Agreement as a Subsidiary Guarantor are in excess of 10% of the consolidated gross revenues of Borrower and its Subsidiaries for such fiscal year, then Borrower shall designate one or more Immaterial Domestic Subsidiaries of Borrower as Material Domestic Subsidiaries and (ii) any Immaterial Domestic Subsidiary of Borrower that has been designated as a Material Domestic Subsidiary by Borrower.
Material Domestic Subsidiary
provided
 
"" means any employee benefit plan of the type described in Section 4001(a)(3) of ERISA to which Borrower or any ERISA Affiliate makes or is obligated to make contributions, or during the preceding five plan years, has made or been obligated to make contributions.
Multiemployer Plan
"" means the Third Amended and Restated Revolving Line of Credit Note.
Note
"" means all advances, debts, liabilities, obligations, covenants and duties of Borrower or any Guarantor under any Loan Document or otherwise, whether with respect to any Loan or otherwise, whether direct or indirect (including those acquired by assumption), absolute or contingent, due or to become due, now existing or hereafter arising and including interest and fees that accrue after the commencement by or against Borrower or any Guarantor or any affiliate thereof of any proceeding under any Bankruptcy Law naming such Person as the debtor in such proceeding, regardless of whether such interest and fees are allowed claims in such proceeding.
Obligations
"" means the Pension Benefit Guaranty Corporation.
PBGC
"" means any "employee pension benefit plan" (as that term is defined in Section 3(2) of ERISA), other than a Multiemployer Plan, that is subject to Title IV of ERISA and is sponsored or maintained by Borrower or any ERISA Affiliate or to which Borrower or any ERISA Affiliate contributes or has an obligation to contribute, or in the case of a multiple employer or other plan described in Section 4064(a) of ERISA, has made contributions at any time during the immediately preceding five plan years.
Pension Plan
means any Acquisition with respect to which all of the following conditions shall have been satisfied:
"Permitted Acquisition"
(a) the Acquired Business is in an Eligible Line of Business;
(b) the Acquisition shall not be a Hostile Acquisition;
(c) the financial statements of the Acquired Business shall be in form and substance satisfactory to Bank and shall have undergone review of a scope satisfactory to Bank;
(d)(i) with respect to the Acquisition of any Acquired Business, the Total Consideration for such Acquired Business shall not exceed $30,000,000, and (iii) the Total Consideration for such Acquisition, when taken together with the Total Consideration for all Acquired Businesses acquired after the date of this Agreement, shall not exceed $100,000,000 in the aggregate;
 
(e) Borrower shall have notified Bank not less than 30 days prior to any such Acquisition and furnished to Bank at such time reasonable details as to such Acquisition (including sources and uses of funds therefor), and 3-year historical financial information and 3-year pro forma financial forecasts of the Acquired Business on a stand alone basis as well as of Borrower on a consolidated basis after giving effect to the Acquisition and covenant compliance calculations reasonably satisfactory to Bank demonstrating satisfaction of the condition described in clause (f) below;
(f) after giving effect to the Acquisition, no Default or Event of Default shall exist, including with respect to the financial covenants contained in Section 6.9 hereof (applicable as of the most recently ended fiscal quarter), tested on a pro forma basis as of the date of the Acquisition;
(g) Borrower shall demonstrate, in reasonable detail, that the Acquired Business had positive Consolidated EBITDA (calculated in the same manner as if the reference to Borrower therein was to such Acquired Business) on a pro forma basis for the four (4) fiscal quarter period ended immediately prior to the proposed closing date of such Acquisition for which financial statements are available; and
(h) the Acquisition shall have been approved by Borrower's board of directors and (if necessary) owners, and all necessary legal and regulatory approvals with respect to the Acquisition shall have been obtained.
means:
"Permitted Indebtedness"
(a) the liabilities of Borrower to Bank under this Agreement and the other Loan Documents;
(b) any other liabilities of Borrower existing as of the Closing Date and listed on ;
Schedule 1.1-A
(c) unsecured indebtedness to trade creditors incurred in the ordinary course of business;
(d) guaranty obligations of Borrower with respect to indebtedness of Subsidiaries of Borrower permitted under Section 7.6;
(e) indebtedness secured by Permitted Liens identified in paragraphs (d), (e), (f), (g) (but solely with respect to Permitted Liens permitted under such paragraph (g) that are related to extensions, renewals or refinancings of indebtedness secured by liens identified in paragraph (d) of the definition of Permitted Liens) and (j) of the definition of Permitted Liens; and
(f) extensions, refinancings, modifications, amendments and restatements of any items of Permitted Indebtedness identified in (a) through (d) above, that the principal amount is not increased nor the terms modified to impose more burdensome terms upon Borrower or its Subsidiaries, as the case may be.
provided
 
means:
"Permitted Investments"
(a) Investments by Borrower existing as of the Closing Date and listed on ;
Schedule 1.1-B
(b) Investments by Borrower in (i) marketable direct obligations issued or unconditionally guaranteed by the United States or any agency or any state thereof maturing within one year from the date of acquisition thereof, (ii) commercial paper maturing no more than one year from the date of creation thereof and currently having rating of at least A-2 or P-2 from either Standard & Poor's Corporation or Moody's Investors Service, (iii) Bank's certificates of deposit maturing no more than one year from the date of investment therein, (iv) Bank's money market accounts, and (v) in conformance with Borrower's "Investment Policy," as in effect on the Closing Date (or as amended from time to time, subject to the approval of Bank), a copy of which has previously been provided to Bank;
(c) Investments by Borrower consisting of the endorsement of negotiable instruments for deposit or collection or similar transactions in the ordinary course of business of Borrower;
(d) Investments by Borrower consisting of deposit accounts in which Bank has a first priority perfected security interest;
(e) Investments by Borrower constituting Permitted Acquisitions;
(f) Investments by Borrower not to exceed at any time $250,000.00 in the aggregate consisting of (i) travel advances and employee relocation loans and other employee loans and advances in the ordinary course of business, and (ii) loans to employees, officers or directors relating to the purchase of equity securities of Borrower pursuant to employee stock purchase plans or agreements approved by Borrower's board of directors;
(g) Investments (including debt obligations) by Borrower not to exceed $50,000.00 in the aggregate outstanding at any time received in connection with the bankruptcy or reorganization of customers or suppliers and in settlement of delinquent obligations of, and other disputes with, customers or suppliers arising in the ordinary course of business; and
(h) Investments by Borrower not to exceed $50,000.00 in the aggregate outstanding at any time consisting of notes receivable of, or prepaid royalties and other credit extensions to, customers and suppliers who are not affiliates, in the ordinary course of business; provided that this paragraph (h) shall not apply to investments of Borrower in any Subsidiary.
 
means:
"Permitted Liens"
(a) liens and security interests in favor of Bank created under any Loan Document;
(b) liens and security interests existing as of the Closing Date and listed on ;
Schedule 1.1-C
(c) liens for taxes, fees, assessments or other government charges or levies, either not delinquent or being contested in good faith by appropriate proceedings promptly instituted and diligently conducted and for which Borrower maintains adequate reserves in accordance with GAAP;
(d) purchase money liens securing indebtedness not to exceed $2,000,000.00 in the aggregate incurred after the Closing Date (i) on equipment acquired or held by Borrower incurred for financing the acquisition of such equipment, or (ii) existing on equipment when acquired, if the lien is confined to the property so acquired and improvements thereon, and the proceeds of such equipment;
(e) statutory liens arising in the ordinary course of business and not overdue for a period of more than thirty days or being contested in good faith by appropriate proceedings promptly instituted and diligently conducted and for which Borrower maintains adequate reserves in accordance with GAAP, not to exceed $500,000.00 in the aggregate, securing claims or demands of materialmen, mechanics, carriers, warehousemen, landlords and other persons imposed without action of such parties;
(f) liens to secure payment of workers' compensation, employment insurance, old-age pensions, social security and other like obligations incurred in the ordinary course of business not delinquent or being contested in good faith by appropriate proceedings promptly instituted and diligently conducted and for which Borrower maintains adequate reserves in accordance with GAAP;
(g) liens incurred in the extension, renewal or refinancing of the indebtedness secured by liens identified in paragraphs (b) and (d) of this definition, so long as such indebtedness is Permitted Indebtedness, that any extension, renewal or replacement lien shall be limited to the property encumbered by the existing lien and the principal amount of the indebtedness being extended, renewed or refinanced does not increase;
provided
(h) leases or subleases of real property entered into as sublessee or lessee in the ordinary course of business, and leases; and subleases, non-exclusive licenses or sublicenses of property (other than real property or intellectual property) entered into as licensee or sublicensee in the ordinary course of Borrower's business;
(i) non-exclusive licenses of intellectual property entered into as licensee with third parties in the ordinary course of business; and
 
(j) liens in favor of financial institutions other than Bank arising in connection with Borrower's deposit and/or securities accounts held at such institutions, that (i) Bank has a first priority perfected security interest in the amounts held in such deposit and/or securities accounts (excluding liens identified in the following clause (ii)) and (ii) such liens secure Borrower's payment of normal fees and charges related to the maintenance of such deposit and/or securities accounts and not indebtedness related to credit extended by such financial institutions to Borrower.
provided
means any natural person, corporation, limited liability company, trust, joint venture, association, company, partnership, Governmental Authority or other entity.
"Person"
"" means any "employee benefit plan" (as such term is defined in Section 3(3) of ERISA) established by Borrower or, with respect to any such plan that is subject to Section 412 of the Code or Title IV of ERISA, any ERISA Affiliate.
Plan
means (i) that certain Amended and Restated Pledge Agreement, dated as of March 2, 2012, executed by Borrower and certain other Loan Parties pledging capital stock for the benefit of Bank as of the Closing Date and (ii) any other pledge agreement executed by a Loan Party in favor of Bank.
"Pledge Agreement"
means, as of any date of determination, for Borrower and its Subsidiaries on a consolidated basis, the ratio of: (a) the sum of (i) unrestricted cash (ii) unrestricted short-term marketable securities (iii) net accounts receivable to (b) the sum of (i) current liabilities (ii) any currently outstanding Revolving Credit Loans.
"Quick Ratio"
plus
plus
plus
"" means any of the events set forth in Section 4043(c) of ERISA, other than events for which the thirty-day notice period has been waived.
Reportable Event
means the chief executive officer, the president, the chief financial officer, any vice president, the general counsel and/or secretary, the assistant secretary, the controller of Borrower, the director of finance of Borrower, or any other officer of Borrower having substantially the same authority and responsibility as any of the foregoing.
"Responsible Officer"
"" means a borrowing of a Revolving Credit Loan of a particular Type.
Revolving Credit Borrowing
"" means March 2, 2015.
Revolving Credit Maturity Date
has the meaning ascribed to such term in Section 2.1(a).
"Revolving Line of Credit"
has the meaning ascribed to such term in Section 9.13(b) hereof.
"Rules"
means (i) that certain Third Amended and Restated Security Agreement, dated as of March 2, 2012, executed by Borrower and certain other Loan Parties in favor of Bank and (ii) any other security agreement executed by a Loan Party in favor of Bank.
"Security Agreement"
 
of a Person means a corporation, partnership, joint venture, limited liability company or other business entity of which a majority of the shares of securities or other interests having ordinary voting power for the election of directors or other governing body (other than securities or interests having such power only by reason of the happening of a contingency) are at the time beneficially owned, or the management of which is otherwise controlled, directly, or indirectly through one or more intermediaries, or both, by such Person. Unless otherwise specified, all references herein to a "" or to "" shall refer to a Subsidiary or Subsidiaries of Borrower.
"Subsidiary"
Subsidiary
Subsidiaries
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 9.6(a) hereof.
Subsidiary Guarantor
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 9.6(i) hereof.
Subsidiary Guarantor Subordinated Debt
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 9.6(i) hereof.
Subsidiary Guarantor Subordinated Debt Payments
means the monetary obligation of a Person under either: (a) a so-called synthetic, off-balance sheet or tax retention lease; or (b) an agreement for the use or possession of property creating obligations that do not appear on the balance sheet of such Person but which, upon the insolvency or bankruptcy of such Person, would be characterized as the indebtedness of such Person (without regard to accounting treatment).
"Synthetic Lease Obligation"
has the meaning ascribed to such term in Section 8.1(d) hereof.
"Third Party Obligor"
means, with respect to an Acquisition, the sum (but without duplication) of (a) cash paid in connection with such Acquisition, (b) indebtedness payable to the seller in connection with such Acquisition, (c) the fair market value of any equity securities, including any warrants or options therefor, delivered in connection with such Acquisition, (d) the amount of contingent consideration or transaction costs related to such Acquisition, to the extent required to be expensed by ASC 805, (e) the present value of covenants not to compete entered into in connection with such Acquisition or other future payments which are required to be made over a period of time and are not contingent upon Borrower meeting financial performance objectives (exclusive of salaries paid in the ordinary course of business) (discounted at the Base Rate in effect on the date of such Acquisition), but only to the extent not included in clause (a), (b), (c) or (d) above, and (f) the amount of indebtedness assumed in connection with such Acquisition.
"Total Consideration"
"" means, with respect to any Loan, its character as a Base Rate Loan or a LIBOR Loan.
Type
S 1.2. C R C.
ECTION
ERTAIN
ULES
OF
ONSTRUCTION
(a) Unless the context requires otherwise, the meaning of a defined term is applicable equally to the singular and plural forms thereof.
 
(b) The words "," "," "" and similar words refer to this Agreement as a whole and not to any particular provision of this Agreement; and, unless otherwise specified, Article, Section, subsection, clause, Schedule and Exhibit references are to this Agreement.
hereof
herein
hereunder
(c)(i) The term "" includes instruments, documents, agreements, certificates, indentures, notices and other writings, however evidenced.
documents
(ii) The terms "" and "" are not limiting.
include
including
(iii) In the computation of periods of time from a specified date to a later specified date, the word "" means ""; the words "" and "" each mean "" and the word "" means "."
from
from and including
to
until
to but excluding
through
to and including
(iv) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the terms "," "," "" and "" refer to both personal property (whether tangible or intangible) and real property.
property
properties
asset
assets
(d) Unless otherwise expressly provided herein: (i) references to documents (including this Agreement) shall be deemed to include all subsequent amendments and other modifications thereto, but only to the extent such amendments and other modifications are not prohibited by the terms of any Loan Document; and (ii) references to any statute or regulation are to be construed as including all statutory and regulatory provisions consolidating, amending, replacing, supplementing or interpreting the statute or regulation.
(e) Unless otherwise specified, all references herein to times of day shall be references to Pacific time (daylight or standard, as applicable).
(f) The captions and headings of this Agreement are for convenience of reference only and shall not affect the interpretation of this Agreement.
(g) This Agreement and the other Loan Documents may use several different limitations, tests or measurements to regulate the same or similar matters. All such limitations, tests and measurements are cumulative and shall be performed in accordance with their respective terms.
(h) This Agreement and the other Loan Documents are the result of negotiations among, and have been reviewed by counsel to, Borrower, the Guarantors and Bank and are the products of all parties. Accordingly, they shall not be construed against Bank merely because of the involvement of any or all of the preceding Persons in their preparation.
(i) Unless the context otherwise clearly requires, all accounting terms not expressly defined herein shall be construed, and all financial computations required under this Agreement shall be made, in accordance with GAAP. If at any time any change in GAAP would affect the computation of any financial ratio or requirement set forth in any Loan Document, and Bank shall so request, Bank and Borrower shall negotiate in good faith to amend such ratio or requirement to preserve the original intent thereof in light of such change in GAAP; that, until so amended: (i) such ratio or requirement shall continue to be computed in accordance with GAAP prior to such change therein; and (ii) Borrower shall provide to Bank financial statements and other documents required under this Agreement or as reasonably requested hereunder setting forth a reconciliation between calculations of such ratio or requirement made before and after giving effect to such change in GAAP.
provided
 
(j) References herein to "" refer to the fiscal year of Borrower.
fiscal year
(k) Any financial ratios required to be maintained by Borrower pursuant to the Loan Documents shall be calculated by dividing the appropriate component by the other component, carrying the result to one place more than the number of places by which such ratio is expressed herein and rounding the result up or down to the nearest number using the common  or symmetric arithmetic  method of rounding (in other words, rounding-up if there is no nearest number).
S 2.1. R L C.
ECTION
EVOLVING
INE
OF
REDIT
(a) . Subject to the terms and conditions of this Agreement, Bank hereby agrees to make loans (each such loan, a "") to Borrower from time to time on any Business Day during the Availability Period, not to exceed at any time the aggregate principal amount of Fifty Million Dollars ($50,000,000.00) (the ""). The proceeds of the initial advance under the Revolving Line of Credit shall be used to refinance all outstanding indebtedness owing under the Existing Agreement (with any such advances having the same characteristics, including, without limitation, Type and remaining Interest Period, if applicable, as the indebtedness refinanced thereby) and the proceeds of all other advances under the Revolving Line of Credit shall be used for working capital and general corporate purposes. Borrower's obligation to repay advances under the Revolving Line of Credit shall be evidenced by a promissory note dated March 2, 2012 (as amended, restated, supplemented or otherwise modified from time to time, the ""), in the form attached hereto as , all terms of which are incorporated herein by this reference.
Revolving Line of Credit
Revolving Credit Loan
Revolving Line of Credit
Note
Exhibit A
 
(b) . As a subfeature under the Revolving Line of Credit, Bank agrees from time to time during the term thereof to issue or cause an Affiliate to issue standby letters of credit for the account of Borrower or its Subsidiaries (each, a "" and collectively, ""); that the aggregate undrawn amount of all outstanding Letters of Credit shall not at any time exceed Ten Million Dollars ($10,000,000.00). The form and substance of each Letter of Credit shall be subject to approval by Bank in its sole discretion. Each Letter of Credit shall be issued for a term not to exceed three hundred sixty-five (365) days, as designated by Borrower, or such longer term as is acceptable to by Bank in its sole discretion; , that no Letter of Credit shall have an expiration date more than three hundred sixty five (365) days beyond the Revolving Credit Maturity Date or such other date that is acceptable to Bank in its sole discretion. The undrawn amount of all Letters of Credit shall be reserved under the Line of Credit and shall not be available for borrowings thereunder. Each Letter of Credit shall be subject to the additional terms and conditions of the Letter of Credit Agreements, applications and any related documents required by Bank in connection with the issuance thereof. Each drawing paid under a Letter of Credit shall be deemed an advance under the Revolving Line of Credit in accordance with the provisions of Section 2.2(g) and shall be repaid by Borrower in accordance with the terms and conditions of this Agreement applicable to advances; that if advances under the Revolving Line of Credit are not available, for any reason, at the time any drawing is paid, then Borrower shall immediately pay to Bank the full amount drawn, together with interest thereon from the date such drawing is paid to the date such amount is fully repaid by Borrower, at the rate of interest applicable to advances under the Revolving Line of Credit. In such event Borrower agrees that Bank, in its sole discretion, may debit any account maintained by Borrower with Bank for the amount of any such drawing.
Letter of Credit Subfeature
Letter of Credit
Letters of Credit
provided
provided however
provided
(c) Borrower may from time to time during the Availability Period, partially or wholly repay its outstanding borrowings under the Revolving Line of Credit, and reborrow, subject to all of the limitations, terms and conditions contained herein; that, the total outstanding borrowings under the Revolving Line of Credit shall not at any time exceed the maximum principal amount available thereunder, as set forth above. On the Revolving Credit Maturity Date, Borrower shall repay to Bank in full the aggregate outstanding principal balance of all Revolving Credit Loans, together with all accrued and unpaid interest due thereon.
Borrowing and Repayment.
provided
S 2.1A. L R L C T C. If, at the time of termination or cancellation of the Revolving Line of Credit, any contingent liabilities of Borrower in connection with any Letter of Credit or any other obligations of Borrower to Bank of any nature whatsoever remain outstanding under any of the other Loan Documents or any other agreement between Borrower and Bank, Borrower shall deliver and pledge to Bank, cash collateral in an aggregate amount of, and as security for, all such contingent obligations in respect of outstanding Letters of Credit. All of the foregoing shall be evidenced by and subject to the terms of such security agreements, control agreements, financing statements, and other documents as Bank shall require, all in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to Bank.
ECTION
IABILITIES
IF
EVOLVING
INE
OF
REDIT
ERMINATED
OR
ANCELLED
S 2.2. P F B.
ECTION
ROCEDURES
OR
ORROWING
(a) Each Revolving Credit Borrowing, each conversion of Loans from one Type to the other and each continuation of LIBOR Loans shall be made upon Borrower's irrevocable notice to Bank, which may be given by telephone or by approved electronic communications. Each such notice must be received by Bank not later than 11:00 a.m. on the requested date of any Revolving Credit Borrowing, conversion or continuation. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained herein, any telephonic notice or other electronic communication by Borrower pursuant to this Section 2.2(a) may be given by an individual who has been authorized in writing to do so by an appropriate Responsible Officer of Borrower. Each such telephonic notice or other electronic communication must be confirmed promptly by delivery to Bank of a written Loan Notice, appropriately completed and signed by an appropriate Responsible Officer of Borrower.
 
(b) Each Revolving Credit Borrowing of, conversion to or continuation of LIBOR Loans shall be in a principal amount of $1,000,000 or a whole multiple of $100,000 in excess thereof. Each Revolving Credit Borrowing of or conversion to Base Rate Loans shall be in a principal amount of $1,000,000 or a whole multiple of $100,000 in excess thereof.
(c) Each Loan Notice (whether telephonic or written) shall specify: (i) whether Borrower is requesting: (A) a Revolving Credit Borrowing; (B) a conversion of outstanding Loans from one Type to the other; or (C) a continuation of LIBOR Loans; (ii) the requested date of such Revolving Credit Borrowing, conversion or continuation, as the case may be (which shall be a Business Day); (iii) the principal amount of the Loans to be borrowed, converted or continued; (iv) the Type of Loans to be borrowed or to which existing Loans are to be converted; and (v) if applicable, the duration of the Interest Period with respect thereto. If Borrower fails to specify a Type of Loan in a Loan Notice or if Borrower fails to give a timely notice requesting a conversion or continuation, then the applicable Loan(s) shall be made as, or converted to, Base Rate Loans. Any such automatic conversion to Base Rate Loans shall be effective as of the last day of the Interest Period then in effect with respect to the applicable LIBOR Loans. If Borrower requests a Revolving Credit Borrowing of, conversion to, or continuation of LIBOR Loans in any such Loan Notice, but fails to specify an Interest Period, it will be deemed to have specified an Interest Period of one month.
(d) Except as otherwise provided herein, a LIBOR Loan may be continued or converted only on the last day of an Interest Period for such LIBOR Loan. During the existence of an Event of Default: (i) no Loans may be requested as, converted to or continued as LIBOR Loans without the consent of Bank; and (ii) Bank may demand that any or all of the then outstanding Revolving Credit Loans that are LIBOR Loans be converted immediately to Base Rate Loans, whereupon Borrower shall pay any amounts due under Section 3.4 in accordance with the terms thereof due to any such conversion.
(e) Bank shall promptly notify Borrower of the interest rate applicable to any Interest Period for LIBOR Loans upon determination of such interest rate.
(f) After giving effect to all Revolving Credit Borrowings, all conversions of Loans from one Type to the other, and all continuations of Loans as the same Type, there shall not be more than five Interest Periods in effect with respect to the Revolving Credit Loans.
(g) Upon receipt from the beneficiary of any Letter of Credit of any drawing under such Letter of Credit (or any notice thereof), Bank shall notify Borrower thereof. In such event, Borrower shall be deemed to have requested a Revolving Credit Loan consisting of Base Rate Loans to be disbursed on the date of such drawing in an amount equal to such drawing, without regard to the minimum and multiples specified in Section 2.2(b) for the principal amount of Base Rate Loans but subject to the conditions set forth in Section 5.2. Any notice given by Bank pursuant to this Section 2.2(g) may be given by telephone if immediately confirmed in writing; that the lack of such an immediate confirmation shall not affect the conclusiveness or binding effect of such notice.
provided
 
S 2.3. P P P. Borrower may, upon notice to Bank, at any time or from time to time voluntarily prepay Loans in whole or in part without premium or penalty but subject to Section 3.4; that: (A) such notice must be received by Bank not later than 11:00 a.m.: (1) three Business Days prior to any date of prepayment of Loans that are LIBOR Loans; and (2) one Business Day prior to the date of prepayment of Loans that are Base Rate Loans; and (B) any prepayment of any Loans that are: (1) LIBOR Loans shall be in a principal amount of $5,000,000 or a whole multiple of $1,000,000 in excess thereof, or, if less, the entire principal amount thereof then outstanding; and (2) Base Rate Loans shall be in a principal amount of $1,000,000 or a whole multiple of $1,000,000 in excess thereof, or, if less, the entire principal amount thereof then outstanding. Each such notice shall specify the date and amount of such prepayment and the Type(s) of Loans to be prepaid. If Borrower gives such notice, then Borrower's prepayment obligation shall be irrevocable, and Borrower shall make such prepayment and the payment amount specified in such notice shall be due and payable on the date specified therein. Any prepayment of a Loan that is a LIBOR Loan shall be accompanied by all accrued interest on the amount prepaid, together with any additional amounts required pursuant to Section 3.4.
ECTION
RINCIPAL
AYMENTS
AND
REPAYMENTS
provided
S 2.4. I/A R.
ECTION
NTEREST
PPLICABLE
ATES
(a) Subject to the provisions of subsection Section 2.4(b): (i) each LIBOR Loan shall bear interest on the outstanding principal amount thereof for each Interest Period at a rate per annum equal to LIBOR for such Interest Period the Applicable Rate; and (ii) each Base Rate Loan shall bear interest on the outstanding principal amount thereof from the applicable borrowing date at a rate per annum equal to the Base Rate the Applicable Rate.
plus
plus
(b)(i) If any amount of principal of any Loan is not paid when due (without regard to any applicable grace periods), whether at stated maturity, by acceleration or otherwise, such amount shall thereafter bear interest at a fluctuating interest rate per annum at all times equal to the Default Rate to the fullest extent permitted by applicable laws.
(ii) If any amount (other than principal of any Loan) payable by Borrower under any Loan Document is not paid when due (without regard to any applicable grace periods), whether at stated maturity, by acceleration or otherwise, then such amount shall thereafter bear interest at a fluctuating interest rate per annum at all times equal to the Default Rate to the fullest extent permitted by applicable laws.
(iii) While any Event of Default exists, Borrower shall pay interest on the principal amount of all outstanding Obligations hereunder at a fluctuating interest rate per annum at all times equal to the Default Rate to the fullest extent permitted by applicable laws.
 
(iv) Accrued and unpaid interest on past due amounts (including interest on past due interest) shall be due and payable upon demand.
(c) Interest on each Loan shall be due and payable in arrears on each Interest Payment Date applicable thereto and at such other times as may be specified herein. Interest hereunder shall be due and payable in accordance with the terms hereof before and after judgment, and before and after the commencement of any proceeding under any Bankruptcy Law.
(d) Any increase or decrease in any Applicable Rate resulting from a change in the Leverage Ratio shall become effective as of the first day of the month immediately following the month in which Borrower is required to deliver a Compliance Certificate in accordance with Section 6.3(d) for a given period (each such date, a ""); that the Applicable Rate in effect from the Closing Date to the first day of the month immediately following receipt by Bank of a timely delivered Compliance Certificate with respect to the fiscal quarter ending March 31, 2012 shall be determined based upon Tier 2 (as indicated in the definition of ); that, if any Compliance Certificate required to be delivered in accordance with Section 6.3(d) for any given period is not delivered to Bank on or before the related calculation date, then Tier 1 (as indicated in the definition of ) shall apply, effective on the related calculation date until two Business Days after such Compliance Certificate is actually received by Bank.
calculation date
provided
"Applicable Rate"
provided further
"Applicable Rate"
Notwithstanding the foregoing and for the avoidance of doubt, if for any period and for any reason, the actual Leverage Ratio is higher than that reported in the Compliance Certificate, Borrower shall immediately, without the requirement of notice or demand from any Person, pay to Bank an amount equal to the excess of: (A) the amount of interest or fees that would have accrued had the Applicable Rates for the relevant period been based upon the actual Leverage Ratio for the prior period rather than the Leverage Ratio reported in the Compliance Certificate delivered for such prior period; (B) the amount of interest or fees that was actually paid by Borrower based upon the Leverage Ratio reported in the Compliance Certificate delivered for such period.
over
S 2.5. F.
ECTION
EES
(a) . Borrower shall pay to Bank unused commitment fees (each, an ) equal to 0.0125% the average daily unused amount of the Revolving Line of Credit. Unused Commitment Fees shall accrue at all times during Prior to the Revolving Credit Maturity Date, and shall be due and payable quarterly in arrears on the last Business Day of each March, June, September and December, commencing with the first such date to occur after the Closing Date, and on the Revolving Credit Maturity Date. Unused Commitment Fees shall be calculated quarterly in arrears.
Unused Commitment Fee
"Unused Commitment Fee"
multiplied by
(b) Borrower shall pay to Bank (A) fees upon the issuance of each standby Letter of Credit (each, a "") equal to the Applicable Rate (computed on the basis of a 360-day year, actual days elapsed) the face amount of such standby Letter of Credit, and (ii) fees upon the payment or negotiation of each drawing under any standby Letter of Credit and fees upon the occurrence of any other activity with respect to any standby Letter of Credit (including without limitation, the transfer, amendment or cancellation of any standby Letter of Credit) determined in accordance with Bank's standard fees and charges then in effect for such activity.
Letter of Credit Fees.
Letter of Credit Fee
multiplied by
 
S 2.6. C I F. All computations of interest for Base Rate Loans shall be made on the basis of a year of 365 or 366 days, as the case may be, and actual days elapsed. All other computations of interest and fees hereunder shall be made on the basis of a year of 360 days and actual days elapsed. Interest shall accrue on each Loan for the day on which the Loan is made, and shall not accrue on a Loan, or any portion thereof, for the day on which the Loan or such portion is paid, that any Loan that is repaid on the same day on which it is made shall bear interest for one day. Each determination by Bank of an interest rate or fee hereunder shall be conclusive and binding for all purposes, absent manifest error.
ECTION
OMPUTATIONS
OF
NTEREST
AND
EES
provided
S 2.7. P G; C P.
ECTION
AYMENTS
ENERALLY
OLLECTION
OF
AYMENTS
(a) . All payments to be made by Borrower shall be made without condition or deduction for any counterclaim, defense, recoupment or setoff. Except as otherwise expressly provided herein, all payments by Borrower hereunder shall be made to Bank in Dollars and in immediately available funds not later than 4:00 p.m. on the date specified herein. All payments received by Bank after 4:00 p.m. shall be deemed received on the next succeeding Business Day and any applicable interest or fee shall continue to accrue. If any payment to be made by Borrower shall come due on a day other than a Business Day, payment shall be made on the next following Business Day, and such extension of time shall be reflected in computing interest or fees, as the case may be.
General
(b) . Borrower authorizes Bank to collect all principal, interest and fees due under each credit created by the Loan Documents by charging Borrower's deposit account number 4121261853 with Bank, or any other deposit account maintained by Borrower with Bank, for the full amount thereof. Should there be insufficient funds in any such deposit account to pay all such sums when due, the full amount of such deficiency shall be immediately due and payable by Borrower.
Collection of Payments
S 2.8. C. As security for all indebtedness of Borrower to Bank created by the Loan Documents, Borrower hereby grants to Bank security interests of first priority (except for Permitted Liens that are senior to Bank's security interests), and shall cause each Material Domestic Subsidiary to grant to Bank security interests of first priority, in all of Borrower's and each such Material Domestic Subsidiary's personal property (including, without limitation, all of Borrower's ownership interests in Subsidiaries, accounts receivable, inventory, equipment and intellectual property now owned or hereafter acquired), but excluding interests as a lessee under real property and personal property leases and shares of voting stock of each Foreign Subsidiary that represent more than 65% of the voting stock of such Foreign Subsidiary.
ECTION
OLLATERAL
 
As additional security for all indebtedness of Borrower to Bank created by the Loan Documents, Borrower shall cause each Material Domestic Subsidiary to grant to Bank security interests of first priority in all such Material Domestic Subsidiary's ownership interest in any Material Domestic Subsidiary or Foreign Subsidiary, but excluding shares of voting stock of each Foreign Subsidiary that represent more than 65% of the voting stock of such Foreign Subsidiary and, with respect to each Foreign Subsidiary, subject to the time frames established in Section 6.12(b) hereof.
All of the foregoing shall be evidenced by and subject to the terms of such security agreements, financing statements, deeds or mortgages, and other documents as Bank shall reasonably require, all in form and substance satisfactory to Bank. Borrower shall reimburse Bank immediately upon demand for all costs and expenses incurred by Bank in connection with any of the foregoing security, including without limitation, filing and recording fees and costs of appraisals, audits and title insurance.
S 2.9. G. Subject to the time frames established in Section 6.12(a) hereof, all Obligations shall be guaranteed jointly and severally by each Subsidiary Guarantor, as evidenced by and subject to the terms of this Agreement.
ECTION
UARANTIES
S 3.1. I C.
ECTION
NCREASED
OSTS
(a) . If any Change in Law shall: (i) impose, modify or deem applicable any reserve, special deposit, compulsory loan, insurance charge or similar requirement against assets of, deposits with or for the account of, or advances, loans or other credit extended by, Bank (except any reserve requirement reflected in the LIBOR); (ii) subject Bank to any tax of any kind whatsoever with respect to this Agreement or any Loan bearing interest at LIBOR made by it, or change the basis of taxation of payments to Bank in respect thereof (except for Indemnified Taxes or Other Taxes covered by and the imposition of, or any change in the rate of any Excluded Tax payable by Bank); or (iii) impose on Bank or the London interbank market any other condition, cost or expense affecting this Agreement or any Loan bearing interest at LIBOR made by Bank; and the result of any of the foregoing shall be to increase the cost to Bank of making or maintaining any Loan bearing interest at LIBOR (or of maintaining its obligation to make any such Loan), or to reduce the amount of any sum received or receivable by Bank hereunder (whether of principal, interest or any other amount) then, upon written request of Bank, Borrower shall promptly pay to Bank such additional amount or amounts as will compensate Bank for such additional costs incurred or reduction suffered.
Increased Costs Generally
Section 3.2
(b) . If Bank determines (in good faith and in its reasonable discretion) that any Change in Law affecting Bank or any lending office of Bank or Bank's holding company, if any, regarding capital requirements has or would have the effect of reducing the rate of return on Bank's capital or on the capital of Bank's holding company, if any, as a consequence of this Agreement, the Line of Credit or the Loans made by Bank, to a level below that which Bank or Bank's holding company could have achieved but for such Change in Law (taking into consideration Bank's policies and the policies of Bank's holding company with respect to capital adequacy), then from time to time upon written request of Bank, Borrower shall promptly pay to Bank such additional amount or amounts as will compensate Bank or Bank's holding company for any such reduction suffered.
Capital Requirements
 
(c) . A certificate of Bank setting forth the amount or amounts necessary to compensate Bank or its holding company, as the case may be, as specified in paragraph (a) or (b) of this and setting forth in reasonable detail the manner in which such amount or amounts shall have been determined, shall be delivered to Borrower and shall be conclusive absent manifest error. Borrower shall pay Bank the amount shown as due on any such certificate within ten (10) days after receipt thereof.
Certificates for Reimbursement
Section 3.1
(d) . Failure or delay on the part of Bank to demand compensation pursuant to this Section shall not constitute a waiver of Bank's right to demand such compensation; that Borrower shall not be required to compensate Bank pursuant to this Section for any increased costs incurred or reductions suffered more than nine (9) months prior to the date that Bank notifies Borrower of the Change in Law giving rise to such increased costs or reductions and of Bank's intention to claim compensation therefor (except that if the Change in Law giving rise to such increased costs or reductions is retroactive, then the nine-month period referred to above shall be extended to include the period of retroactive effect thereof).
Delay in Requests
provided
S 3.2. T.
ECTION
AXES
(a) Any and all payments by Borrower to or for the account of Bank hereunder or under any other Loan Document shall be made free and clear of and without deduction or withholding for any and all Taxes, and all liabilities with respect thereto, now or hereafter imposed, levied, collected, withheld or assessed by any Governmental Authority, excluding Taxes imposed on its income, receipts, capital, net worth or items of tax preference and franchise, doing business and similar Taxes (imposed on it in lieu of net income taxes), that are imposed on Bank as a result of a present or former connection between Bank and the jurisdiction of the Governmental Authority imposing such tax or any political subdivision or taxing authority thereof or therein (other than any such connection arising solely from Bank having executed, delivered or performed its obligations or received a payment under, or enforced, this Agreement or any other Loan Document) (""). If any such non-Excluded Taxes ("") or Other Taxes (as defined below) are required to be withheld after the date hereof from or in respect of any sum payable under this Agreement or any other Loan Document to Bank, (i) the sum payable shall be increased as necessary so that after making all required deductions (including deductions applicable to additional sums payable under this ) Bank receives an amount equal to the sum it would have received had no such deductions been made, (ii) Borrower shall make such deductions, (iii) Borrower shall timely pay the full amount deducted to the relevant taxation authority or other authority in accordance with applicable Laws, and (iv) Borrower shall furnish to Bank, at its address referred to in , the original or a certified copy of a receipt evidencing payment thereof or other evidence of payment reasonably acceptable to Bank; that Borrower shall not be required to increase such amounts payable to Bank with respect to any Taxes (A) that are attributable to Bank's failure to comply with the requirements of paragraph (d) of this Section or (B) that are United States federal withholding taxes imposed on amounts payable to Bank at the time Bank becomes a party to this Agreement, or, in the case of an assignment, at the time when the Assignee becomes a party to this Agreement, except to the extent that Bank's assignor (if any) was entitled, at the time of assignment, to receive additional amounts from Borrower with respect to such Taxes pursuant to this paragraph.
Excluded Taxes
Indemnified Taxes
Section 3.2
Section 9.2
provided
 
(b) In addition, Borrower agrees to timely pay any and all present or future stamp, property, recording, excise and documentary taxes which arise from the execution or delivery of this Agreement or any other Loan Document or the provision of the security interest in any Collateral required hereunder (hereinafter referred to as "").
Other Taxes
(c) Borrower agrees to indemnify Bank for the full amount of Indemnified Taxes and Other Taxes (including any Indemnified Taxes or Other Taxes imposed or asserted by any jurisdiction on amounts payable under this ) paid by Bank and any liability (including penalties, interest, and reasonable expenses) arising therefrom or with respect thereto.
Section 3.2
(d) Bank, on or prior to the Closing Date, and from time to time thereafter if requested in writing by Borrower, shall provide Borrower with (i) a complete and properly executed IRS Form W-8BEN, W-8ECI or W-8IMY (including all required accompanying information), as appropriate, or any successor form prescribed by the IRS (including a United States taxpayer identification number), certifying that Bank is entitled to benefits under an income tax treaty to which the United States is a party that reduces the rate of withholding tax on payments of interest, certifying that such Person is eligible for the "portfolio interest exemption" or certifying that the income receivable pursuant to this Agreement is effectively connected with the conduct of a trade or business in the United States or (ii) an IRS Form W-9 or any successor form prescribed by the IRS. In addition, Bank will (A) take all actions reasonably requested in good faith by Borrower in writing that are consistent with applicable legal and regulatory restrictions to claim any available reductions or exemptions from Indemnified Taxes or Other Taxes and (B) otherwise cooperate with Borrower to minimize any amounts payable by Borrower under this ; that, in each case, any out-of-pocket cost relating directly to such action or cooperation requested by Borrower shall be borne by Borrower, and Bank shall not be required to take any action that it determines in its sole good faith discretion may be adverse in any non respect to it and not indemnified to its satisfaction.
Section 3.2
provided
de minimis
(e) Without prejudice to the survival of any other agreement of Borrower hereunder, the agreements and obligations of Borrower contained in this shall survive the payment in full of all obligations under this Agreement and the other Loan Documents.
Section 3.2
S 3.3. I D R. If Bank determines in connection with any request for a Loan or continuation thereof that (a) Dollar deposits are not being offered to banks in the London interbank offered market for the applicable amount and Interest Period of such Loan, (b) adequate and reasonable means do not exist for determining LIBOR for any requested Interest Period with respect to a proposed Loan, or (c) LIBOR for any requested Interest Period with respect to a proposed Loan does not adequately and fairly reflect the cost to Bank of funding such Loan, then Bank will promptly so notify Borrower. Thereafter, the obligation of Bank to make or maintain Loans shall be suspended until Bank revokes such notice. Upon receipt of such notice, Borrower may revoke any pending request for a Revolving Credit Borrowing or continuation of Loans or, failing that, will be deemed to have converted such request into a request for a Revolving Credit Borrowing consisting of Base Rate Loans in the amount specified therein.
ECTION
NABILITY
TO
ETERMINE
ATES
 
S 3.4. C L. Upon demand of Bank from time to time, Borrower shall promptly compensate Bank for and hold Bank harmless from any loss, cost or expense incurred by it as a result of:
ECTION
OMPENSATION
FOR
OSSES
(a) any continuation, conversion, payment or prepayment of any Loan other than a Base Rate Loan on a day other than the last day of the Interest Period for such Loan (whether voluntary, mandatory, automatic, by reason of acceleration, or otherwise); or
(b) any failure by Borrower (for a reason other than the failure of Bank to make a Loan) to prepay, borrow, continue or convert any Loan other than a Base Rate Loan on the date or in the amount notified by Borrower;
including any loss of anticipated profits and any loss or expense arising from the liquidation or reemployment of funds obtained by it to maintain such Loan or from fees payable to terminate the deposits from which such funds were obtained. Borrower shall also pay any customary administrative fees charged by Bank in connection with the foregoing. For purposes of calculating amounts payable by Borrower to Bank under this Section 3.4, Bank shall be deemed to have funded each LIBOR Loan made by it by a matching deposit or other borrowing in the London interbank offered market for a comparable amount and for a comparable period, whether or not such LIBOR Loan was in fact so funded.
S 3.5. S. All obligations of Borrower under this Article III shall survive repayment, satisfaction or discharge of all the Obligations.
ECTION
URVIVAL
Borrower makes the following representations and warranties to Bank, which representations and warranties shall survive the execution of this Agreement and shall continue in full force and effect until the full and final payment, and satisfaction and discharge, of all obligations of Borrower to Bank created by the Loan Documents.
S 4.1. L S. Borrower and each of its Subsidiaries, and each Subsidiary of a Subsidiary, is a corporation, partnership or limited liability company, duly organized and existing and in good standing under the laws of the jurisdiction of its incorporation, organization or formation, and is qualified or licensed to do business (and is in good standing as a foreign entity, if applicable) in all jurisdictions in which such qualification or licensing is required or in which the failure to so qualify or to be so licensed would reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect. All of the Subsidiaries of Borrower in existence as of the Closing Date are listed on hereto.
ECTION
EGAL
TATUS
Schedule 4.1
 
S 4.2. A V. This Agreement and each of the Loan Documents have been duly authorized, and upon their execution and delivery in accordance with the provisions hereof will constitute legal, valid and binding agreements and obligations of Borrower or the party which executes the same, enforceable in accordance with their respective terms.
ECTION
UTHORIZATION
AND
ALIDITY
S 4.3. N V. The execution, delivery and performance by Borrower and the Guarantors of each of the Loan Documents do not violate any provision of any law or regulation, or contravene any provision of such Person's organizational documents, or result in any breach of or default under any contract, obligation, indenture or other instrument to which any such Person is a party or may be bound which violation contravention, breach or default would individually or in the aggregate reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect.
ECTION
O
IOLATION
S 4.4. L. There are no pending, or to the best of Borrower's knowledge threatened, actions, claims, investigations, suits or proceedings by or before any governmental authority, arbitrator, court or administrative agency, against Borrower, any Subsidiary, or any Subsidiary of a Subsidiary, which would reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect, other than those disclosed on .
ECTION
ITIGATION
Schedule 4.4
S 4.5. C F S. The consolidated financial statement of Borrower dated December 31, 2010, a true copy of which has been delivered by Borrower to Bank prior to the date hereof, (a) is complete and correct and presents fairly the financial condition of Borrower, (b) discloses all liabilities of Borrower that are required to be reflected or reserved against under GAAP, whether liquidated or unliquidated, fixed or contingent, and (c) has been prepared in accordance with GAAP. Since the date of such financial statement there has been no material adverse change in the financial condition of Borrower, nor (exclusive of Permitted Liens) has Borrower mortgaged, pledged, granted a security interest in or otherwise encumbered any of its assets or properties except in favor of Bank or as otherwise permitted by Bank in writing.
ECTION
ORRECTNESS
OF
INANCIAL
TATEMENT
S 4.6. I T R. Borrower has no knowledge of any pending assessments or adjustments of its income tax payable with respect to any year.
ECTION
NCOME
AX
ETURNS
S 4.7. N S. There is no agreement, indenture, contract or instrument to which Borrower is a party or by which Borrower may be bound that requires the subordination in right of payment of any of Borrower's or any Guarantor's obligations created by the Loan Documents to any other obligation of Borrower or such Guarantor.
ECTION
O
UBORDINATION
 
S 4.8. P, F. Borrower and each of its Subsidiaries, and each Subsidiary of a Subsidiary, possess, and will hereafter possess, all permits, consents, approvals, franchises and licenses required and rights to all trademarks, trade names, patents, and fictitious names, if any, necessary to enable it to conduct the business in which it is now engaged in compliance with applicable law.
ECTION
ERMITS
RANCHISES
S 4.9. ERISA C. As of the Closing Date: (a) each Plan is in compliance with the applicable provisions of ERISA, the Code and other federal or state law. Each Plan which is intended to qualify under subsection 401(a) of the Code has received a favorable determination letter from the Internal Revenue Service and nothing has occurred that would cause the loss of such qualification. As of the Closing Date, Borrower and each ERISA Affiliate have made all required contributions to any Plan subject to Section 412 of the Code, and no application for a funding waiver or an extension of any amortization period pursuant to Section 412 of the Code has been made with respect to any Plan; (b) there are no pending or, to the best knowledge of Borrower, threatened claims, actions or lawsuits, or action by any Governmental Authority. As of the Closing Date, there has been no prohibited transaction or violation of the fiduciary responsibility rules with respect to any Plan; and (c) (i) no ERISA Event has occurred or is reasonably expected to occur; and (ii) no event or circumstance has occurred or exists that, if such event or circumstance had occurred or arisen after the Closing Date, would create an Event of Default under Section 8.1(j).
ECTION
OMPLIANCE
S 4.10. O O. None of Borrower or any Subsidiary (including any Subsidiary of a Subsidiary) is in default on any obligation for borrowed money, any purchase money obligation or any other material lease, commitment, contract, instrument or obligation.
ECTION
THER
BLIGATIONS
S 4.11. E M. Except as disclosed on , Borrower is in compliance in all material respects with all applicable federal or state environmental, hazardous waste, health and safety statutes, and any rules or regulations adopted pursuant thereto, which govern or affect any of Borrower's operations and/or properties, including without limitation, the Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation and Liability Act of 1980, the Superfund Amendments and Reauthorization Act of 1986, the Federal Resource Conservation and Recovery Act of 1976, and the Federal Toxic Substances Control Act, as any of the same may be amended, modified or supplemented from time to time. None of the operations of Borrower is the subject of any federal or state investigation evaluating whether any remedial action involving a material expenditure is needed to respond to a release of any toxic or hazardous waste or substance into the environment. Borrower has no material contingent liability in connection with any release of any toxic or hazardous waste or substance into the environment.
ECTION
NVIRONMENTAL
ATTERS
Schedule 4.11
S 5.1. C I E C. The obligation of Bank to extend any credit contemplated by this Agreement is subject to the fulfillment to Bank's satisfaction of all of the following conditions:
ECTION
ONDITIONS
OF
NITIAL
XTENSION
OF
REDIT
 
(a) . All legal matters incidental to the extension of credit by Bank shall be satisfactory to Bank's counsel.
Approval of Bank Counsel
(b) . Bank shall have received, in form and substance satisfactory to Bank, each of the following, duly executed:
Documentation
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
(c) . There shall have been no material adverse change, as determined by Bank, in the financial condition or business of Borrower and its Subsidiaries, nor any material decline, as determined by Bank, in the market value of any collateral required hereunder or a substantial or material portion of the assets of Borrower.
Financial Condition
(d) . Borrower shall have delivered to Bank evidence of insurance coverage on all Borrower's property, in form, substance, amounts, covering risks and issued by companies satisfactory to Bank, and where required by Bank, with loss payable endorsements in favor of Bank.
Insurance
 
S 5.2. C E E C. The obligation of Bank to make each extension of credit requested by Borrower hereunder shall be subject to the fulfillment to Bank's satisfaction of each of the following conditions:
ECTION
ONDITIONS
OF
ACH
XTENSION
OF
REDIT
(a) . The representations and warranties contained herein and in each of the other Loan Documents shall be true on and as of the date of the signing of this Agreement and on the date of each extension of credit by Bank pursuant hereto, with the same effect as though such representations and warranties had been made on and as of each such date, and on each such date, no Event of Default as defined herein, and no condition, event or act which with the giving of notice or the passage of time or both would constitute such an Event of Default, shall have occurred and be continuing or shall exist.
Compliance
(b) Bank shall have received all additional documents that may be required in connection with such extension of credit, including, in connection with the issuance of any Letter of Credit, a Letter of Credit Agreement.
Documentation.
Borrower covenants that so long as Bank remains committed to extend credit to Borrower pursuant hereto, or any liabilities (other than contingent indemnification obligations under Section 9.3) of Borrower to Bank under any of the Loan Documents remain outstanding, and until payment in full of all obligations of Borrower created by the Loan Documents, Borrower shall, and shall (except in the case of the covenants set forth in Section 6.3 and Section 6.10) cause each of its Subsidiaries (including Subsidiaries of Subsidiaries) to, unless Bank otherwise consents in writing:
S 6.1. P P. Punctually pay all principal, interest, fees or other liabilities due under any of the Loan Documents at the times and place and in the manner specified therein.
ECTION
UNCTUAL
AYMENTS
S 6.2. A R; C E. Maintain adequate books and records in accordance with GAAP, and permit any representative of Bank, at any reasonable time, to inspect, audit and examine such books and records, to make copies of the same, and to inspect its properties. From time to time, as Bank shall require in the exercise of its reasonable discretion, permit Bank, or its employees, accountants, attorneys or agents, to conduct, with respect to each such Person, examinations and inspections of any collateral required hereby or any other property of Borrower or such Subsidiary, as applicable. Such examination and inspection shall be conducted during ordinary business hours and upon one Business Day's advance notice (unless an Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing, in which case no notice shall be required).
ECTION
CCOUNTING
ECORDS
OLLATERAL
XAMS
S 6.3. F S. Provide to Bank all of the following, in form and detail satisfactory to Bank:
ECTION
INANCIAL
TATEMENTS
 
(a) not later than 90 days after and as of the end of each fiscal year, audited annual consolidated and consolidating financial statements of Borrower examined by, and with the unqualified opinion of, independent certified public accountants selected by Borrower and acceptable to Bank, which financial statements shall include Borrower's balance sheet as of the end of such fiscal year and the related statements of Borrower's income, reconciliation of retained earnings and cash flows for the fiscal year then ended, all in reasonable detail and prepared in accordance with GAAP;
(b) promptly after the sending or filing thereof, but in no event later than 45 days after the end of each fiscal quarter of Borrower, (other than the fourth fiscal quarter in each fiscal year) copies of each Form 10-Q report filed by Borrower with the United States Securities and Exchange Commission or any successor agency;
(c) not later than 15 days after the beginning of each fiscal year, projected consolidated and consolidating balance sheets and income statements for each quarter of such year for Borrower, each in reasonable detail, representing Borrower's good faith projections and certified by the chief financial officer of Borrower as being Borrower's good faith projections and identical to the projections to be used by Borrower for internal planning purposes, together with a statement of underlying assumptions and such supporting schedules and information as Bank may in its discretion require;
(d) concurrently with the delivery of the financial statements referred to in subsections (a) and (b) of this Section a duly completed Compliance Certificate signed by an appropriate Responsible Officer of Borrower; and
,
(e) from time to time such other information as Bank may reasonably request.
S 6.4. C . Preserve and maintain all licenses, permits, governmental approvals, rights, privileges and franchises necessary for the conduct of its business; and comply with the provisions of all documents pursuant to which it is organized and/or which govern its continued existence and with the requirements of all laws, rules, regulations and orders of any governmental authority applicable to it and/or its business.
ECTION
OMPLIANCE
S 6.5. I. Maintain and keep in force insurance of the types and in amounts customarily carried in lines of business similar to that of such Person, including but not limited to fire, extended coverage, public liability, flood, property damage and workers' compensation, with all such insurance carried with companies and in amounts satisfactory to Bank, and deliver to Bank from time to time at Bank's request schedules setting forth all insurance then in effect.
ECTION
NSURANCE
S 6.6. F. Keep all properties useful or necessary to such Person's business in good repair and condition, and from time to time make necessary repairs, renewals and replacements thereto so that such properties shall be fully and efficiently preserved and maintained.
ECTION
ACILITIES
 
S 6.7. T O L. Pay and discharge when due any and all indebtedness, obligations, assessments and taxes, both real or personal, including without limitation federal and state income taxes and state and local property taxes and assessments, except such (a) as such Person may in good faith contest or as to which a bona fide dispute may arise, and (b) for which such Person has made provision, to Bank's satisfaction, for eventual payment thereof in the event such Person is obligated to make such payment.
ECTION
AXES
AND
THER
IABILITIES
S 6.8. L. Promptly give notice in writing to Bank of any litigation pending or threatened against Borrower or any of its Subsidiaries with a claim in excess of $250,000.00.
ECTION
ITIGATION
S 6.9. F C. Maintain Borrower's financial condition as follows using GAAP (except to the extent modified by the definitions herein), with compliance determined commencing with Borrower's financial statements for the period ending March 31, 2012:
ECTION
INANCIAL
ONDITION
(a) As of each fiscal quarter end of Borrower, Consolidated EBITDA, determined on a rolling four-quarter basis, not less than the amounts set forth below:
 
(b) Quick Ratio not less than 1.00 to 1.00 as of the end of each fiscal quarter.
S 6.10. N B. Promptly (but in no event more than five (5) business days after a Responsible Officer becomes, or should become, aware of the occurrence of each such event or matter) give written notice to Bank in reasonable detail of: (a) the occurrence of any Event of Default, or any condition, event or act which with the giving of notice or the passage of time or both would constitute an Event of Default; (b) any change in the name or the organizational structure of Borrower; (c) the occurrence and nature of any Reportable Event or Prohibited Transaction, each as defined in ERISA, or any funding deficiency with respect to any Plan; or (d) any termination or cancellation of any insurance policy which Borrower is required to maintain, or any uninsured or partially uninsured loss through liability or property damage, or through fire, theft or any other cause affecting Borrower's property in excess of an aggregate of $250,000.00.
ECTION
OTICE
TO
ANK
 
S 6.11. M A B. At all times maintain its primary depository accounts with Bank pursuant to account agreements and terms mutually acceptable to such Person and Bank.
ECTION
AINTENANCE
OF
CCOUNTS
WITH
ANK
S 6.12. S.
ECTION
UBSIDIARIES
(a) . By not later than (i) with respect to each Material Domestic Subsidiary in existence as of the Closing Date, the Closing Date and (ii) with respect to each Material Domestic Subsidiary formed or acquired on or after the Closing Date, thirty (30) calendar days after the formation or acquisition of such Material Domestic Subsidiary, cause such Material Domestic Subsidiary to execute and deliver to Bank (A) a Joinder Agreement in satisfaction of the requirements of Section 2.9 hereof, (B) a Security Agreement (or joinder thereto) and, if pledging ownership interests in another entity, a Pledge Agreement (or joinder thereto) in satisfaction of the requirements of Section 2.8 hereof and (C) such other documents as Bank shall reasonably request, in form and substance satisfactory to Bank, evidencing the authority of such Material Domestic Subsidiary to execute and deliver such Joinder Agreement, Security Agreement (or joinder thereto) and Pledge Agreement (or joinder thereto), and the incumbency of the Persons executing such Joinder, Security Agreement (or joinder thereto) and Pledge Agreement (or joinder thereto) on behalf of such Material Domestic Subsidiary.
Domestic Subsidiaries
(b) . By not later than (i) with respect to each Foreign Subsidiary in existence as of the Closing Date and owned, in whole or in part, by Borrower or a Material Domestic Subsidiary, the Closing Date and (ii) with respect to each Foreign Subsidiary formed or acquired on or after the Closing Date and owned, in whole or in part, by Borrower or a Material Domestic Subsidiary, forty-five (45) calendar days after the formation or acquisition of such Foreign Subsidiary, execute, or cause to be executed, a Pledge Agreement and such further agreements, documents or instruments, or take such other actions, as Bank reasonably deems necessary in order to effectuate the pledge to Bank of security interests in Borrower's, and/or Borrower's Domestic Subsidiaries', ownership interest in such Foreign Subsidiary (such pledge exclusive of shares of voting stock of such Foreign Subsidiary that represent more than 65% of the voting stock of such Foreign Subsidiary, as described in Section 2.8 hereof), including, without limitation, (A) executing and delivering to each such Foreign Subsidiary, a notice of the pledge of Borrower's and/or Borrower's Subsidiaries' interests therein to Bank, and (B) causing such Foreign Subsidiary to execute and deliver to Bank an acknowledgment of pledge related to Borrower's and/or such Subsidiaries' pledge of its or their interest in such Foreign Subsidiary, in each case, in form in substance satisfactory to Bank.
Foreign Subsidiaries
(c) Upon the request of Bank, with respect to Borrower's ownership interests in Subsidiaries pledged to Bank as collateral under the Loan Documents, Borrower shall promptly deliver stock certificates (or other comparable certificates) for all certificated securities now or at any time constituting such collateral, duly endorsed in blank for transfer or accompanied by an appropriate assignment or assignments or an appropriate undated stock power or powers, in every case sufficient to transfer title thereto.
 
Borrower further covenants that so long as Bank remains committed to extend credit to Borrower pursuant hereto, or any liabilities (other than contingent indemnification obligations under Section 9.3) of Borrower to Bank under any of the Loan Documents remain outstanding, and until payment in full of all obligations of Borrower created by the Loan Documents, Borrower will not, and will not permit any Subsidiary (including Subsidiaries of Subsidiaries) of Borrower to, without Bank's prior written consent:
S 7.1. U F. Use any of the proceeds of any credit extended hereunder except for the purposes stated in Article II hereof.
ECTION
SE
OF
UNDS
S 7.2. C E. Make any additional investment in fixed assets in any fiscal year such that, after giving effect to such investment, the aggregate investments in fixed assets in such year made by Borrower and all Subsidiaries would exceed $10,000,000.00.
ECTION
APITAL
XPENDITURES
S 7.3. L E. Incur operating lease expense in any fiscal year such that, after giving effect to such operating lease expense, the aggregate operating lease expense incurred by Borrower and all Subsidiaries in such year is in excess of $4,000,000.00.
ECTION
EASE
XPENDITURES
S 7.4. O I. Create, incur, assume or permit to exist any indebtedness resulting from borrowings, loans or advances, whether secured or unsecured, matured or unmatured, liquidated or unliquidated, joint or several, other than Permitted Indebtedness.
ECTION
THER
NDEBTEDNESS
S 7.5. M, C, T A. Merge into or consolidate with any other entity, other than pursuant to a Permitted Investment; make any substantial change in the nature of such Person's business as conducted as of the date hereof; acquire all or substantially all of the assets of any other entity, other than pursuant to a Permitted Investment; nor sell, lease, transfer or otherwise dispose of all or a substantial or material portion of such Person's assets except in the ordinary course of its business; that Borrower or any Subsidiary may sell, lease or transfer assets to Borrower or any wholly-owned Material Domestic Subsidiary of Borrower that is a Guarantor.
ECTION
ERGER
ONSOLIDATION
RANSFER
OF
SSETS
provided
S 7.6. G. Guarantee or become liable in any way as surety, endorser (other than as endorser of negotiable instruments for deposit or collection in the ordinary course of business), accommodation endorser or otherwise for, nor pledge or hypothecate any assets of such Person as security for, any liabilities or obligations of any other person or entity, except (a) any of the foregoing in favor of Bank, and (b) guaranties by Borrower of real property lease obligations of its Subsidiaries not exceeding in the aggregate $500,000.00 outstanding at any time.
ECTION
UARANTIES
 
S 7.7. L, A, I. Make any loans or advances to or investments in any person or entity, other than Permitted Investments; that, so long as no Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing, Borrower shall be permitted to make contractually required earn-out payments related to a Permitted Acquisition if all of the following conditions shall have been satisfied at the time of any such earn-out payment: (a) Borrower shall have provided Bank pro forma financial forecasts of Borrower on a consolidated basis after giving effect to such payment and covenant compliance calculations reasonably satisfactory to Bank demonstrating satisfaction of the condition described in Section 7.7(b); and (b) after giving effect to such earn-out payment, no Default or Event of Default shall exist, including with respect to the financial covenants contained in Section 6.9 hereof on a pro forma basis.
ECTION
OANS
DVANCES
NVESTMENTS
provided
S 7.8. D, D. Declare or pay any dividend or distribution either in cash, stock or any other property on such Person's stock now or hereafter outstanding, nor redeem, retire, repurchase or otherwise acquire any shares of any class of such Person's stock now or hereafter outstanding; that each Subsidiary may declare or pay dividends or distributions to Borrower or any wholly-owned Material Domestic Subsidiary of Borrower that is a Guarantor.
ECTION
IVIDENDS
ISTRIBUTIONS
provided
S 7.9. P A. Mortgage, pledge, grant or permit to exist a security interest in, or lien upon, all or any portion of such Person's assets now owned or hereafter acquired, other than Permitted Liens.
ECTION
LEDGE
OF
SSETS
S 7.10. S L. Enter into any arrangement, directly or indirectly, with any other Person whereby Borrower or such Subsidiary, as applicable, shall sell or transfer any real or personal property, whether now owned or hereafter acquired, and then or thereafter rent or lease as lessee such property or any part thereof or any other property which Borrower or such Subsidiary, as applicable, intends to use for substantially the same purpose or purposes as the property being sold or transferred.
ECTION
ALE
AND
EASEBACKS
S 7.11. T A. Enter into any transaction of any kind with any affiliate of Borrower, irrespective of whether in the ordinary course of business, other than on fair and reasonable terms substantially as favorable to Borrower or a Subsidiary of Borrower as would be obtainable by such Person at the time in a comparable arm's-length transaction with a Person other than an affiliate, that the foregoing restriction shall not apply to transactions between or among Borrower or any Guarantor or between or among Guarantors.
ECTION
RANSACTIONS
WITH
FFILIATES
provided
 
Section 8.1. Events of Default Section 8.1. Events of Default. The occurrence of any of the following shall constitute an under this Agreement:
"Event of Default"
(a) Borrower shall fail to pay when due any principal, interest, fees or other amounts payable under any of the Loan Documents; or
(b) Any financial statement or certificate furnished to Bank in connection with, or any representation or warranty made by Borrower, any Subsidiary or any other party under this Agreement or any other Loan Document, shall prove to be incorrect, false or misleading in any material respect when furnished or made; or
(c) Any default in the performance of or compliance with any obligation, agreement or other provision contained herein or in any other Loan Document (other than those referred to in subsections (a) and (b) above), and with respect to any such default which by its nature can be cured, such default shall continue for a period of twenty (20) days from the date Borrower receives notice thereof or any Responsible Officer of Borrower becomes aware thereof; that if the default cannot by its nature be cured within the twenty (20) day period or cannot after diligent attempts by Borrower be cured within such twenty (20) day period, and such default is likely to be cured within a reasonable time, then Borrower shall have an additional reasonable period (which shall not in any case exceed twenty (20) days) to attempt to cure such default; that during such additional reasonable time period the failure to have cured such default shall not be deemed an Event of Default, however, no further advances under the Revolving Line of Credit will be made; or
provided
provided, further,
(d) Any default in the payment or performance of any material obligation, or any defined event of default, under the terms of any contract or instrument (other than any of the Loan Documents) pursuant to which Borrower, any Subsidiary of Borrower or any general partner or joint venturer in any Borrower or Subsidiary of Borrower which is a partnership or joint venture (with each such Subsidiary, general partner and/or joint venturer referred to herein as a ) has incurred any debt or other material liability to any person or entity, including Bank, and such default or event shall continue for a period of time without cure sufficient to permit the acceleration of the maturity of any such indebtedness or the enforcement of remedies with respect to such liability; or
"Third Party Obligor"
(e) The filing of a notice of judgment lien against Borrower or any Third Party Obligor; or the recording of any abstract of judgment against Borrower or any Third Party Obligor in any county in which Borrower or such Third Party Obligor has an interest in real property; or the service of a notice of levy and/or of a writ of attachment or execution, or other like process, against the assets of Borrower or any Third Party Obligor; or the entry of a judgment against Borrower or any Third Party Obligor; and, in any such case, the same shall remain unsatisfied, unvacated and unstayed pending appeal for a period of twenty (20) days after the entry thereof; or
 
(f) Borrower or any Third Party Obligor shall become insolvent, or shall suffer or consent to or apply for the appointment of a receiver, trustee, custodian or liquidator of itself or any of its property, or shall generally fail to pay its debts as they become due, or shall make a general assignment for the benefit of creditors; Borrower or any Third Party Obligor shall file a voluntary petition in bankruptcy, or seeking reorganization, in order to effect a plan or other arrangement with creditors or any other relief under the Bankruptcy Code, or under any state or federal law granting relief to debtors, whether now or hereafter in effect; or any involuntary petition or proceeding pursuant to the Bankruptcy Code or any other applicable state or federal law relating to bankruptcy, reorganization or other relief for debtors is filed or commenced against Borrower or any Third Party Obligor and is not dismissed within 45 days after its filing, or Borrower or any Third Party Obligor shall file an answer admitting the jurisdiction of the court and the material allegations of any involuntary petition; or Borrower or any Third Party Obligor shall be adjudicated a bankrupt, or an order for relief shall be entered against Borrower or any Third Party Obligor by any court of competent jurisdiction under the Bankruptcy Code or any other applicable state or federal law relating to bankruptcy, reorganization or other relief for debtors; or
(g) There shall exist or occur any event or condition which Bank in good faith believes would reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect; or
(h) The dissolution or liquidation of any Borrower or Third Party Obligor which is a corporation, partnership, joint venture or other type of entity; or Borrower or any such Third Party Obligor, or any of its directors, stockholders or members, shall take action seeking to effect the dissolution or liquidation of such Borrower or Third Party Obligor; or
(i) There shall exist a material deficiency in any collateral required hereunder, as identified by Bank pursuant to one or more of the collateral examinations and inspections referenced in Section 6.2 hereof; or
(j)(i) An ERISA Event occurs with respect to a Pension Plan or Multiemployer Plan which has resulted or could reasonably be expected to result in liability of Borrower under Title IV of ERISA to the Pension Plan, Multiemployer Plan or the PBGC in an aggregate amount in excess of $1,000,000; or (ii) Borrower or any ERISA Affiliate fails to pay when due, after the expiration of any applicable grace period, any installment payment with respect to its withdrawal liability under Section 4201 of ERISA under a Multiemployer Plan in an aggregate amount in excess of $1,000,000; or
(k) Any Loan Document or any provision thereof, at any time after its execution and delivery and for any reason other than as expressly permitted hereunder or thereunder or satisfaction in full of all the Obligations, ceases to be in full force and effect; or Borrower or any Subsidiary contests in any manner the validity or enforceability of any Loan Document or any provision thereof; or Borrower or any Subsidiary denies that it has any or further liability or obligation under any Loan Document, or purports to revoke, terminate or rescind any Loan Document or any provision thereof; or
(l) A Change of Control occurs.
S 8.2. R. Upon the occurrence of any Event of Default: (a) all indebtedness of Borrower under each of the Loan Documents, any term thereof to the contrary notwithstanding, shall at Bank's option and without notice become immediately due and payable without presentment, demand, protest or notice of dishonor, all of which are hereby expressly waived by each Borrower; (b) the obligation, if any, of Bank to extend any further credit under any of the Loan Documents shall immediately cease and terminate; and (c) Bank shall have all rights, powers and remedies available under each of the Loan Documents, or accorded by law, including without limitation the right to resort to any or all security for any credit created by the Loan Documents and to exercise any or all of the rights of a beneficiary or secured party pursuant to applicable law. All rights, powers and remedies of Bank may be exercised at any time by Bank and from time to time after the occurrence of an Event of Default, are cumulative and not exclusive, and shall be in addition to any other rights, powers or remedies provided by law or equity.
ECTION
EMEDIES
 
S 9.1. N W. No delay, failure or discontinuance of Bank in exercising any right, power or remedy under any of the Loan Documents shall affect or operate as a waiver of such right, power or remedy; nor shall any single or partial exercise of any such right, power or remedy preclude, waive or otherwise affect any other or further exercise thereof or the exercise of any other right, power or remedy. Any waiver, permit, consent or approval of any kind by Bank of any breach of or default under any of the Loan Documents must be in writing and shall be effective only to the extent set forth in such writing.
ECTION
O
AIVER
S 9.2. N. All notices, requests and demands which any party is required or may desire to give to any other party under any provision of this Agreement must be in writing delivered to each party at the following address:
ECTION
OTICES
 
or to such other address as any party may designate by written notice to all other parties. Each such notice, request and demand shall be deemed given or made as follows: (a) if sent by hand delivery, upon delivery; (b) if sent by mail, upon the earlier of the date of receipt or three (3) days after deposit in the U.S. mail, first class and postage prepaid; and (c) if sent by telecopy, upon receipt.
S 9.3. E; I; D W.
ECTION
XPENSES
NDEMNITY
AMAGE
AIVER
(a) Borrower shall pay to Bank immediately upon demand the full amount of all payments, advances, charges, costs and expenses, including reasonable attorneys' fees (to include outside counsel fees and all allocated costs of Bank's in-house counsel), expended or incurred by Bank in connection with (i) the negotiation and preparation of this Agreement and the other Loan Documents, Bank's continued administration hereof and thereof, and the preparation of any amendments and waivers hereto and thereto, (ii) the enforcement of Bank's rights and/or the collection of any amounts which become due to Bank under any of the Loan Documents, and (iii) the prosecution or defense of any action in any way related to any of the Loan Documents, including without limitation, any action for declaratory relief, whether incurred at the trial or appellate level, in an arbitration proceeding or otherwise, and including any of the foregoing incurred in connection with any bankruptcy proceeding (including without limitation, any adversary proceeding, contested matter or motion brought by Bank or any other person) relating to any Borrower or any other person or entity.
 
(b) Borrower shall indemnify Bank and Bank's affiliates and the partners, members, directors, officers, employees, agents and advisors of Bank and Bank's affiliates (each such Person being called an "") against, and hold each Indemnitee harmless from, any and all losses, claims, damages, liabilities and related expenses (including the fees, charges and disbursements of any counsel for any Indemnitee), and shall indemnify and hold harmless each Indemnitee from all fees and time charges and disbursements for attorneys, who may be employees of any Indemnitee, incurred by any Indemnitee or asserted against any Indemnitee by any third party or by Borrower or any Guarantor, or any Subsidiary of Borrower or any Guarantor, arising out of, in connection with, or as a result of: (i) the execution or delivery of this Agreement, any other Loan Document or any document contemplated hereby or thereby, the performance by the parties hereto of their respective obligations hereunder or thereunder or the consummation of the transactions contemplated hereby or thereby; (ii) any Loan or the use or proposed use of the proceeds therefrom; (iii) any actual or alleged presence or release of Hazardous Materials on or from any property owned or operated by Borrower, any Guarantor or any Subsidiary of Borrower or any Guarantor, or any Environmental Claim or Environmental Liability related in any way to Borrower, any Guarantor or any Subsidiary of Borrower or any Guarantor; or (iv) any actual or prospective claim, litigation, investigation or proceeding relating to any of the foregoing, whether based on contract, tort or any other theory, whether brought by a third party or by Borrower, any Guarantor or any Subsidiary of Borrower or any Guarantor, and regardless of whether any Indemnitee is a party thereto, in all cases, whether or not caused by or arising, in whole or in part, out of the comparative, contributory or sole negligence of the Indemnitee; that such indemnity shall not, as to any Indemnitee, be available to the extent that such losses, claims, damages, liabilities or related expenses result from the gross negligence or willful misconduct of such Indemnitee.
Indemnitee
provided
(c) To the fullest extent permitted by applicable law, Borrower shall not assert, and hereby waives, any claim against any Indemnitee, on any theory of liability, for special, indirect, consequential or punitive damages (as opposed to direct or actual damages) arising out of, in connection with, or as a result of, this Agreement, any other Loan Document or any document contemplated hereby, the transactions contemplated hereby or thereby, any Loan or the use of the proceeds thereof. No Indemnitee referred to in Section 9.3(b) shall be liable for any damages arising from the use by unintended recipients of any information or other materials distributed by it through telecommunications, electronic or other information transmission systems in connection with this Agreement or the other Loan Documents or the transactions contemplated hereby or thereby.
(d) The agreements in this Section 9.3 shall survive the termination of Bank's commitment to make Loans and the repayment, satisfaction or discharge of all other Obligations.
S 9.4. S, A. This Agreement shall be binding upon and inure to the benefit of the heirs, executors, administrators, legal representatives, successors and assigns of the parties; that Borrower may not assign or transfer its interest hereunder without Bank's prior written consent. Bank reserves the right to sell, assign, transfer, negotiate or grant participations in all or any part of, or any interest in, Bank's rights and benefits under each of the Loan Documents.
ECTION
UCCESSORS
SSIGNMENT
provided
 
S 9.5. C. The Confidential Information will be used by Bank solely for the purpose of evaluating Borrower's credit request and/or Bank's ongoing credit accommodations to Borrower. Bank will keep all the Confidential Information confidential, and will not disclose any of the Confidential Information to any person or entity, except disclosures: (a) to federal and state bank examiners, and other regulatory officials having jurisdictions over Bank; (b) to Bank's legal counsel and auditors; (c) to other professional advisors to Bank; (d) to Bank's representatives (which shall include, without limitation, all other banks and companies affiliated with Wells Fargo & Company) who need to know the Confidential Information for the purpose of evaluating Borrower's credit request and/or Bank's ongoing credit accommodations to Borrower, it being expressly understood and agreed that such representatives shall be informed of the confidential nature of the Confidential Information, and shall be required by Bank to treat the Confidential Information as confidential in accordance with the terms and conditions hereof; (e) as otherwise required by law or legal process; or (f) as otherwise authorized by Borrower in writing. In the event that Bank or any of its representatives becomes legally compelled to disclose any of the Confidential Information pursuant to clause (e) of the preceding sentence, then Bank, except as otherwise required by law, will provide notice thereof to Borrower so that Borrower, at its sole option (but without obligation to do so), may attempt to seek a protective order or other appropriate remedy and/or waive compliance with the provisions of this Agreement. The confidentiality requirement set forth herein shall not extend to any portion of the Confidential Information that: (x) is or becomes generally available to the public other than as a result of a disclosure by Bank or its representatives; (y) is or becomes available to Bank on a non-confidential basis by Borrower or any officer, employee, agent or representative of Borrower prior to its disclosure by Bank; or (z) is or becomes available to Bank on a non-confidential basis from a source other than Borrower.
ECTION
ONFIDENTIALITY
S 9.6. G.
ECTION
UARANTY
(a)(i) Each Material Domestic Subsidiary of Borrower party hereto, and each Material Domestic Subsidiary that becomes a guarantor of the Obligations pursuant to a Joinder Agreement (each, a "") unconditionally and irrevocably guarantees to Bank the full and prompt payment when due (whether at stated maturity, by required prepayment, declaration, acceleration, demand or otherwise) and performance of all indebtedness, liabilities, covenants, duties and other obligations of Borrower to Bank under this Agreement, the Note and all other Loan Documents (the ""). The Guaranteed Obligations include interest that, but for a proceeding under any Bankruptcy Law, would have accrued on such Guaranteed Obligations, whether or not a claim is allowed against Borrower for such interest in any such proceeding.
Subsidiary Guarantor
Guaranteed Obligations
 
(ii) Notwithstanding any term or provision of this Agreement or any other Loan Document to the contrary, the maximum aggregate amount for which any Subsidiary Guarantor shall be liable under the Loan Documents shall not exceed the maximum amount for which such Subsidiary Guarantor can be liable without rendering this Agreement or any other Loan Document, as it relates to such Subsidiary Guarantor, subject to avoidance under applicable requirements of law relating to fraudulent conveyance or fraudulent transfer, including the Uniform Fraudulent Conveyance Act, the Uniform Fraudulent Transfer Act and Section 548 of title 11 of the United States Code or any applicable provisions of comparable Requirements of Law (collectively, ""). Any analysis of the provisions of this Agreement or any other Loan Document for purposes of Fraudulent Transfer Laws shall take into account the right of contribution established in Section 9.6(a)(iii) and, for purposes of such analysis, give effect to any discharge of intercompany debt as a result of any payment made by any Subsidiary Guarantor under any Loan Document.
Fraudulent Transfer Laws
(iii) To the extent that any Subsidiary Guarantor shall be required under any Loan Document to pay any portion of any indebtedness under any Loan Document exceeding the greater of (x) the amount of the economic benefit actually received by such Subsidiary Guarantor from the loans and other obligations under the Loan Documents and (y) the amount such Subsidiary Guarantor would otherwise have paid if such Subsidiary Guarantor had paid the aggregate amount of the indebtedness and other liabilities under the Loan Documents (excluding the amount thereof repaid by Borrower) in the same proportion as such Subsidiary Guarantor's net worth on the date enforcement is sought hereunder bears to the aggregate net worth of all the Subsidiary Guarantors on such date, then such Subsidiary Guarantor shall be reimbursed by such other Subsidiary Guarantors for the amount of such excess, , based on the respective net worth of such other Subsidiary Guarantors on such date.
pro rata
(b) Each Subsidiary Guarantor acknowledges and agrees that: (i) the Guaranteed Obligations are separate and distinct from any debt arising under or in connection with any other document, including under any provision of this Agreement other than this Section 9.6, executed at any time by such Subsidiary Guarantor in favor of Bank; and (ii) such Subsidiary Guarantor shall pay and perform all of the Guaranteed Obligations as required under this Section 9.6, and Bank may enforce any and all of its respective rights and remedies hereunder, without regard to any other document, including any provision of this Agreement other than this Section 9.6, at any time executed by such Subsidiary Guarantor in favor of Bank, irrespective of whether any such other document, or any provision thereof or hereof, shall for any reason become unenforceable or any of the debt thereunder shall have been discharged, whether by performance, avoidance or otherwise (other than the indefeasible payment and performance in full of all Guaranteed Obligations). Each Subsidiary Guarantor acknowledges that, in providing benefits to Borrower, Bank is relying upon the enforceability of this Section 9.6 and the Guaranteed Obligations as separate and distinct debt of such Subsidiary Guarantor, and each Subsidiary Guarantor agrees that Bank would be denied the full benefit of its bargain if at any time this Section 9.6 or the Guaranteed Obligations were treated any differently. The fact that the guaranty is set forth in this Agreement rather than in a separate guaranty document is for the convenience of Borrower and Subsidiary Guarantors and shall in no way impair or adversely affect the rights or benefits of Bank under this Section 9.6. Each Subsidiary Guarantor agrees to execute and deliver a separate document, immediately upon request at any time of Bank, evidencing such Subsidiary Guarantor's obligations under this Section 9.6. Upon the occurrence of any Event of Default, a separate action or actions may be brought against any Subsidiary Guarantor, whether or not Borrower, any other Subsidiary Guarantor or any other Person is joined therein or a separate action or actions are brought against Borrower, any such other Subsidiary Guarantor or any such other Person.
 
(c) To the extent that any court of competent jurisdiction shall impose by final judgment under applicable law (including the California Uniform Fraudulent Transfer Act and Sections 544 and 548 of the Bankruptcy Code) any limitations on the amount of any Subsidiary Guarantor's liability with respect to the Guaranteed Obligations that Bank can enforce under this Section 9.6, Bank by its acceptance hereof accepts such limitation on the amount of such Subsidiary Guarantor's liability hereunder to the extent needed to make this Section 9.6 fully enforceable and nonavoidable.
(d) The liability of any Subsidiary Guarantor under this Section 9.6 shall be irrevocable, absolute, independent and unconditional, and shall not be affected by any circumstance that might constitute a discharge of a surety or guarantor other than the indefeasible payment and performance in full of all Guaranteed Obligations. In furtherance of the foregoing and without limiting the generality thereof, each Subsidiary Guarantor agrees as follows:
(i) such Subsidiary Guarantor's liability hereunder shall be the immediate, direct, and primary obligation of such Subsidiary Guarantor and shall not be contingent upon Bank's exercise or enforcement of any remedy it may have against Borrower or any other Person, or against any collateral or other security for any Guaranteed Obligations;
(ii) this guaranty is a guaranty of payment when due and not merely of collectibility;
(iii) Bank may enforce this Section 9.6 upon the occurrence of an Event of Default notwithstanding the existence of any dispute among Bank, on the one hand, and Borrower or any other Person, on the other hand, with respect to the existence of such Event of Default;
(iv) such Subsidiary Guarantor's payment of a portion, but not all, of the Guaranteed Obligations shall in no way limit, affect, modify or abridge such Subsidiary Guarantor's liability for any portion of the Guaranteed Obligations remaining unsatisfied; and
(v) such Subsidiary Guarantor's liability with respect to the Guaranteed Obligations shall remain in full force and effect without regard to, and shall not be impaired or affected by, nor shall such Subsidiary Guarantor be exonerated or discharged by, any of the following events:
(A) any proceeding under any Bankruptcy Law;
(B) any limitation, discharge, or cessation of the liability of Borrower or any other Person for any Guaranteed Obligations due to any statute, regulation or rule of law, or any invalidity or unenforceability in whole or in part of any of the Guaranteed Obligations or the Loan Documents;
 
(C) any merger, acquisition, consolidation or change in structure of Borrower or any other guarantor or Person, or any sale, lease, transfer or other disposition of any or all of the assets or shares of Borrower or any other Person;
(D) any assignment or other transfer, in whole or in part, of Bank's interests in and rights under this Agreement (including this Section 9.6) or the other Loan Documents;
(E) any claim, defense, counterclaim or setoff, other than that of prior performance, that Borrower, such Subsidiary Guarantor, any other guarantor or any other Person may have or assert, including any defense of incapacity or lack of corporate or other authority to execute any of the Loan Documents;
(F) Bank's amendment, modification, renewal, extension, cancellation or surrender of any Loan Document or any Guaranteed Obligations;
(G) Bank's exercise or non-exercise of any power, right or remedy with respect to any Guaranteed Obligations or any collateral therefor;
(H) Bank's vote, claim, distribution, election, acceptance, action or inaction in any proceeding under any Bankruptcy Law; or
(I) any other guaranty, whether by such Subsidiary Guarantor or any other Person, of all or any part of the Guaranteed Obligations or any other indebtedness, obligations or liabilities of Borrower to Bank.
(e) Each Subsidiary Guarantor hereby unconditionally consents and agrees that, without notice to or further assent from such Subsidiary Guarantor:
(i) the principal amount of the Guaranteed Obligations may be increased or decreased and additional indebtedness or obligations of Borrower under the Loan Documents may be incurred and the time, manner, place or terms of any payment under any Loan Document may be extended or changed, by one or more amendments, modifications, renewals or extensions of any Loan Document or otherwise;
(ii) the time for Borrower's (or any other Person's) performance of or compliance with any term, covenant or agreement on its part to be performed or observed under any Loan Document may be extended, or such performance or compliance waived, or failure in or departure from such performance or compliance consented to, all in such manner and upon such terms as Bank (as applicable under the relevant Loan Documents) may deem proper;
(iii) Bank may request and accept other guaranties and may take and hold security as collateral for the Guaranteed Obligations, and may, from time to time, in whole or in part, exchange, sell, surrender, release, subordinate, modify, waive, rescind, compromise or extend such other guaranties or security and may permit or consent to any such action or the result of any such action, and may apply such security and direct the order or manner of sale thereof; and
 
(iv) Bank may exercise, or waive or otherwise refrain from exercising, any other right, remedy, power or privilege even if the exercise thereof affects or eliminates any right of subrogation or any other right of such Subsidiary Guarantor against Borrower.
(f) Each Subsidiary Guarantor waives and agrees not to assert:
(i) any right to require Bank to proceed against Borrower, any other guarantor or any other Person, or to pursue any other right, remedy, power or privilege of Bank whatsoever;
(ii) the defense by Borrower of the statute of limitations in any action hereunder or for the collection or performance of the Guaranteed Obligations;
(iii) any defense arising by reason of any lack of corporate or other authority or any other defense of Borrower, such Subsidiary Guarantor or any other Person;
(iv) any defense based upon Bank's errors or omissions in the administration of the Guaranteed Obligations;
(v) any rights to set-offs and counterclaims;
(vi) without limiting the generality of the foregoing, to the fullest extent permitted by law, any defenses or benefits that may be derived from or afforded by applicable law limiting the liability of or exonerating guarantors or sureties, or that may conflict with the terms of this Section 9.6, including any and all benefits that otherwise might be available to such Subsidiary Guarantor under any of California Civil Code Sections 1432, 2809, 2810, 2815, 2819, 2839, 2845, 2848, 2849, 2850, 2899 and 3433; and
(vii) any and all notice of the acceptance of this guaranty, and any and all notice of the creation, renewal, modification, extension or accrual of the Guaranteed Obligations, or the reliance by Bank upon this guaranty, or the exercise of any right, power or privilege hereunder. The Guaranteed Obligations shall conclusively be deemed to have been created, contracted, incurred and permitted to exist in reliance upon this guaranty. Each Subsidiary Guarantor waives promptness, diligence, presentment, protest, demand for payment, notice of default, dishonor or nonpayment and all other notices to or upon Borrower, each Subsidiary Guarantor or any other Person with respect to the Guaranteed Obligations.
 
(g) No Subsidiary Guarantor shall have any right to require Bank to obtain or disclose any information with respect to: the financial condition or character of Borrower or the ability of Borrower to pay and perform the Guaranteed Obligations; the Guaranteed Obligations; any collateral or other security for any or all of the Guaranteed Obligations; the existence or nonexistence of any other guarantees of all or any part of the Guaranteed Obligations; any action or inaction on the part of Bank or any other Person; or any other matter, fact or occurrence whatsoever. Each Subsidiary Guarantor hereby acknowledges that it has undertaken its own independent investigation of the financial condition of Borrower and all other matters pertaining to this guaranty and further acknowledges that it is not relying in any manner upon any representation or statement of Bank with respect thereto.
(h) Until the Guaranteed Obligations shall be satisfied in full and all commitments to extend credit by Bank to Borrower shall be terminated, each Subsidiary Guarantor shall not have, and shall not directly or indirectly exercise: (i) any rights that it may acquire by way of subrogation under this Section 9.6, by any payment hereunder or otherwise; (ii) any rights of contribution, indemnification, reimbursement or similar suretyship claims arising out of this Section 9.6; or (iii) any other right that it might otherwise have or acquire (in any way whatsoever) that could entitle it at any time to share or participate in any right, remedy or security of Bank as against any Borrower or other guarantors or any other Person, whether in connection with this Section 9.6, any of the other Loan Documents or otherwise. If any amount shall be paid to any Subsidiary Guarantor on account of the foregoing rights at any time when all the Guaranteed Obligations shall not have been paid in full, such amount shall be held in trust for the benefit of Bank and shall forthwith be paid to Bank to be credited and applied to the Guaranteed Obligations, whether matured or unmatured, in accordance with the terms of the Loan Documents.
(i) All payments on account of all indebtedness, liabilities and other obligations of Borrower to any Subsidiary Guarantor or to any other Subordinated Guarantor, whether now existing or hereafter arising, and whether due or to become due, absolute or contingent, liquidated or unliquidated, determined or undetermined (the "") shall be subject, subordinate and junior in right of payment and exercise of remedies, to the extent and in the manner set forth herein, to the prior payment in full in cash or cash equivalents of the Guaranteed Obligations. As long as any of the Guaranteed Obligations (other than unasserted contingent indemnification obligations) shall remain outstanding and unpaid, each Subsidiary Guarantor shall not accept or receive any payment or distribution by or on behalf of Borrower or any other Subsidiary Guarantor, directly or indirectly, or assets of Borrower or any other Subsidiary Guarantor, of any kind or character, whether in cash, property or securities, including on account of the purchase, redemption or other acquisition of Subsidiary Guarantor Subordinated Debt, as a result of any collection, sale or other disposition of collateral, or by setoff, exchange or in any other manner, for or on account of the Subsidiary Guarantor Subordinated Debt (""). Notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained herein, unless an Event of Default has occurred and is continuing, any Subsidiary Guarantor may accept payments by or on behalf of Borrower or any other Subsidiary Guarantor made in the ordinary course of business and consistent with past practices of Borrower and the Subsidiary Guarantors.
Subsidiary Guarantor Subordinated Debt
Subsidiary Guarantor Subordinated Debt Payments
 
If any Subsidiary Guarantor Subordinated Debt Payments shall be received in contravention of this Section 9.6, such Subsidiary Guarantor Subordinated Debt Payments shall be held in trust for the benefit of Bank and shall be paid over or delivered to Bank for application to the payment in full in cash or cash equivalents of all Guaranteed Obligations remaining unpaid to the extent necessary to give effect to this Section 9.6 after giving effect to any concurrent payments or distributions to Bank in respect of the Guaranteed Obligations.
(j) This guaranty is a continuing guaranty and agreement of subordination and shall continue in effect and be binding upon each Subsidiary Guarantor until all commitments to extend credit by Bank to Borrower shall be terminated and payment and performance in full of the Guaranteed Obligations, including Guaranteed Obligations which may exist continuously or which may arise from time to time under successive transactions, and each Subsidiary Guarantor expressly acknowledges that this guaranty shall remain in full force and effect notwithstanding that there may be periods in which no Guaranteed Obligations exist. This guaranty shall continue in effect and be binding upon each Subsidiary Guarantor until actual receipt by Bank of written notice from such Subsidiary Guarantor of its intention to discontinue this guaranty as to future transactions (which notice shall not be effective until noon on the day that is five Business Days following such receipt); that no revocation or termination of this guaranty shall affect in any way any rights of Bank hereunder with respect to any Guaranteed Obligations arising or outstanding on the date of receipt of such notice, including any subsequent continuation, extension, or renewal thereof, or change in the terms or conditions thereof, or any Guaranteed Obligations made or created after such date to the extent made or created pursuant to a legally binding commitment of Bank in existence as of the date of such revocation (collectively, ""), and the sole effect of such notice shall be to exclude from this guaranty Guaranteed Obligations thereafter arising which are unconnected to any Existing Guaranteed Obligations.
provided
Existing Guaranteed Obligations
(k) This guaranty shall continue to be effective or shall be reinstated and revived, as the case may be, if, for any reason, any payment of the Guaranteed Obligations by or on behalf of Borrower (or receipt of any proceeds of collateral) shall be rescinded, invalidated, declared to be fraudulent or preferential, set aside, voided or otherwise required to be repaid to Borrower, its estate, trustee, receiver or any other Person (including under any Bankruptcy Law), or must otherwise be restored by Bank, whether as a result of proceedings under any Bankruptcy Law or otherwise. All losses, damages, costs and expenses that Bank may suffer or incur as a result of any voided or otherwise set aside payments shall be specifically covered by the indemnity in favor of Bank contained in Section 9.3.
(l) The extensions of credit provided to or for the benefit of Borrower hereunder by Bank have been and are to be contemporaneously used for the benefit of Borrower and each Subsidiary Guarantor. It is the position, intent and expectation of the parties that Borrower and each Subsidiary Guarantor have derived and will derive significant and substantial benefits from the extensions of credit to be made available by Bank under the Loan Documents. Each Subsidiary Guarantor has received at least "reasonably equivalent value" (as such phrase is used in Section 548 of the Bankruptcy Code, in Section 3439.04 of the California Uniform Fraudulent Transfer Act and in comparable provisions of other applicable law) and more than sufficient consideration to support its obligations hereunder in respect of the Guaranteed Obligations. Immediately prior to and after and giving effect to the incurrence of each Subsidiary Guarantor's obligations under this guaranty, such Subsidiary Guarantor will be solvent.
 
(m) Each Subsidiary Guarantor acknowledges that it either has obtained the advice of legal counsel or has had the opportunity to obtain such advice in connection with the terms and provisions of this Section 9.6. Each Subsidiary Guarantor acknowledges and agrees that each of the waivers and consents set forth herein is made with full knowledge of its significance and consequences, that all such waivers and consents herein are explicit and knowing and that each Subsidiary Guarantor expects such waivers and consents to be fully enforceable.
If, while any Subsidiary Guarantor Subordinated Debt is outstanding, any proceeding under any Bankruptcy Law is commenced by or against Borrower or its property, Bank, is hereby irrevocably authorized and empowered (in its own the name or in the name of any Subsidiary Guarantor or otherwise), but shall have no obligation, to demand, sue for, collect and receive every payment or distribution in respect of all Subsidiary Guarantor Subordinated Debt and give acquittances therefor and to file claims and proofs of claim and take such other action (including voting the Subsidiary Guarantor Subordinated Debt) as it may deem necessary or advisable for the exercise or enforcement of any its the rights or interests; and each Subsidiary Guarantor shall promptly take such action as Bank may reasonably request: (A) to collect the Subsidiary Guarantor Subordinated Debt for the account of Bank and to file appropriate claims or proofs of claim in respect of the Subsidiary Guarantor Subordinated Debt; (B) to execute and deliver to Bank such powers of attorney, assignments and other instruments as it may request to enable it to enforce any and all claims with respect to the Subsidiary Guarantor Subordinated Debt; and (C) to collect and receive any and all Subsidiary Guarantor Subordinated Debt Payments.
S 9.7. E A; A. This Agreement and the other Loan Documents constitute the entire agreement between Borrower and Bank with respect to each credit created by the Loan Documents and supersede all prior negotiations, communications, discussions and correspondence concerning the subject matter hereof. This Agreement may be amended or modified only in writing signed by each party hereto.
ECTION
NTIRE
GREEMENT
MENDMENT
S 9.8. N T P B. This Agreement is made and entered into for the sole protection and benefit of the parties hereto and their respective permitted successors and assigns, and no other person or entity shall be a third party beneficiary of, or have any direct or indirect cause of action or claim in connection with, this Agreement or any other of the Loan Documents to which it is not a party.
ECTION
O
HIRD
ARTY
ENEFICIARIES
S 9.9. T. Time is of the essence of each and every provision of this Agreement and each other of the Loan Documents.
ECTION
IME
S 9.10. S P. If any provision of this Agreement shall be prohibited by or invalid under applicable law, such provision shall be ineffective only to the extent of such prohibition or invalidity without invalidating the remainder of such provision or any remaining provisions of this Agreement.
ECTION
EVERABILITY
OF
ROVISIONS
S 9.11. C. This Agreement may be executed in any number of counterparts, each of which when executed and delivered shall be deemed to be an original, and all of which when taken together shall constitute one and the same Agreement.
ECTION
OUNTERPARTS
 
S 9.12. G L. This Agreement shall be governed by and construed in accordance with the laws of the State of California.
ECTION
OVERNING
AW
S 9.13. A.
ECTION
RBITRATION
(a) . The parties hereto agree, upon demand by any party, to submit to binding arbitration all claims, disputes and controversies between or among them (and their respective employees, officers, directors, attorneys, and other agents), whether in tort, contract or otherwise in any way arising out of or relating to (i) any credit subject hereto, or any of the Loan Documents, and their negotiation, execution, collateralization, administration, repayment, modification, extension, substitution, formation, inducement, enforcement, default or termination; or (ii) requests for additional credit.
Arbitration
(b) . Any arbitration proceeding will (i) proceed in a location in California selected by the American Arbitration Association (); (ii) be governed by the Federal Arbitration Act (Title 9 of the United States Code), notwithstanding any conflicting choice of law provision in any of the documents between the parties; and (iii) be conducted by the AAA, or such other administrator as the parties shall mutually agree upon, in accordance with the AAA's commercial dispute resolution procedures, unless the claim or counterclaim is at least $1,000,000.00 exclusive of claimed interest, arbitration fees and costs in which case the arbitration shall be conducted in accordance with the AAA's optional procedures for large, complex commercial disputes (the commercial dispute resolution procedures or the optional procedures for large, complex commercial disputes to be referred to herein, as applicable, as the ). If there is any inconsistency between the terms hereof and the Rules, the terms and procedures set forth herein shall control. Any party who fails or refuses to submit to arbitration following a demand by any other party shall bear all costs and expenses incurred by such other party in compelling arbitration of any dispute. Nothing contained herein shall be deemed to be a waiver by any party that is a bank of the protections afforded to it under 12 U.S.C. 91 or any similar applicable state law.
Governing Rules
"AAA"
"Rules"
(c) . The arbitration requirement does not limit the right of any party to (i) foreclose against real or personal property collateral; (ii) exercise self-help remedies relating to collateral or proceeds of collateral such as setoff or repossession; or (iii) obtain provisional or ancillary remedies such as replevin, injunctive relief, attachment or the appointment of a receiver, before during or after the pendency of any arbitration proceeding. This exclusion does not constitute a waiver of the right or obligation of any party to submit any dispute to arbitration or reference hereunder, including those arising from the exercise of the actions detailed in sections (i), (ii) and (iii) of this paragraph.
No Waiver of Provisional Remedies, Self-Help and Foreclosure
 
(d) . Any arbitration proceeding in which the amount in controversy is $5,000,000.00 or less will be decided by a single arbitrator selected according to the Rules, and who shall not render an award of greater than $5,000,000.00. Any dispute in which the amount in controversy exceeds $5,000,000.00 shall be decided by majority vote of a panel of three arbitrators; that all three arbitrators must actively participate in all hearings and deliberations. The arbitrator will be a neutral attorney licensed in the State of California or a neutral retired judge of the state or federal judiciary of California, in either case with a minimum of ten years experience in the substantive law applicable to the subject matter of the dispute to be arbitrated. The arbitrator will determine whether or not an issue is arbitratable and will give effect to the statutes of limitation in determining any claim. In any arbitration proceeding the arbitrator will decide (by documents only or with a hearing at the arbitrator's discretion) any pre-hearing motions which are similar to motions to dismiss for failure to state a claim or motions for summary adjudication. The arbitrator shall resolve all disputes in accordance with the substantive law of California and may grant any remedy or relief that a court of such state could order or grant within the scope hereof and such ancillary relief as is necessary to make effective any award. The arbitrator shall also have the power to award recovery of all costs and fees, to impose sanctions and to take such other action as the arbitrator deems necessary to the same extent a judge could pursuant to the United States federal Rules of Civil Procedure, the California Rules of Civil Procedure or other applicable law. Judgment upon the award rendered by the arbitrator may be entered in any court having jurisdiction. The institution and maintenance of an action for judicial relief or pursuit of a provisional or ancillary remedy shall not constitute a waiver of the right of any party, including the plaintiff, to submit the controversy or claim to arbitration if any other party contests such action for judicial relief.
Arbitrator Qualifications and Powers
provided, however,
(e) . In any arbitration proceeding discovery will be permitted in accordance with the Rules. All discovery shall be expressly limited to matters directly relevant to the dispute being arbitrated and must be completed no later than 20 days before the hearing date. Any requests for an extension of the discovery periods, or any discovery disputes, will be subject to final determination by the arbitrator upon a showing that the request for discovery is essential for the party's presentation and that no alternative means for obtaining information is available.
Discovery
(f) . No party hereto shall be entitled to join or consolidate disputes by or against others in any arbitration, except parties who have executed any Loan Document, or to include in any arbitration any dispute as a representative or member of a class, or to act in any arbitration in the interest of the general public or in a private attorney general capacity.
Class Proceedings and Consolidations
(g) The arbitrator shall award all costs and expenses of the arbitration proceeding.
Payment Of Arbitration Costs And Fees
.
(h) . Notwithstanding anything herein to the contrary, no dispute shall be submitted to arbitration if the dispute concerns indebtedness secured directly or indirectly, in whole or in part, by any real property unless (i) the holder of the mortgage, lien or security interest specifically elects in writing to proceed with the arbitration, or (ii) all parties to the arbitration waive any rights or benefits that might accrue to them by virtue of the single action rule statute of California, thereby agreeing that all indebtedness and obligations of the parties, and all mortgages, liens and security interests securing such indebtedness and obligations, shall remain fully valid and enforceable. If any such dispute is not submitted to arbitration, the dispute shall be referred to a referee in accordance with California Code of Civil Procedure Section 638 et seq., and this general reference agreement is intended to be specifically enforceable in accordance with said Section 638. A referee with the qualifications required herein for arbitrators shall be selected pursuant to the AAA's selection procedures. Judgment upon the decision rendered by a referee shall be entered in the court in which such proceeding was commenced in accordance with California Code of Civil Procedure Sections 644 and 645.
Real Property Collateral; Judicial Reference
 
(i) . To the maximum extent practicable, the AAA, the arbitrators and the parties shall take all action required to conclude any arbitration proceeding within 180 days of the filing of the dispute with the AAA. No arbitrator or other party to an arbitration proceeding may disclose the existence, content or results thereof, except for disclosures of information by a party required in the ordinary course of its business or by applicable law or regulation. If more than one agreement for arbitration by or between the parties potentially applies to a dispute, the arbitration provision most directly related to the Loan Documents or the subject matter of the dispute shall control. This arbitration provision shall survive termination, amendment or expiration of any of the Loan Documents or any relationship between the parties.
Miscellaneous
(j) . Notwithstanding anything herein to the contrary, each party retains the right to pursue in Small Claims Court any dispute within that court's jurisdiction. Further, this arbitration provision shall apply only to disputes in which either party seeks to recover an amount of money (excluding attorneys' fees and costs) that exceeds the jurisdictional limit of the Small Claims Court.
Small Claims Court
S 9.14. N N. This Agreement amends and restates the Existing Agreement in its entirety, effective as of the Closing Date, and is not intended to constitute a novation of the obligations thereunder. Nothing contained herein shall terminate any security interests, liens, guaranties or subordinations in favor of Bank and all such security interests, guaranties and subordinations shall continue in full force and effect.
ECTION
O
OVATION
S 9.15. T A. This Agreement shall terminate (other than with respect to contingent indemnification obligations under Section 9.3) when all monetary Obligations (including, without limitation, the repayment of all Loans) have been satisfied in full and Bank has no further commitment to make credit extensions or accommodations under this Agreement.
ECTION
ERMINATION
OF
GREEMENT
 
I W W, the parties hereto have caused this Third Amended and Restated Credit Agreement to be executed as of the day and year first written above.
N
ITNESS
HEREOF
 
Date:             ,             
 
Ladies and Gentlemen:
Reference is hereby made to that certain Third Amended and Restated Credit Agreement, dated as of March 2, 2012 (as amended, restated, extended, supplemented or otherwise modified in writing from time to time, the ), between N M I ("") and W F B, N A. Unless otherwise defined herein, each capitalized term used herein has the meaning ascribed thereto in the Agreement.
"Agreement"
ATUS
EDICAL
NCORPORATED
Borrower
ELLS
ARGO
ANK
ATIONAL
SSOCIATION
The undersigned Borrower hereby requests (select one):
 
The Revolving Credit Borrowing, if any, requested herein complies with of the Agreement.
Section 2.1
 
 
This Compliance Certificate is delivered this             day of             , 20    , by the undersigned, as a senior financial officer of Borrower to Bank in accordance with of the Credit Agreement.
Section 6.3(d)
The undersigned hereby certifies that:
1. Attached hereto are the consolidated and consolidating annual audited or consolidated quarterly unaudited financial statements of Borrower, as applicable, presented fairly in accordance with GAAP that are required to be delivered pursuant to or of the Credit Agreement for the period ending             , 20            (the "").
Section 6.3(a)
6.3(b)
End Date
2. As of the date of this Compliance Certificate, no Default or Event of Default had occurred and was continuing.
3. The financial condition covenants and other compliance calculations and information set forth on attached hereto are true, complete and accurate on and as of the date of this Compliance Certificate.
Schedule 1
The foregoing certifications, together with the computations set forth in hereto, are made and delivered, and the financial statements referenced above are made or posted, as applicable, this             day of             , 201_, pursuant to the provisions of the Credit Agreement.
Schedule 1
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BABY/BABY-8K-20120328121017.txt.gz
TIME:20120328121017
EVENTS:	Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year	Other Events
TEXT:
ITEM: Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year
ITEM: Other Events
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 5.03 Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year
On March 22, 2012, the Board of Directors (the "Board") of Natus Medical Incorporated (the "Company") amended Article 2, Section 2.2 and Article 3, Section 3.3 of the Bylaws of the Company to provide that directors shall be elected by a majority vote standard for the election of directors in uncontested elections. A majority of the votes cast means that the number of votes cast "for" a director must exceed the number of votes cast "against" that director. In contested elections the vote standard will continue to be a plurality of votes cast.
A copy of the Bylaws as so amended shall be filed with the Company's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the period ending March 31, 2012.
Item 8.01. Other events
On March 22, 2012, the Board approved the amendment of the Company's Amended and Restated Preferred Stock Rights Agreement (the "Rights Agreement") to provide for the early termination of the Rights Agreement.
The Rights Agreement, dated as of October 8, 2002, as amended by that certain Amendment No.1 dated as of February 14, 2003, that certain Amendment No. 2 dated as of March 15, 2005, and that certain Amendment No. 3 dated as of August 17, 2006, and the Form of Rights Certificate attached as Exhibit B of the Rights Agreement, currently provide that the expiration date for the exercise of any rights granted under the Rights Agreement is October 11, 2012. The Company expects to enter into a further amendment of the Rights Agreement with the rights agent to change the expiration date to a date on or before April 30, 2012.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BABY/BABY-8K-20120417150818.txt.gz
TIME:20120417150818
EVENTS:	Termination of a Material Definitive Agreement	Material Modifications to Rights of Security Holders
TEXT:
ITEM: Termination of a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Material Modifications to Rights of Security Holders
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 1.02 Termination of a Material Definitive Agreement.
On March 22, 2012, the Board of Directors of Natus Medical Incorporated approved the amendment of the Company's Amended and Restated Preferred Stock Rights Agreement (the "Rights Agreement") to provide for the early termination of the Rights Agreement.
The Rights Agreement, which was was dated as of October 8, 2002, and amended by that certain Amendment No.1 dated as of February 14, 2003, that certain Amendment No. 2 dated as of March 15, 2005, and that certain Amendment No. 3 dated as of August 17, 2006, and the Form of Rights Certificate attached as Exhibit B of the Rights Agreement was terminated effective April 13, 2012.
As a result of the amendment and early termination, any rights under the Rights Agreement will no longer be outstanding and will not be exercisable. Stockholders do not need to take any action as a result of this termination.
Item 3.03. Material Modification to Rights of Securities Holders.
See the information set forth under "Item 1.02. Termination of a Material Definitive Agreement," which is incorporated by reference into this Item 3.03.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BABY/BABY-8K-20120423213627.txt.gz
TIME:20120423213627
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 1.01 Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
On April 20, 2012, Natus Medical Incorporated (the "Company") and CareFusion 303, Inc. and CareFusion 2200, Inc., both wholly-owned subsidiaries of CareFusion Corporation (collectively "CareFusion"), entered into a Share and Asset Purchase Agreement (the "Purchase Agreement"), a copy of which is attached to this Current Report on Form 8-K as Exhibit 10.1, pursuant to which the Company will acquire the Nicolet business of CareFusion.
Pursuant to the Purchase Agreement, the Company will acquire for a cash purchase price of $58 million all of the outstanding common shares of CareFusion subsidiaries comprising the Nicolet business in the United States, Ireland, and the United Kingdom, and certain assets and liabilities of Nicolet sales divisions principally in China, Brazil, Germany, Italy, the Netherlands, and Spain. The purchase price is subject to adjustment depending upon the level of working capital in the Nicolet subsidiaries on the date of the acquisition.
This description of the Purchase Agreement does not purport to be complete and is qualified in its entirety by reference to the Purchase Agreement, a copy of which is attached to this Current Report on Form 8-K as Exhibit 10.1. All references to currency herein shall be deemed to be references to the U.S. dollar.
Based near Madison, Wisconsin, the Nicolet business employs more than 400 people worldwide and generated sales of approximately $95 million in 2011. The Nicolet business develops clinically differentiated neurodiagnostic and monitoring products, including a portfolio of electroencephalography (EEG) and electromyography (EMG) systems and related accessories, as well as vascular and obstetric doppler sensors and connectivity products.
On April 23, 2012, the Company and CareFusion issued a joint press release relating to the agreement, a copy of which is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1.
It is expected that the transaction contemplated by the Purchase Agreement will be consummated in July 2012.
The acquisition will be funded by existing cash of the Company and borrowings on the Company's existing credit facility with Wells Fargo Bank National Association ("Wells Fargo"). Wells Fargo has provided the company a limited consent to consummate the transaction, subject to certain customary closing conditions.
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 10.1
EXECUTION COPY
 
 
 
 
 
 
Exhibits
 
 
This Share and Asset Purchase Agreement (the "") is made as of April 20, 2012, by and between CareFusion 303, Inc., a Delaware corporation (""), and CareFusion 2200, Inc., a Delaware corporation ("", and together with CFN 303, the ""), and Natus Medical Incorporated, a Delaware corporation (the "").
Agreement
CFN 303
CFN 2200
Sellers
Purchaser
The Sellers, either directly or through certain of their Affiliates (as defined below), including the Acquired Companies (as defined below), are engaged in the Business (as defined below). This Agreement contemplates the sale and transfer to the Purchaser of certain of the assets and liabilities relating to the Business, including the shares or other equity securities of the Acquired Companies.
NOW, THEREFORE, intending to be legally bound and in consideration of the mutual provisions set forth in this Agreement and for other good and valuable consideration, the receipt and sufficiency of which are hereby acknowledged, the parties agree as follows:
. For the purposes of this Agreement and the Ancillary Agreements:
Section 1.1
Definitions
"" means all current trade accounts payable and other payment obligations to suppliers of the Acquired Companies (whether relating to the Business or any other business) and the obligation in respect of all security for such accounts and payment obligations, including all trade accounts payable representing amounts payable in respect of goods shipped or products sold or services rendered, and any obligations or Liability related to any of the foregoing, except for the Intercompany Payables.
Accounts Payable
"" means all notes and accounts receivable, including all trade accounts receivable and other rights to payment, from customers of the Acquired Companies (whether relating to the Business or any other business) and the full benefit of all security for such accounts or rights to payment, except for the Intercompany Receivables.
Accounts Receivable
"" means, collectively, CareFusion U.K. 240 Limited, CareFusion Manufacturing Ireland 241 Limited and CareFusion 209, Inc.
Acquired Companies
"" means any Intellectual Property used primarily in the operation of the Business as presently conducted by the Acquired Companies.
Acquired Company Intellectual Property
"" means those items listed in Section 1.1(a) of the Seller Disclosure Schedule.
Acquired Software
"" means, with respect to a specified Person, a Person that directly, or indirectly through one or more intermediaries, controls, is controlled by or is under common control with, the specified Person. For purposes of this definition, the term "control" (including the terms "controlling," "controlled by" and "under common control with") means the possession, direct or indirect, of the power to direct or cause the direction of the management and policies of a Person, whether through the ownership of voting securities, by contract or otherwise.
Affiliate
"" means a group of corporations with which any Acquired Company has filed consolidated, combined, unitary or similar Tax Returns.
Affiliated Group
"" means, collectively, the Transition Services Agreement, the Business Transfer Agreements, the Share Transfer Documents, and the IP Assignment.
Ancillary Agreements
"" means those entities listed in Section 1.1(b) of the Seller Disclosure Schedule.
Asset Selling Affiliates
"" means those Seller Plans identified as "Assumed Benefit Plans" in Section 3.13(a) of the Seller Disclosure Schedule.
Assumed Benefit Plans
"" means the neurologic and brain vascular diagnostic and monitoring products and service business conducted by the Sellers, Acquired Companies and Asset Selling Affiliates as of the Closing Date, including the manufacture, promotion, sale and/or distribution of the Restricted Products; that, for the avoidance of doubt, the respiratory sleep diagnostic products and service business of the Sellers and their Affiliates shall not be deemed to be included in the Business.
Business
provided
"" means any day other than Saturday, Sunday or any day on which banking institutions in San Diego, California are closed either under applicable Law or action of any Governmental Authority.
Business Day
"" means any guarantees, indemnities, letters of credit, letters of comfort and similar credit obligations provided by the Sellers or any of their Affiliates (other than the Acquired Companies) to any third party, to the extent relating to the Business as set forth on Section 1.1(c) of the Seller Disclosure Schedule.
Business Guarantees
"" means, with respect to a Person, the amount of cash and cash equivalents credited to any account open in the name of such Person with a third party financial institution (plus all uncollected bank deposits, accrued interest and less all outstanding checks).
Cash
"" means the sum of all Cash of the Acquired Companies as of the close of business on the Closing Date, determined in accordance with the Reference Calculation.
Closing Cash
"" means the outstanding Indebtedness owed by the Acquired Companies as of the close of business on the Closing Date.
Closing Indebtedness
"" means (a) the sum of all Accounts Receivable, Intercompany Receivables (excluding Non-Trade Intercompany Receivables), Inventory, VAT recoverable of the Acquired Companies, and prepaid expenses of the Acquired Companies and to the extent incorporated in the Purchased Assets (, , that Closing Net Working Capital shall exclude any deferred tax assets, deferred tax liabilities, and any VAT recoverable that is attributable to VAT for which Purchaser is required to indemnify or pay Sellers under Section 9.1(f), Section 9.8(a) or Section 9.8(c) of this Agreement); minus (b) the sum of all Accounts Payable, Intercompany Payables (excluding Non-Trade Intercompany Payables), other current accrued liabilities of the Acquired Companies and of the Asset Selling Affiliates with respect to the Transferred Employees (including all Liabilities in respect of accrued PTO (paid time off) or vacation or holiday pay for Transferred Employees to the extent not paid by the Seller or its applicable Affiliate to such employee prior to the Closing), and deferred revenue. All elements of Closing Net Working Capital shall be calculated as of the opening of business on the Closing Date in the applicable jurisdiction and reflect the exclusion of the Excluded Assets, Excluded Liabilities, Retained Assets and Retained Liabilities. Notwithstanding Section 11.10, to determine the Closing Net Working Capital, all line items expressed in any currency other than U.S. dollars will be converted into U.S. dollars using the closing rate quoted by Bloomberg as of 5 p.m. Eastern time on the last Business Day prior to Closing Date. Notwithstanding the preceding, for the avoidance of doubt, the Final Closing Net Working Capital shall be calculated on a basis consistent with the Reference Calculation.
Closing Net Working Capital
provided
however
 
"" means the amount, if any, by which Closing Net Working Capital is less than the Closing Net Working Capital Target Amount.
Closing Net Working Capital Deficiency Amount
"" means $19,472,000 (nineteen million four hundred seventy two thousand dollars).
Closing Net Working Capital Target Amount
"" means the Internal Revenue Code of 1986.
Code
"" means any contract, agreement, lease, license, commitment, understanding, franchise, warranty, guaranty, mortgage, note, bond or other instrument or consensual obligation that is legally binding as of the date hereof or as may hereafter be in effect.
Contract
"" means (i) an Affiliate of the Purchaser, or (ii) third party distributor in each of the jurisdictions listed in Section 1.1(d) of the Seller Disclosure Schedule to whom all of the Purchased Assets in the applicable jurisdiction will be transferred at Closing, which in each case is designated by the Purchaser and such designation (a) is reasonably acceptable to the Sellers, (b) does not impede or delay in any way the ability of the parties to close the transactions contemplated by this Agreement (or extend any consultation period required with respect to any Transferred Employees as a result of measures taken by any third party distributor nominated by the Purchaser to be a Designated Affiliate), (c) does not directly or indirectly prejudice or increase the costs (including any Taxes) to the Sellers or any Selling Affiliate (other than such costs, if any, which the Purchaser agrees in writing to reimburse or indemnify the Sellers and their Affiliates in full), and (d) is made in accordance with Sections 5.10 () and 11.5 (.
Designated Affiliates
Designated Affiliates
Assignment, Successors and No Third Party Rights)
"" means any individual who, as of the Closing Date, is: (a) an employee of an Acquired Company other than any Retained Employees; or (b) is an employee of the Sellers, a Selling Affiliate or an Affiliate of any of the foregoing (other than the Acquired Companies), who performs services primarily on behalf of the Business. An individual who would otherwise satisfy this definition but who is absent from active employment on the Closing Date on account of vacation, sick leave, disability leave, leave under any local Law which preserves employment or reemployment rights for the individual, or any other similar reason, will nonetheless be an "" hereunder.
Employee
Employee
"" means any encumbrance, lien, charge, pledge, mortgage, title retention agreement, security interest of any nature, adverse claim, exception, reservation, easement, right of occupation, any matter capable of registration against title, option, right of pre-emption or privilege, voting trust, shareholder agreement, proxy, right of refusal or similar agreement, or any agreement or other commitment, whether written or oral, to create any of the foregoing.
Encumbrance
"" means any Law concerning (a) the treatment, storage, disposal, emission, discharge, manufacture, handling, Release or threatened Release of Hazardous Material, (b) exposure or threatened exposure to Hazardous Materials, or (c) the pollution, natural resource damages or protection of the environment (including natural resources, air and surface or subsurface land or waters), or human health and safety.
Environmental Law
"" means, any Taxes imposed on or payable with respect to the Acquired Companies or the Purchased Assets for any Pre-Closing Period or allocable to any Pre-Closing Period under Section 9.1(d) other than (a) Taxes resulting from any action taken by the Purchaser or its Affiliates outside the ordinary course of business on the Closing Date after the Closing with respect to the Acquired Companies or the Purchased Assets, (b) Taxes taken into account as a reduction of the Closing Net Working Capital as finally determined under Section 2.7, (c) Transfer Taxes to the extent they are the responsibility of the Purchaser pursuant to Section 9.1(f), and (d) VAT to the extent it is the responsibility of the Purchaser pursuant to Section 9.8.
Excluded Taxes
 
"" means United States generally accepted accounting principles.
GAAP
"" means any (a) nation, region, state, county, city, town, village, district or other jurisdiction, (b) federal, state, local, municipal, foreign or other government, (c) governmental or quasi-governmental authority of any nature (including any governmental agency, branch, department or other entity and any court or other tribunal), (d) multinational organization exercising judicial, legislative or regulatory power or (e) body exercising, or entitled to exercise, any administrative, executive, judicial, legislative, police, regulatory or taxing authority or power of any nature of any federal, state, local, municipal, foreign or other government.
Governmental Authority
"" means any approval, consent, ratification, waiver, license, permit, registration or other authorization issued or granted by any Governmental Authority.
Governmental Authorization
"" means any waste or other substance that is listed, defined, designated or classified as hazardous, or imminently hazardous, radioactive or toxic or a pollutant or a contaminant under applicable Law, including any admixture or solution thereof, and including petroleum and all derivatives thereof or synthetic substitutes therefor, asbestos or asbestos-containing materials in any form or condition and polychlorinated biphenyls, and natural gas and all derivatives thereof or synthetic substitutes therefor.
Hazardous Material
"" means the laws or regulations relating to the regulation of the healthcare industry (as such laws are currently enforced or as interpreted at the Closing by existing, publicly available judicial and administrative decisions and regulations): (i) Sections 1877, 1128, 1128A or 1128B of the Social Security Act (the ""); (ii) the licensure, certification or registration requirements of healthcare facilities, services or equipment; (iii) any state certificate of need or similar law governing the establishment of healthcare facilities or services or the making of healthcare capital expenditures; (iv) any state law relating to fee-splitting or the corporate practice of medicine; (v) any state physician self-referral prohibition or state anti-kickback law; (vi) any criminal offense relating to the delivery of, or claim for payment for, a healthcare item or service under any federal or state healthcare program; and (vii) any federal or state law relating to the interference with or obstruction of any investigation into any criminal offense.
Healthcare Law
SSA
"" means the Agreement, dated July 24, 2009, between the Industrial Development Agency (Ireland) and CareFusion Manufacturing Ireland 241 Limited.
IDA Agreement
"" means any federal, state, local, or foreign Tax imposed on or measured by income, profits or gains and any gross receipts, franchise Tax or other similar Tax imposed in lieu of income taxes.
Income Tax
"" means, as applied to any Person:
Indebtedness
(a) all indebtedness for borrowed money, including all obligations evidenced by a note, bond, debenture, letter of credit, draft or similar instrument;
(b) that portion of obligations with respect to capital leases that is properly classified as a Liability on a balance sheet in conformity with GAAP;
(c) Liabilities for interest rate swaps;
(d) all guarantees of such Person in connection with the foregoing; and
 
(e) all indebtedness and obligations of the types described in the foregoing clauses (a) through (d) to the extent secured by any Encumbrance, other than Permitted Encumbrances, on any property or asset owned or held by that Person, regardless of whether the indebtedness secured thereby will have been incurred or assumed by that Person or is otherwise nonrecourse to the credit of that Person,
in each case, other than any Indebtedness between Acquired Companies, Notes Receivable and any Intercompany Accounts that are included within Closing Net Working Capital.
"" means all (a) patents, (b) inventions, discoveries, processes, formulae, designs, models, industrial designs, know-how, confidential information, proprietary information and trade secrets, whether or not patented or patentable, (c) trademarks, service marks, trade names, brand names, trade dress, slogans, logos and internet domain names, (d) copyrights and other copyrightable works and works in progress, (e) all other intellectual property rights and foreign equivalent or counterpart rights and forms of protection of a similar or analogous nature or having similar effect in any jurisdiction throughout the world, (f) any renewals, extensions, continuations, divisionals, reexaminations or reissues or equivalent or counterpart of any of the foregoing in any jurisdiction throughout the world, and (g) all registrations and applications for registration of any of the foregoing; that Intellectual Property shall not include any software or software licenses.
Intellectual Property
provided
"" means, as applicable, the Intercompany Payables or Intercompany Receivables.
Intercompany Accounts
"" means all intercompany accounts payable by any Acquired Company to the Sellers or any of their Affiliates (excluding the Acquired Companies).
Intercompany Payables
"" means all intercompany accounts payable by the Sellers or any of their Affiliates (excluding the Acquired Companies) to any Acquired Company.
Intercompany Receivables
"" means all inventory (including demo inventory) to the extent used or held for use primarily in the Business, including all finished goods, work in process and raw materials (if any).
Inventory
"" means the United States Internal Revenue Service and, to the extent relevant, the United States Department of Treasury.
IRS
"" means any order, injunction, judgment, decree, ruling, assessment or arbitration award of any Governmental Authority or arbitrator.
Judgment
"" means any federal, state, local, municipal, foreign, international, multinational, or other constitution, law, statute, treaty, rule, regulation, ordinance or code.
Law
"" means any liability or obligation, whether known or unknown, absolute or contingent, accrued or unaccrued, liquidated or unliquidated, due or to become due.
Liability
"" means all software licensed by an Acquired Company for use in the Business, excluding any commercially available off-the-shelf software.
Licensed Software
"" means any Liabilities, losses, damages, Judgments, fines, penalties, costs or expenses (including reasonable attorney's or other professional and expert fees and expenses, reasonable costs of investigation, and courts costs (including such fees and costs incurred in connection with enforcing the provisions of Article 8 of this Agreement)), that, "Loss" will not include (a) any Liabilities, losses, damages, Judgments, fines, penalties, costs or expenses to the extent (and only to such extent) directly and intentionally, or with gross negligence, caused or exacerbated by the Indemnified Party or its Affiliates, and (b) any multiple of earnings, EBITDA or revenue, or any other similar multiple valuation formula.
Loss
provided
 
"" means any event, change, circumstance, effect or other matter (each, an "") (regardless of whether or not such Effect is inconsistent with the representations and warranties made by the Sellers in this Agreement) that, individually or in the aggregate, has or is reasonably likely to have a material adverse effect on (a) the assets (including Intellectual Property), condition (financial or otherwise), business, employees, or results of operations of the Business, taken as a whole, or (b) the ability of the Sellers and Selling Affiliates to consummate timely the transactions contemplated by this Agreement and the Ancillary Agreements in accordance with the respective terms of such agreements and applicable Law; , , that none of the following, either alone or in combination, will constitute, or be considered in determining whether there has been, a Material Adverse Effect: any Effect resulting from or related to (i) any outbreak or escalation of war or major hostilities or any act of terrorism, (ii) changes in Laws, generally accepted accounting principles or enforcement or interpretation thereof after the date hereof, (iii) changes that generally affect the industries and markets in which the Business operates, (iv) changes in financial markets, general economic conditions (including prevailing interest rates, exchange rates, commodity prices, currency fluctuations and fuel costs) or political conditions, (v) any failure of the Business to meet any published or internally prepared projections, budgets, plans or forecasts of revenues, earnings or other financial performance measures or operating statistics (provided that any Effect giving rise or contributing to such failure shall be taken into account in determining whether there has been a Material Adverse Effect), (vi) any action taken or failed to be taken pursuant to or in accordance with this Agreement or at the request of, or consented to by, the Purchaser, (vii) the execution or delivery of this Agreement, the consummation of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement, or (viii) the public announcement or other publicity with respect to any of the foregoing (provided that, in the case of foregoing clauses (i) through (iv), inclusive, such Effect does not affect the Sellers or Selling Affiliates (with respect to the Business) disproportionately as compared to the competitors of the Business).
Material Adverse Effect
Effect
provided
however
"" means all intercompany accounts payable balances from the general ledger accounts included within the Indebtedness calculation in the Reference Calculation.
Non-Trade Intercompany Payables
"" means all intercompany accounts receivable balances from the general ledger accounts included within the Indebtedness calculation in the Reference Calculation.
Non-Trade Intercompany Receivables
"" means, collectively, the note receivable of Dutch American Manufactures (D.A.M.) B.V. owed by CareFusion Manufacturing Ireland 241 Limited and the note receivable of CareFusion U.K. 305 Limited owed by CareFusion U.K. 240 Limited.
Notes Receivable
"" means, with respect to the Business, an action taken by or on behalf of the Business if such action is consistent in nature, scope and magnitude with the past practices of the Business and is taken in the ordinary course of the normal day-to-day operations of the Business.
Ordinary Course of Business
"" means (a) in the case of a corporation, its articles of incorporation or certificate of incorporation and bylaws, (b) in the case of a limited liability company, its articles of formation, certificate of formation and limited liability company agreement or operating agreement, and (c) in the case of any other legal entity, its equivalent organizational or governing documents.
Organizational Documents
"" means any guarantees, indemnities, letters of credit, letters of comfort and similar credit obligations provided by any Acquired Company to any third party, to the extent relating to any business of the Sellers and their Affiliates, other than the Business.
Other Business Guarantees
 
"" means all inventory (including demo inventory) of the Acquired Companies used or held for use in any business other than the Business, including all finished goods, work in process and raw materials (if any).
Other Inventory
"" means (a) carrier's, warehousemen's, mechanic's, materialmen's and other similar liens with respect to amounts that are not yet due and payable or that are being contested in good faith, (b) liens for Taxes, assessments and other charges of Governmental Authorities that are not yet due and payable or that are being contested in good faith, (c) liens securing rental payments under capital lease arrangements that do not, individually or in the aggregate, materially impair the present use of the Purchased Assets, (d) restrictions on the transferability of securities arising under applicable Securities Laws, (e) restrictions arising under applicable zoning and other land use Laws that do not, individually or in the aggregate, have a material effect on the present use or occupancy of the property subject thereto, (f) defects, easements, rights of way, restrictions, covenants, claims, subleases or similar items relating to real property that do not, individually or in the aggregate, materially interfere with the present use or occupancy of the real property subject thereto, (g) matters which would be disclosed by an accurate survey or inspection of any land, buildings, improvements and fixtures erected thereon and all appurtenances related thereto which do not, individually or in the aggregate, materially interfere with the present use or occupancy of the real property subject thereto, or (h) matters of public record; , , that none of the foregoing shall be a Permitted Encumbrance to the extent that any liability secured by such Encumbrance is an Excluded Liability.
Permitted Encumbrance
provided
however
"" means an individual or an entity, including a corporation, share company, limited liability company, partnership, trust, association or other business or investment entity, or any Governmental Authority.
Person
"" means any taxable period or portion of a period that begins after the Closing Date.
Post-Closing Period
"" means any taxable period or portion of a period that begins and ends on or before the Closing Date.
Pre-Closing Period
"" means any written claim, action, arbitration, audit, examination, investigation, hearing, litigation or suit (whether civil, criminal, administrative, judicial or investigative, whether formal or informal, and whether public or private) commenced, brought, conducted or heard by or before, or otherwise involving, any Governmental Authority, arbitrator or regulatory body.
Proceeding
"" shall mean all Intellectual Property that is the subject of an application, certificate, filing, registration, or other document issued by, filed with, or recorded by, any state, government, or other public legal authority at any time in any jurisdiction, including all applications, reissues, divisions, re-examinations, renewals, extensions, provisionals, continuations, and continuations-in-part associated with patent rights.
Registered Intellectual Property
"" means the release, spill, emission, leaking, pumping, pouring, emptying, escaping, dumping, injection, deposit, disposal, discharge, dispersal, leaching or migrating of any Hazardous Material into the environment (including natural resources, air and surface or subsurface land or waters).
Release
"" means all rights, title and interest in and to the telephone and fax numbers (including "1-800" numbers) shared by the Business and any business (other than the Business) conducted by the Sellers or their Affiliates immediately prior to Closing.
Relevant Phone Numbers
 
"" means any relief, loss, allowance, credit, set-off or deduction for any Tax purpose and any reference to the "use" or "set-off" of a Relief will be construed accordingly and will include use or set-off in part.
Relief
"" means certain diagnostic and monitoring equipment, software, supplies and accessories for the neurologic and brain vascular markets, including the following product lines: electromyography (EMG), intraoperative monitoring (IOM), evoked potentials (EP), clinical electroencephalography (EEG), long-term monitoring (LTM), ICU brain monitoring (NICU and adult), level of sedation monitoring, cortical stimulation, transcranial dopplers (TCD) and small doppler products for obstetric and peripheral diagnostics, TECA ELITE Concentric electrode needles, TECA Myoject electrode needles, TECA Monopolar electrode needles and self-manufactured probes and stimulators; that, for the avoidance of doubt, no sleep diagnostic product lines (including Type I, II, III or IV) shall be deemed to be included in the Restricted Products.
Restricted Products
provided
"" means (a) all assets (including all inventory, Contracts, machinery, equipment, furniture and other items of tangible personal property, rights in respect of real property, Intellectual Property, Governmental Authorizations, and books and records) of each Acquired Company, in each case to the extent not used or held for use primarily in the Business (other than the Accounts Receivable), and (b) all insurance policies, binders, entitlements and rights thereunder and proceeds thereof, and in each case not included within the Purchased Assets.
Retained Assets
"" means any individual who, as of the date of this Agreement, is an employee of an Acquired Company and is listed in Section 1.1(e) of the Seller Disclosure Schedule.
Retained Employees
"" means any Liabilities arising out of or related to any Retained Asset or Retained Employee. The Retained Liabilities will not include any Accounts Payable.
Retained Liabilities
"" means the U.S. Securities Act of 1933, any federal or state securities Laws and any non-U.S. securities Laws.
Securities Laws
"" means any and all of the Seller, the Acquired Companies and the Selling Affiliates.
Seller Group
"" means any material plan, fund or program listed in Section 3.13(a) of the Seller Disclosure Schedule pursuant to which a Seller, any Selling Affiliate, any Acquired Company or any of their respective Affiliates, provides variable compensation or remuneration (other than base salary) or benefits to employees or former employees of the Business, but excluding any governmental plan or program requiring the mandatory payment of social insurance Taxes or similar contributions to a governmental fund with respect to the wages of an employee. Where applicable, "Seller Plan" also means the trustee or trustees from time to time of any such, plan, fund or program.
Seller Plan
"" means all products manufactured, sourced, marketed or sold by the Sellers, the Asset Selling Affiliates or the Acquired Companies with respect to the Business on or prior to the Closing Date.
Seller Products
"" means, with respect to the Sellers, the actual knowledge, after due inquiry, of any of the executive officers or senior managerial employees of the Sellers or their Affiliates listed in Section 1.1(f) of the Seller Disclosure Schedule. The term "Sellers' Knowledge" shall include knowledge after reasonable review of such Person's files and records.
Sellers' Knowledge
"" means, collectively, the Asset Selling Affiliates and the Share Selling Affiliates.
Selling Affiliates
 
"" means those entities listed in Section 1.1(g) of the Seller Disclosure Schedule.
Share Selling Affiliates
"" means, collectively, all of the issued and outstanding capital stock or other equity securities of each of the Acquired Companies (other than any Subsidiary of an Acquired Company).
Shares
"" means September 1, 2009, being the date that CareFusion Corporation was spun off from Cardinal Health, Inc.
Spin Date
"" means any taxable period that begins on or before, and ends after, the Closing Date.
Straddle Period
"" means, with respect to a specified Person, any corporation or other Person of which securities or other interests having the power to elect a majority of that corporation's or other Person's board of directors or similar governing body, or otherwise having the power to direct the business and policies of that corporation or other Person (other than securities or other interests having such power only upon the happening of a contingency that has not occurred) are held by the specified Person or one or more of its Subsidiaries. When used in this Agreement without reference to a particular Person, "Subsidiary" means a Subsidiary of an Acquired Company.
Subsidiary
"" means all software identified in Section 1.1(h) of the Seller Disclosure Schedule.
Systems Software
"" means (A) (i) any federal, state, local, foreign or other tax, charge, fee, duty (including customs duty), levy or assessment, including any income, gross receipts, net proceeds, alternative or add-on minimum, corporation, ad valorem, turnover, real property, personal property (tangible or intangible), sales, use, franchise, excise, VAT, stamp duty, leasing, lease, user, transfer, fuel, excess profits, profits, occupational, premium, interest equalization, windfall profits, severance, license, registration, payroll, environmental, capital stock, capital duty, disability, estimated, gains, wealth, welfare, employee's income withholding, other withholding, unemployment or social security or other tax of whatever kind (including any fee, assessment or other charges in the nature of or in lieu of any tax) that is imposed by any Governmental Authority, and (ii) any interest, fines, penalties or additions resulting from, attributable to, or incurred in connection with any items described in this paragraph; (B) any liability for the payment of any amounts of the type described in clause (A) of this sentence as a result of being a member of an affiliated, consolidated, combined, unitary, group relief, or VAT group for any taxable period, and (C) any liability for the payment of any amounts of the type described in clauses (A) or (B) of this sentence as a result of being a transferee of or successor to any Person or as a result of any express or implied obligation to indemnify any other Person.
Tax
"" means any net operating loss, net capital loss, investment tax credit, foreign tax credit, charitable deduction or any other credit or tax attribute that could be carried forward or back to reduce Taxes (including deductions and credits relating to alternative minimum Taxes).
Tax Attributes
"" means an audit, claim, dispute or controversy relating to Taxes.
Tax Contest
"" means any report, return, declaration, claim for refund, or information return or statement related to Taxes, including any schedule or attachment thereto, and including any amendment thereof, filed or required to be filed with a Governmental Authority.
Tax Return
"" means a supply that is treated neither as a supply of goods nor services for the purposes of VAT pursuant to Article 19 of Directive 2006/112 or any similar or analogous rules in any jurisdiction.
TOGC
 
"" means all sales, excise, use, transfer, gross receipts, documentary, filing, recordation, stamp duty, stamp duty reserve tax, stamp duty land tax, mortgage tax, real estate tax, and all other similar taxes, duties or other like charges, however denominated (including any conveyance and recording fees), together with interest, penalties, and additional amounts imposed with respect thereto, but for the avoidance of doubt, "Transfer Taxes" will not include any Tax charged on, in respect of or calculated by reference to a Person's net income or profits or gains.
Transfer Taxes
"" means the transition services agreement pursuant to which each of the Sellers (on the one hand) and the Purchaser (on the other) provide one another services post-Closing, in the form attached hereto as .
Transition Services Agreement
Exhibit A
"" means any value-added tax, goods and services tax or similar tax.
VAT
. For purposes of this Agreement and the Ancillary Agreements, the following terms have the meanings specified in the indicated Section of this Agreement:
Section 1.2
Additional Defined Terms
 
 
 
. Any reference in this Agreement to an "Article," "Section," "Exhibit" or "Disclosure Schedule" refers to the corresponding Article, Section, Exhibit or Disclosure Schedule of or to this Agreement, unless the context indicates otherwise. The table of contents and the headings of Articles and Sections are provided for convenience only and are not intended to affect the construction or interpretation of this Agreement. All words used in this Agreement are to be construed to be of such gender or number as the circumstances require. The words "including," "includes," or "include" are to be read as listing non-exclusive examples of the matters referred to, whether or not words such as "without limitation" or "but not limited to" are used in each instance. Where this Agreement states that a party "shall", "will" or "must" perform in some manner or otherwise act or omit to act, it means that the party is legally obligated to do so in accordance with this Agreement. Any reference to a statute is deemed also to refer to any amendments or successor legislation as in effect at the relevant time. Any reference to a Contract or other document as of a given date means the Contract or other document as amended, supplemented and modified from time to time through such date.
Section 1.3
Construction
.
Section 2.1
Sale and Purchase of Shares and Purchased Assets
(a) In accordance with the provisions of this Agreement, at the Closing, the Sellers will cause each Share Selling Affiliate to sell, convey, assign, transfer and deliver to the Purchaser (or its Designated Affiliate(s)), and the Purchaser will (or will cause its Designated Affiliate(s) to) purchase and acquire from the Share Selling Affiliates, all of the Shares, free and clear of all Encumbrances (other than any restrictions under applicable Securities Laws).
(b) In accordance with the provisions of this Agreement and except as set forth in Section 2.3, at the Closing, the Sellers will cause each Asset Selling Affiliate to, sell, convey, assign, transfer and deliver to the Purchaser (or its Designated Affiliate(s)) free and clear of all Encumbrances other than Permitted Encumbrances, and the Purchaser will (or will cause its Designated Affiliate(s) to) purchase and acquire from the Asset Selling Affiliates, all of the right, title and interest of the Asset Selling Affiliates in and to all of the following assets (collectively, the ""):
Purchased Assets
(i) all Inventory of the Asset Selling Affiliates as of the Closing Date (collectively, the "");
Purchased Inventory
(ii) all of the rights of the Asset Selling Affiliates under all Contracts to the extent primarily relating to the Business, including those set forth on Schedule 2.1(b)(ii) of the Seller Disclosure Schedule (collectively, the "");
Included Contracts
 
(iii) all machinery and equipment used or held for use by the Asset Selling Affiliates to the extent primarily used in the Business, and the related interests of the Asset Selling Affiliates therein;
(iv) all rights in respect of the leasehold interests of the real property set forth on Section 2.1(b)(iv) of the Seller Disclosure Schedule (collectively, the ""), to the extent such rights may be transferred under applicable Law;
Leased Real Property
(v) all rights in and to (A) the Intellectual Property, to the extent primarily used in the operation of the Business as presently conducted, including the Intellectual Property set forth on Section 2.1(b)(v) of the Seller Disclosure Schedule, and (B) the Systems Software, subject to Section 5.18 (collectively, the "");
Purchased Intellectual Property
(vi) the Notes Receivable;
(vii) any and all rights of the Sellers or other Selling Affiliates under Contracts between any of the Sellers or such other Selling Affiliate (on the one hand) and any Transferred Employee (on the other) to the extent such Contract relates to the confidentiality, nondisclosure, assignment of proprietary rights or noncompetition obligations of such Person, only to the extent that such rights or obligations relate to the Purchased Assets;
(viii) all goodwill of the Asset Selling Affiliates primarily relating to the Business or the Purchased Assets, other than goodwill associated with the corporate names of either Seller or any Asset Selling Affiliate;
(ix) to the extent transferable under applicable Law, all Governmental Authorizations held by the Asset Selling Affiliates that primarily relate to the operation of the Business;
(x) to the extent transferable under applicable Law, copies of all books, records, files and papers to the extent related to the Business, including all current advertising materials, client and customer lists, supplier and vendor lists, purchase orders, sales and purchase invoices, production reports, personnel and employment records, and financial and accounting records, other than the corporate books and records of the Asset Selling Affiliates;
(xi) all assets of the Assumed Benefit Plans that related to Assumed Liabilities under such plans to the extent expressly transferred to the Purchaser pursuant to Article 10;
(xii) all rights relating to prepaid expenses in connection with or relating to the Business, to the extent incorporated in Closing Net Working Capital; and
(xiii) all of the Asset Selling Affiliates' claims, rights, credits, causes of action, defenses and rights of set-off against third parties relating to or arising from any of the Purchased Assets, the Business or Assumed Liabilities, including unliquidated rights under manufacturers' and vendors' warranties and including all rights to seek injunctive relief and to recover damages for past, present or future infringement relating to the Purchased Assets.
. The transfer of the Purchased Assets, Assumed Liabilities and Employees by the Asset Selling Affiliates will be effected pursuant to short-form business transfer agreements (the ""), and the transfer of the Shares by the Share Selling Affiliates will be effected pursuant to short-form share transfer agreements, forms or other similar documents reasonably satisfactory to the Sellers and the Purchaser (the ""), each subject to the terms and conditions of this Agreement and on a country-by-country basis. Each Business
Section 2.2
Transfer Documents
Business Transfer Agreements
Share Transfer Documents
 
Transfer Agreement will be on terms reasonably agreed between the Purchaser and the Sellers, taking into account (i) the deletion of provisions which are inapplicable to the Business unit in the relevant country, (ii) such changes as may be necessary to satisfy the requirements of applicable Law, and (iii) such changes regarding Transfer Taxes, VAT, employees and employee benefits matters in order to adapt such agreement to the particular circumstances of the relevant Business unit and country; , , that such changes will be consistent with the principles underlying the corresponding provisions of this Agreement. The parties will prepare the Business Transfer Agreements and Share Transfer Documents as soon as reasonably practicable after the date of this Agreement and will execute and deliver or cause their respective Affiliates to execute and deliver the Business Transfer Agreements and Share Transfer Documents at the Closing upon the terms and subject to the conditions of this Agreement.
provided
however
. Notwithstanding the terms of Section 2.1, no Asset Selling Affiliate will sell, convey, assign, transfer or deliver to the Purchaser (or its Designated Affiliates), and the Purchaser (and its Designated Affiliates) will not purchase or acquire, and the Purchased Assets do not include the following assets (together, the ""):
Section 2.3
Excluded Assets
Excluded Assets
(a) all accounts receivable of the Asset Selling Affiliates (other than the Notes Receivable) (regardless of whether such accounts receivable relate to the Business);
(b) all Cash, bank deposits, investment accounts, lockboxes, certificates of deposit, marketable securities, bank accounts, corporate credit cards and other similar cash items of any Asset Selling Affiliate (including for this purpose all collected funds received into bank accounts owned by any Asset Selling Affiliate through the Closing);
(c) all minute books, records, stock ledgers and Tax records of the Asset Selling Affiliates, along with personnel records and all other materials that the Asset Selling Affiliates are required by Law to retain;
(d) the shares of the capital stock or other equity securities of any Asset Selling Affiliate and any Asset Selling Affiliate's ownership interest in any Person (other than the Acquired Companies);
(e) subject to Article 10, all insurance policies, binders, entitlements and rights of the Selling Affiliates thereunder and proceeds thereof;
(f) all rights under all Contracts of any Asset Selling Affiliate other than the Included Contracts;
(g) all rights to refunds, credits or similar benefits relating to Excluded Taxes;
(h) the "CareFusion" name, mark, domain name and logo, along with all intellectual property rights of the Sellers or any Asset Selling Affiliate, other than the Purchased Intellectual Property;
(i) all real property and rights of the Asset Selling Affiliates in respect of real property, other than the Leased Real Property;
(j) all rights in connection with and assets of any Seller Plan (except as otherwise expressly provided in Article 10);
(k) all rights arising under any Excluded Liability;
(l) all rights to use and otherwise in connection with the Relevant Phone Numbers;
 
(m) all assets and other rights of the Asset Selling Affiliates sold or otherwise transferred or disposed of during the period from the date of this Agreement through and including the Closing Date, in any event in accordance with Sections 5.2 or 5.11 hereof; and
(n) all rights of any Asset Selling Affiliates under this Agreement or any of the Ancillary Agreements.
. Subject to the provisions of this Agreement, at the Closing, the Purchaser will (and will cause its Designated Affiliates to) assume and pay or perform and discharge when due any and all Liabilities, to the extent relating to the Business or the Purchased Assets (whether of the Sellers or any of their Affiliates (including the Asset Selling Affiliates)), and whether arising on, prior to or following the Closing Date, in each case other than the Excluded Liabilities (the ""), including the following:
Section 2.4
Assumed Liabilities
Assumed Liabilities
(a) all other Liabilities of the Asset Selling Affiliates to the extent relating to the Purchased Assets (including those reflected in Closing Net Working Capital);
(b) all Liabilities of the Asset Selling Affiliates arising on, prior to or following the Closing Date under the Included Contracts and the Governmental Authorizations included in the Purchased Assets;
(c) all Liabilities relating to the employment of Transferred Employees (subject to Article 10);
(d) all Liabilities arising out of the Purchaser's activities relating to and asserted by or on behalf of one or more Employees, regardless of whether such person becomes a Transferred Employee (subject to Article 10);
(e) all Liabilities associated with the Assumed Benefit Plans and all other Liabilities expressly assumed by the Purchaser and its Affiliates pursuant to Article 10;
(f) all Liabilities associated with the Leased Real Property arising on, prior to or following the Closing Date;
(g) all Liabilities for Taxes for which Purchaser or its Affiliates are liable pursuant to Article 9; and
(h) subject to Section 2.5(d), all other Liabilities arising out of, relating to or incurred in connection with the Business or the Purchased Assets, including (i) the operation of the Business after the Closing Date, and (ii) any other condition arising on, prior to or following the Closing Date with respect to the Purchased Assets.
Notwithstanding any other provision of this Agreement, the assumption by Purchaser (and any Designated Affiliates) of the Assumed Liabilities will not be deemed to limit or qualify in any manner the representations and warranties of the Sellers hereunder.
. Notwithstanding the foregoing Section 2.4, in no event shall the Purchaser (or any of its Designated Affiliates) assume any of the following Liabilities of the Sellers or any Asset Selling Affiliate, whether arising on, prior to or following the Closing Date (collectively, the ""), which Excluded Liabilities shall remain the sole responsibility of, and shall be retained by, the Sellers and the Asset Selling Affiliates, as the case may be:
Section 2.5
Excluded Liabilities
Excluded Liabilities
(a) any Liability for which the Sellers or their Affiliates are liable pursuant to Article 10;
 
(b) any Liability for Taxes other than Taxes for which Purchaser or its Affiliates are liable pursuant to Article 9;
(c) all Liabilities for legal, accounting and audit fees and any other expenses incurred by the Sellers or any Asset Selling Affiliate in connection with this Agreement (other than any fees and expenses of the Independent Accounting Firm to be shared with the Purchaser pursuant to the terms of this Agreement); and
(d) any Liability arising out of or related to any Excluded Asset.
. The consideration for the Purchased Assets and the Shares (the "") consists of (a) the payment at the Closing of U.S. $58,000,000 (fifty-eight million dollars) (the ""), subject to adjustment in accordance with Section 2.7(a) through (j), and (b) the assumption of the Assumed Liabilities.
Section 2.6
Consideration
Purchase Price
Cash Purchase Price
.
Section 2.7
Closing Adjustment
(a) No later than five (5) Business Days prior to the Closing Date, the Sellers shall deliver to the Purchaser a certificate executed by the President or Chief Executive Officer of each of the Sellers dated as of the date of delivery, certifying as to a good faith estimate of the following (the ""): (i) the Closing Net Working Capital, reflecting the exclusion of the Excluded Assets, Excluded Liabilities, Retained Assets and Retained Liabilities (the "") and the Estimated Closing Net Working Capital Adjustment, (ii) the Closing Indebtedness (the ""). The Estimated Closing Net Working Capital and Estimated Closing Indebtedness shall be calculated on a consistent basis with the principles set forth in Section 2.7(a) of the Seller Disclosure Schedule (the ""). The Cash Purchase Price to be paid by the Purchaser at the Closing pursuant to Section 2.10(b) will be adjusted as follows: (A) up for the Estimated Closing Net Working Capital Adjustment Amount (if such amount is positive) or down for the Estimated Closing Net Working Capital Adjustment Amount (if such amount is negative); and (B) down for the absolute value of the Estimated Closing Indebtedness. For the purposes of this Agreement, the "" means (1) if the Estimated Closing Net Working Capital exceeds the Closing Net Working Capital Target Amount, an amount equal to such excess (the "") provided such Estimated Closing Net Working Capital Surplus shall not exceed $2,000,000 (two million dollars), and (2) if the Estimated Closing Net Working Capital is less than the Closing Net Working Capital Target Amount, an amount equal to such deficiency.
Pre-Closing Adjustment Notice
Estimated Closing Net Working Capital
Estimated Closing Indebtedness
Reference Calculation
Estimated Closing Net Working Capital Adjustment
Estimated Closing Net Working Capital Surplus
(b) Within 60 days after the Closing Date, the Purchaser will prepare and deliver to the Sellers a certificate executed by the President or Chief Executive Officer of the Purchaser dated as of the date of delivery, certifying as to a good faith estimate of the following (the ""): (i) the Closing Net Working Capital reflecting the exclusion of the Excluded Assets, Excluded Liabilities, Retained Assets and Retained Liabilities (the "") (ii) the Closing Cash (the "") (iii) the Closing Indebtedness (the "") and (iv) the amount of any payments required pursuant to Sections 2.7(g), (h) and (i) based on the amounts set forth in the Adjustment Notice with respect to the Final Closing Net Working Capital, the Final Closing Cash and the Final Closing Indebtedness (the ""). The Final Closing Net Working Capital, the Final Closing Cash and the Final Closing Indebtedness shall be calculated, on a consistent basis with the Reference Calculation.
Adjustment Notice
Final Closing Net Working Capital
Final Closing Cash
Final Closing Indebtedness
Adjustment Calculation
 
(c) Within 45 days after delivery of the Adjustment Notice, the Sellers will either:
(i) agree in writing with the Adjustment Calculation, in which case such calculation will be final and binding on the parties for purposes of Sections 2.7(g), (h) and (i); or
(ii) dispute the Adjustment Calculation by delivering to the Purchaser a written notice (a "") setting forth in reasonable detail the basis for each such disputed item and certifying that all such disputed items are being disputed in good faith.
Dispute Notice
(d) If the Sellers fail to take either of the foregoing actions described in clause (c) above within 45 days after delivery of the Adjustment Notice, then the Sellers will be deemed to have irrevocably accepted the Adjustment Calculation, in which case, the Adjustment Calculation will be final and binding on the parties for purposes of 2.7(g), (h) and (i). In connection with the Sellers' review of the Adjustment Notice, the Purchaser will, and will cause each of its Affiliates (including the Designated Affiliates and Acquired Companies) to, use its commercially reasonable efforts to cooperate with the Sellers and the Sellers' representatives, including by providing on a timely basis all information reasonably requested by Sellers necessary in reviewing the Adjustment Notice and preparing any Dispute Notice.
(e) If the Sellers timely deliver a Dispute Notice to the Purchaser, then the Purchaser and the Sellers will attempt in good faith, for a period of 30 days, to agree on the Adjustment Calculation for purposes of 2.7(g), (h) and (i). Any resolution by the Purchaser and the Sellers during such 30-day period as to any disputed items will be final and binding on the parties for purposes of Sections 2.7(g), (h) and (i). If the Purchaser and the Sellers do not resolve all disputed items by the end of 30 days after the date of delivery of the Dispute Notice, then the Purchaser and the Sellers will submit the remaining items in dispute to KPMG LLP for resolution, or if that firm is unwilling or unable to serve, the Purchaser and the Sellers will engage another mutually agreeable independent accounting firm of recognized international standing, which firm is not the regular auditing firm of the Purchaser or the Sellers. If the Purchaser and the Sellers are unable to jointly select such independent accounting firm within 15 days after such 30-day period, the Purchaser, on the one hand, and the Sellers, on the other hand, will each select an independent accounting firm of recognized national or international standing and such selected accounting firms will select a third independent accounting firm of recognized international standing, which firm is not the regular auditing firm of the Purchaser or the Sellers; , , that if either the Purchaser, on the one hand, or the Sellers, on the other hand, fail to select such independent accounting firm during this 15-day period, then the parties agree that the independent accounting firm selected by the other party will be the independent accounting firm selected by the parties for purposes of this Section 2.7 (such selected independent accounting firm, whether pursuant to this sentence or the preceding sentence, the ""). The Purchaser and the Sellers will instruct the Independent Accounting Firm to render its determination with respect to the items in dispute in a written report that specifies the conclusions of the Independent Accounting Firm as to each item in dispute and the resulting Adjustment Calculation; that the Independent Accounting Firm shall not assign a value to any item greater than the greatest value for such item set forth in the Adjustment Notice or the Dispute Notice, as applicable, or less than the smallest value for such item set forth in the Adjustment Notice or the Dispute Notice, as applicable. In so acting, the Independent Accounting Firm will act as an expert and not as an arbiter. The Purchaser and the Sellers will each use their commercially reasonable efforts to cause the Independent Accounting Firm to render its determination within 30 days after referral of the items to such firm or as soon thereafter as reasonably practicable. The Independent Accounting Firm's determination of the Adjustment Calculation as set forth in its report will be final and binding on the parties for purposes of Sections 2.7(g), (h) and (i). The Purchaser will revise the calculation of the Final Closing Net Working Capital, the Final Closing Cash and the Final Closing Indebtedness as appropriate to reflect the resolution of the items in dispute pursuant to this Section 2.7(e). The fees and expenses of the Independent Accounting Firm will be shared by the Purchaser and the Sellers in inverse proportion to the relative amount by which the disputed amounts are determined to be for the account of the Purchaser and the Sellers, respectively.
provided
however
Independent Accounting Firm
provided
 
(f) For purposes of complying with this Section 2.7, the Purchaser and the Sellers will furnish to each other and to the Independent Accounting Firm such work papers and other documents and information relating to the disputed items as the Independent Accounting Firm may reasonably request and are available to that party (or its independent public accountants) and will be afforded the opportunity to present to the Independent Accounting Firm any material related to the disputed items and to discuss the items with the Independent Accounting Firm.
(g) If the Final Closing Net Working Capital (as finally determined pursuant to this Section 2.7) is less than the Estimated Closing Net Working Capital, then the Sellers will pay to the Purchaser an amount equal to the Estimated Closing Net Working Capital minus the Final Closing Net Working Capital (as so finally determined pursuant to the foregoing provisions of this Section 2.7). If the Final Closing Net Working Capital (as finally determined pursuant to this Section 2.7) is greater than the Estimated Closing Net Working Capital, then the Purchaser will pay to the Sellers an amount equal to the Final Closing Net Working Capital (as so finally determined pursuant to the foregoing provisions of this Section 2.7) minus the Estimated Closing Net Working Capital. For the avoidance of doubt, in no event shall the aggregate amount for any adjustment to the Cash Purchase Price contemplated by this Section 2.7 with respect to the Estimated Closing Net Working Capital Surplus and/or determination of Final Closing Net Working Capital result in a payment by the Purchaser to the Sellers of more than $2,000,000 (two million dollars).
(h) If the Final Closing Cash (as finally determined pursuant to this Section 2.7) is more than zero, then the Purchaser will pay to the Sellers such difference in cash.
(i) If the absolute value of the Final Closing Indebtedness (as finally determined pursuant to this Section 2.7) is less than the Estimated Closing Indebtedness, then the Purchaser will pay to the Sellers the absolute value of such difference in cash. If the absolute value of the Final Closing Indebtedness (as finally determined pursuant to this Section 2.7) is greater than the Estimated Closing Indebtedness, then the Sellers will pay to the Purchaser the absolute value of such difference in cash.
(j) Any payment to the Purchaser pursuant to Sections 2.7(g) and (i) will be effected by wire transfer of immediately available funds from the Sellers to an account or accounts designated by the Purchaser, and any payment to the Sellers pursuant to Sections 2.7(g), (h) and (i) will be effected by wire transfer of immediately available funds to an account or accounts designated by the Sellers. Such payments will be made within five Business Days following the final determination of the Final Closing Net Working Capital, Final Closing Cash and Final Closing Indebtedness in accordance with this Section 2.7. Notwithstanding the above, the aggregate amount of payments required to be made by this Section 2.7 will be netted against each other and any balance will be paid, plus interest thereon (calculated based on the actual number of days elapsed in a year consisting of 365 days) from the Closing Date through and including the date of such payment at a rate equal to the one month LIBOR rate as of Closing Date plus 2.50% per annum, to the receiving party in accordance with this Section 2.7(j).
(k) The purpose of this Section 2.7 is to determine the final Purchase Price to be paid by the Purchaser under this Agreement. Accordingly, any adjustment pursuant hereto will neither be deemed to be an indemnification pursuant to Article 8 or Article 9, nor preclude a party from exercising any indemnification rights pursuant to Article 8 or Article 9; , , that in no event will the Sellers or the Purchaser be obligated to indemnify any Purchaser Indemnified Party or Seller Indemnified Party, as applicable, for any Loss as a result of, or based upon or arising from, any matter, to the extent such matter is reflected in the calculation of the Final Closing Net Working Capital, the Final Closing Cash or the Final Closing Indebtedness as finally determined pursuant to this Section 2.7. Any payment made pursuant to this Section 2.7 will be treated by the parties for all purposes as an adjustment to the Purchase Price and will not be subject to offset for any reason.
provided
however
 
.
Section 2.8
Allocation of Purchase Price
(a) The parties will use their reasonable best efforts to agree prior to the Closing to an allocation of the Purchase Price to (i) the Purchased Assets (including the Notes Receivable), (ii) the Shares, and (iii) the assets of CareFusion 209, Inc. As soon as practicable after the date of this Agreement, the Sellers will prepare and deliver to the Purchaser a calculation of the proposed allocation of the Purchase Price (the ""). Within 10 days after receipt of the Allocation Statement, the Purchaser will deliver a written response to the Sellers setting forth whether the Purchaser agrees with or disputes the Sellers' calculation (the "") and, if the Purchaser disputes the Sellers' calculation, the Purchaser's Written Response will set forth in reasonable detail the basis for each disputed item. The Purchaser and the Sellers will attempt in good faith and in an expedient manner to reach agreement on any disputed items. The Sellers and the Purchaser agree to amend the Allocation Statement (as finally determined in accordance with this clause (a)) in good faith and as necessary to reflect any adjustments made to the Purchase Price pursuant to Section 2.7 and as required by Section 1060 of the Code and Treasury Regulations Sections 1.338-6 and 1.338-7 (and any similar provisions of state, local or foreign Law) (as amended, the "").
Allocation Statement
Purchaser's Written Response
Final Allocation Statement
(b) The Purchaser and the Sellers will report the allocation of the Purchase Price for U.S. federal, state, local and non-U.S. income Tax purposes in a manner consistent with the Final Allocation Statement. Except as otherwise required by Law, neither the Sellers nor the Purchaser will (or will permit their respective Affiliates to) take any position inconsistent with the Final Allocation Statement in any U.S. federal, state, local, or non-U.S. income Tax Returns or similar filings (including IRS Form 8594 and IRS Form 8883 or any similar forms required to be filed under Law), any refund claim, litigation, audit or otherwise. The Purchaser and the Sellers each agree to provide the other party(ies) with any additional information reasonably required to complete IRS Form 8594 and IRS Form 8883 (or any similar forms required to be filed under Law).
(c) The Purchaser and the Sellers will (i) promptly inform the other party(ies) of any challenge by any Governmental Authority to the Final Allocation Statement, (ii) consult with and keep each other informed with respect to the status of, and any discussion, proposal or submission with respect to, such challenge and (iii) cooperate in good faith in responding to such challenge in order to preserve the effectiveness of the Final Allocation Statement.
(d) If the Purchaser and the Sellers do not agree on an Allocation Statement within 30 days after delivery of the Purchaser's Written Response, then, for purposes of this Section 2.8, there will be no Final Allocation Statement and each party will prepare its own allocation of the Purchase Price among (i) the Purchased Assets, (ii) the Shares, and (iii) the assets of CareFusion 209, Inc.
 
. The closing of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement (the "") shall occur on the later of (i) July 1, 2012 or such earlier date, if so mutually agreed by the Sellers and the Purchaser, and (ii) three Business Days after the date on which all of the conditions set forth in Article 6 have been satisfied or waived (other than those conditions that by their nature can only be satisfied at the Closing). The date on which the Closing actually occurs is referred to in this Agreement as the "." For all purposes under this Agreement and each of the Ancillary Agreements, all matters at Closing will be considered to take place simultaneously, no delivery of any document will be deemed complete until all transactions and deliveries of documents are completed, and the Closing will be deemed to have occurred on the close of business in each jurisdiction applicable to the Business on the Closing Date irrespective of the actual occurrence of the Closing at any particular time on the Closing Date.
Section 2.9
Closing
Closing
Closing Date
.
Section 2.10
Closing Deliveries
(a) At the Closing, the Sellers will, for themselves and as agents for the Selling Affiliates (as applicable), deliver or cause to be delivered to the Purchaser, for itself and as agent for the Designated Affiliates (as applicable):
(i) Business Transfer Agreements, executed by the applicable Asset Selling Affiliates;
(ii) Share Transfer Documents, executed by the applicable Share Selling Affiliates;
(iii) certificates representing such of the Shares as are certificated (duly endorsed in blank or accompanied by stock powers duly executed in blank or other appropriate transfer forms in form reasonably satisfactory to the Purchaser for transfer) with all appropriate stock transfer tax stamps affixed, and such other deeds, documents and instruments as are necessary or appropriate to effect the valid transfer of the remainder of the Shares executed by the applicable Share Selling Affiliates;
(iv) assignment of all Purchased Intellectual Property in the form of (the "") executed by the applicable Asset Selling Affiliate;
Exhibit B
IP Assignment
(v) the Transition Services Agreement, executed by the Sellers;
(vi) letters of resignation effective as of the Closing Date from the directors and officers (or their equivalent) of the Acquired Companies, executed by the relevant directors and officers (or their equivalent) in a form reasonably satisfactory to the Purchaser;
(vii) the minute books, stock ledger and seal (if any) of each of the Acquired Companies (which, at the election of the Sellers, will be delivered from representatives of the Sellers to representatives of the Purchaser locally in the jurisdiction of incorporation or formation of the applicable Acquired Company);
(viii) a FIRPTA certificate with respect to CareFusion 209, Inc. in accordance with the requirements of Treasury Regulation Section 1.1445-2(b)(2) certifying that Viasys Holdings, Inc. is a U.S. person;
(ix) a FIRPTA certificate in accordance with the requirements of Treasury Regulation Section 1.1445-2(b)(2) certifying that CareFusion 209, Inc. is a U.S. person;
 
(x) a certificate, dated as of the Closing Date, executed by an officer of each of the Sellers confirming the satisfaction of the conditions specified in Sections 6.1(a) and 6.1(b);
(xi) assignments of the Notes Receivable, executed by the applicable debtor and in a form reasonably satisfactory to the Purchaser;
(xii) a certificate, dated as of the Closing Date, executed on behalf of each of the Sellers by its secretary, an assistant secretary or an authorized officer, certifying (A) the Organizational Documents of each of the Acquired Companies; (B) resolutions of the board of directors, sole director or shareholders (or equivalent), as the case may be, of each of the Sellers and other Selling Affiliates to evidence: (i) the approval of the sale, assignment and transfer of the Purchased Assets and the Shares, and the transactions contemplated by this Agreement; and (ii) the authorization of the execution of and the performance by the relevant Seller Group member of its obligations under each of the documents to be executed by it;
(xiii) pay-off, lien release or similar letters from holders of Indebtedness of any Acquired Company or any other Selling Affiliates to the extent then encumbering any of the Purchased Assets (in each case, other than Closing Indebtedness (if any) of the Selling Affiliates), in a form reasonably acceptable to the Purchaser;
(xiv) the Sellers shall have executed and delivered to the Purchaser a release in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to the Purchaser that acknowledges that, as of the Closing Date, the Sellers and the Selling Affiliates have no claim of any nature against any of the Acquired Companies and that none of the Acquired Companies have any or owe any liability to the Sellers or the Selling Affiliates, in each case other than any Intercompany Accounts; and
(xv) such other instruments of sale, transfer, conveyance and assignment as the Purchaser reasonably requests for the purpose of consummating the transactions contemplated by this Agreement.
(b) At the Closing, the Purchaser will, for itself and as agent for the Designated Affiliates (as applicable), deliver or cause to be delivered to the Sellers, for themselves and as agents for the Selling Affiliates (as applicable):
(i) the Cash Purchase Price (A)  or the Estimated Closing Net Working Capital Adjustment Amount as applicable, and (B) minus the Estimated Closing Indebtedness, by wire transfer of immediately available funds in U.S. dollars to the account(s) specified by the Sellers no later than two Business Days prior to the Closing Date;
plus
minus
(ii) the Business Transfer Agreements, executed by the Purchaser and/or the applicable Designated Affiliates;
(iii) the Share Transfer Documents, if any, that call for a signature by the Purchaser and/or its Designated Affiliates, executed by the Purchaser and/or such Designated Affiliates, as applicable;
(iv) the IP Assignment, executed by the Purchaser and/or such Designated Affiliates, as applicable;
(v) the Transition Services Agreement, executed by the Purchaser;
 
(vi) a release in the form of , executed by Purchaser on behalf of each of the Acquired Companies with respect to each of the resigning officers and directors (or their equivalent);
Exhibit C
(vii) a certificate, dated as of the Closing Date, executed on behalf of each of the Purchaser by its secretary, an assistant secretary or an authorized officer, certifying resolutions of the board of directors, sole director or shareholders (or equivalent), as the case may be, of each of the Purchaser and its applicable Affiliates to evidence: (i) the approval of the purchase, assignment and transfer of the Purchased Assets and the Shares, and the transactions contemplated by this Agreement, and (ii) the authorization of the execution of and the performance by the relevant Purchaser and its Affiliates (as applicable) of its obligations under each of the documents to be executed by it;
(viii) a certificate, dated as of the Closing Date, executed by an officer of the Purchaser confirming the satisfaction of the conditions specified in Sections 6.2(a) and 6.2(b), and
(ix) such other instruments of sale, transfer, conveyance and assignment as the Sellers reasonably request for the purpose of consummating the transactions contemplated by this Agreement.
. Notwithstanding any other provision of this Agreement (but subject to Section 5.3 with respect to any filings, consents or approvals required under applicable Antitrust Laws), this Agreement does not effect an assignment or transfer of any Contract or Governmental Authorization if an attempted assignment or transfer thereof, without the consent of a third party thereto, would constitute a breach or other contravention thereof or would be ineffective with respect to any party thereto. As to any such Contract or Governmental Authorization so designated in writing by the Purchaser, the Sellers and the Purchaser will use commercially reasonable efforts to obtain as promptly as practicable after the Closing the consent of the other parties to such Contract or Governmental Authorization or, if required, novation thereof to the Purchaser (or its Designated Affiliates) or, alternatively, written confirmation from such parties reasonably satisfactory to the Purchaser that such consent and/or novation is not required. In no event, however, will the Sellers or any of their Affiliates be obligated to commence, defend or participate in any litigation, pay any money to any Person, or offer or grant other financial or other accommodations to any Person in connection with obtaining any consent, waiver, confirmation, novation or approval with respect to any such Contract or Governmental Authorization. If any consent, waiver, confirmation, novation or approval is not obtained with respect to any such Contract or Governmental Authorization, then the Sellers and the Purchaser will cooperate to establish an agency type or other similar arrangement reasonably satisfactory to the Sellers and the Purchaser under which the Purchaser (and its Designated Affiliates) would obtain, to the extent practicable, all rights, and assume the corresponding Liabilities thereunder (including by means of subcontracting, sublicensing or subleasing arrangement, or a power of attorney pursuant to which Purchaser or its Designated Affiliate would perform all obligations and receive all benefits under the terms of such Contract or Governmental Authorization) or under which the Sellers would enforce or cause the Asset Selling Affiliates, as appropriate, to enforce, for the benefit of the Purchaser (and its Designated Affiliates), with the Purchaser (and its Designated Affiliates) and the Sellers assuming and agreeing to pay one-half of the Sellers' and the Asset Selling Affiliates' reasonable out-of-pocket costs and expenses incurred in connection with obtaining such consent, waiver, confirmation, novation or approval from such third party to any such Contract or Governmental Authorization necessary for effectively owning, conducting, operating and continuing the Business and/or the Purchased Assets following the Closing. In such event (a) the Sellers will promptly pay or cause to be paid to the Purchaser when received all moneys relating to the period on or after the Closing Date received by the Sellers or any Asset Selling Affiliate under any Contract or Governmental Authorization not transferred pursuant to this Section 2.11, and (b) the Purchaser will promptly pay, perform or discharge, or cause to be promptly paid,
Section 2.11
Consents
 
performed or discharged, when due any Liabilities arising thereunder after the Closing Date but not transferred to the Purchaser (or its Designated Affiliates) pursuant to this Section 2.11. The failure by the Purchaser or the Sellers to obtain any required consent, waiver, confirmation, novation or approval with respect to any Contract or Governmental Authorization will not relieve any party from its obligation to consummate at the Closing the transactions contemplated by this Agreement.
Each of the Sellers represents and warrants to the Purchaser that as of the date of this Agreement and as of the Closing Date the statements set forth in this Article 3 are true and correct, except as set forth on the disclosure schedule delivered by the Sellers to the Purchaser concurrently with the execution and delivery of this Agreement and dated as of the date of this Agreement (the "").
Seller Disclosure Schedule
. Each of the Sellers, each Selling Affiliate and each Acquired Company is a corporation or other legal entity duly organized, validly existing and in good standing (to the extent such concept is applicable in the relevant jurisdiction) under the Laws of the jurisdiction of its organization, and has all requisite power and authority to conduct its business as presently conducted.
Section 3.1
Organization and Good Standing
.
Section 3.2
Authority and Enforceability
(a) Each of the Sellers has all requisite corporate power and authority to execute and deliver this Agreement and to perform its obligations under this Agreement. The execution, delivery and performance of this Agreement and the consummation of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement by the Sellers has been duly authorized by all necessary action on the part of each of the Sellers and no action on the part of the stockholders of any of the Sellers is necessary to consummate the transactions contemplated hereby. Each of the Sellers has duly and validly executed and delivered this Agreement. Assuming the due authorization, execution and delivery of this Agreement by the Purchaser, this Agreement constitutes the valid and binding obligation of the Sellers, enforceable against the Sellers in accordance with its terms, subject to (i) Laws of general application relating to bankruptcy, insolvency and the relief of debtors, and (ii) Laws governing specific performance, injunctive relief and other equitable remedies.
(b) Each of the Sellers has, and each of their Affiliates will have, all requisite power and authority to execute and deliver each Ancillary Agreement to which it is a party and to perform its respective obligations under each such Ancillary Agreement. The execution, delivery and performance of each Ancillary Agreement and the consummation of the transactions contemplated thereby by the Sellers have been, and by each of the Sellers' Affiliates party thereto will be, duly authorized by all necessary action on the part of each of the Sellers and the Sellers' Affiliates and no action on the part of the stockholders of any of the Sellers is necessary to consummate the transactions contemplated pursuant to the Ancillary Agreements. On or prior to the Closing, each of the Sellers and each of the Sellers' Affiliates will have duly and validly executed and delivered each Ancillary Agreement to which it is a party. Assuming the due authorization, execution and delivery of the Ancillary Agreements by the Purchaser and/or the Designated Affiliates and the other parties thereto, at the Closing each Ancillary Agreement to which a Seller or any of its Affiliates is a party will constitute the valid and binding obligation of such Seller or the Affiliate of such Seller that is party thereto, enforceable against such Seller or such Affiliate of such Seller in accordance with its terms, subject to (i) Laws of general application relating to bankruptcy, insolvency and the relief of debtors, and (ii) Laws governing specific performance, injunctive relief and other equitable remedies.
 
. Neither the execution, delivery and performance of this Agreement by the Sellers and any Ancillary Agreement by the Sellers or any Affiliate of the Sellers party thereto, nor the consummation by the Sellers and their Affiliates of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement, will (a) conflict with or violate the certificate of incorporation or bylaws or other applicable charter or organizational documents of the Sellers or any of their Affiliates, (b) result in a breach or default under, or create in any Person the right to terminate, cancel, accelerate or modify, or require any notice, consent or waiver under, any Material Contract, (c) violate any Law or Judgment applicable to the Sellers or any of their Affiliates, the Business or the Purchased Assets, (d) result in the creation of any Encumbrance (other than Permitted Encumbrances) on any of the Purchased Assets or the assets of any Acquired Company, or (e) except under applicable Antitrust Laws, require the Sellers or any of their Affiliates to obtain any consent, approval, authorization or other action by, or make any filing with or notification to any Governmental Authority, except, in the case of clauses (b), (c), (d) or (e) above, as would not have a material effect on the Business.
Section 3.3
No Conflict
. Section 3.4 of the Seller Disclosure Schedule sets forth an accurate and complete list of all the issued and outstanding shares of capital stock or other equity securities of the Acquired Companies. The Shares represent all of the issued and outstanding shares of capital stock or other equity securities of the Acquired Companies. The Share Selling Affiliates are the sole record holders and beneficial owners of all of the Shares, free and clear of all Encumbrances other than Permitted Encumbrances, in the respective amounts set forth in Section 3.4 of the Seller Disclosure Schedule. All of the Shares are duly authorized, validly issued, fully paid and nonassessable, and are not issued in violation of any preemptive rights. There are no Contracts to which any Share Selling Affiliate or, to the Sellers' Knowledge, any other Person, is a party or bound with respect to the voting (including voting trusts or proxies) of the Shares. Other than the Shares, there are no outstanding or authorized options, warrants, convertible securities or other rights (including preemptive rights), agreements or commitments to which any Acquired Company is a party or which are binding upon any Acquired Company providing for the issuance, sale, purchase or redemption of any shares or other equity securities. No Acquired Company owns, of record or beneficially, directly or indirectly, any outstanding voting securities or other equity interests in any Person.
Section 3.4
Capitalization and Ownership
.
Section 3.5
Financial Information
(a) The Sellers have made available to the Purchaser unaudited historic pro-forma financial statements for the Business (reflecting the exclusion of the Excluded Assets, Excluded Liabilities, Retained Assets and Retained Liabilities) (i) as of and for the fiscal years ending June 30, 2010 and June 30, 2011, and (ii) as of and for the twelve month period ending March 31, 2012 (the ""), in each case including a balance sheet and an income statement, each as set forth in Section 3.5(a) of the Seller Disclosure Schedule (the "").
Balance Sheet Date
Financial Statements
(b) The Financial Statements (i) are derived from and consistent with the books and records of the Sellers and the Selling Affiliates pertaining to the Business, (ii) have been prepared in accordance with GAAP in all material respects, except as described in Section 3.5(b) of the Seller Disclosure Schedule (GAAP, so qualified by Section 3.5(b) of the Seller Disclosure Schedule, the ""), applied on a consistent basis throughout the periods indicated, and (iii) fairly present in all material respects the financial condition of the Business as of the respective dates thereof and for the periods indicated therein except as described in Section 3.5(b) of the Seller Disclosure Schedule.
Accounting Principles
(c) The Seller Group has no Liabilities (of a type that the Accounting Principles would require be included in the Financial Statements) that are, individually or in the aggregate, material to the Business or the Purchased Assets (considered together), except for Liabilities (i) included in the Financial Statements, (ii) incurred in the conduct of the Sellers' (and the Selling Affiliates' and Acquired Companies') operation of the Business since the Balance Sheet Date in the Ordinary Course of Business, or (iii) as set forth on Schedule 3.5(c) of the Seller Disclosure Schedule.
 
(d) All Accounts Receivable reflected in the Financial Statements arose in the Ordinary Course of Business. Allowances for doubtful accounts are adequate and have been prepared in accordance with the Accounting Principles consistently applied and in accordance with the Seller Group's past practices. The Accounts Receivable arising after the Balance Sheet Date and before the Closing Date arose or will arise in the Ordinary Course of Business. None of the outstanding Accounts Receivable is subject to any material claim of offset, recoupment, setoff or counterclaim, and, to the Sellers' Knowledge, there are no specific facts or circumstances (whether asserted or unasserted) that could reasonably be expected to give rise to any such claim.
(e) Section 3.5(e) of the Seller Disclosure Schedule sets forth the names and locations of all banks, trust companies, savings and loan associations and other financial institutions at which any of the Acquired Companies maintains accounts of any nature with respect to the Business (other than in relation to any Indebtedness) and the names of all persons authorized to draw thereon or make withdrawals therefrom.
. Except as set forth in Section 3.6 of the Seller Disclosure Schedule, from the Balance Sheet Date to the date of this Agreement, (a) there has not been any damage, destruction, condemnation, Loss (whether or not covered by insurance) of any material assets of the Business; (b) the Sellers, the Selling Affiliates and the Acquired Companies have operated the Business in the Ordinary Course of Business; and (c) neither the Sellers, the Selling Affiliates nor the Acquired Companies have taken any action that (if taken between the date of this Agreement and Closing) would constitute a breach of Section 5.2(b).
Section 3.6
Operation of the Business
. Except (a) for the Excluded Assets and Retained Assets, and (b) with respect to Intellectual Property and software, and assuming (i) the Purchaser owns or forms legal entities in any necessary jurisdictions and that such legal entities obtain such necessary corporate or other required qualifications to do business in such jurisdictions, and (ii) that the Purchaser has the ability to provide to the Business those types of corporate level services currently provided to the Business by the Sellers, the Selling Affiliates and certain of their Affiliates, including accounting, ethics and compliance, global trade, human resources, legal, treasury, information technology, environmental, health and safety services and other support services (together, ""), in each case (where applicable) subject to the Transition Services Agreement, the Purchased Assets, together with the assets of the Acquired Companies and the rights, goods and services which are the subject of the Ancillary Agreements, constitute all the material assets which are necessary for the conduct of the Business and use of the Purchased Assets by the Purchaser immediately following the Closing in the same manner as presently conducted by the Sellers, Selling Affiliates and the Acquired Companies.
Section 3.7
Sufficiency of Assets
Ancillary Services
. The (a) Sellers and the Asset Selling Affiliates, as applicable, have good and marketable title to, or in the case of leased assets, valid leasehold interests in, all of the material tangible personal property included in the Purchased Assets, and (b) Acquired Companies, as applicable, have good and marketable title to, or in the case of leased assets, valid leasehold interests in, all of their material tangible personal property, in each case free and clear of all Encumbrances except Permitted Encumbrances. All of the material items of tangible personal property included in the Purchased Assets and all of the material items of tangible personal property of the Acquired Companies is in good working condition and repair, ordinary wear and tear excepted.
Section 3.8
Tangible Personal Property
 
.
Section 3.9
Real Property
(a) Section 3.9(a) of the Seller Disclosure Schedule sets forth an accurate and complete list (by street address and current owner) of all real property in which any Acquired Company has fee title (or equivalent) interest (collectively, the ""). The applicable Acquired Company has good and marketable title in fee simple to each parcel of Acquired Company Real Property, in each case free and clear of all Encumbrances other than Permitted Encumbrances.
Acquired Company Real Property
(b) Section 3.9(b) of the Seller Disclosure Schedule sets forth an accurate and complete description (by street address of the subject leased real property, the date and term of the lease, the name of the parties thereto and the aggregate annual rent payable thereunder) of (a) all real property that is leased by any Acquired Company (collectively, the "") and (b) all Leased Real Property. The Sellers have made available to the Purchaser complete copies of the leases in effect as of the date hereof relating to the Acquired Company Leased Real Property and the Leased Real Property and there has not been any sublease or assignment entered into by the Sellers, any Asset Selling Affiliate or any Acquired Company in respect of the leases relating to such Leased Real Property or Acquired Company Leased Real Property (together, the ""). No Acquired Company, with respect to any Acquired Company Leased Real Property, and neither the Sellers nor any Asset Selling Affiliate, with respect to Leased Real Property, nor, to the Sellers' Knowledge, any other party, is in material breach or default of any provision of any such Lease.
Acquired Company Leased Real Property
Leases
(c) Except (i) as set forth on Section 3.9(c) of the Seller Disclosure Schedule, and (ii) for the real property used for the provision of the Ancillary Services, the Acquired Company Real Property, the Acquired Company Leased Real Property and the Leased Real Property constitute all interests in real property used, occupied or held for use in connection with the Business immediately prior to Closing.
.
Section 3.10
Intellectual Property
(a) Except for the Intellectual Property licensed under the IP Licenses and the software licensed under the Software Licenses (each as defined below), (i) the Sellers and the Asset Selling Affiliates, as applicable, own, free and clear of any Encumbrance (other than Permitted Encumbrances), all Purchased Intellectual Property and (ii) the Acquired Companies, as applicable, own, free and clear of any Encumbrance (other than Permitted Encumbrances), all Acquired Company Intellectual Property. No member of the Seller Group has received notice that any Purchased Intellectual Property or Acquired Company Intellectual Property is subject to any proceeding or outstanding decree, order, judgment or settlement agreement that restricts in any manner the use, transfer or licensing thereof by the Sellers, the Asset Selling Affiliates or the Acquired Companies or may affect the validity, use, or enforceability of such Intellectual Property.
(b) All Registered Intellectual Property owned by the Sellers or the Asset Selling Affiliates with respect to any Purchased Intellectual Property is set forth in Section 2.1(b)(v) of the Seller Disclosure Schedule, and all Registered Intellectual Property owned by the Acquired Companies with respect to any Acquired Company Intellectual Property is set forth in Section 3.10(b) of the Seller Disclosure Schedule (collectively the ""). To Sellers' Knowledge, all necessary registration, maintenance and renewal fees due and payable as of the date hereof, in connection with any Business Registered Intellectual Property, have been made.
Business Registered Intellectual Property
 
(c) Except as set forth in Section 3.10(c) of the Seller Disclosure Schedule, the Purchased Intellectual Property and the Acquired Company Intellectual Property constitute all material Intellectual Property necessary for the conduct of the Business by the Purchaser immediately following the Closing in the same manner as presently conducted by the Sellers, Selling Affiliates and the Acquired Companies, other than with respect to the Excluded Assets.
(d) No member of the Seller Group has received notice that the Purchased Intellectual Property or the Acquired Company Intellectual Property infringes or misappropriates the proprietary rights of any other Person. The Business, as currently conducted, does not infringe or misappropriate (i) the proprietary rights (other than with respect to patents) of any other Person, and (ii) to Sellers' Knowledge, the patents of any other Person. To the Sellers' Knowledge, the Purchased Intellectual Property and the Acquired Company Intellectual Property have not been infringed or misappropriated by any Person.
(e) Except for the Software Licenses (as defined below), Section 3.10(e) of the Seller Disclosure Schedule sets forth all material licenses, sublicenses, assignments and other agreements (the "") with respect to the Acquired Company Intellectual Property and the Purchased Intellectual Property. No Acquired Company, with respect to any Acquired Company Intellectual Property, and neither the Sellers nor any Asset Selling Affiliate, with respect to any Purchased Intellectual Property, is in, or has received notice that they are in, material breach or default of any provision of the IP License. To the Sellers' Knowledge, no other party is in material breach or default of any provision of any such IP Licenses.
IP Licenses
(f) Other than with respect to any open source materials incorporated therein, the Acquired Companies are the sole owners of the Acquired Software. There is no obligation to compensate any Person for the development, use, sale or exploitation of the Acquired Software. Section 3.10(f)(i) of the Seller Disclosure Schedule sets forth all material licenses, sublicenses, assignments and other agreements with respect to the Licensed Software, the Acquired Software and the Systems Software (the ""). Except as set forth in Section 3.10(f)(ii) of the Seller Disclosure Schedule, no member of the Seller Group is in, or has received notice that they are in material breach or default of any Software Licenses. Except for software used for the Ancillary Services only, and commercially available off-the-shelf-software, the Acquired Software, the Licensed Software and the Systems Software constitute all of the material software used by the Business in the operation of the Business as presently conducted by the Sellers, the Asset Selling Affiliates and the Acquired Companies. The data stored in the Systems Software with respect to the Business constitutes all of the material data necessary to use the Systems Software for the Business in substantially the same manner as presently conducted by the Sellers, Selling Affiliates and the Acquired Companies.
Software Licenses
(g) Each of the Sellers, Asset Selling Affiliates and Acquired Companies has taken commercially reasonable steps in accordance with normal industry practice to maintain the confidentiality of their respective trade secrets included in the Purchased Intellectual Property and Acquired Company Intellectual Property (""). Without limiting the foregoing, each of the Sellers, Asset Selling Affiliates and Acquired Companies has used reasonable efforts to enforce policies requiring each employee and contractor who has access to Confidential Information to execute nondisclosure agreements. All employees and contractors of the Sellers, Asset selling Affiliates, and Acquired Companies who have contributed to the creation, invention, modification or improvement of any Purchased Intellectual Property or Acquired Company Intellectual Property, have signed written agreements assigning their ownership rights therein to Sellers, Asset Selling Affiliates or Acquired Companies, as applicable.
Confidential Information
 
.
Section 3.11
Contracts
(a) Section 3.11(a) of the Seller Disclosure Schedule sets forth an accurate and complete list as of the date hereof of each Included Contract to which any Seller or Asset Selling Affiliate is a party and each Contract to which any Acquired Company is a party, in each case which:
(i) is for the purchase of materials, supplies, goods, equipment or services that involves the payment by a Seller, any Asset Selling Affiliate (with respect to the Business) or any Acquired Company of more than U.S.$500,000 in either of fiscal years 2010 and 2011;
(ii) is for the sale of materials, supplies, goods, equipment or services by a Seller, any Asset Selling Affiliate (with respect to the Business) or any Acquired Company to any of the ten largest customers of the Business, as identified on Section 3.22(a) of the Seller Disclosure Schedule, in each of the United States, Germany, Italy, Spain, the United Kingdom and the Netherlands;
(iii) is for capital expenditures or commitments therefor in excess of U.S.$500,000 annually;
(iv) is a Contract for employment that provides (x) for base salary of more than U.S.$100,000 on an annual basis, or (y) for base salary of more than U.S.$100,000 on an annual basis and severance of at least six months' base salary, or (z) for base salary of more than U.S.$100,000 on an annual basis and is not terminable by a Seller without at least six months' notice, by any Asset Selling Affiliate or any Acquired Company (excluding such severance or notice as is required by applicable Law);
(v) is a Contract that provides for any third party, in each case, to act as a distributor, dealer or sales representative under which such third party has received payments of more than U.S.$500,000 in either of Sellers' fiscal years 2010 and 2011;
(vi) other than any Contracts that provide for the Seller Group, or any third party, to act as a distributor, dealer, sales representative or authorized service Person that are terminable upon notice of one hundred twenty (120) days or less, is (x) a Contract that materially limits or purports to materially limit the ability of the Business or any Acquired Company to compete in any line of business or with any Person or in any geographic area, or (y) contains most-favored-nation or exclusivity provisions;
(vii) is a Contract for a joint venture, or a Contract which involves a sharing of revenues, profits, cash flows, expenses or losses of the Business with any third-party;
(viii) is a Contract to license or authorize any third party to manufacture or reproduce any end-use products manufactured by the Seller Group with respect to the Business; and
(ix) is a Contract pursuant to which any member of the Seller Group has since December 31, 2009 acquired a business or entity, or assets of a business or entity (other than in the Ordinary Course of Business), with respect to the Business, whether by way of merger, consolidation, purchase of stock, purchase of assets, license or otherwise.
The Contracts listed in Section 3.11(a) of the Seller Disclosure Schedule (other than purchase orders) are referred to in this Agreement as the "". A true and complete copy of each Material Contract has been made available to Purchaser or Purchaser's representatives, , that, as of the date of this Agreement, (x) names of key customers and suppliers, and related pricing
Material Contracts
provided
 
terms, and (y) certain proprietary Contracts to be listed under Section 3.11(a)(vii) of the Seller Disclosure Schedule, have been redacted from applicable Material Contracts (with unredacted versions of such Material Contracts to be made available by Sellers to Purchaser or Purchaser's representatives promptly after the date hereof).
(b) With respect to each such Material Contract, none of the Sellers, the Asset Selling Affiliates and the Acquired Companies party to the Material Contract, nor, to the Sellers' Knowledge, any other party to the Material Contract, is in material breach or material default under the Material Contract. Each Material Contract set forth in writing is enforceable as to the Seller, the Asset Selling Affiliate or the Acquired Company party thereto and, to the Knowledge of the Seller, any other party thereto, in accordance with its terms subject to, if any, (i) Laws of general application relating to bankruptcy, insolvency and the relief of debtors, and (ii) rules of Law governing specific performance, injunctive relief and other equitable remedies. Other than the transactions contemplated by this Agreement, there exists no occurrence, condition or act, with respect to any member of the Seller Group or, to the Sellers' Knowledge, with respect to any other contracting party, which, with the giving of notice, the lapse of time or the happening of any other event or condition, would reasonably be expected to (i) become a material default or event of material default under any Material Contract or (ii) give any third party (A) the right to declare a material default or exercise any material remedy under any Material Contract, or (C) the right to cancel, terminate or materially modify any Material Contract. To Sellers' Knowledge, no member of the Seller Group has received any written notice or other communication regarding any actual or possible material violation or breach of, material default under, or intention to cancel or materially modify any Material Contract.
.
Section 3.12
Tax Matters
(a) All (i) material Tax Returns required to be filed with respect to the Purchased Assets or by the Acquired Companies have been timely filed, and (ii) Taxes shown on such Tax Returns have been paid. Sellers have delivered to Purchaser correct and complete copies of all (i) income Tax Returns of CareFusion U.K. 240 Limited and CareFusion Manufacturing Ireland 241 Limited with respect to calendar years 2008, 2009 and 2010, (ii) material, stand-alone state income Tax Returns of CareFusion 209, Inc. with respect to fiscal years 2008, 2009, 2010 and 2011, and (iii) pro forma Forms 1120 of CareFusion 209, Inc. with respect to fiscal years 2008, 2009, 2010 and 2011.
(b) For all periods through and including the Closing Date, all amounts required to be withheld or collected for payment of Taxes by the Acquired Companies and by the Sellers and Selling Affiliates in relation to the Purchased Assets have been properly withheld or collected, and, to the extent required by applicable Law, have been paid over to the proper Governmental Authority.
(c) Except as set forth in Section 3.12(c) of the Seller Disclosure Schedule, there is no Proceeding pending, nor any claim for Taxes being asserted, with respect to Taxes or Tax Returns of the Acquired Companies or the Purchased Assets. Except as set forth in Section 3.12(c) of the Seller Disclosure Schedule, no currently effective waiver of any statute of limitations with respect to Taxes has been granted or requested to be granted with respect to the Acquired Companies or the Purchased Assets. To Sellers' Knowledge, no claim has ever been made by a Tax Authority in a jurisdiction where any of the Acquired Companies does not file Tax Returns that such Acquired Company is or may be subject to taxation in that jurisdiction. To Sellers' Knowledge, none of the Acquired Companies has a "permanent establishment" in any country outside of its country of its incorporation or residence, as such term is defined in any applicable tax treaty or convention between such Acquired Company's country of residence and such other country.
(d) There are no liens for Taxes upon the assets of the Acquired Companies or upon the Purchased Assets except for Taxes not yet due and payable or that are being contested in good faith.
 
(e) None of the Acquired Companies is a party to or bound by any Tax sharing, tax indemnity, or tax allocation agreement nor do any of the Acquired Companies have any Liability or potential Liability to another party for Taxes under any such agreement.
(f) None of the Acquired Companies has consummated or participated in, or is currently participating in any transaction which was or is a reportable transaction within the meaning of Section 1.6011-4(b) of the Treasury Regulations.
(g) None of the Purchased Assets transferred by a Selling Affiliate that is not a U.S. person constitutes a U.S. real property interest within the meaning of section 897(c) of the Code
(h) To Sellers' Knowledge, neither CareFusion U.K. 240 Limited, nor CareFusion Manufacturing Ireland 241 Limited will be required to include in income, or exclude any item of deduction from, taxable income for any Post-Closing Period as a result of any (i) change in method of accounting for a Pre-Closing Period; (ii) agreement entered into with a Tax Authority; (iii) installment sale or open transaction disposition made on or prior to the Closing Date; (iv) prepaid amount received on or prior to the Closing Date; or (v) deferral of income arising out of cancellation of indebtedness on or prior to the Closing Date.
(i) There are no Tax holidays or Tax incentives with respect to the Acquired Companies.
(j) None of the Acquired Companies has constituted either a "distributing corporation" or a "controlled corporation" in a distribution of stock qualifying for tax-free treatment under Section 355 of the Code (i) in the two years prior to the date of this Agreement or (ii) in a distribution that could otherwise constitute part of a "plan" or "series of related transactions" (within the meaning of Section 355(e) of the Code) in conjunction with the transaction contemplated in this Agreement.
(k) This Section 3.12 constitutes the sole and exclusive representations and warranties of the Sellers with respect to any matters relating to Taxes. For the avoidance of doubt, nothing in this Section 3.12 or in the related section of the Seller Disclosure Schedule shall affect Sellers' obligations to indemnify Purchaser under Article 9.
.
Section 3.13
Employee Benefit Matters
(a) Section 3.13(a) of the Seller Disclosure Schedule sets forth an accurate and complete list of all Seller Plans and identifies those Seller Plans that are Assumed Benefit Plans.
(b) The Sellers have made available to the Purchaser an accurate and complete copy of the material documentation in relation to each Seller Plan.
(c) No Proceeding with respect to any Assumed Benefit Plan (other than routine claims for benefits) is pending, or to the Sellers' Knowledge, is threatened, there are no current submissions or referrals to any Assumed Benefit Plan's internal dispute resolution procedure, or to any regulatory body in respect of the Asset Selling Affiliates, Acquired Companies or the Assumed Benefit Plans, and there are no material outstanding payments or penalties payable by the Asset Selling Affiliates, Acquired Companies or the Assumed Benefit Plans in respect of any litigation or arbitration proceedings or determinations of any such regulatory bodies.
(d) As of the Closing Date, all contributions required to be made by the Sellers, an Asset Selling Affiliate or an Acquired Company to each Assumed Benefit Plan under the terms of such Assumed Benefit Plan or applicable Law will have been made. Each Assumed Benefit Plan complies with the requirements of applicable Law.
 
(e) Each Seller Plan that is intended to be qualified under Section 401(a) of the Code has received a favorable determination on which it can currently rely or opinion letter from the IRS that it is qualified under Section 401(a) of the Code and that its related trust is exempt from federal income Tax under Section 501(a) of the Code. To Sellers' Knowledge, no event has occurred or circumstance exists that could reasonably be expected to give rise to disqualification or loss of Tax-exempt status of any such Seller Plan or trust. There does not now exist, nor do any circumstances exist that would reasonably be expected to result in, any liability under Title IV of the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, as amended ("") that would be a liability of an Acquired Company following the Closing. No Assumed Benefit Plan is a self-funded employee benefit plan.
ERISA
(f) Each Seller Plan, including any amendments thereto, that the Sellers, the Selling Affiliates and the Acquired Companies treat as having special tax status with a Governmental Authority (including, but not limited to, the appropriate taxation, social security or supervisory authorities in the relevant country, state, territory or the like) has received any necessary approval or qualification from such Governmental Authority (or there remains a period of time in which to obtain such approval or qualification retroactive to the date of any such amendment that has not previously received such approval or qualification) and, to Sellers' Knowledge, no event has occurred and no circumstances exist which would be reasonably likely to adversely affect such approval or qualification or result in the imposition of material sanctions by such authorities.
(g) With respect to each Assumed Benefit Plan which is a defined benefit pension plan (and excluding any foreign severance funds), as of March 31, 2012 and except as set forth on Section 3.13(g) of the Seller Disclosure Schedule, (i) there does not exist any accumulated funding deficiency, whether or not waived, and (ii) the actuarial present value of all accrued benefits under such Assumed Benefit Plan (based upon the assumptions used by the Seller in the Ordinary Course of Business) does not exceed the fair market value of the assets of such plan by more than $250,000.
(h) Section 3.13(h) of the Seller Disclosure Schedule lists all "nonqualified deferred compensation plans" (subject to Section 409A of the Code) that are Assumed Benefit Plans and to which the Acquired Companies, the Sellers and Selling Affiliates is a party with an Employee. Each such nonqualified deferred compensation plan materially complies with the requirements of paragraphs (2), (3) and (4) of Section 409A(a) by its terms and has been operated in accordance with such requirements. No event has occurred that would be treated by Section 409A(b) as a transfer of property for purposes of Section 83 of the Code.
(i) This Section 3.13 and Section 3.14 together constitute the sole and exclusive representations and warranties of the Sellers with respect to any matters relating to employee benefits.
.
Section 3.14
Employment and Labor Matters
(a) Section 3.14(a) of the Seller Disclosure Schedule sets forth a list of all Employees as of the date of this Agreement. Such list is accurate and complete in all material respects with regard to name of Employee, position, date of hire, engagement or seniority, compensation (including any Bonus described in Section 10.12 of this Agreement) and benefits, status as exempt/non-exempt, city/country of employment, date of hire, date of birth, employing Person, and service credited for purposes of vesting and eligibility to participate under any Seller Plan with respect to such Persons.
(b) Section 3.14(b) of the Seller Disclosure Schedule lists as of the date hereof each Employee who is not fully available to perform work because of disability or other leave, excluding ordinary annual leave or vacation, or absence due to sickness or injury lasting less than two weeks, and also lists, with respect to each such Employee, the basis of such disability or leave and the anticipated date of return to full service.
 
(c) There is no labor strike, picketing, slowdown, lockout, employee grievance process or other work stoppage or labor dispute pending or, to Sellers' Knowledge, threatened between any Asset Selling Affiliate or any Acquired Company, on the one hand, and any Employees on the other hand.
(d) To the Sellers' Knowledge, except as set forth in Section 3.14(d) of the Seller Disclosure Schedule, the Asset Selling Affiliates and the Acquired Companies are in compliance in all material respects with all applicable Laws pertaining to the employment of their Employees, including all such Laws relating to fair employment practices, equal employment opportunities, prohibited discrimination and other similar employment activities.
(e) Except as disclosed in Section 3.14(e) of the Seller Disclosure Schedule and except as required by applicable Law, no Asset Selling Affiliate or Acquired Company has since January 1, 2010 been a party to, nor are they bound by, any voluntary union contract or voluntary collective bargaining agreement with respect to the Employees, nor is any such contract currently in effect or being negotiated by or on behalf of any Asset Selling Affiliate or Acquired Company, and no voluntary employee consultation body or works council exists representing the Employees.
(f) Except as disclosed in Section 3.14(f) of the Seller Disclosure Schedule, there are no current Proceedings in respect of any Employees relating to employment practices including, discrimination, harassment, retaliation, wrongful termination, unfair dismissal, workers' compensation (or the equivalent concept in an applicable jurisdiction), disability, or pursuant to any employment-related contract or tort theory.
(g) To Sellers' Knowledge, there is no material violation of any employment Contract between any Acquired Company or Asset Selling Affiliate (on the one hand) and any Employee (on the other).
(h) Except as disclosed in Section 3.14(h) of the Seller Disclosure Schedule, there are no ongoing formal performance improvement processes or live disciplinary sanctions against any of the Employees.
(i) Except as disclosed in Section 3.14(i) of the Seller Disclosure Schedule and other than as required by applicable Law, neither the execution and delivery of this Agreement nor the consummation of the transactions contemplated hereby will (of themselves) (i) result in any payment (including severance, unemployment compensation, golden parachute, bonus or otherwise) obligation of the Purchaser or any of its Affiliates (including the Acquired Companies from Closing) to any Employee, (ii) materially increase or otherwise enhance any benefits otherwise payable by Purchaser or its Affiliates (including the Acquired Companies or the Designated Affiliates from Closing), (iii) result in the acceleration of the time of payment or vesting of any such benefits, except as required under Section 411(d)(3) of the Code, (iv) increase the amount of compensation due to any Employee for which the Purchaser or any of its Affiliates (including the Acquired Companies from Closing) will be responsible, or (v) result in the forgiveness in whole or in part of any outstanding loans made by Sellers or the Asset Selling Affiliates to any Employee (for which the Purchaser or its Affiliates will be liable or responsible).
(j) This Section 3.14 and Section 3.13 together constitute the sole and exclusive representations and warranties of the Sellers with respect to any matters relating to employment and labor matters.
. Except as disclosed in Section 3.15 of the Seller Disclosure Schedule, the Sellers, the Selling Affiliates and the Acquired Companies have since June 30, 2009 been and are in compliance in all material respects with (a) all Environmental Laws (to the extent that they relate to the Business), and (b) all Governmental Authorizations required of the Seller, the
Section 3.15
Environmental, Health and Safety Matters
 
Selling Affiliates and the Acquired Companies under Environmental Laws to conduct the Business as presently conducted or to occupy the Leased Real Property and the Acquired Company Leased Real Property as presently occupied. There have been no Releases of Hazardous Materials at or from the Acquired Company Real Property, the Leased Real Property or the Acquired Company Leased Real Property in connection with the operation of the Business that is reasonably likely to result in any material Liability under applicable Environmental Laws. None of the Sellers, the Selling Affiliate and the Acquired Companies has received any written notice stating that the conduct of the Business or the condition of any Acquired Company Real Property, Leased Real Property or Acquired Company Leased Real Property is currently in violation of any Environmental Law or that any of the Sellers, the Selling Affiliates and the Acquired Companies has any current Liability under applicable Environmental Laws arising out of the Release of Hazardous Materials at any third party disposal site. No Proceeding is pending or, to the Sellers' Knowledge, threatened against the Sellers, any Selling Affiliate or any Acquired Company that alleges a violation by the Sellers, any Selling Affiliate or any Acquired Company of any applicable Environmental Laws (to the extent that they relate to the Business). The Sellers have made available to the Purchaser any material environmental reports, assessments or investigations related to the Business in the possession, custody or control of the Sellers, any Selling Affiliates or any Acquired Company. Neither the execution of this Agreement nor the consummation of the transactions contemplated hereunder will require any investigation, remediation or other action with respect to Hazardous Materials, or any notice to or consent of Governmental Authorities or third parties pursuant to any applicable so-called "property transfer act" statutes or regulations. This Section 3.15 constitutes the sole and exclusive representations and warranties of the Sellers with respect to any matters relating to environmental, health and safety matters.
.
Section 3.16
Governmental Authorizations
(a) The Sellers, the Selling Affiliates and the Acquired Companies have all material Governmental Authorizations that are necessary for the Sellers, the Selling Affiliates and the Acquired Companies to conduct the Business in the manner in which it is presently conducted (together, the "").The Sellers, the Selling Affiliates and the Acquired Companies are in possession of all Material Governmental Authorizations and are in compliance in all material respects with all such Material Governmental Authorizations. No suspension or cancellation of any such Material Governmental Authorization is pending or, to the Sellers' Knowledge, threatened.
Material Governmental Authorizations
. The Seller, the Selling Affiliates and the Acquired Companies are in compliance in all material respects with all Laws, including Healthcare Laws (but other than Environmental Laws, Tax Laws, Laws relating to employee benefits or labor matters, or Laws relating to certain regulatory compliance matters, which are governed by Sections 3.12 through 3.16, and Section 3.20, as applicable) applicable to the conduct of the Business, the ownership or operation of the Business, or the ownership or use of the Purchased Assets, or the assets of the Acquired Companies (with respect to the Business).
Section 3.17
Compliance with Laws
. Except as provided in Section 3.18 of the Seller Disclosure Schedule, there is no material Proceeding pending or, to the Sellers' Knowledge, threatened against any Acquired Company or against a Seller or any Selling Affiliate with respect to the Business or any Purchased Asset. No Acquired Company, nor Seller nor any Selling Affiliate (to the extent relating to the Business) is subject to any material outstanding Judgment.
Section 3.18
Legal Proceedings
.
Section 3.19
Product Defects
(a) Section 3.19(a) of the Seller Disclosure Schedule sets forth a list of all (a) Seller Products which have been recalled, withdrawn or suspended (other than Seller Products discontinued or suspended in the Ordinary Course of Business or by reason of business decisions made without regard to (A) concerns as to design or other inherent defect or risk to the safety of the users thereof or (B) written
 
concerns of any Governmental Authority received by the Sellers, Asset Selling Affiliates or Acquired Companies) since the Spin Date, and (b) Proceedings pending against the Sellers, Asset Selling Affiliates or Acquired Companies at any time since the Spin Date (whether such Proceedings have since been completed or remain pending) seeking the recall, withdrawal, suspension or seizure of any Seller Products or seeking to enjoin any of the Sellers, Asset Selling Affiliates or Acquired Companies from engaging in activities pertaining to any Seller Products.
(b) Except as disclosed in Section 3.19(a) of the Seller Disclosure Schedule, each (i) Seller Product manufactured, merchandised, serviced, distributed, sold or delivered since June 30, 2009 by the Seller Group in connection with the Business has been in conformity in all material respects with all applicable contractual commitments and all express and implied warranties made by members of the Seller Group, (ii) member of the Seller Group has no material liability or obligation for replacement or repair thereof or other damages in connection therewith, in each case subject to warranty claims in the Ordinary Course of Business and the terms of any written Contract with the applicable third party. Except as disclosed in Section 3.19(b) of the Seller Disclosure Schedule, no member of the Seller Group has been required to file any notice or other report with, or provide information to, any product safety agency, commission, board or other Governmental Authority concerning actual or potential hazards with respect to any such Seller Product.
.
Section 3.20
Certain Regulatory Compliance
(a) The Acquired Companies, the Sellers and Asset Selling Affiliates (with respect to the Business) and, to Sellers' Knowledge, each director, officer, employee, agent or distributor of such Persons (in the case of each Seller and Asset Selling Affiliate, with respect to the Business), have, since the Spin Date, complied with the Foreign Corrupt Practices Act, 15 U.S.C. 78dd et seq ("") and all other applicable anti-corruption Laws. The Sellers maintain a system of internal accounting controls (as applied to the Acquired Companies), and the books and records of the Acquired Companies are maintained, pursuant to the requirements of 15 U.S.C. 78m(b)(2).
FCPA
. A list and brief description of policies of insurance held by any Acquired Company, including the policy number, the coverage, names of insurance carrier, principal amount or limit, annual premium, deductible and date of expiration of each policy, is set forth in Section 3.21(a) of the Seller Disclosure Schedule. All premiums due and payable under all such policies have been timely paid, and the Acquired Companies are otherwise in compliance with the terms of such policies. Section 3.21(b) of the Seller Disclosure Schedule further sets forth an accurate and complete list of all material claims asserted by a Seller, any Selling Affiliate or any Acquired Company (in each case, with respect to the Business) pursuant to any product liability and general liability policy with an insurance carrier since January 1, 2009, and describes the nature and status of the claims.
Section 3.21
Insurance
. Section 3.22(a) of the Seller Disclosure Schedule sets forth a true and complete list of the top ten customers of the Business, based on the revenue from such customer during the 12-month period ended June 30, 2011, in each of the United States, Germany, Italy, Spain, the United Kingdom and the Netherlands. Section 3.22(b) of the Seller Disclosure Schedule sets forth a true and complete list of the top ten suppliers of the Business, based on amounts paid or payable by the Sellers, the Selling Affiliates or the Acquired Companies to such supplier with respect to the Business during the 12-month period ended June 30, 2011. As of the date hereof, none of the customers listed in Section 3.22(a) of the Seller Disclosure Schedule and none of the suppliers listed in Section 3.22(b) of the Seller Disclosure Schedule, has to Sellers' Knowledge threatened, or indicated its intention, to (i) cancel or otherwise terminate its relationship with the Seller Group or (ii) reduce substantially their purchases from or sale to the Seller Group of any products, equipment, goods or services relating to the Business, and, to the Sellers' Knowledge, no fact or condition exists (other than the transactions contemplated hereby) involving such customers or suppliers which would reasonably be expected to give rise to the matters set forth in (i) or (ii) of this sentence.
Section 3.22
Customers and Suppliers
 
. None of the Sellers, the Selling Affiliate and the Acquired Companies has incurred any Liability to pay any fees or commissions to any broker, finder or agent in connection with any of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement for which the Purchaser (or any Acquired Company from Closing) would become liable or obligated.
Section 3.23
Brokers Fees
. The representations and warranties set forth in this Article 3 are the only representations and warranties made by the Sellers (or any of their Affiliates, or any of their respective officers, directors, employees, agents, representatives or stockholders) with respect to the Business, the Purchased Assets, the Assumed Liabilities, the Shares, the Acquired Companies or any other matter relating to the transactions contemplated by this Agreement. Except as specifically set forth in this Article 3, the Sellers are selling the Purchased Assets and the Shares to the Purchaser "as is" and "where is" and with all faults, and make no warranty, express or implied, as to any matter whatsoever relating to the Business, the Purchased Assets, the Assumed Liabilities, the Shares, the Acquired Companies or any other matter relating to the transactions contemplated by this Agreement, including as to (i) merchantability or fitness for any particular use or purpose, (ii) the operation of the Business by the Purchaser after the Closing in any manner, or (iii) the probable success or profitability of the Business after the Closing.
Section 3.24
Disclaimer of Other Representations and Warranties
The Purchaser represents and warrants to the Sellers that as of the date of this Agreement and as of the Closing Date the statements set forth in this Article 4 are true and correct, except as set forth on the disclosure schedule delivered by the Purchaser to the Sellers concurrently with the execution and delivery of this Agreement and dated as of the date of this Agreement (the ""):
Purchaser Disclosure Schedule
. The Purchaser and each Designated Affiliate is a corporation or other legal entity duly organized, validly existing and in good standing under the Laws of its jurisdiction of organization, and has all requisite corporate power and authority to conduct its business as it is presently conducted, except where the failure to have such power and authority would not, individually or in the aggregate, prevent or delay consummation of the transactions contemplated under this Agreement.
Section 4.1
Organization and Good Standing
. The Purchaser has all requisite corporate power and authority to execute and deliver this Agreement and the Purchaser and each of its Affiliates have all requisite corporate power and authority to execute and deliver each Ancillary Agreement to which it is a party and to perform its obligations under this Agreement and each such Ancillary Agreement. The execution, delivery and performance of this Agreement and each Ancillary Agreement to which the Purchaser and each of Purchaser's Affiliates is a party and the consummation of the transactions contemplated hereby and thereby have been (or will be with respect to each Affiliate of Purchaser) duly authorized by all necessary action on the part of the Purchaser and each of Purchaser's Affiliates party thereto, as the case may be. The Purchaser has duly and validly executed and delivered this Agreement and, on or prior to the Closing, the Purchaser and each of Purchaser's Affiliates will have duly and validly executed and delivered each Ancillary Agreement to which it is a party. Assuming the due authorization, execution and delivery of this Agreement and the Ancillary Agreements by the Sellers and the other parties thereto, this Agreement constitutes, and at the Closing each Ancillary Agreement to which the Purchaser or each of Affiliate of Purchaser is a party will constitute, the valid and binding obligation of the Purchaser
Section 4.2
Authority and Enforceability
 
and such Affiliates of Purchaser, as the case may be, enforceable against the Purchaser and such Affiliates of Purchaser in accordance with its terms, subject to (a) Laws of general application relating to bankruptcy, insolvency and the relief of debtors, and (b) Laws governing specific performance, injunctive relief and other equitable remedies.
. Neither the execution, delivery and performance of this Agreement by the Purchaser and any Ancillary Agreement by the Purchaser or any Affiliate of Purchaser party thereto, nor the consummation by the Purchaser and Affiliates of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement, will (a) conflict with or violate the certificate of incorporation, certificate of formation, bylaws, limited liability company agreement or other applicable charter or organizational documents of the Purchaser or any of its Affiliates, (b) result in a breach or default under, or create in any Person the right to terminate, cancel, accelerate or modify, or require any notice, consent or waiver under, any material Contract to which the Purchaser or any of Purchaser's Affiliates is a party or by which the Purchaser or any of Purchaser's Affiliates is bound, in any case with or without due notice or lapse of time or both, (c) violate in any respect any Law or Judgment applicable to the Purchaser or any of its Purchaser's Affiliates, or (d) except under applicable Antitrust Laws, require the Purchaser or any of Purchaser's Affiliates to obtain any Governmental Authorization or make any filing with any Governmental Authority, except, with respect to clauses (b), (c) and (d), for any such conflicts, violations, breaches, delay or other occurrences which would not, individually or in the aggregate, have a material adverse effect on the Purchaser or prevent or delay consummation of the transactions contemplated under this Agreement.
Section 4.3
No Conflict
. There is no Proceeding pending or, to the Purchaser's knowledge, threatened against the Purchaser or any of the Purchaser's Affiliates that questions or challenges the validity of this Agreement or that may prevent, delay, make illegal or otherwise interfere with the ability of the Purchaser or any of the Purchaser's Affiliates to consummate any of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement.
Section 4.4
Legal Proceedings
. The Purchaser and the Designated Affiliates are acquiring the Shares for the Purchaser's and the Designated Affiliates' own account for investment purposes only and are not acquiring the Shares with a view to, or for sale in connection with, any distribution thereof in violation of U.S. federal Law or any other applicable securities Laws. The Purchaser and the Designated Affiliates acknowledge that the Shares have not be registered under the U.S. Securities Act of 1933, as amended, or any state or non-U.S. Law regarding the sale of securities.
Section 4.5
Investment Intent
. Neither the Purchaser or any Designated Affiliate, nor any Person acting on their behalf, has incurred any Liability to pay any fees or commissions to any broker, finder or agent in connection with any of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement.
Section 4.6
Brokers Fees
. The Purchaser has immediately available cash in an amount sufficient to pay the Purchase Price or, if some or all of the Purchase Price will be obtained from external financing sources, the Purchaser has delivered to the Sellers executed commitments, including bridge commitments (collectively, the ""), if necessary, for all such funds, in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to the Sellers, and the Purchaser will have available as of the Closing Date (either from its immediately available cash or from the financing contemplated by the Commitment Letters, or a combination thereof) funds sufficient to pay the Purchase Price. The Purchaser knows of no circumstance or condition that it expects will prevent the availability at the Closing of the funds necessary to consummate the transactions contemplated by this Agreement on the terms set forth in this Agreement.
Section 4.7
Financial Capacity
Commitment Letters
. The Purchaser has conducted its own independent investigation, review and analysis of the business, operations, assets, liabilities, results of operations, financial condition and prospects of the Business and the Acquired Companies as it has deemed appropriate, which investigation, review and analysis was done by the Purchaser and its Affiliates and
Section 4.8
Independent Investigation
 
representatives. The Purchaser acknowledges that it and its Affiliates and representatives have been provided diligence materials with respect to the personnel, properties, premises and records of the Business and the Acquired Companies for such purpose. The Purchaser acknowledges that other than the representations and warranties set forth in Article 3, none of the Sellers, the Selling Affiliates, the Acquired Companies, their Affiliates, and their respective officers, directors, employees, agents, representatives and stockholders makes or has made any representation or warranty, express or implied, at law or in equity, as to any matter whatsoever relating to the Business, the Purchased Assets, the Assumed Liabilities, the Shares, the Acquired Companies or any other matter relating to the transactions contemplated by this Agreement, including as to (i) merchantability or fitness for any particular use or purpose, (ii) the operation of the Business by the Purchaser after the Closing in any manner, or (iii) the probable success or profitability of the Business after the Closing, it being understood that the foregoing shall not limit any claim of the Purchaser based on fraud.
. Until the Closing and upon reasonable advance notice from the Purchaser, the Sellers will, and will cause the Selling Affiliates and the Acquired Companies to, allow the Purchaser and its representatives reasonable access during normal business hours, subject to reasonable coordination with the Seller (including with respect to ensuring security and safety) and without unreasonable interference to the operation of the Business to (a) such materials and information about the Business as the Purchaser may reasonably request, (b) those employees of the Business mutually agreed between the Sellers and the Purchaser, and (c) the properties, offices, plants and other facilities relating to the Business, which (in each case) all such material and information (including as gained through any access to offices, properties, employees or representatives) being held by Purchaser and its Affiliates and representatives pursuant to the terms of the Confidentiality Agreement). The covenants in this Section 5.1 will not require Sellers or any of their Affiliates or representatives to permit Purchaser or its representatives to conduct any environmental tests, including soil, water, air or other sampling or testing, at or relating to any applicable real property.
Section 5.1
Access and Investigation
.
Section 5.2
Operation of the Business
(a) Until the Closing, except as expressly contemplated, permitted or required by this Agreement, as described in Section 5.2 of the Seller Disclosure Schedule or as otherwise consented to in writing by the Purchaser (which consent will not be unreasonably withheld, conditioned or delayed), the Sellers will, and will cause the Selling Affiliates and the Acquired Companies to, conduct the Business in the Ordinary Course of Business in all material respects, use their commercially reasonable efforts to keep available the services of the Employees and to preserve the Business' relationships with its customers and others doing business with it.
(b) Without limiting the generality of the foregoing clause (a), from the date hereof until the Closing, except as expressly contemplated, permitted or required by this Agreement, as described in Section 5.2 of the Seller Disclosure Schedule or as otherwise consented to in writing by the Purchaser (which consent will not be unreasonably withheld, conditioned or delayed), the Sellers will not, and will not cause or permit any Selling Affiliate or Acquired Company to:
(i) amend the articles of incorporation or bylaws or other applicable charter or organizational documents of (A) any Acquired Company or (B) any Selling Affiliate in a manner that could be expected to delay or otherwise interfere with the consummation of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement;
 
(ii) issue, sell or pledge additional shares of the capital stock of any Acquired Company (or securities convertible into any such shares), or any options, warrants or rights to acquire any such shares or other convertible securities;
(iii) purchase, redeem or otherwise acquire any outstanding shares or other equity securities of any Acquired Company;
(iv) incur any Indebtedness for borrowed money of any Acquired Company (other than from another Acquired Company) or that constitutes an Assumed Liability, in each case other than in the Ordinary Course of Business;
(v) place or allow the creation of any Encumbrance (other than a Permitted Encumbrance) on any of the Purchased Assets, the Shares or the assets of the Acquired Companies (other than Retained Assets);
(vi) sell, transfer or otherwise dispose of any of the Purchased Assets or any of the assets of the Acquired Companies, other than inventory in the Ordinary Course of Business and Retained Assets;
(vii) acquire, by merger or consolidation with, or by purchase of all or a substantial portion of the assets or stock of, or by any other manner, any business or entity, by any Acquired Company or which would constitute a Purchased Asset or Assumed Liability, or enter into any joint venture, partnership or other similar arrangement for the conduct of the Business;
(viii) change the remuneration, benefits or other material terms of employment of any Employee, other than (i) as required by Law, (ii) pay rises in the Ordinary Course of Business (provided any such pay rise is not in excess of 3% of the applicable employee's compensation) or (iii) to satisfy a contractual commitment existing prior to the date of this Agreement;
(ix) (A) hire or terminate (1) any Employee with an annual base salary of more than U.S.$100,000, or (2) more than five Employees with an annual base salary less than U.S.$100,000, or (B) transfer any employee into, or any Employee out of, any Acquired Company or Asset Selling Affiliate, except as contemplated by this Agreement;
(x) enter into, extend, terminate, amend, fail to renew or modify in any material respect, any (A) Material Contract, (B) Seller Plan or (C) Lease, in each case except in the Ordinary Course of Business;
(xi) pay, discharge, satisfy, settle or waive, outside the Ordinary Course of Business, any Proceedings or Liabilities in excess of $100,000 in any one case with respect to the Business (other than Indebtedness or Intercompany Accounts);
(xii) initiate any Proceeding, except where the amount in controversy does not exceed $25,000 and does not involve injunctive or other equitable relief;
(xiii) to the extent not otherwise required by Law, prepare or file any Tax Return of an Acquired Company inconsistent with past practice or, on any such Tax Return, take any position, make any election, or adopt any method that is inconsistent with positions taken, elections made or methods used in preparing or filing similar Tax Returns in prior periods;
 
(xiv) make any change (other than due to changes in GAAP or as consistently applied by the Sellers throughout their corporate group) in the accounting policies applied in the preparation of the Financial Statements;
(xv) declare or pay any dividends on or make any other distributions (whether in cash, shares or property); , , that the Sellers may make, pay or distribute Cash and intercompany receivables other than any such Cash required to comply with the Sellers' obligations pursuant to Section 5.2(a) hereof; or
provided
however
(xvi) (i) agree in writing to take any of the foregoing actions, (ii) intentionally take or agree to take any action which could reasonably be expected to render any of the Sellers' representations and warranties contained in this Agreement untrue or inaccurate such that the condition set forth in Section 6.1(a) of this Agreement would not be satisfied, or (iii) intentionally take or agree to take any action which could reasonably be expected to prevent the Sellers (or any Selling Affiliate) from performing, or cause the Sellers (or any Selling Affiliate) not to perform, one or more covenants required hereunder to be performed by the Sellers (or any Selling Affiliate) such that the condition set forth in Section 6.1(b) of this Agreement would not be satisfied.
(c) Notwithstanding the other provisions of this Section 5.2, the Sellers may cause the Reorganization (and all actions necessary for, or incidental to, the Reorganization) to occur prior to Closing in accordance with Section 5.11, and such Reorganization (or action) will not be considered a breach of Sections 5.2(a) or 5.2(b), or any other provision of this Agreement.
.
Section 5.3
Consents and Filings
(a) Subject to the terms and conditions provided in this Section 5.3, the Sellers and the Purchaser will each use their respective best efforts to take, or cause to be taken, all actions and to do, or cause to be done, all things necessary, proper or advisable to consummate and make effective as promptly as practicable the transactions contemplated by this Agreement and to cooperate with each other in connection with the foregoing, including to: (i) obtain all necessary waivers, consents and approvals from other parties to Material Contracts; (ii) obtain all Governmental Authorizations that are required to be obtained under any Law; (iii) lift or rescind any injunction, restraining order or other Judgment adversely affecting the ability of the parties to this Agreement to consummate the transactions contemplated by this Agreement; (iv) effect all necessary registrations and filings under Antitrust Laws, including filings and submissions of information requested or required by any Governmental Authority that are deemed by the Sellers and the Purchaser, after consulting with one another, to be applicable to the transactions contemplated by this Agreement (""), with any such Antitrust Law filings to be made by the parties as set forth in Section 5.3 of the Seller Disclosure Schedule; and (v) fulfill all conditions to this Agreement. The Sellers and the Purchaser further covenant and agree, with respect to any threatened or pending preliminary or permanent injunction or other Judgment or Law that would adversely affect the ability of the parties to this Agreement to consummate the transactions contemplated by this Agreement, to use their respective best efforts to prevent the entry, enactment or promulgation thereof, as the case may be. In no event, however, will the Sellers or any Selling Affiliate be obligated to pay any money to any Person or to offer or grant other financial or other accommodations to any Person in connection with their obligations under this Section 5.3.
Governmental Antitrust Authority
(b) In furtherance and not in limitation of the foregoing, the Purchaser will use its best efforts to resolve such objections, if any, as may be asserted with respect to the transactions contemplated by this Agreement under any antitrust, competition or trade regulatory Laws (""). Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the Purchaser will (i) use its best efforts to avoid the entry of, or to have vacated or terminated, any Judgment that would restrain, prevent or delay the consummation of
Antitrust Laws
 
the transactions contemplated by this Agreement, including defending through litigation on the merits and through any available appeals any claim asserted in any court by any party, and (ii) take any and all steps necessary to avoid (or eliminate) each and every impediment under any Antitrust Laws that may be asserted by any Governmental Antitrust Authority with respect to the transactions contemplated by this Agreement so as to enable the consummation of such transactions to occur as expeditiously as possible, including proposing, negotiating, committing to and effecting (by consent decree, hold separate order or otherwise) the sale, divestiture or disposition of such assets or businesses of the Purchaser or its Affiliates or of the Acquired Companies, or of the Purchased Assets or the Business (or otherwise taking or committing to take any action that limits its freedom of action with respect to any of the businesses, product lines or assets of the Purchaser or its Affiliates or of the Acquired Companies, or of the Purchased Assets or the Business) as may be required in order to avoid the entry of, or to effect the dissolution of, any injunction, temporary restraining order or other Judgment in any Proceeding, which would otherwise have the effect of preventing or delaying the consummation of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement. The entry by any Governmental Antitrust Authority (where it has the power to do so) in any Proceeding brought by a private party or Governmental Antitrust Authority challenging the transactions contemplated by this Agreement as violative of any Antitrust Law, of a Judgment permitting the transactions contemplated by this Agreement, but requiring that any of the businesses, product lines or assets of any of the Purchaser or its Affiliates or of the Acquired Companies, or of the Purchased Assets or the Business be divested or held separate by the Purchaser, or that would otherwise limit the Purchaser's freedom of action with respect to, or its ability to retain, the Business or any portion thereof or any of the Purchaser's or its Affiliates' other businesses, product lines or assets, will not be deemed a failure to satisfy the conditions specified in Section 6.1(c) or 6.1(e). Notwithstanding the foregoing, however, none of the Sellers or any Selling Affiliate will be required to divest or hold separate or otherwise take or commit to take any action that limits its ability to retain in the event of failure to meet any of the conditions set forth in Article 6 the Business or any portion thereof, or its freedom of action with respect to any of its or their other businesses, product lines or assets.
(c) The Sellers and the Purchaser will keep each other apprised of the status of matters relating to the completion of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement and work cooperatively in connection with obtaining the requisite Governmental Authorizations, including: (i) cooperating with the other party in connection with filings under any Antitrust Laws, including, with respect to the party making a filing, (A) providing copies of all such documents to the non-filing party and its advisors prior to filing (other than documents containing confidential business information that will be shared only with outside legal counsel to the non-filing party), and (B) considering all reasonable additions, deletions or changes suggested in connection with any such filing; (ii) promptly furnishing to each other all information reasonably required for any application or other filing to be made pursuant to any Antitrust Laws in connection with the transactions contemplated by this Agreement (or where such information constitutes confidential business information of the disclosing party, providing it only to the outside legal counsel to the other party); (iii) promptly notifying the other of, and if in writing furnishing the other with copies of, any communications from or with any Governmental Antitrust Authority with respect to the transactions contemplated by this Agreement (other than documents containing confidential business information of the disclosing party that will be shared only with outside legal counsel to the other party); (iv) permitting the other party to review in advance and considering in good faith the views of one another in connection with any proposed material communication with any Governmental Antitrust Authority in connection with Proceedings under or relating to any Antitrust Laws; (v) not agreeing to participate in any meeting or discussion with any Governmental Antitrust Authority in connection with Proceedings under or relating to any Antitrust Laws unless it consults with the other party in advance, and, to the extent permitted by such Governmental Antitrust Authority, gives the other party the opportunity to attend and participate in such meetings or discussions; and (vi) consulting and cooperating with one another in connection with any analyses, appearances, presentations, memoranda, briefs, arguments, opinions and proposals made or submitted by or on behalf of either party to this Agreement in connection with
 
Proceedings under or relating to any Antitrust Laws. If either party or any Affiliate thereof receives a request for additional information or documentary material from any such Governmental Antitrust Authority with respect to the transactions contemplated by this Agreement, then such party will endeavor in good faith to make, or cause to be made, as soon as practicable and after consultation with the other party, an appropriate response in compliance with such request. The Purchaser will advise the Sellers promptly in respect of any understandings, undertakings or agreements (oral or written) which the Purchaser proposes to make or enter into with any Governmental Antitrust Authority in connection with the transactions contemplated by this Agreement.
. Notwithstanding anything contained in this Agreement to the contrary, the Purchaser expressly acknowledges and agrees that the Purchaser's obligations under this Agreement are not conditioned in any manner whatsoever upon the Purchaser or any Designated Affiliate obtaining any financing or the receipt of proceeds therefrom. The Purchaser will keep the Sellers reasonably apprised of all material developments or changes relating to the financing contemplated by the Commitment Letters. In the event that the Commitment Letters cease to be in full force and effect at any time or the lenders party thereto indicate any unwillingness to provide the financing contemplated thereby, or for any reason the Purchaser otherwise no longer believes in good faith that it or any Designated Affiliate will be able to obtain the financing contemplated thereby, then the Purchaser will promptly notify the Sellers and use its reasonable best efforts to obtain replacement financing arrangements or commitment letters, on terms and conditions that are no less favorable to the Purchaser than those set forth in the Commitment Letters, as soon as reasonably practicable. The Purchaser will not, and will not permit any of its Affiliates to, without the prior written consent of the Sellers, take any action or enter into any transaction, including any merger, acquisition, joint venture, lease or other Contract or debt or equity financing that would reasonably be expected to impair, delay or prevent the financing contemplated by the Commitment Letters.
Section 5.4
Financing
.
Section 5.5
Confidentiality
(a) The parties agree to continue to abide by that certain Confidentiality Agreement between CFN 2200 and the Purchaser dated March 30, 2012 (the ""), which will survive until the Closing, at which time the Confidentiality Agreement will terminate. If this Agreement is, for any reason, terminated prior to the Closing, the Confidentiality Agreement will continue in full force and effect in accordance with its terms in respect of that portion of the Confidential Information (as defined in the Confidentiality Agreement) relating to the Business and the transactions contemplated by this Agreement.
Confidentiality Agreement
(b) For a period of two years after the Closing, the Sellers will, and will cause the Selling Affiliates to, and will instruct their directors, officers, employees and advisors to, hold in confidence, unless compelled to disclose by judicial or administrative process or by other requirements of Law, all non-public documents and information to the extent relating to the Business the ""), except to the extent that such Business Information (i) must be disclosed in connection with the obligations of the Sellers or the Selling Affiliates pursuant to this Agreement and the Ancillary Agreements, (ii) can be shown to have been in the public domain through no fault of the Sellers or any Selling Affiliate, or (iii) was lawfully acquired by the Sellers or any Selling Affiliate from a source other than those related to its prior ownership of the Business and that are not restricted by Law, contract or fiduciary duty from disclosing such information. Notwithstanding the foregoing, in no event will this Section 5.5(b) limit or otherwise restrict the right of the Sellers or any Selling Affiliate to disclose such Business Information (w) to their and their Affiliates' respective directors, officers, employees, agents and advisors to the extent reasonably required to facilitate the negotiation, execution, delivery or performance of this Agreement and the Ancillary Agreements, (x) to any Governmental Authority or arbitrator to the extent reasonably required in connection with any Proceeding relating to the enforcement of this Agreement or any Ancillary Agreement, (y) in connection with their indemnification obligations under this Agreement, including the defense of any Third Party Claim, and (z) as permitted in accordance with Section 5.6 or Article 9.
(
Business Information
 
. Prior to the Closing, each party agrees not to issue any press release or make any other public announcement relating to this Agreement or the transactions contemplated hereunder without the prior written approval of the other parties, except that each of the Sellers and the Purchaser reserves the right, without the other parties' prior consent, to make any public disclosure it believes in good faith is required by applicable securities Laws or securities listing standards (in which case the disclosing party agrees to use commercially reasonable efforts to advise the other parties prior to making such disclosure). The parties will agree on mutually acceptable joint press releases announcing each of the execution of this Agreement and the Closing.
Section 5.6
Public Announcements
. Subject to the other express provisions of this Agreement, upon the request of any party to this Agreement, the other parties will execute and deliver or cause to be executed and delivered such other documents, instruments and agreements as the requesting party may reasonably require for the purpose of carrying out the intent of this Agreement and to consummate and make effective the transactions contemplated by this Agreement.
Section 5.7
Further Actions
.
Section 5.8
Indemnification
(a) The Purchaser will not, for a period of six years after the Closing, take or permit any action to alter or impair any exculpatory or indemnification provisions now existing in the certificate of incorporation or bylaws or other applicable charter or organizational documents of any Acquired Company for the benefit of any individual who served as a director or officer of any Acquired Company at any time prior to the Closing (each an ""), except for any changes which may be required to conform with changes in applicable Law, any changes which do not affect the application of such provisions to acts or omissions of such individuals prior to the Closing and any changes which would not affect adversely the rights of any Affiliate Indemnified Party.
Affiliate Indemnified Party
(b) Without limiting the generality of this Section 5.8, the provisions of this Section 5.8 are intended for the benefit of, and may be enforced by, each of the Affiliate Indemnified Parties and their respective heirs.
. The Purchaser hereby waives compliance by the Sellers and/or any Selling Affiliate with any applicable bulk sale or bulk transfer Laws of any jurisdiction in connection with the transactions contemplated by this Agreement.
Section 5.9
Bulk Transfer Laws
. The Purchaser will use its reasonable best efforts to, where necessary, form acquisition vehicles (with all necessary Governmental Authorizations and any mandatory insurance required by applicable Law) at Purchaser's sole cost in all applicable jurisdictions and designate all of its Designated Affiliates as soon as practicable following the date of this Agreement and, in any event, will use its reasonable best efforts to make such designation not less than ten (10) days prior to the Closing.
Section 5.10
Designated Affiliates
. The Sellers will, and will cause their Affiliates to, at the Sellers' sole cost and expense, take such steps that are necessary or appropriate (in the Sellers' reasonable opinion) to (a) cause any Retained Assets, Retained Employees and Retained Liabilities of each Acquired Company to be sold, transferred, assigned or otherwise conveyed to or assumed by, as applicable, Affiliates of the Sellers (other than the Acquired Companies), (b) except any items expressly included in the definition of Closing Net Working Capital and balances arising from any current trading activity, (i) make a capital contribution into any Acquired Company, (ii) distribute, pay or satisfy any Intercompany Receivables and the debtor's obligation with respect to the Notes Receivable, and (iii) settle, capitalize or otherwise
Section 5.11
Reorganization
 
eliminate any Intercompany Payables and the creditor's right to receive the Notes Receivable, in each case in whole or part and as determined by the Sellers in their sole discretion, (c) cause all Employees who provide services or are assigned to, but are not employed by, CareFusion 209, Inc. to be transferred with their consent or in accordance with applicable Law to CareFusion 209, Inc. and (d) cause any assets (in each case to the extent exclusively relating to the Business or that would otherwise fall within the definition of Purchased Assets if held by an Asset Selling Affiliate)) currently held by the Sellers or any of their Affiliates (other than any Acquired Company or Asset Selling Affiliate) to be transferred, assigned or otherwise conveyed to, as applicable, any Acquired Company or Asset Selling Affiliate and, to the extent any Acquired Company or Asset Selling Affiliate receives all rights related to such asset, any Liability related to such asset will be assumed by, as applicable, any Acquired Company or Asset Selling Affiliate, in each case, effective at or prior to the Closing (the "").
Reorganization
. Until the Closing, the Sellers agree to use commercially reasonable efforts to distribute, extract or otherwise remove as much Cash as is reasonably practicable and permitted under applicable Law from the Acquired Companies.
Section 5.12
Removal of Cash
. During the period commencing on the Closing Date and ending on the third (3
Section 5.13
Non-Competition
rd
) anniversary of the Closing Date (the ""), other than as permitted by this Agreement or otherwise agreed to in writing by Purchaser, the Sellers will not, and will cause CareFusion Corporation and its Subsidiaries not to, directly or indirectly, engage in any aspect of the Business, whether under the Sellers' label or any other Person's label (the ""); or (ii) own, manage or control another Person who, or participate in a partnership, joint venture or similar arrangement which, undertakes or conducts any Restricted Activities; , , that, for the purposes of this Section 5.13, neither the Sellers, CareFusion Corporation nor any of its Subsidiaries will be prevented from:
Restricted Period
Restricted Activities
provided
however
(a) being the holders or beneficial owners by way of bona fide investment purposes only of any units of an authorized unit trust and/or any securities in any company carrying on any Business which are listed or traded on any recognized securities exchange, regulated market or trading facility provided always that such Persons do not hold or are not beneficially interested in more than a total of 5.00% of the equity securities in such listed company, and that such Persons do not have directly or indirectly any management functions or any material influence in such a company; or
provided further,
(b) acquiring in a single transaction or a series of related transactions any one or more companies and/or businesses (taken together, the "") although the activities of such companies and/or businesses include the Restricted Activities (or part thereof) (the ""), if the Acquired Competing Business represents not more than 10% of the Acquired Business (measured in terms of turnover in the last accounting year of the Acquired Business).
Acquired Business
Acquired Competing Business
In the event of a breach of any of the covenants set forth in this Section 5.13 or the following Section 5.14, the Purchaser shall be entitled to an injunction against the Sellers, CareFusion Corporation or its Subsidiaries, as applicable, in addition to any other remedies provided by law or equity.
. Unless otherwise agreed to in writing, during the period commencing on the Closing Date and ending on the 18 month anniversary of the Closing Date (the ""), neither the Sellers, CareFusion Corporation nor any of its Subsidiaries will, directly or indirectly, (a) hire any Transferred Employee (other than a Transferred Employee who is terminated from employment by the Purchaser or any of its Affiliates (including any Acquired Company)); (b) solicit, induce or attempt to persuade any Transferred Employees to terminate their employment relationship with Purchaser or any of its Affiliates, or (c) solicit, induce or attempt to persuade any agent, supplier or customer of the Business to terminate such agency or other relationship with the Business. During the Non-Solicitation Period, unless otherwise agreed to in writing by the other party, neither the Sellers nor the Purchaser will (and each party will cause its respective Affiliates not to), directly or indirectly, hire any
Section 5.14
Non Solicitation
Non-Solicitation Period
 
Protected Employee of the other party (except for any such Protected Employee who is terminated from employment by its current employer), or solicit, induce or attempt to persuade any Protected Employee of the other party to terminate their relationship with such other party. For purposes of this Section 5.14, a "" of the Sellers or the Purchaser means any officer, director or employee of such party (or any of its Affiliates) with whom the other party has had contact, or who first became known to such other party, in connection with its consideration and negotiations of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement. This Section 5.14 will not be deemed to prohibit either party, or any of their respective Affiliates, from engaging in general media advertising or solicitation that may be targeted to a particular geographic or technical area but that is not specifically targeted towards any employees of the other party or any of their respective Affiliates (including the Acquired Companies after Closing).
Protected Employee
.
Section 5.15
Contact with Business Employees, Customers and Suppliers
(a) Subject to applicable Law and Section 5.2, and in accordance with Section 5.1, during the period from the date of this Agreement until the Closing Date, the Purchaser and the Sellers will cooperate in good faith and in the manner agreed by the Purchaser and Sellers in communicating with any Employees, customers, suppliers, licensors, licensees, partners or distributors of the Business concerning the transactions contemplated hereby, including the Purchaser's intentions concerning the operation of the Business following the Closing.
(b) Prior to the Closing and in accordance with applicable Law, the Sellers shall, and shall cause the Selling Affiliates to, and the Purchaser shall, and shall cause its Affiliates to, mutually cooperate in undertaking all reasonably necessary or legally required provision of information to, and consultations, discussions or negotiations with, any employee, union, works council, labor organization or other employee representative group regarding the transactions contemplated by this Agreement.
.
Section 5.16
Post-Closing Cooperation
(a) Subject to Article 9, for the longer of the period required by applicable Law or six (6) years following the Closing Date, each of the Sellers (on the one hand) and the Purchaser (on the other) will (i) retain books and records relating to the Business or the Acquired Companies in their possession with respect to periods prior to the Closing, and (ii) afford the other parties and their representatives, during normal business hours of the requested party and at the requesting party's expense, reasonable access to the books and records relating to the Business or the Acquired Companies in their possession with respect to periods prior to the Closing and the right to make copies and extracts therefrom, to the extent that such access may be reasonably required by the requesting party.
(b) To the extent that, from time to time after the Closing, the Sellers or their Affiliates and/or the Purchaser or its Affiliates identify assets that are owned by the Purchaser or its Affiliates (including the Acquired Companies) but that are in the possession of the Sellers or their Affiliates (including any payments from customers of the Purchaser or its Affiliates (including the Acquired Companies) that are improperly sent to the Sellers or its Affiliates after the Closing), the Sellers will use their respective commercially reasonable efforts to locate such items and take such action as is necessary to put the Purchaser or one of its Affiliates in actual possession thereof; , , that (i) to the extent the Sellers or an Affiliate thereof are legally liable for any Taxes (other than any Transfer Tax and/or VAT) that are imposed on any assets delivered by the Sellers pursuant to this Section 5.16(b), the Purchaser will reimburse the Sellers for the amount of such Taxes and (ii) to the extent the Sellers or an Affiliate thereof are legally liable for any Taxes (other than any Transfer Tax and/or VAT) that are imposed on any payments delivered by the Sellers pursuant to this Section 5.16(b), the amount of any payments required to be delivered by the Sellers will be reduced by such Taxes. To the extent that, from time to time after the Closing, the Purchaser, the Acquired Companies or their respective Affiliates and/or the Sellers or their Affiliates identify assets that are owned by the Sellers or their Affiliates, but that are in
provided
however
 
the possession of the Purchaser, an Acquired Company or any of their Affiliates (including any payments from customers of the Sellers that are improperly sent to the Purchaser or its Affiliates (including the Acquired Companies) after the Closing), the Purchaser will use commercially reasonable efforts to locate such assets and take such action as is necessary to put the Sellers or one of their Affiliates in actual possession thereof; , , that (i) to the extent the Purchaser or an Affiliate is legally liable for any Taxes (other than any Transfer Tax and/or VAT) imposed on any assets delivered by the Purchaser pursuant to this Section 5.16(b), the Sellers will reimburse the Purchaser for the amount of such Taxes and (ii) to the extent the Purchaser or an Affiliate is legally liable for any Taxes (other than any Transfer Tax and/or VAT) imposed on any payments delivered by the Purchaser pursuant to this Section 5.16(b), the amount of any payments required to be delivered by the Purchaser will be reduced by such Taxes. Any Transfer Tax and/or VAT which arises in connection with any transfer or delivery contemplated under this Section will be borne by the parties on the same basis as is provided for in Article 9.
provided
however
(c) For a period of ninety (90) days after the Closing Date and upon reasonable advance notice, the Selling Affiliates shall provide the Purchaser and its representatives reasonable access to, and the reasonable assistance of, its employees (who will interact, as reasonably required, with the applicable service providers of the Sellers and their Affiliates to provide such assistance) during normal business hours, subject to reasonable coordination with the Seller (including with respect to ensuring security and safety) and without unreasonable interference to the operation of Sellers' and their Affiliates' business, in the collection and review of materials, books, records, historical financial and other information of the Selling Affiliates relating to the Purchased Assets and the Business for the purpose of assisting the Purchaser to prepare its audited financials reflecting acquisition of the Purchased Assets and the Business (with any associated out-of-pocket costs incurred by the Sellers or their Affiliates to be promptly paid by Purchaser, on the provision of reasonable evidence of same by the Sellers to the Purchaser).
.
Section 5.17
Release of Guarantees
(a) Following the date of this Agreement and prior to Closing, the Purchaser and the Sellers will (i) cooperate with one another, and will use their respective commercially reasonable efforts, in order to replace all of the Business Guarantees with guarantees given by the Purchaser or its Affiliates and replace all of the Other Business Guarantees with guarantees given by the Sellers or their Affiliates (with commercially reasonable efforts in this context to include preparing and submitting documents and providing information and responses to requests from the beneficiaries of such Business Guarantees and Other Business Guarantees) and (ii) use their respective commercially reasonable efforts to cause the Sellers and all Affiliates of the Sellers (other than the Acquired Companies) who are parties to the Business Guarantees to be fully released and discharged with respect thereto, and cause the Acquired Companies who are parties to the Other Business Guarantees to be fully released and discharged with respect thereto, in each case, as of the Closing Date. With respect to any Business Guarantees or Other Business Guarantees that are not fully released and discharged as of the Closing Date, the Purchaser and the Sellers will continue to use commercially reasonable efforts to replace such Business Guarantees or Other Business Guarantees (as the case may be) and to cause the Sellers and their Affiliates or the Acquired Companies (as the case may be) to be fully released and discharged therefrom as promptly as practicable.
(b) Until all of the Business Guarantees and Other Business Guarantees (as applicable) are fully released and discharged, (i) the Purchaser will indemnify and hold the Sellers and all Affiliates of the Sellers harmless from and against, and pay and reimburse the Sellers and all Affiliates of Sellers for, any and all out-of-pocket: (A) Losses that the Sellers or any of their Affiliates suffer as a result of being required to make any payment under the Business Guarantees after the Closing Date as a result of either (x) the failure of the Purchaser or any of its Affiliates to meet its obligations underlying the Business
 
Guarantees or (y) the failure of the Sellers and their Affiliates (other than the Acquired Companies) to be fully released from the Business Guarantees, and (B) reasonable costs and expenses incurred by the Sellers or any of their Affiliates relating to extension or renewal of Business Guarantees that have not been fully released and discharged; and (ii) the Sellers will indemnify and hold the Purchaser and all Affiliates of the Purchaser harmless from and against, and pay and reimburse the Purchaser and all Affiliates of the Purchaser for, any and all out-of-pocket: (A) Losses that the Purchaser or any of its Affiliates suffer as a result of being required to make any payment under the Other Business Guarantees after the Closing Date as a result of either (x) the failure of the Sellers or any of their Affiliates to meet its obligations underlying the Other Business Guarantees or (y) the failure of the Purchaser and its Affiliates (including the Acquired Companies) to be fully released from the Other Business Guarantees, and (B) reasonable costs and expenses incurred by the Purchaser or any of its Affiliates relating to extension or renewal of any Other Business Guarantees that have not been fully released and discharged.
. The Sellers will (a) cause the applicable employees to enter into discussions with Purchaser (and Purchaser's representatives) promptly after the date hereof and cooperate in good faith with the Purchaser to assist Purchaser in identifying its ongoing needs with respect to Systems Software in the operation of the Business from Closing, (b) (i) use commercially reasonable efforts to obtain, transfer or assign prior to (but with effect from) Closing, all necessary licenses, consents and approvals from the third party licensors of such Systems Software reasonably determined by the Purchaser to be required from Closing in the operation of the Business in the same manner as presently conducted (the "") (with the Required Systems Software to be nominated by the Purchaser to the Sellers in writing within 10 Business Days after the date hereof), or such work around solution reasonably agreed to by the parties, in each case at the Purchaser's expense, as may be required for the Acquired Companies to use or obtain fully paid-up, valid licenses to such Required Systems Software for use by the Acquired Companies after the Closing in materially the same manner as such Required Systems Software is used in the conduct of the Business as presently conducted and (ii) any such Required Systems Software, if obtained, transferred or assigned pursuant to the immediately preceding clause (i), shall function as of the Closing in conjunction with the data obtained pursuant to clause (c) of this Section 5.18 in materially the same manner as such Required Systems Software functions in the conduct of the Business as presently conducted (unless to the extent the failure to function as described above is caused by changes requested by the Purchaser or by the Purchaser not assuming all Systems Software), and (c) use commercially reasonable efforts to identify, segregate and (to the extent reasonably practicable, subject to any restrictions under applicable Law) deliver to the Purchaser prior to, but with effect from, Closing any material data of the Acquired Companies stored in the Required Systems Software. For a period of four (4) months following the Closing Date, the Sellers will, and will cause the Selling Affiliates to, allow the Purchaser and their representatives reasonable access during normal business hours of the Sellers, subject to reasonable coordination with the Sellers (including with respect to ensuring security and safety) and without unreasonable interference to the operation of the businesses of the Sellers and Selling Affiliates, such employees of the Sellers and Selling Affiliates as are necessary to answer any reasonable requests with respect to the Required Systems Software, as such Required Systems Software is used in the conduct of the Business as presently conducted, or the data delivered therewith pursuant to this Section 5.18.
Section 5.18
Systems Software
Required Systems Software
. The Purchaser, on its own behalf and (from Closing Date) on behalf of the Acquired Companies, hereby acknowledges and confirms that, upon and following the Closing Date, the Acquired Companies and the Purchaser will have no rights, title or interest whatsoever (including ownership rights, rights of use and invention rights) with respect to any Intellectual Property or software developed or used by the Sellers, the Acquired Companies, the Asset Selling Affiliates or any Affiliates thereof, other than the Purchased Intellectual Property, the Acquired Company Intellectual Property, the Systems Software, the Licensed Software and the Acquired Software (the ""). If at any time following the Closing Date, the Purchaser or the Acquired Companies discover that any of the Acquired Companies or the Purchaser holds or controls any right, title
Section 5.19
Intellectual Property Rights
Seller Retained IP
 
or interest in any Seller Retained IP, the Purchaser shall procure (a) that all right, title and interest held by the Purchaser or any Acquired Company in the Seller Retained IP is assigned for no additional consideration to the Sellers or to an entity specified by the Sellers, and (b) that the Purchaser and the Acquired Companies shall not (i) use such Seller Retained IP in any part of the world, (ii) restrict the Sellers, the Asset Selling Affiliates or any Affiliates thereof from using any right, title or interest they have in such Seller Retained IP, nor (iii) grant the freedom or right to use the Seller Retained IP in any part of the world to any Person other than the Sellers or the entity specified by the Sellers.
. The Sellers will not, and will not authorize or permit any officer, director or employee of a Seller or any Affiliate of the Sellers or authorize any investment banker, attorney, accountant or other representative retained by the Sellers or any Affiliate of the Sellers to, directly or indirectly, solicit or encourage, or furnish information with respect to the Business, to or engage in any discussions with any Person in connection with, any proposal for the acquisition of all or a substantial portion of the Business, other than as contemplated by this Agreement. The Sellers will promptly cease or cause to be terminated any existing activities or discussions with any Person with respect to any of the foregoing and will promptly request the return of any confidential information provided to any Person in connection with a prospective acquisition of the Business, in each case other than the Purchaser.
Section 5.20
Acquisition Proposals
.
Section 5.21
Use of Names
(a) For the period from the Closing Date through to the later of (i) one year after the Closing Date, and (ii) such time as, on a country by country basis, the Purchaser or its Affiliates requires to obtain the transfer of any product registration for the Restricted Products and the sleep diagnostic product lines (including Type I, II, III or IV) sold or distributed by the Business (together with the Restricted Products, the ""), which shall in no event be longer than 18 months after the Closing Date, unless the Purchaser has used (and is then using) commercially reasonable efforts from the Closing Date through to such date to obtain all such registrations as soon as reasonably practicable, in which case (upon at least one month's notice from the Purchaser to the Sellers) the Sellers may consent to a further extension of six months, on a country-by-country basis (such consent not be unreasonably withheld, conditioned or delayed) (such period under clause (i) or (ii), the ""), Purchaser and its Affiliates shall (in the applicable countries) have the royalty-free right to use the name "CareFusion" (the ""), only as and to the extent such name was used by a member of the Seller Group with respect to the sale of Covered Products by the Business or to the extent necessary to satisfy applicable regulatory requirements or as otherwise reasonably required (with the prior consent of Seller, not to be unreasonably withheld, conditioned or delayed) in connection with the orderly transition of the Business from Sellers to the Purchaser, including for reference purposes.
Covered Products
CareFusion Name Period
CareFusion Name
(b) The Purchaser and its Affiliates shall have the further royalty-free right during the CareFusion Name Period to sell or otherwise use or dispose of any materials included in the inventory of the Seller Group with respect to the Business which bear the CareFusion Name to the extent that such materials (i) were included in the Purchased Assets or the assets of the Acquired Companies (and were not Retained Assets or Excluded Assets), (ii) relate to the Business and are returned to Purchaser or its Affiliates after the Closing Date, or (iii) were contracted for by the Seller Group for use in the Business prior to the Closing Date (in each case, without altering or modifying such materials or inventory); , such right shall terminate upon the expiration of the CareFusion Name Period with respect to any such materials unless the only reference therein to Sellers or the CareFusion Name is to its or their copyright claim, in which case such right shall be unlimited as to time.
provided
that
(c) The Purchaser and its Affiliates shall also have the royalty-free right from and after the Closing Date to use, for a period of six months following the Closing Date (the ""), any signs, letterhead, invoices or other supplies which bear the CareFusion Name if such signs or supplies
General Name Period
 
(i) were included in the Purchased Assets or the assets of the Acquired Companies (and were not Retained Assets or Excluded Assets), or (ii) were contracted for by the Seller Group for use in the Business prior to the Closing Date.
(d) Notwithstanding the above, in no event shall the Purchaser or any of its Affiliates use the CareFusion Name after the Closing in any manner or for any purpose different from the use of such the CareFusion Name by the Seller Group during the six month period prior to the Closing Date with respect to the Business or to satisfy applicable regulatory requirements or as otherwise reasonably required (with the prior consent of the Sellers, not to be unreasonably withheld, conditioned or delayed) in connection with the orderly transition of the Business from the Sellers to the Purchaser, including for reference purposes.
.During the period from the date of this Agreement through to the Closing Date, if and to the extent requested by Purchaser, the Sellers will cooperate in good faith to (a) ensure that the Purchaser can cause its applicable Affiliates, on and from Closing, to approve of the resignations of directors and officers (or equivalent) of each of the Acquired Companies required to be delivered under Section 2.10(a)(vi) so that such resignations will take effect from Closing; and (b) identify any existing instructions given by any Acquired Company to any bank or financial institution and ensure that the Purchaser can cause the revocation of any such instructions on and from Closing (with replacement instructions in such form as the Purchaser may direct).
Section 5.22
Certain Closing Actions
. The obligation of the Purchaser to consummate the transactions contemplated by this Agreement is subject to the satisfaction, on or before the Closing Date, of each of the following conditions (any of which may be waived by the Purchaser, in whole or in part):
Section 6.1
Conditions to the Obligation of the Purchaser
(a) . The representations and warranties of the Sellers in Article 3 must be true and correct as of the Closing Date (disregarding any statement in a representation that contains a standard of materiality) as if made at and as of such time (except to the extent any such representation or warranty speaks as of the date of this Agreement or any other specific date, in which case such representation or warranty must have been true and correct as of such date), except in each case where the failure of such representations and warranties to be so true and correct would not, individually or in the aggregate, constitute a Material Adverse Effect;
Accuracy of Representations and Warranties
(b) . All of the covenants and obligations that the Sellers (or any Selling Affiliate) are required to perform or comply with under this Agreement on or before the Closing Date must have been duly performed and complied with in all material respects;
Performance of Covenants
(c) . All applicable waiting periods (and any extensions thereof) under the Antitrust Laws must have expired or otherwise terminated and all Governmental Authorizations required under the Antitrust Laws, pursuant to the filings to be made under Section 5.3 of the Seller Disclosure Schedule, must have been obtained;
Antitrust Laws
(d) . All information and/or consultation requirements of the relevant employee representation bodies within the Selling Affiliates or the Acquired Companies, as imposed as a condition to lawfully close the transactions contemplated by this Agreement by law or applicable collective agreement in the applicable jurisdictions, will have been conducted and related agreements or opinions obtained from such employee representation bodies in a manner allowing the transactions contemplated by this Agreement to lawfully close;
Works Council
 
(e) . There must not be in effect any Law or Judgment that would prohibit or make illegal the consummation of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement or cause the transactions contemplated by this Agreement to be rescinded following consummation; and
No Action
(f) . The Sellers must have delivered or caused to be delivered each document that Section 2.10(a) requires it to deliver.
Transaction Documents
. The obligation of the Sellers to consummate the transactions contemplated by this Agreement is subject to the satisfaction, on or before the Closing Date, of each of the following conditions (any of which may be waived by the Sellers, in whole or in part):
Section 6.2
Conditions to the Obligation of the Sellers
(a) . The representations and warranties of the Purchaser in Article 4 must be true and correct in all respects as of the Closing Date (disregarding any statement in a representation that contains a standard of materiality) as if made at and as of such time (except to the extent any such representation or warranty speaks as of the date of this Agreement or any other specific date, in which case such representation or warranty must have been true and correct in all material respects as of such date), except in each case where the failure of such representations and warranties to be so true and correct would not, individually or in the aggregate, constitute a material adverse effect on the assets, condition (financial or otherwise), business, employees or results of operations of the Purchaser's business, taken as a whole, or the ability of the Purchaser and its Affiliates to consummate timely the transactions contemplated by this Agreement and the Ancillary Agreements in accordance with the respective terms of such agreements and applicable Law;
Accuracy of Representations and Warranties
(b) . All of the covenants and obligations that the Purchaser (or any Designated Affiliate) is required to perform or comply with under this Agreement on or before the Closing Date (other than the covenants and obligations set forth in Section 5.3) must have been duly performed and complied with in all material respects, and all of the covenants and obligations that the Purchaser (or any Designated Affiliate) is required to perform or comply with under Section 5.3 must have been duly performed and complied with in all respects;
Performance of Covenants
(c) . All applicable waiting periods (and any extensions thereof) under the Antitrust Laws must have expired or otherwise terminated and all Governmental Authorizations required under the Antitrust Laws, pursuant to the filings to be made under Section 5.3 of the Seller Disclosure Schedule, must have been obtained;
Antitrust Laws
(d) . All information and/or consultation requirements of the relevant employee representation bodies within the Selling Affiliates or the Acquired Companies, as imposed as a condition to lawfully close the transactions contemplated by this Agreement by law or applicable collective agreement in the various jurisdictions, will have been conducted and related agreements or opinions obtained from such employee representation bodies in a manner allowing the transactions contemplated by this Agreement to lawfully close;
Works Council
(e) . There must not be in effect any Law or Judgment that would prohibit or make illegal the consummation of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement or cause the transactions contemplated by this Agreement to be rescinded following consummation; and
No Action
(f) . The Purchaser must have delivered or caused to be delivered to the Sellers each of the items that Section 2.10(b) requires it to deliver.
Transaction Documents
 
. This Agreement may, by written notice given before or at the Closing, be terminated:
Section 7.1
Termination Events
(a) by mutual written consent of the Purchaser and the Sellers;
(b) by the Purchaser (so long as the Purchaser is not then in material breach of any of its representations, warranties or covenants contained in this Agreement) if there has been a breach of any of the Sellers' representations, warranties or covenants contained in this Agreement, which would result in the failure of a condition set forth in Section 6.1(a) or Section 6.1(b), and which breach has not been cured within 30 days after written notice of the breach has been delivered to the Sellers from the Purchaser;
(c) by the Sellers (so long as the Sellers are not then in material breach of any of its representations, warranties or covenants contained in this Agreement) if there has been a breach of any of the Purchaser's representations, warranties or covenants contained in this Agreement, which would result in the failure of a condition set forth in Section 6.2(a) or Section 6.2(b), and which breach has not been cured within 30 days after written notice of the breach has been delivered to the Purchaser from the Sellers;
(d) by either the Purchaser or the Sellers if any Governmental Authority has issued a nonappealable final Judgment or taken any other nonappealable final action, in each case having the effect of permanently restraining, enjoining or otherwise prohibiting the transactions contemplated by this Agreement; , , that the right to terminate this Agreement under this Section 7.1(d) will not be available to any party whose failure to fulfill any covenant under this Agreement, including the obligations of the Purchaser under Section 5.3, has been the cause of or resulted in the action or event described in this Section 7.1(d) occurring; or
provided
however
(e) by either the Sellers or the Purchaser if the Closing has not occurred (other than through the failure of such Party to comply fully with its obligations under this Agreement) on or before August 31, 2012.
. If this Agreement is terminated pursuant to Section 7.1, this Agreement and all rights and obligations of the parties under this Agreement automatically end without Liability against any party or its Affiliates, except that (a) Section 5.5(a) (), Section 5.6 (), Section 7.3 (), Article 11 () (except for Section 11.13 ()) and this Section 7.2 will remain in full force and survive any termination of this Agreement and (b) if this Agreement is terminated by a party because of the knowing and intentional breach of this Agreement by the other party or because one or more of the conditions to the terminating party's obligations under this Agreement is not satisfied as a result of the other party's knowing and intentional failure to comply with its obligations under this Agreement, the terminating party's right to pursue all legal remedies will survive such termination unimpaired.
Section 7.2
Effect of Termination
Confidentiality
Public Announcements
Certain Effects of Termination
General Provisions
Specific Performance
. If the Purchaser or the Sellers terminate this Agreement pursuant to Section 7.1, the Purchaser will comply with the Confidentiality Agreement regarding the return and/or destruction of any information furnished to the Purchaser in connection with this Agreement.
Section 7.3
Certain Effects of Termination
 
. If the Closing occurs, and subject to the limitations expressly set forth in this Article 8, the Sellers will, jointly and severally, indemnify and hold harmless the Purchaser and Designated Affiliates and their directors, officers, employees, agents, successors and permitted assigns (collectively, the "") from and against any and all Losses of the Purchaser Indemnified Parties (regardless of whether or not the Losses relate to any Third Party Claim) arising or resulting from or relating to (a) any breach or inaccuracy of any representation or warranty of the Sellers set forth in this Agreement or in any certificate delivered by or on behalf of the Sellers or any Selling Affiliate, (b) any breach of any covenant or agreement of the Sellers (or any Selling Affiliate or any of their respective Affiliates) set forth in this Agreement, (c) any Excluded Liability or Retained Liability (other than Losses with respect to Excluded Taxes, for which the provisions of Section 9.1(a) will govern), (d) all Liabilities for the Proceedings disclosed in Sections 3.14(f) and 3.18 of the Seller Disclosure Schedule, and (e) all Liabilities arising prior to the Closing Date related to the tax and employment status of two Employees disclosed in Section 3.14(d) of the Seller Disclosure Schedule. For the avoidance of doubt, the Sellers' indemnification obligations with respect to Losses arising from Excluded Taxes will be governed by the provisions of Article 9.
Section 8.1
Indemnification by the Seller
Purchaser Indemnified Parties
. If the Closing occurs, and subject to the limitations expressly set forth in this Article 8, the Purchaser will indemnify and hold harmless the Sellers and their Affiliates and their respective directors, officers, employees, agents, successors and permitted assigns (collectively, the "") from and against any and all Losses of the Seller Indemnified Parties (regardless of whether or not the Losses relate to any Third Party Claim) arising or resulting from or relating to (a) any breach or inaccuracy of any representation or warranty of the Purchaser set forth in this Agreement or in any certificate delivered by or on behalf of the Purchaser, (b) any breach of any covenant or agreement of the Purchaser (or any Designated Affiliate) set forth in this Agreement and (c) any Assumed Liability (other than Losses with respect to Taxes for which the Purchaser is liable, for which the provisions of Section 9.1(b) will govern). For the avoidance of doubt, the Purchaser's indemnification obligations with respect to Losses arising from Taxes for which the Purchaser is liable will be governed by the provisions of Article 9.
Section 8.2
Indemnification by the Purchaser
Seller Indemnified Parties
.
Section 8.3
Claim Procedure; Resolution of Claim Notice
(a) Before the end of the applicable Claim Period (as defined in Section 8.4(c)), a party that seeks indemnity under this Article 8 or any other indemnification provision of this Agreement (an "") will give written notice (a "") to the party from whom indemnification is sought (an ""), whether the Losses sought arise from matters solely between the parties or from Third Party Claims described in Section 8.3(b). The Claim Notice must contain (i) a description and, if known, the estimated amount of any Losses incurred, paid, reserved or accrued or reasonably expected to be incurred, paid, reserved or accrued by the Indemnified Party, (ii) a reasonable explanation of the basis for the Claim Notice to the extent of the facts then known by the Indemnified Party and (iii) a demand for payment of those Losses.
Indemnified Party
Claim Notice
Indemnifying Party
(b) If the Indemnified Party seeks indemnification under this Article 8, or unless the context and applicable terms otherwise require, under any other indemnification provision of this Agreement, in response to a claim or Proceeding by another Person not a party to this Agreement (a ""), then the Indemnified Party will give a Claim Notice to the Indemnifying Party as soon as reasonably practicable after the Indemnified Party has received notice or otherwise learns of the assertion of such Third Party Claim and in any case on or before the last day of the applicable Claim Period and will include in the Claim Notice (i) the facts constituting the basis for such Third Party Claim and the
Third Party Claim
 
amount of the damages claimed by the other Person, in each case to the extent known to the Indemnified Party, accompanied by reasonable supporting documentation submitted by such third party (to the extent then in the possession of the Indemnified Party), and (ii) the assertion of the claim or the notice of the commencement of any Proceeding relating to such Third Party Claim; , , that no delay or deficiency on the part of the Indemnified Party in so notifying the Indemnifying Party will relieve the Indemnifying Party of any Liability under this Agreement except to the extent (and only to such extent) such delay or deficiency within the control of the Indemnified Party materially prejudices or otherwise adversely affects the rights of the Indemnifying Party with respect thereto.
provided
however
(c) In the event of a Third Party Claim, the Indemnifying Party will be entitled, at its option and expense, to participate in the defense thereof and, if it so chooses, to assume control of the defense thereof by giving to the Indemnified Party written notice of its intention to assume control of the defense of such Third Party Claim through counsel reasonably satisfactory to the Indemnified Party and agreeing in writing that, if such Third Party Claim is adversely determined, the Indemnifying Party has an obligation to provide indemnification to the Indemnified Party in respect thereof in accordance with the terms of this Agreement; , , that the Indemnified Party may participate in the defense of such Third Party Claim with its own counsel at its own expense; , , that the Indemnified Party shall be entitled to participate in any such defense with separate counsel at the reasonable expense of the Indemnifying Party if (A) so requested by the Indemnifying Party to participate or (B) in the reasonable opinion of counsel to the Indemnified Party, an actual conflict of interest exists between the Indemnified Party and the Indemnifying Party that would make it inappropriate in the reasonable judgment of such outside counsel for the same counsel to represent both the Indemnified Party and the Indemnifying Party. In such circumstances, the Indemnifying Party shall not, in connection with any such Third Party Claim, be liable for the fees and expenses of more than one separate counsel at any time for the Indemnified Party, except to the extent that local or regulatory counsel, in addition to its regular counsel, is required in order to effectively defend against such Third Party Claim.
provided
however
provided
further
however
(d) Notwithstanding the foregoing, the Indemnifying Party will not be entitled to assume the defense of any Third Party Claim where (i) the relief sought against the Indemnified Party is other than monetary damages or if the claim seeks an injunction or other equitable relief against the Purchaser, the Acquired Companies or any of their Affiliates, (ii) the Third Party Claim is one which, upon petition by the Indemnified Party, the appropriate court or arbitrator rules that the Indemnifying Party failed or is failing to vigorously prosecute or defend, or (iii) the claim includes allegations of criminal conduct against either the Indemnified Party or any of its directors, officers, employees or agents. If the Indemnifying Party does not assume control of the defense of such Third Party Claim pursuant to this Section 8.3, the Indemnified Party will have the right to conduct and control, through counsel of its choosing reasonably satisfactory to the Indemnifying Party, the defense, compromise or settlement of any Third Party Claim; , , that the Indemnifying Party may participate in the defense of such Third Party Claim with its own counsel at its own expense.
provided
however
(e) The Indemnifying Party will not agree to any settlement of, or consent to the entry of any Judgment (other than a Judgment of dismissal on the merits without costs) arising from, any such Third Party Claim without the prior written consent of the Indemnified Party; , , that the consent of the Indemnified Party will not be required if (i) the Indemnifying Party agrees in writing to pay any amounts payable pursuant to such settlement or any Judgment, (ii) such settlement or Judgment includes a full, complete and unconditional release of the Indemnified Party from any Liability in connection therewith by the claimant of such Third Party Claim and the Indemnifying Party, and (iii) with respect to the nonmonetary provisions of such settlement or Judgment (if any), such provisions would not, in the Indemnified Party's reasonable judgment, have or be reasonably expected to have a material adverse effect on the business, assets, properties, condition (financial or otherwise) or results of operations of the Indemnified Party. The Indemnified Party will not agree to any settlement of, or the entry of any Judgment (other than a Judgment of dismissal on the merits without costs) arising from, any such Third Party Claim without the prior written consent of the Indemnifying Party.
provided
however
 
(f) In any event, the Indemnifying Party and the Indemnified Party will fully cooperate with each other in connection with the defense or prosecution of any Third Party Claim, including (i) the retention, and the provision to the party in control of the defense or prosecution, of records and information that are reasonably relevant to such Third Party Claim, and (ii) the making available of employees, on a mutually convenient basis, for providing additional information and explanation of any material provided hereunder.
.
Section 8.4
Survival
(a) All representations and warranties contained in this Agreement will survive the Closing until 11:59 p.m. Pacific Time on the date that is the twelve-month anniversary of the Closing Date. Any covenants or agreements contained in this Agreement which have any remaining obligation to be performed or observed following the occurrence of the Closing (each, a "") will survive and continue in full force and effect until fully performed or observed in accordance with their terms.
Post-Closing Covenant
(b) Notwithstanding Section 8.4(a) above, and in each case regardless of any investigation or disclosure made by or on behalf of any of the parties to this Agreement (i) the representations and warranties contained in Sections 3.1 (), 3.2 (), 3.4 (), 3.23 (), 4.1 (), 4.2 (), and 4.6 () (collectively, the "") will survive the Closing indefinitely, and (ii) the representations and warranties contained in Sections 3.12 (), 3.13 () and 3.15 () will survive until thirty (30) days after the expiration of the applicable statute of limitations for the applicable underlying claim, including any extensions or waivers thereof.
Organization and Good Standing
Authority and Enforceability
Capitalization and Ownership
Brokers Fees
Organization and Good Standing
Authority and Enforceability
Brokers Fees
Fundamental Representations
Tax Matters
Employee Benefit Matters
Environmental, Health and Safety Matters
(c) All claims for indemnification under this Agreement must be asserted pursuant to a Claim Notice given prior to the expiration of the applicable survival period set forth in this Section 8.4 (such applicable survival period referred to herein as the ""); , , that any representation, warranty or covenant that is the subject of a claim for indemnification which is asserted pursuant to a Claim Notice given after the Closing Date and within the applicable Claim Period specified in this Section 8.4 will survive until, but only for purposes of, the resolution of such claim.
Claim Period
provided
however
.
Section 8.5
Limitations on Liability
(a) . Notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained in this Agreement:
Caps and Deductible
(i) no indemnification payments will be made by or on behalf of the Indemnifying Party under this Agreement until the aggregate amount of Losses for which the Indemnifying Party would (but for this clause (i)) be liable thereunder exceeds $580,000 (five hundred eighty thousand dollars) (such amount being, the ""), and then only to the extent of such excess over the Threshold; and
Threshold
(ii) the aggregate total amount in respect of which the Indemnifying Party will be liable to indemnify and hold harmless the Indemnified Party pursuant to this Agreement will not exceed, on a cumulative basis, $5,800,000 (five million eight hundred thousand dollars) (the ""). The parties hereby acknowledge that the Aggregate Cap will be a single amount applicable to all claims subject to this Section 8.5 and that any indemnification payments made will reduce the remaining amounts for all such matters under the Aggregate Cap.
Aggregate Cap
 
(b) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary set forth in Section 8.5(a) above, (A) clauses (i) and (ii) of Section 8.5(a) will not apply to any Liability for any Losses with respect to breaches of the Fundamental Representations, the representations and warranties contained in Sections 3.12 () and Sections 3.15 (; and (B) clauses (i) and (ii) of Section 8.5(a) will not apply (1) in connection with fraud or intentional misconduct or (2) as a result of or relating to Sections 8.1(b), 8.1(c), 8.1(d), 8.1(e), 8.2(b), 8.2(c), 9.1(a) and 9.1(b). Notwithstanding the foregoing, the aggregate total amount in respect of which the Sellers will be liable to indemnify and hold harmless the Purchaser Indemnified Parties with respect to Article 9, the Fundamental Representations, the representations and warranties contained in Sections 3.12 () and Sections 3.15 ( will not exceed, on a cumulative basis, the Cash Purchase Price (the ""); that the parties hereby acknowledge that the Special Cap will be a single amount applicable to all claims with respect to Article 9, the Fundamental Representations, the representations and warranties contained in Sections 3.12 () and Sections 3.15 (and that any indemnification payments made will reduce the remaining amounts for all such matters under the Special Cap.
Tax Matters
Environmental, Health and Safety Matters)
Tax Matters
Environmental, Health and Safety Matters),
Special Cap
provided further
Tax Matters
Environmental, Health and Safety Matters)
(c) . The amount of any and all Losses for which indemnification is provided pursuant to this Article 8 or Article 9 will be net of any amounts of any insurance proceeds, indemnification payments, contribution payments or reimbursements receivable by, or payable in kind to, the Indemnified Party with respect to such Losses or any of the circumstances giving rise thereto. In connection therewith, if, at any time following payment in full by the Indemnifying Party of any amounts of Losses due under this Agreement, the Indemnified Party receives any insurance proceeds, indemnification payments, contribution payments or reimbursements relating to the circumstances giving rise to such Losses, the Indemnified Party will promptly remit to the Indemnifying Party such proceeds, payments or reimbursements in an amount not to exceed the amount of the corresponding indemnification payment made by the Indemnifying Party. The Purchaser will use (and will cause its Affiliates to use) commercially reasonable efforts to collect the proceeds of any available insurance which would have the effect of reducing any Losses (in which case the net proceeds thereof will reduce such Losses).
Insurance Proceeds and Other Payments
(d) . If the Purchaser or any Purchaser Indemnified Party is indemnified for any Losses pursuant to this Agreement with respect to any claim by a Person not party to this Agreement, then the Sellers will be subrogated to all rights and remedies of the Purchaser or the Purchaser Indemnified Party against such third party, and the Purchaser will, and will cause each of the Purchaser Indemnified Parties to, cooperate with and assist the Sellers in asserting all such rights and remedies against such third party; , , that the Sellers shall not be entitled to any such rights of subrogation if, in the reasonable opinion of counsel to the Purchaser Indemnified Party, an actual conflict of interest exists between the Purchaser Indemnified Party and the Indemnifying Party with regard to such subrogation.
Subrogation
provided
however
(e) . In no event will the Sellers or the Purchaser be obligated to indemnify any Purchaser Indemnified Party or Seller Indemnified Party with respect to any matter to the extent that such matter was reflected in the calculation of the adjustment to the Purchase Price, if any, pursuant to Section 2.7.
Adjustments to Purchase Price
.
Section 8.6
Arbitration
(a) All disputes under this Article 8 and with respect the interpretation of any provision in Article 9 shall be settled by arbitration in San Diego, California before a panel of three arbitrators pursuant to the rules of the American Arbitration Association. Arbitration may be commenced at any
 
time by any party giving written notice to each other party to a dispute that such dispute has been referred to arbitration under this Section 8.6. The panel of arbitrators shall be selected as follows: one arbitrator shall be selected by the Sellers and one arbitrator shall be selected by the Purchaser within 20 days following any referral to arbitration, and the third arbitrator shall be selected by agreement of the first two arbitrators. Any award rendered by the arbitrators shall be conclusive and binding upon the parties; , , that any such award shall be accompanied by a written opinion of the arbitrators giving the reasons for the award. The proceedings shall be confidential. This provision for arbitration shall be specifically enforceable by the parties and the decision of the arbitrators in accordance herewith shall be final and binding and there shall be no right of appeal therefrom. Each party shall pay its own expenses of arbitration and the expenses of the arbitrators shall be shared 50% by the Sellers and 50% by the Purchaser; , , that if in the opinion of the arbitrators any claim for indemnification or any defense or objection thereto was unreasonable, the arbitrators may assess, as part of their award, all or any part of the arbitration expenses of the other party (including reasonable attorneys' fees) and of the arbitrators against the party raising such unreasonable claim, defense or objection. To the extent that arbitration may not be legally permitted hereunder and the parties to any dispute hereunder may not at the time of such dispute mutually agree to submit such dispute to arbitration, any party may commence a civil action in a court of appropriate jurisdiction to solve disputes hereunder in accordance with Section 11.14. Nothing contained in this Section 8.6 shall prevent the parties from settling any dispute by mutual agreement at any time.
provided
however
provided
however
. Except in connection with fraud or intentional misconduct, from and after the Closing, the sole and exclusive remedy of the Purchaser for any matter under this Agreement will be pursuant to the indemnification obligations set forth in Article 8 and Article 9 and, except to the extent a party has asserted a claim for indemnification by giving a Claim Notice in accordance with Section 8.3 prior to the expiration of the applicable Claim Period set forth in Section 8.4, such party will have no remedy against the other party for any breach of any provision of this Agreement.
Section 8.7
Exclusive Remedy
.
Section 9.1
Liability and Indemnification for Taxes
(a) If the Closing occurs, and subject to the limitations expressly set forth in Section 8.5 and Section 8.6, the Sellers will indemnify the Purchaser Indemnified Parties from and against (i) all Excluded Taxes, (ii) any Taxes arising out of the Reorganization described in Section 5.11, (iii) all Transfer Taxes that are the responsibility of the Sellers or the Asset Selling Affiliates pursuant to Section 9.1(f), (iv) all Taxes arising out of or due to any breach of any covenant of the Sellers set forth in this Agreement, and (v) any Taxes imposed on or with respect to an Acquired Company as a result of such Acquired Company's having been a member in an affiliated, consolidated, combined, unitary, group relief, or VAT group during a Pre-Closing Period or transferee or successor to any Person with respect to any Taxes for Pre-Closing Periods.
(b) If the Closing occurs, and subject to the limitations expressly set forth in Section 8.5 and Section 8.6, the Purchaser will indemnify the Seller Indemnified Parties from and against (i) all Taxes of the Acquired Companies and with respect to the Purchased Assets that are allocable to the Post-Closing Period under Section 9.1(d), (ii) all Transfer Taxes and VAT for which the Purchaser is responsible pursuant to Sections 9.1(f) and 9.8 hereof, (iii) all Taxes arising out of or due to any breach of any covenant of the Purchaser set forth in this Agreement, (iv) subject to Section 9.1(f), Taxes resulting from any action taken by the Purchaser or its Affiliates outside the ordinary course of business on the Closing Date after the Closing with respect to the Acquired Companies or the Purchased Assets, and (v) with respect to any Straddle Period of CareFusion U.K. 240 Limited or CareFusion Manufacturing Ireland 241
 
Limited, all Taxes arising from any income required to be recognized under Section 951(a)(1) of the Code by Sellers (or any Affiliated Group of which the Sellers are a member) resulting from any act or transaction taken or caused to be taken by the Purchaser or its Affiliates on or after the Closing Date; , , that if the Purchaser, an Acquired Company, or one of their respective Affiliates makes an election under Section 338(g) of the Code with respect to the acquisition of CareFusion U.K. 240 Limited or CareFusion Manufacturing Ireland 241 Limited, Purchaser shall not have liability under this Section 9.1(b)(v) for any Taxes arising from income required to be recognized under Section 951(a)(1) of the Code with respect to such Acquired Company as a result of such election.
provided
however
(c) Notwithstanding the indemnification provisions in this Article 9 and Article 8, the Sellers will not be liable for indemnification of the Purchaser Indemnified Parties against (i) any Taxes arising or increased as a result of any increase in rates of tax, any change in law or practice, or any change in accountancy practice occurring after the Closing, (ii) any Taxes arising or increased as a consequence of any failure by any Purchaser Indemnified Party or Acquired Company (from Closing) to comply with any of their obligations under this Agreement, (iii) any Taxes arising or increased by (x) a failure or omission on the part of any of the Purchaser Indemnified Parties or Acquired Companies after the Closing to make any election or claim any relief which was taken into account or assumed in the Adjustment Calculation and is set forth on Schedule 9.1(c) hereto, or (y) a voluntary disclaimer by any of the Purchaser Indemnified Parties or Acquired Companies after the Closing of the whole or part of any relief to which it is entitled or revocation of any claim for relief made (whether provisionally or otherwise) prior to the Closing, and (iv) any Taxes in respect of which a Relief or Tax Attribute is for no consideration made available by the Sellers or any Selling Affiliate to an Acquired Company to set against, reduce or eliminate the Tax liability.
(d) With respect to any Straddle Period, Taxes will be allocated between the Pre-Closing Period and the Post-Closing Period on the basis of an interim closing of the books, except that Taxes imposed on a periodic basis (such as real or personal property Taxes for assets held at the Closing) will be allocated on a daily basis. Notwithstanding the foregoing, Section 9.1(f) (and not this Section 9.1(d)) applies to Transfer Taxes or VAT as a result of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement.
(e) For purposes of computing taxable income for the Pre-Closing Periods under this Agreement, the Sellers are entitled to any and all Tax benefits related to (i) the vesting of any equity compensation of the Employees or Transferred Employees at or prior to Closing, (ii) the exercise of any CareFusion Corporation stock options by any Employees or Transferred Employees at or prior to Closing and (iii) the payment to any Employee or Transferred Employee of any severance, bonus or similar amounts at or prior to Closing. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this Agreement, the Sellers will not be required to indemnify the Purchaser Indemnified Parties for any Losses resulting from reductions in the amount of any Tax Attributes or in Tax basis in assets existing at the Closing. For the avoidance of doubt, Sellers and Purchaser agree that Tax deductions with respect to the exercise of any CareFusion Corporation stock options by any Employees or Transferred Employees, even if such options are exercised in a Post-Closing Period, shall be deducted by the Sellers or CareFusion Corporation on their Tax Returns.
(f) Any Transfer Taxes and any VAT (except for any VAT for which Purchaser is required to indemnify Seller under Section 9.8(c)) that are, or become due and payable as a result of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement, whether such Taxes are imposed by Law on the Sellers, any Selling Affiliate, the Purchased Assets, the Purchaser or any Designated Affiliate (other than VAT, which is addressed in Section 9.8 hereof), will be borne equally by the Sellers (on the one hand) and the Purchaser (on the other). The parties will cooperate with each other in the provision of any information or preparation of any documentation that may be necessary or useful for obtaining any available mitigation, reduction or exemption from any such Transfer Taxes.
 
.
Section 9.2
Tax Return Filing; Audit Responsibilities
(a) The Sellers will timely prepare and file or will cause to be timely prepared and filed (taking into account all extensions properly obtained) (i) any combined, consolidated, unitary or similar Tax Returns that include the Acquired Companies and the Sellers or any of their Affiliates, and (ii) any Tax Returns that are required to be filed by or with respect to the Acquired Companies and the Purchased Assets which are due for Pre-Closing Periods (other than Straddle Periods). In each case, the Sellers shall pay the Taxes due in respect of such return. The Purchaser shall reimburse the Sellers to the extent any amounts due with the return constitute Taxes for which Purchaser is required to indemnify Seller under this Agreement. Sellers will prepare all such Tax Returns in a manner consistent with past practice, unless otherwise required by a change in applicable law. With respect to Tax Returns described in clause (ii) above, the Sellers will deliver to the Purchaser for review and comment a copy of Tax Returns covered by clause (ii) at least 30 Days prior to the due date (giving effect to any validly obtained extensions thereof). The Purchaser will not (and will not cause the Acquired Companies to) amend or revoke such Tax Returns at any time without the Sellers' written consent (which consent shall not be unreasonably withheld, conditioned or delayed).
(b) The Purchaser will timely prepare and file or will cause to be timely prepared and filed all Tax Returns with respect to the Acquired Companies and the Purchased Assets other than Tax Returns described in Section 9.2(a). For any Tax Return of the Acquired Companies or the Purchased Assets that relates to a Pre-Closing Period and that is the responsibility of the Purchaser under this Section 9.2(b) (including any Tax Returns relating to Straddle Periods), (i) the Purchaser will, and will cause its Affiliates to, prepare such Tax Return in a manner consistent with past practice unless otherwise required by Applicable Law, and (ii) the Purchaser will deliver to the Sellers for their review, comment and approval (such approval not to be unreasonably withheld, conditioned or delayed) a copy of such Tax Return (accompanied, in the case of any Tax Return for a Straddle Period, by an allocation between the Pre-Closing Period and the Post-Closing Period of the Taxes shown to be due on such Tax Return) at least 30 days prior to the due date (giving effect to any validly obtained extensions thereof). The Purchaser will reflect in good faith any comments received from the Sellers within 15 days following the Sellers' receipt of such Tax Return. The Purchaser will not amend or revoke any Tax Return for a Straddle Period (or any notification or election relating thereto) without the Sellers' prior written consent (which consent will not be unreasonably withheld, conditioned or delayed). In each case, the Purchaser shall pay the Taxes due in respect of such return. The Sellers shall reimburse the Purchaser to the extent any amounts are due with the return for any Pre-Closing Periods. The Purchaser will reimburse the Sellers for any overpayment of Taxes with respect to a Pre-Closing Period, including by reason of the payment of any estimated Taxes by the Sellers or their Affiliates or as a result of any accrual of taxes payable in the Final Closing Net Working Capital (as finally determined pursuant to Section 2.7).
(c) In the event that the Sellers or the Purchaser are liable under this Agreement for any Taxes paid by the other party with respect to any Tax Return, reimbursement by the Sellers or the Purchaser, as applicable, will be made no later than 30 days following the date such Taxes are or were due.
(d) The Sellers will control (i) except as otherwise provided in Section 9.2(e) with respect to Straddle Periods, any Tax Contest of the Acquired Companies or with respect to the Purchased Assets for Pre-Closing Periods, and (ii) any Tax Contest for any taxable period of the Sellers or any of their Affiliates during which any combined, consolidated or unitary Tax Return includes the Acquired Companies and the Sellers or any of their Affiliates; , , that Sellers shall (iii) keep Purchaser reasonably informed with respect to any such Tax Contest that relates to any of the Acquired Companies or Purchased Assets and (iv) not settle any such Tax Contest in a manner that would adversely affect any of the Acquired Companies or Purchased Assets in a Post-Closing Period without the prior written consent of Purchaser, which consent shall not be unreasonably withheld, conditioned or delayed.
provided
however
 
(e) In the case of a Tax Contest for a Straddle Period of the Acquired Companies, the Purchaser will have the right to control such Tax Contest; , , that (i) the Purchaser will keep the Sellers reasonably informed with respect to any such Tax Contest, (ii) the Purchaser will consult with the Sellers before taking any significant action in connection with such Tax Contest, (iii) the Purchaser will defend such Tax Contest diligently and in good faith as if it were the only party in interest in connection with such Tax Contest, (iv) the Sellers will be entitled to participate in such Tax Contest, at their own expense, and (v) the Purchaser will not settle, compromise or abandon any such Tax Contest without obtaining the Sellers' prior written consent, which consent will not be unreasonably withheld, conditioned or delayed, if such settlement, compromise or abandonment would have an adverse impact on the Sellers or any of their Affiliates.
provided
however
(f) Except to the extent such refunds are reflected in the Final Closing Net Working Capital (as finally determined pursuant to Section 2.7), the Sellers will be entitled to any refunds of, and the benefit of any prepayment or credits of or against, any Taxes for which Sellers are required to indemnify the Purchaser under this Agreement. The Purchaser will be entitled to any refunds of, and the benefit of any prepayments or credits of or against, any Taxes for which the Purchaser is required to indemnify the Sellers under this Agreement.
(g) The Purchaser will cause the Acquired Companies to elect, where permitted by applicable Law, to forego carry back to any Pre-Closing Period of any item of loss, deduction or credit which arises in a Post-Closing Period and is not used in such period. If the Sellers or any of their Affiliates receives (or realizes) a refund or credit of Taxes as a result of any Tax Attribute arising in a Post-Closing period that is carried back as permitted by the previous sentence, the Sellers shall remit to Purchaser, within 30 days, the amount of such refund; , that, if a Taxing Authority subsequently reduces or disallows such Tax refund, the Purchaser shall, within 30 days of the reduction or disallowance, return the amount equal to such reduction or disallowance that was previously remitted to Purchaser.
providedhowever
,
(h) To the extent not inconsistent with the provisions of this Section 9.2, the procedures of Article 8 will apply in the case of any indemnification claim for Taxes.
. Within ten (10) days after an Indemnified Party becomes aware of the commencement of a Tax Contest that may give rise to an indemnification obligation for which an Indemnifying Party is or may reasonably be responsible pursuant to this Article 9, the Indemnified Party will notify the Indemnifying Party of such Tax Contest, and thereafter will promptly forward or make available to the Indemnifying Party copies of notices and communications relating to such Tax Contest. The failure of an indemnified Party to notify an Indemnifying Party of the commencement of any such Tax Contest within such ten (10) day period or promptly forward any further notices or communications will not relieve the Indemnifying Party of any obligation which it may have to the Indemnified Party under this Agreement except to the extent that the Indemnifying Party is actually prejudiced by such failure.
Section 9.3
Notification of Tax Proceedings
. Each of the Sellers and the Purchaser agree that it will, and will cause its respective Affiliates to:
Section 9.4
Cooperation
(a) timely sign and deliver such certificates and forms as may be necessary or appropriate to establish an exemption from (or otherwise reduce), or file Tax Returns or other reports with respect to Taxes described in Section 9.1(f) (relating to sales, transfer and similar taxes);
 
(b) cooperate fully in preparing for and defending any Tax Contests regarding any Tax Returns for the Acquired Companies or related to the Purchased Assets, including providing powers of attorney where necessary or appropriate and preparing for and participating in any competent authority proceedings;
(c) provide assistance to the other party as reasonably requested in preparing and filing Tax Returns, responding to Tax Contests and recovering any VAT;
(d) make available to the other party as reasonably requested all Tax information, records and documents relating solely to the Acquired Companies and the Purchased Assets; and
(e) retain any books and records that could reasonably be expected to be necessary or useful in connection with any preparation by any other party of any Tax Return, financial statements or for any Tax Contest or other examination or Proceeding relating to Taxes. Such books and records will be retained for at least as long as the end of the applicable statute of limitations.
. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this Agreement, the parties acknowledge and agree that any Tax information, records and documents that may be provided by the Sellers to the Purchaser in connection with the transfer of the Shares pursuant to this Agreement will relate solely to the Acquired Companies.
Section 9.5
Tax Records
.
Section 9.6
Code Section 338 Elections
(a) The parties hereto shall, with respect to the purchase of shares of CareFusion 209, Inc. (i) join in making (A) an election under section 338(h)(10) of the Code, (B) any election required to be made under state or local law by a taxpayer that has made an election under section 338(h)(10) of the Code and (C) all elections corresponding to section 338(h)(10) of the Code under state or local law that are permissive under state or local law (the ""), (ii) provide to the other party (A) the necessary information to permit the Section 338(h)(10) Election to be made and (B) the opportunity to review and approve (such approval not to be unreasonably withheld or delayed) any filings made pursuant to or in furtherance of the Section 338(h)(10) Election prior to the making of such filing and (iii) take all actions necessary and appropriate (including filing any necessary forms, returns, elections, schedules and other documents) as may be required to timely effect and preserve (and refrain from taking any actions that interfere with or prevent) the Section 338(h)(10) Election in accordance with the provisions of section 338(h)(10) of the Code and Treasury Regulation Section 1.338(h)(10)-1 (or any comparable provisions of state or local Tax law). The Purchaser represents and warrants to the Sellers that it is an entity taxable as corporation for U.S. federal income tax purposes, and, as such, the Purchaser is eligible to make an election under section 338(h)(10) of the Code with respect to CareFusion 209, Inc. in connection with the transactions contemplated by this Agreement.
Section 338(h)(10) Election
(b) Without limitation on any other provision hereof not fewer than ten (10) Business Days prior to the Closing Date, Purchaser shall provide to the Sellers a fully completed and executed IRS Form 8023, dated as of the Closing Date, in respect of the Section 338(h)(10) Election in form and substance satisfactory to the Sellers. The Sellers, after reviewing such Form 8023 pursuant to Section 9.6(a)(ii)(B) above, shall execute and deliver to Purchaser at Closing such Form 8023 and shall promptly file such form with the IRS and provide Purchaser with proof of mailing.
.
Section 9.7
Other Tax Matters
(a) From the Closing, this Agreement will supersede any and all Tax sharing or similar agreements to which (i) the Acquired Companies and (ii) the Sellers or any of their Affiliates (excluding the Acquired Companies) are parties. Neither the Acquired Companies nor the Sellers (and/or such Affiliates) will have any obligation or right with respect to each other under any such prior agreement after the Closing.
 
(b) The parties hereto will treat any indemnification payments made under this Agreement as an adjustment to the Purchase Price.
.
Section 9.8
VAT
(a) The amount of any payment for a supply of goods or services or the value of any supply made or deemed to have been made pursuant to this Agreement with respect to the transfer of the Purchased Assets and the Acquired Companies will be exclusive of any VAT properly chargeable on the supply, and half of the amount of the VAT will be borne by the Purchaser or the relevant Designated Affiliate in addition to any payment due under this Agreement at the time the supply is made. In the event that any VAT is imposed upon or imposed against the Sellers or any Selling Affiliate, the Sellers or the Selling Affiliate will promptly notify the Purchaser or relevant Designated Affiliate of the VAT amount on a valid VAT invoice. Upon receipt thereof, the Purchaser or Designated Affiliate will promptly remit to the Sellers or the Selling Affiliate half of the VAT amount specified in such VAT invoice, in addition to the payment for the transfer of the Purchased Assets and the Acquired Companies, and the Sellers or relevant Selling Affiliate will make, or will cause to be made, any payments to the applicable Governmental Authorities as required under applicable Law.
(b) The parties will use all reasonable efforts to procure that the sale of the Purchased Assets and, (if applicable) the assumption of the Assumed Liabilities, is treated as a TOGC by each relevant Governmental Authority for each jurisdiction in which the Purchased Assets are located for VAT purposes.
(c) The Purchaser hereby represents and warrants to the Sellers that:
(i) prior to Closing each entity (whether the Purchaser or a Designated Affiliate) acquiring Purchased Assets, or (if relevant) assuming the Assumed Liabilities, the supply of which, but for the availability of TOGC treatment, would for VAT purposes be treated as made in any jurisdiction (the "") will be registered for VAT in such Relevant Jurisdiction and on or before Closing the Purchaser will provide the relevant Selling Affiliate with the VAT registration number of the Purchaser or its applicable Affiliate with respect to such Relevant Jurisdiction or other evidence of such valid VAT registration for such Relevant Jurisdiction, and shall as soon as is practical after Closing provide the relevant Selling Affiliate with a copy of a certificate of VAT registration for each such Purchaser or Designated Affiliate in a Relevant Jurisdiction, valid as at the date of Closing;
Relevant Jurisdiction
(ii) each entity (whether the Purchaser or a Designated Affiliate) acquiring Purchased Assets intends to carry on the same kind of business in relation to those Purchased Assets with effect from the Closing as that carried on by relevant Selling Affiliate(s) of such Purchased Assets prior to Closing, and does not intend to liquidate such business; and
(iii) the Purchased Assets and Assumed Liabilities of each Selling Affiliate will be acquired by a single entity, whether that be the Purchaser or a Designated Affiliate.
(d) The Purchaser agrees to indemnify and hold harmless the Sellers and each Selling Affiliate against any Liability for VAT, fines, surcharges, interest or penalties arising to the Sellers or a Selling Affiliate as a result of the failure of the transfer of the Purchased Assets to qualify, in whole or in part, as a TOGC, but only to the extent that such failure arises solely as a consequence of the Purchaser breaching the covenants in Section 9.8(b) or the representations and warranties set out in Section 9.8(c).
 
(e) In the event that: (i) an amount of VAT is payable under the terms of this Agreement and the consideration as stated on the relevant VAT invoice in respect of such amount of VAT differs from the actual consideration for the relevant supply for VAT purposes (which will include where the Purchase Price is adjusted in accordance with Section 2.7 (), where the allocation of consideration to any Purchased Assets or Assumed Liabilities is amended or where no VAT invoice was actually issued), or (ii) where a Governmental Authority determines in writing that a supply by the Sellers or a Selling Affiliate in respect of which the Purchaser or a Designated Affiliate has paid VAT should properly be characterized as a TOGC, the parties agree to co-operate in good faith to correct the respective invoices/VAT returns.
Closing Adjustment
.
Section 9.
9
Deductions and Withholdings
(a) Any payments made by or due from the Purchaser or a Designated Affiliate pursuant to the terms of this Agreement will be free and clear of all deductions or withholdings of or on account of Tax whatsoever, save only for any deductions or withholdings required by applicable Law.
(b) In the event that any deductions or withholdings are required by applicable Law, the Purchaser will or will cause any relevant Designated Affiliate to promptly furnish the Sellers or relevant Selling Affiliate with such evidence as may be required by the applicable Governmental Authorities to establish that any such Tax has been paid, and will indemnify and hold harmless the Sellers and the Selling Affiliate on an after-Tax basis from any Liability for penalties or interest arising to the Sellers or the Selling Affiliates due to the Purchaser's or Designated Purchaser's failure to timely withhold and remit amounts in respect of Taxes to the applicable Governmental Authority.
(c) Each of the Sellers and the Purchaser will use commercially reasonable efforts to cooperate to minimise the amounts that the Purchaser or Designated Affiliates, as the case may be, are required to deduct and withhold pursuant to this Agreement. In connection therewith, the Sellers and the Purchaser will cooperate to the extent necessary to obtain any exemption from or reduction in deduction or withholding Tax. The Purchaser agrees to notify the Sellers or any Asset Selling Affiliate promptly prior to Closing of any potential withholding tax obligation of which it becomes aware and shall consult with the Sellers or the Asset Selling Affiliate in good faith as to the nature of such withholding tax and the basis upon which such withholding is required.
. Pursuant to Section 5.11, on or prior to the Closing Date, the Seller shall cause each Retained Employee to be transferred from an Acquired Company to an Affiliate of the Seller (other than another Acquired Company). If any Retained Employee continues to be employed, or alleges to be employed, by the Acquired Company or any Purchaser Affiliate or Designated Affiliate after the Closing Date the Purchaser will notify the Sellers immediately on becoming aware of that fact and will provide the Seller with all reasonable assistance and access to those Retained Employees to make an offer of employment and will encourage the relevant Retained Employees to accept that offer.
Section 10.1
Retained Employees
. The Sellers will take commercially reasonable steps to ensure that all Employees not employed in an Acquired Company at Closing either transfer to the Purchaser or relevant Designated Affiliate at Closing in accordance with applicable law or accept the offer of employment made by the Purchaser or relevant Designated Affiliate pursuant to this Article 10. If any such Employee does not transfer to the Purchaser, Designated Affiliate or Acquired Company on Closing, the Sellers will notify the Purchaser immediately on becoming aware of that fact and will provide the Purchaser or relevant Designated Affiliate with all reasonable assistance and access to those Employees to make an offer of employment and will encourage the relevant Employees to accept that offer.
Section 10.2
Transfer of Employees
 
. The Purchaser will, or will cause its Designated Affiliates and the Acquired Companies from Closing to, either (a) continue to employ the Employees employed by an Acquired Company; (b) accept the transfer of such Employees whose employment transfers to the Purchaser or a Designated Affiliate by operation of Law; or (c) prior to the Closing Date (and in any event no later than 10 days prior to the Closing Date) make an offer of employment to all other Employees to commence on the Closing Date. In each case such continued employment or such offer of employment, as applicable, will comply with any applicable Laws and in any event will be on terms and conditions, including basic salary, variable pay, equity compensation, employee benefits, other benefits in kind, severance, position and responsibility that are, in the aggregate, substantially equivalent to or better than (except with respect to severance, which must be equivalent to or better than) the terms and conditions provided to such Employee by the Selling Affiliates or the Acquired Companies immediately prior to the Closing Date, , that such terms and conditions of employment will be subject to the variances set forth on Schedule 10.3 hereto as such schedule may be amended or updated from time to time by the Purchaser (it being understood that such amendments or updates are to be in connection with renewals of existing U.S. health and medical benefit plans or subscriptions to such new benefit plans in the ordinary course of the Purchaser's business) (which, in turn, will be subject in all cases to applicable Law); , , that no such variances will apply to the Employees listed in Section 10.3 of the Seller Disclosure Schedule with respect to the minimum weekly hours required for benefit eligibility. Each Employee who is employed by the Purchaser, its Affiliates (including the Acquired Companies) or other Designated Affiliates from the Closing Date as a result of offers of employment made pursuant to this Section 10.3 will be referred to in this Agreement as a "."
Section 10.3
Transfer of Employment
provided
provided
further
Transferred Employee
. In relation to those Employees to which the WARN Act or any equivalent U.S. state or local law applies, the Purchaser will not, and will cause its Affiliates (including the Acquired Companies from Closing) and other Designated Affiliates to not, at any time prior to 180 days after the Closing Date effectuate a "mass layoff" as that term is defined in the Worker Adjustment and Retraining Notification Act of 1988, as amended (the ""), collective dismissal, reduction-in-force, plant closing, permanent or temporary shutdown, relocation or comparable conduct under any equivalent state or local Law, affecting in whole or in part any facility, site of employment, operating unit or Transferred Employee without complying fully with the requirements of the WARN Act or such equivalent U.S. state or local Law.
Section 10.4
WARN
WARN Act
 
.
Section 10.5
Indemnities
(a) With effect from the Closing Date the Purchaser agrees to be responsible for, indemnify and hold harmless, or procure that the appropriate Affiliate or other Designated Affiliate of the Purchaser will be responsible for, indemnify and hold harmless the Selling Affiliates for all Liabilities and Losses which arise with respect to or in connection with the Transferred Employees which arise or accrue at any time (including prior to the Closing Date), including (i) all Liabilities and Losses relating to a failure to comply with any obligation to inform or consult with the Transferred Employees or their representatives in respect of the transfer of their employment to the Purchaser or its Designated Affiliates, (ii) all Liabilities for accrued but unused paid time off of Transferred Employees determined as of Closing (either by honoring such time off or payment to such Transferred Employee therefore), and (iii) any other legal obligations in connection with the transfer of employment of the Transferred Employees); , the Sellers will be responsible for and will indemnify and hold harmless the Purchaser and its Affiliates or other Designated Affiliate against any Liability or Loss which arises with respect to or in connection with a failure by any Selling Affiliate to comply with any obligation to inform or consult with the Transferred Employees or their representatives in respect of the transfer of their employment to the Purchaser or its Designated Affiliate, or any other legal obligations in connection with the transfer of employment of the Transferred Employees, except to the extent such breach is due to the fault of the Purchaser or its Affiliates or other Designated Affiliates.
provided, that
(b) The Sellers agree to be responsible for, indemnify and hold harmless, or procure that the appropriate Seller Affiliate will be responsible for, indemnify and hold harmless the Purchaser and its Affiliates and other Designated Affiliates from any Liabilities and Losses which arise from or are connected with the dismissal of those employees identified on Section 10.5(b) of the Seller Disclosure Schedule, including all or any severance payments made to such employee as a result of or in connection with such dismissal of such employees at the end of the transition service with Sellers pursuant to the Transition Services Agreement, along with any repayment of any the grant provided for under the IDA Agreement directly attributable to the dismissal of such employees.
.
Section 10.6
Termination of Employment
(a) A Selling Affiliate may terminate the employment of any Employee who does not become a Transferred Employee on the Closing Date as a result of a failure by the Purchaser or its Affiliates or other Designated Affiliates to comply with Section 10.3. The Purchaser or any Affiliate of the Purchaser may terminate the employment of any Retained Employee or any other employee of the Seller or a Seller Affiliate who is not an Employee if such person remains or becomes employed by the Purchaser or any Affiliate of the Purchaser on the Closing Date, such dismissal takes effect as soon as reasonably practicable following the Closing Date. The Sellers agree to be responsible for, indemnify and hold harmless, or procure that the appropriate Seller Affiliate will be responsible for, indemnify and hold harmless the Purchaser and its Affiliates and other Designated Affiliates from any Liabilities and Losses which arise from or are connected with (i) such dismissal permitted pursuant to the previous sentence of this Section 10.6(a) (including the cost of employment from the Closing Date up to the termination date and all or any severance payments, compensation, damages or penalties (whether awarded by a court or reasonably agreed by the Selling Affiliate or Purchaser Affiliate) made to such employee as a result of or in connection with such dismissal); and (ii) a failure by the Sellers or their Affiliate to comply with Section 10.2.
provided
(b) The Purchaser agrees to be responsible for, indemnify and hold harmless, or procure that the appropriate Affiliate or other Designated Affiliate of the Purchaser will be responsible for, indemnify and hold harmless the Sellers and the Selling Affiliates from any Liabilities and Losses which arise from or are connected with (i) a failure by the Purchaser or its Affiliates or other Designated Affiliates to
 
comply with Section 10.1 or 10.4, or (ii) dismissals permitted pursuant to the first sentence of Section 10.6(a) above (including the cost of employment from the Closing Date up to the termination date (provided such dismissal takes effect as soon as reasonably practicable following the Closing Date) and all or any severance payments, compensation, damages or penalties (whether awarded by a court or agreed by the Selling Affiliate) made to such Employee as a result of or in connection with such dismissal).
. Notwithstanding the generality of Section 10.3, the Purchaser and its Affiliates will, and the Purchaser will cause the other Designated Affiliates to, take into account all service of the Transferred Employees earned while employed by the Sellers or any of their Affiliates prior to the Closing Date and will treat such service as service with the Purchaser, its Affiliates or other Designated Affiliates for all relevant purposes including for the purposes of determining such Transferred Employees' eligibility for the accrual of holidays, sick days, vacation, calculating severance payment, and other applicable rights and benefits (except to the extent it would result in a duplication of benefits). Further, the Purchaser, its Affiliates and other Designated Affiliates will take into account all service of the Transferred Employees with the Sellers or any of their Affiliates prior to the Closing Date for purposes of participation, vesting and benefit accrual under the employee benefit plans, funds or programs of the Purchaser, its Affiliates and other Designated Affiliates if permitted under the terms of such benefits plans, fund or programs. Any group health plan of the Purchaser or any of its Affiliates or other Designated Affiliates in which a Transferred Employee or the dependents thereof participates will recognize for purposes of calculating any deductible, co-pay or out of pocket maximum thereunder the covered expenses that such Transferred Employee and such Transferred Employee's dependents incurred in the group health plan of the same type with the Sellers (or any of their Affiliates) before the Closing Date, to the extent (with respect to Transferred Employees in the U.S. only) reasonably practicable (or legally required) in coordination with the Purchaser's group health plan providers. For these purposes, "covered expenses" are those that counted towards the deductible, co-pay or maximum out of pocket expenses in the group health plan of the Sellers (or any of their Affiliates or other Designated Affiliates) that is a substantially equivalent type of, or a replacement for the, group health plan that the Transferred Employee and such Transferred Employee's dependents are participating in with the Purchaser, its Affiliates or other Designated Affiliates and that were incurred in a plan year of the Sellers' (or their Affiliates') relevant group health plan that ends with or within the plan year of the Purchaser's (or its Affiliate's or other Designated Affiliate's) relevant group health plan that ends after the Closing Date. Notwithstanding anything in this Agreement to the contrary, any service credited by the Sellers or any of their Affiliates with respect to any Transferred Employee for any period or periods of time prior to the Transferred Employee's commencement of employment with the Sellers or any of their Affiliates (including a period of employment with any entity acquired by the Sellers or any of their Affiliates) will be counted as service of the Transferred Employee with the Sellers or any of their Affiliates prior to the Closing Date and will be taken into account by the Purchaser, its Affiliates and other Designated Affiliates for purposes of this Section 10.7, provided the commencement date of such period for each applicable Transferred Employee is set forth on Section 3.14(a) of the Seller Disclosure Schedule and to the extent (with respect to Transferred Employees in the U.S. only) reasonably practicable (or legally required) in coordination with the Purchaser's group health plan providers.
Section 10.7
Service Credit and Group Health Plans
. With effect from the Closing Date, the Purchaser and each of its Affiliates will, and the Purchaser will cause the other Designated Affiliates to, assume responsibility for all of the Assumed Benefit Plans, and in order to comply with the obligations under this Agreement will:
Section 10.8
Assumed Benefit Plans
(a) continue the Assumed Benefit Plans;
 
(b) establish new employee benefit or fringe benefit plans, funds or programs replacing and replicating the Assumed Benefit Plans to cover the Transferred Employees (and, to the extent appropriate, their dependents and other beneficiaries);
(c) cover and provide substantially equivalent benefits in the aggregate for the Transferred Employees (and, to the extent applicable under the current Assumed Benefit Plans, their dependents and other beneficiaries) under its existing employee benefit or fringe benefit plans, funds or programs; or
(d) any combination of clauses (a), (b) and (c) above,
in each case as the Purchaser, its Affiliates and other Designated Affiliates determine in their sole discretion after consultation with the Sellers and their Affiliates in furtherance of the Purchaser's and its Affiliates' and other Designated Affiliates' obligations under this Article 10 or as may be required by applicable Law.
. Where required by local Law or otherwise agreed to by the Sellers or the appropriate Selling Affiliate, and the Purchaser or one of its Affiliates, as the case may be, a Selling Affiliate will take reasonable steps to transfer or cause to be transferred to the appropriate employee benefit plan, fund or program of the Purchaser, or the appropriate Affiliate or other Designated Affiliate of the Purchaser (excluding stock to be provided under a stock option plan) assets of the corresponding Seller Plan attributable to the Transferred Employees as of the Closing Date; that the affected Transferred Employees and any other third party, if any, consent to such transfer to the extent required by applicable Law. To the extent possible under applicable law and with respect to the Transferred Employees only:
Section 10.9
Transfer of Benefit Plan Assets
provided
(a) the Sellers or the appropriate Selling Affiliate will also take reasonable steps to transfer or cause to be transferred to the Purchaser, or the appropriate Affiliate or other Designated Affiliate of the Purchaser, the assets, if any, of each Assumed Benefit Plan, held by or subject to the direction or control of the Sellers or any Selling Affiliate; or
(b) where any Assumed Benefit Plan is administered by a third party provider, the Sellers or the appropriate Selling Affiliate and the Purchaser or the appropriate Affiliate of the Purchaser will, or will cause the other Designated Affiliate to, make reasonable efforts to ensure that any such third party provider(s) as appointed by the Sellers or the appropriate Selling Affiliate will transfer the assets to the Purchaser or appropriate Affiliate or other Designated Affiliate of the Purchaser or to any third party provider(s) appointed by the Purchaser or appropriate Affiliate or other Designated Affiliate of the Purchaser for this purpose.
Any obligation of the Seller or the appropriate Selling Affiliate to transfer any assets to the Purchaser or the appropriate Affiliate or other Designated Affiliate of the Purchaser shall only arise to the extent that such assets do not transfer automatically to the Purchaser or one of the Purchaser's Affiliates or other Designated Affiliates. Any transfer under this Section 10.9 will be made as soon as reasonably practical following the Closing Date. Upon such transfer, the Sellers' or the appropriate Selling Affiliates' Liabilities related to such Assumed Benefit Plan will be deemed an Assumed Liability for all purposes under this Agreement. With effect from the Closing Date and regardless of whether a transfer of assets referred to in Section 10.9 has taken or will take place, the Purchaser agrees to be responsible for, indemnify and hold harmless or procure that the appropriate Affiliate or other Designated Affiliate of the Purchaser will be responsible for, indemnify and hold harmless the Sellers and the appropriate Selling Affiliates for all claims, Liabilities and Losses which arise with respect to or in connection with any Assumed Benefit Plan, including any underfunding of the Assumed Benefit Plan, to the extent that these claims, Liabilities and/or Losses relate to the service of the Transferred Employees prior to and/or as of the Closing Date. This indemnity does not cover any regular pension contributions to the relevant Assumed
 
Benefit Plan or the third party provider(s) of such plan in relation to the service of the Transferred Employees prior to the Closing Date and will not limit or qualify in any manner the representations and warranties of the Sellers hereunder.
. Nothing contained in this Agreement, expressed or implied, is intended to confer upon any Employee any benefits under any employee benefit plan, fund or program including severance benefits or the right to employment or continued employment with the Purchaser or any Affiliate or other Designated Affiliate of the Purchaser for any period by reason of this Agreement. In addition, the provisions of this Article 10 are for the sole benefit of the parties hereto and their respective Affiliates and are not for the benefit of any third parties.
Section 10.10
No Third-Party Beneficiaries
. The Sellers and, on reasonable request by the Sellers, the Purchaser, will (or will cause the applicable Selling Affiliate and Designated Affiliate to) notify the Employees or their representatives (including any relevant works council or trade union) of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement and will thereafter enter into and properly conduct consultations with the Employees and/or their representatives, all as required by Law and/or any applicable collective bargaining agreements.
Section 10.11
Negotiations with Employees
. Certain Employees have been granted the right to receive payments under cash bonus plans operated by the Sellers (the ""). Each such Bonus will be paid by the Sellers, the relevant Selling Affiliate or the relevant Affiliate of any of the foregoing on or before Closing for all portions of such Bonus which have accrued as at Closing. To the extent that an Employee continues to accrue rights to receive a Bonus after Closing, such Bonus shall be paid by the Purchaser. Responsibility for paying any Tax due in respect of such Bonuses shall be the responsibility of the paying company (being the Purchaser, the relevant Acquired Company, the Seller, the relevant Selling Affiliate or the relevant Affiliate of any of the foregoing, as the case may be).
Section 10.12
Payments under Certain Seller Plans to Employees
Bonuses
. All notices and other communications under this Agreement must be in writing and are deemed duly delivered when (a) delivered if delivered personally or by internationally recognized overnight courier service (costs prepaid), (b) sent by facsimile with confirmation of transmission by the transmitting equipment (or, the first Business Day following such transmission if the date of transmission is not a Business Day) or (c) received or rejected by the addressee, if sent by certified or registered mail, return receipt requested; in each case to the following addresses or facsimile numbers and marked to the attention of the individual (by name or title) designated below (or to such other address, facsimile number or individual as a party may designate by notice to the other party):
Section 11.1
Notices
 
 
. This Agreement may not be amended, supplemented or otherwise modified except in a written document signed by each party to be bound by the amendment and that identifies itself as an amendment to this Agreement.
Section 11.2
Amendment
. The parties may (a) extend the time for performance of any of the obligations or other acts of the other party to this Agreement, (b) waive any inaccuracies in the representations and warranties of the other party to this Agreement contained in this Agreement or (c) waive compliance with any of the covenants or conditions for the benefit of such party contained in this Agreement. Any such extension or waiver by a party to this Agreement (i) will be valid only if set forth in a written document signed on behalf of the party against whom the extension or waiver is to be effective; (ii) will not apply to any time for performance, inaccuracy in any representation or warranty, or noncompliance with any covenant or condition, as the case may be, other than that which is specified in the written extension or waiver. No failure or delay by a party in exercising any right or remedy under this Agreement or any of the documents delivered pursuant to this Agreement, and no course of dealing between the parties, operates as a waiver of such right or remedy, and no single or partial exercise of any such right or remedy precludes any other or further exercise of such right or remedy or the exercise of any other right or remedy. Except as provided in Section 8.6, any enumeration of a party's rights and remedies in this Agreement is not intended to be exclusive, and a party's rights and remedies are intended to be cumulative to the extent permitted by law and include any rights and remedies authorized in law or in equity.
Section 11.3
Waiver and Remedies
. This Agreement (including the Exhibits hereto, the Disclosure Schedules, the Ancillary Agreements and the documents and instruments referred to in this Agreement that are to be delivered at the Closing) constitutes the entire agreement between the parties and supersedes any prior understandings, agreements or representations by or between the parties, or either of them, written or oral, with respect to the subject matter of this Agreement. Notwithstanding the foregoing, the Confidentiality Agreement will remain in effect in accordance with its terms subject to Section 5.5.
Section 11.4
Entire Agreement
 
. This Agreement binds and benefits the parties and their respective successors and assigns, except that (a) the Purchaser may not assign any rights under this Agreement, whether by operation of law or otherwise, without the prior written consent of the Sellers, except that the Purchaser may at any time assign its rights under this Agreement to Designated Affiliates, and (b) the Sellers may not assign any rights under this Agreement, whether by operation of law or otherwise, without the prior written consent of the Purchaser. No party may delegate any performance of its obligations under this Agreement, except that the Purchaser may at any time delegate the performance of its obligations (other than the obligation to pay the Purchase Price) to a Designated Affiliate so long as the Purchaser remains fully responsible for the performance of the delegated obligation. Nothing expressed or referred to in this Agreement will be construed to give any Person, other than the parties to this Agreement, any legal or equitable right, remedy or claim under or with respect to this Agreement or any provision of this Agreement except such rights as may inure to a successor or permitted assignee under this Section 11.5; , , that after the Closing, (i) the Affiliate Indemnified Parties will be third party beneficiaries of, and entitled to enforce, Section 5.8 (), and (ii) the Purchaser Indemnified Parties and the Seller Indemnified Parties will be third party beneficiaries of, and entitled to enforce, Articles 8 and 9.
Section 11.5
Assignment, Successors and No Third Party Rights
provided
however
Indemnification
. If any provision of this Agreement is held invalid, illegal or unenforceable, the remaining provisions of this Agreement remain in full force and effect, if the essential terms and conditions of this Agreement for each party remain valid, binding and enforceable.
Section 11.6
S
everability
. The Exhibits and Disclosure Schedules to this Agreement are incorporated herein by reference and made a part of this Agreement. The Seller Disclosure Schedule and the Purchaser Disclosure Schedule are arranged in sections and paragraphs corresponding to the numbered and lettered sections and paragraphs of Article 3 and Article 4, respectively. The disclosure of any matter in the Seller Disclosure Schedule or the Purchaser Disclosure Schedule (each, a "") will expressly not be deemed to constitute an admission by any party or its Affiliates, or to otherwise imply that any such matter is material for the purposes of this Agreement. Disclosure of any matter, fact, or circumstance in any Disclosure Schedule to this Agreement will be deemed to be disclosure thereof for purposes of any other Disclosure Schedule to the extent the relevance of such disclosure is reasonably apparent to such other Disclosure Schedule.
Section 11.7
Exhibits and Schedules
Disclosure Schedule
. In the negotiation of this Agreement, each party has received advice from its own legal counsel. The language used in this Agreement is the language chosen by the parties to express their mutual intent, and no provision of this Agreement will be interpreted for or against either party because that party or its legal counsel drafted the provision.
Section 11.8
Interpretation
. Except as set forth in this Agreement, each party will pay its own direct and indirect expenses incurred by it in connection with the preparation and negotiation of this Agreement and the consummation of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement, including all fees and expenses of its advisors and representatives.
Section 11.9
Expenses
. Unless otherwise specifically provided in this Agreement, references in this Agreement to any monetary sum expressed in one currency will, where such sum is referable to or is to be compared to a sum in any other currency, be deemed to be a reference to an equivalent amount in such other currency converted at the rate quoted by The Wall Street Journal as at the close of business in New York, USA on the relevant date.
Section 11.10
Currency and Exchange Rates
 
. Unless any Exhibit or Disclosure Schedule specifies a different choice of law, the internal laws of the State of Delaware (without giving effect to any choice or conflict of law provision or rule (whether of the State of Delaware or any other jurisdiction) that would cause the application of laws of any other jurisdiction) govern all matters arising out of or relating to this Agreement and its Exhibits and Disclosure Schedules and the transactions contemplated by this Agreement, including its validity, interpretation, construction, performance and enforcement and any disputes or controversies arising therefrom or related thereto.
Section 11.11
Governing Law
.
Section 11.12
Limitation on Liability
N A , A A , .
OTWITHSTANDING
ANY
OTHER
PROVISION
OF
THIS
GREEMENT
TO
THE
CONTRARY
IN
NO
EVENT
WILL
ANY
PARTY
OR
ANY
OF
ITS
FFILIATES
BE
LIABLE
FOR
ANY
PUNITIVE
DAMAGES
IN
CONNECTION
WITH
ANY
LOSSES
ARISING
OUT
OF
THE
CONDUCT
OF
SUCH
PARTY
PURSUANT
TO
THIS
AGREEMENT
OR
ANY
NCILLARY
AGREEMENT
REGARDLESS
OF
WHETHER
THE
NONPERFORMING
PARTY
WAS
ADVISED
OF
THE
POSSIBILITY
OF
SUCH
DAMAGES
OR
NOT
EXCEPT
TO
THE
EXTENT
THAT
ANY
SUCH
DAMAGES
AND
LOSSES
ARE
INCURRED
OR
PAID
BY
THE
INDEMNIFIED
PARTY
IN
CONNECTION
WITH
A
FINALLY
RESOLVED
THIRD
PARTY
CLAIM
. The parties agree that irreparable damage would occur in the event that any of the provisions of this Agreement were not performed by a party in accordance with their specific terms or were otherwise breached by a party. The parties accordingly agree that in addition to any other remedy to which a party is entitled at law or in equity, each party is entitled to injunctive relief to prevent breaches of this Agreement by the other party and otherwise to enforce specifically the provisions of this Agreement against the other party. Each party expressly waives any requirement that the other party obtain any bond or provide any indemnity in connection with any action seeking injunctive relief or specific enforcement of the provisions of this Agreement.
Section 11.13
Specific Performance
. Except as set forth in Sections 2.7(e), 2.8 and 8.6, any action or proceeding arising out of or relating to this Agreement or the transactions contemplated by this Agreement must be brought in the courts of the State of Delaware, County of Wilmington, or, if it has or can acquire jurisdiction, in the United States District Court for the District of Delaware. Each of the parties knowingly, voluntarily and irrevocably submits to the exclusive jurisdiction of each such court in any such action or proceeding and waives any objection it may now or hereafter have to venue or to convenience of forum. Each party to this Agreement may make service on the other party by sending or delivering a copy of the process to the party to be served at the address and in the manner provided for the giving of notices in Section 11.1. Nothing in this Section 11.14, however, affects the right of a party to serve legal process in any other manner permitted by law.
Section 11.14
Jurisdiction and Service of Process
.
Section 11.15
Waiver of Jury Trial
E , , , , ( , ) A A A , , A.
ACH
OF
THE
PARTIES
KNOWINGLY
VOLUNTARILY
AND
IRREVOCABLY
WAIVES
TO
THE
FULLEST
EXTENT
PERMITTED
BY
LAW
ALL
RIGHT
TO
TRIAL
BY
JURY
IN
ANY
ACTION
PROCEEDING
OR
COUNTERCLAIM
WHETHER
BASED
ON
CONTRACT
TORT
OR
OTHERWISE
ARISING
OUT
OF
OR
RELATING
TO
THIS
GREEMENT
OR
THE
TRANSACTIONS
CONTEMPLATED
BY
THIS
GREEMENT
OR
THE
ACTIONS
OF
EITHER
PARTY
TO
THIS
GREEMENT
IN
NEGOTIATION
EXECUTION
AND
DELIVERY
PERFORMANCE
OR
ENFORCEMENT
OF
THIS
GREEMENT
. Nothing in this Agreement creates a joint venture or partnership between the parties. This Agreement does not authorize either party (a) to bind or commit, or to act as an agent, employee or legal representative of, the other party, except as may be specifically set forth in other provisions of this Agreement, or (b) to have the power to control the activities and operations of the other party. The parties are independent contractors with respect to each other under this Agreement. Each party agrees not to hold itself out as having any authority or relationship contrary to this Section 11.16.
Section 11.16
No Joint Venture
. The parties may execute this Agreement in multiple counterparts, each of which constitutes an original as against the party that signed it, and all of which together constitute
Section 11.17
Counterparts
 
one agreement. This Agreement is effective upon delivery of one executed counterpart from each party to the other party. The signatures of all parties need not appear on the same counterpart. The delivery of signed counterparts by facsimile or email transmission that includes a copy of the sending party's signature(s) is as effective as signing and delivering the counterpart in person.
 
The parties have executed and delivered this Agreement as of the date indicated in the first sentence of this Agreement.
 
 
 
See attached.

Exhibit 99.1
 
            3750 Torrey View Ct
            San Diego, CA 92130
            www.CareFusion.com
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
Contacts:
 
 (NYSE: CFN), a global medical technology company, and (NASDAQ: BABY), a leading provider of health care screening, diagnostic and treatment products, today announced that they have entered into an agreement to sell the CareFusion Nicolet business to Natus for a cash purchase price of approximately $58 million. Based in Madison, Wis., the Nicolet business employs more than 400 people worldwide and generated sales of approximately $95 million in 2011.
SAN DIEGO and SAN CARLOS, Calif., April 23, 2012
CareFusion
Natus Medical Incorporated
"The decision to divest the Nicolet business is in line with our strategy to simplify and focus our operations and prioritize our investments to profitably grow over the long term," said Kieran Gallahue, chairman and CEO of CareFusion. "We have a dedicated team in the Nicolet business that will have greater scale and access to broader market opportunities as part of Natus."
The Nicolet business develops clinically differentiated neurodiagnostic and monitoring products, including a portfolio of electroencephalography (EEG) and electromyography (EMG) systems and related accessories, as well as vascular and obstetric doppler sensors and connectivity products.
"The Nicolet acquisition will strengthen our existing neurology portfolio and provide us with new product categories," said Jim Hawkins, CEO of Natus. "Combining our strong product portfolio and support expertise with that of CareFusion's Nicolet business will allow us to bring additional value to our customers.
"Further, this acquisition will better position Natus in international markets, as over 50 percent of the CareFusion Nicolet business is in markets outside of the United States."
Since its spinoff from Cardinal Health in 2009, CareFusion has simplified its portfolio by divesting five non-strategic businesses and has completed four acquisitions to build scale, expand global reach and add adjacent technologies to existing businesses.
The acquisition is expected to close in July 2012, subject to customary closing conditions. The cash purchase price is subject to working capital adjustments. Natus plans to finance the acquisition with existing cash and borrowings under its revolving credit facility.
Natus Medical Conference Call
Natus has scheduled an investment-community conference call to discuss this announcement beginning at 9 a.m. Eastern Time (6 a.m. Pacific Time), today, April 23, 2012. Natus will issue a separate press release announcing the call and will post details of the call to its investor site at .
http://investor.natus.com
About CareFusion
CareFusion (NYSE: CFN) is a global corporation serving the health care industry with products and services that help hospitals measurably improve the safety and quality of care. The company develops market-leading technologies including Alaris infusion pumps, Pyxis automated dispensing and patient identification systems, AVEA, Air and LTV series ventilation and respiratory products, ChloraPrep skin prep products, MedMined services for data mining surveillance, Nicolet neurological monitoring and diagnostic products, V. Mueller surgical instruments, and an extensive line of products that support interventional medicine. CareFusion employs more than 14,000 people across its global operations. More information may be found at .
Life
www.carefusion.com
About Natus Medical
Natus is a leading provider of health care products used for the screening, detection, treatment, monitoring and tracking of common medical ailments in newborn care, hearing impairment, neurological dysfunction, epilepsy, sleep disorders, and balance and mobility disorders. Product offerings include computerized neurodiagnostic systems for audiology, neurology, polysomnography, and neonatology, as well as newborn care products such as hearing screening systems, phototherapy devices for the treatment of newborn jaundice, head-cooling products for the treatment of brain injury in newborns, incubators to control the newborn's environment, and software systems for managing and tracking disorders and diseases for public health laboratories.
Additional information about Natus Medical can be found at .
www.natus.com
Cautions concerning forward-looking statements
This news release and the information contained herein contains forward-looking statements addressing expectations, prospects, estimates and other matters that are dependent upon future events or developments. The matters discussed in these forward-looking statements are subject
to risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially from those projected, anticipated or implied. Forward-looking statements include, but are not limited to, statements about the expected timing of the anticipated sale, sale price and post sale plans and intentions. The forward-looking statements contained herein are based on current expectations and assumptions and not on historical facts. There are important factors that could cause actual results to differ materially from those set forth in the forward-looking statements including the satisfaction of conditions to closing the sale and adjustments to the sale price. Additional factors that may affect future results are described in CareFusion's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended June 30, 2011, Natus' Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2011, and other filings by each company with the U.S Securities and Exchange Commission. Except to the limited extent required by applicable law, CareFusion and Natus disclaim any obligation to update or revise any forward-looking statements, whether as a result of new information, future events or otherwise.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BABY/BABY-8K-20120426070424.txt.gz
TIME:20120426070424
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C.  20549
Form 8-K
Current Report
Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported):
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
April 26, 2012
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 - 
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 - 
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 - 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 - 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
ITEM 2.02.      Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On April 26, 2012, Natus Medical Incorporated (the Company) is issuing a press release and holding a conference call regarding its financial results for its first quarter ended March 31, 2012 and other financial information.  A copy of the press release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 to this Form 8-K.
The information in this Form 8-K and the exhibit attached hereto shall not be deemed filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the Exchange Act) or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that Section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
ITEM 9.01.     Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d) Exhibits.
SIGNATURES
          Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Exhibit Index

Exhibit 99.1
Natus Medical Announces 2012 First Quarter Financial Results
SAN CARLOS, Calif.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--April 26, 2012-- (Nasdaq:BABY) today announced financial results for the three months ended March 31, 2012.
Natus Medical Incorporated
For the first quarter ended March 31, 2012, the Company reported revenue of $59.5 million, compared to $59.1 million in the comparable quarter of the previous year. Net income was $358,000, or $0.01 per diluted share, compared with net income of $3.1 million, or $0.11 per diluted share in for the first quarter of 2011.
The Company reported non-GAAP earnings per share of $0.07 per diluted share for the first quarter 2012 compared to $0.13 per diluted share for the first quarter of 2011.
I am pleased with our first quarter results, as all of our divisions performed to expectations. The quarter was highlighted by a large incubator order that we fulfilled for the Ministry of Health of Iraq and the contribution of Embla, which we acquired in September 2011, said Jim Hawkins, Chief Executive Officer of the Company. As previously communicated, our first quarter presented a challenging comparison to our results last year, but we are satisfied that business activity continued to stabilize and we look for this trend to continue throughout 2012.
During the first quarter, we continued to take cost out of our business to scale it to the current hospital spending environment as we remain focused on our goal of driving profitability and operating margins back to historical levels, said Hawkins.
As planned, we successfully introduced our first incubator into the U.S. market during the first quarter of 2012. This represents an exciting new market opportunity for Natus in this large product category, added Hawkins.
As announced earlier in the week, we are very excited with the signing of an agreement to acquire the Nicolet neurology business from CareFusion, said Hawkins. We expect this acquisition, which is expected to close early in our third quarter, to be accretive to our non-GAAP earnings in the fourth quarter and throughout 2013.
As of March 31, 2012, the Company had cash, cash equivalents, and short-term investments of $37.8 million, stockholders' equity of approximately $260 million, and working capital of approximately $93 million.
Financial Guidance
The Company provided guidance for the second quarter 2012 and reiterated its guidance for the full year 2012.
For the second quarter 2012, the Company expects to report revenue of $60 million to $63 million and non-GAAP earnings per share of $0.09 to $0.12. For the full year 2012 the Company expects to report revenue of $256 million to $262 million and non-GAAP earnings per share of $0.57 to $0.62.
The Company's full year 2012 and quarterly non-GAAP earnings per share guidance exclude the following charges:
- Amortization expense associated with acquisition-related intangible assets, which the Company expects to be approximately $1.3 million and $5.2 million for the second quarter and full year, respectively, and which the Company expects will reduce GAAP earnings per share by approximately $0.02 and $0.11 for the respective periods.
- The incremental accelerated depreciation of previously capitalized software costs due to the Companys implementation of a world-wide enterprise resource planning platform in 2012, which the Company expects to be approximately $450,000 in second quarter and $900,000 for the full year, and which the Company expects will reduce GAAP earnings per share by approximately $0.01 in second quarter and $0.02 for the full year.
- Restructuring charges that the Company expects to incur in 2012 associated with acquisitions that were $655,000 for the first quarter 2012 and, for the remainder of 2012, the amount and timing of which have not yet been determined.
- The impact on gross profit of the fair value adjustment to inventory associated with Embla purchase accounting that will be $56,000 for the full year 2012.
The full year 2012 non-GAAP guidance also excludes the impact of the Nicolet acquisition and any other future acquisitions. The Company plans to update second half 2012 guidance for the effect of Nicolet after the acquisition closes, as has been its practice in the past.
The Companys non-GAAP guidance includes the impact of expensing employee share based compensation. All earnings per share amounts are on a diluted basis.
Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures
The Company's non-GAAP results for the first quarter 2012 exclude amortization expense associated with certain acquisition-related intangible assets, the accelerated write off of capitalized software, restructuring charges, and the impact of inventory fair value adjustments recorded through purchase accounting, as more fully detailed below.
The Company believes that the presentation of results excluding these charges provides meaningful supplemental information to both management and investors that is indicative of the Company's core operating results. Therefore, the Company believes these non-GAAP financial measures facilitate comparison of operating results across reporting periods. A reconciliation between the Company's results of operations on a GAAP and non-GAAP basis for the periods reported is included as part of the condensed consolidated statements of operations at the end of this release.
The Company believes that both management and investors benefit from referring to these non-GAAP financial measures in assessing the Company's performance and when planning, forecasting, and analyzing future periods. These non-GAAP financial measures also facilitate management's internal comparisons to the Company's historical performance. The non-GAAP financial measures disclosed by the Company should not be considered a substitute for or superior to financial measures calculated in accordance with GAAP, and the financial results calculated in accordance with GAAP and reconciliations to those financial statements should be carefully evaluated.
Conference Call
Natus has scheduled an investment-community conference call to discuss this announcement beginning at 11:00 a.m. Eastern Time (8:00 a.m. Pacific Time) today, April 26, 2012. Individuals interested in listening to the conference call may do so by dialing 888-268-4176 for domestic callers, or 1-617-597-5493 for international callers, and entering reservation code 32875965. A telephone replay will be available for 48 hours following the conclusion of the call by dialing 888-286-8010 for domestic callers, or 1-617-801-6888 for international callers, and entering reservation code 56980616.The conference call also will be available real-time via the Internet at , and a recording of the call will be available on the Companys Web site for 90 days following the completion of the call.
http://investor.natus.com
About Natus Medical Incorporated
Natus is a leading provider of healthcare products used for the screening, detection, treatment, monitoring and tracking of common medical ailments in newborn care, hearing impairment, neurological dysfunction, epilepsy, sleep disorders, and balance and mobility disorders. Product offerings include computerized neurodiagnostic systems for audiology, neurology, polysomnography, and neonatology, as well as newborn care products such as hearing screening systems, phototherapy devices for the treatment of newborn jaundice, head-cooling products for the treatment of brain injury in newborns, incubators to control the newborn's environment, and software systems for managing and tracking disorders and diseases for public health laboratories.
Additional information about Natus Medical can be found at .
www.natus.com
This press release contains forward-looking statements as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, particularly statements regarding the expectations, beliefs, plans, intentions and strategies of Natus. These forward-looking statements include statements regarding the benefit of cost cutting measures, the goal of driving profitability and operating margins back to historical levels, revenue and non-GAAP profitability in the second quarter and full year 2012, and the impact of amortization expense associated with acquisition-related intangible assets, and the potential for future restructuring charges. These statements relate to current estimates and assumptions of our management as of the date of this press release, and future events or Natus' future financial performance or results, and involve known and unknown risks, uncertainties and other factors that may cause actual results, levels of activity, performance, or achievements to differ materially from those expressed or implied by the forward-looking statements. Forward-looking statements are only predictions and the actual events or results may differ materially. Natus cannot provide any assurance that its future results or the results implied by the forward-looking statements will meet expectations. Our future results could differ materially due to a number of factors, including the effects of competition, the demand for our products and services, the impact of adverse global economic conditions on our target markets, our ability to expand our sales in international markets, our ability to maintain current sales levels in a mature domestic market, our ability to control costs, risks associated with bringing new products to market and integrating acquired businesses, and our ability to fulfill product orders on a timely basis. Natus disclaims any obligation to update information contained in any forward looking statement.
More information about potential risk factors that could affect the business and financial results of Natus is included in Natus' annual report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2011, and its quarterly reports on Form 10-Q, and in other reports filed from time to time by Natus with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission.
CONTACT: Natus Medical Incorporated Steven J. Murphy, 650-802-0400 Chief Financial Officer
InvestorRelations@Natus.com


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BABY/BABY-8K-20120612170759.txt.gz
TIME:20120612170759
EVENTS:	Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders
TEXT:
ITEM: Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On June 8, 2012, Natus Medical Incorporated (the "Company") held its annual meeting of stockholders. At this meeting, Doris E. Engibous and William M. Moore were both re-elected to serve on the Board of Directors for a three-year term until 2015. Additionally, shareholders ratified the appointment of Deloitte & Touche LLP as the Company's independent registered public accounting firm for the fiscal year ending December 31, 2012, provided advisory approval of the Company's executive compensation, and approved an amendment to the Company's Revised and Restated Certificate of Incorporation.
 
No other matters were considered or voted upon at the meeting.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BABY/BABY-8K-20120703092959.txt.gz
TIME:20120703092959
EVENTS:	Completion of Acquisition or Disposition of Assets	Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Completion of Acquisition or Disposition of Assets
ITEM: Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 2.01 Completion of Acquisition or Disposition of Assets.
On July 2, 2012, Natus Medical Incorporated (the "Company") completed the acquisition of the Nicolet neurodiagnostic business ("Nicolet") from CareFusion.
On April 20, 2012 the Company and CareFusion executed a Share and Asset Purchase Agreement (the "Agreement") that was filed with a Current report on Form 8-K dated April 20, 2012. On June 30, 2012 the Company and CareFusion executed an Amendment to the Share and Asset Purchase Agreement (taken together with the Agreement the "Amended Agreement"). Pursuant to the terms of the Amended Agreement, on July 2, 2012 the Company paid CareFusion the purchase consideration of approximately $57.9 million in cash. The purchase price is subject to further adjustment based on Closing Net Working Capital as provided in the Amended Agreement.
Based in Middleton, Wisconsin, Nicolet employs more than 400 people worldwide and generated sales of approximately $95 million in 2011.
The Nicolet business develops clinically differentiated neurodiagnostic and monitoring products, including a portfolio of electroencephalography (EEG) and electromyography (EMG) systems and related accessories, as well as vascular and obstetric doppler sensors and connectivity products. The acquisition strengthens the Company's leadership position in neurodiagnostic and monitoring products, and will allow the Company to bring additional value to its customers as well as adding to its customer base around the world.
On July 2, 2012, the Company issued a press release announcing the completion of the acquisition. A copy of the Amendment to the Share and Asset Purchase Agreement and press release are attached hereto as Exhibits 10.1 and 99.1, respectively.
Item 2.03 Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant.
On June 29, 2012 the Company and Wells Fargo Bank N.A. ("Wells Fargo") executed the Second Amendment to Third Amended and Restated Credit Agreement and Amendment to Limited Consent (the "Second Amendment"), and taken together with the Third Amended and Restated Credit Agreement, as amended, the "Credit Facility". The Credit Facility provides for a $50 million secured revolving credit facility.
The Credit Facility provides that the acquisition of the Nicolet business is a permitted investment.
Pursuant to the Credit Facility, on June 29, 2012 the Company borrowed $25 million under a term loan subfacility of the Credit Facility (the "Term Out Loan") and $6 million as revolving debt. The aggregate amount of borrowing under the Credit Facility remains limited to $50 Million including borrowings under the Term Out Loan.
Borrowings under the Credit Facility are secured by certain prescribed personal property
At the Company's option, outstanding borrowings on the Credit Facility will bear interest at either (i) a variable base rate, which is the higher of the federal funds rate plus one-half of one percent, or the rate announced from time to time by Wells Fargo as its prime rate, or (ii) a one-, two-, three- or six-month fixed rate, as selected by the Company, that is based on LIBOR plus an applicable interest margin that ranges from 150 basis points to 175 basis points depending upon the leverage ratio of the Company and its subsidiaries on a consolidated basis.
The Credit Facility matures on March 2, 2015, at which time all principal amounts outstanding under the Credit Facility will be due and payable. Principal payment for the Term Out Loan are due in twelve equal quarterly installments beginning on September 30, 2012. Borrowings on the Credit Facility including the Term Out Loan may be repaid at any time without premium or penalty.
The Credit Facility contains customary representations and warranties and affirmative and negative covenants, which include financial covenants; limitations on liens, additional indebtedness, further negative pledges, investments, payment of dividends, mergers, sale of assets and restricted payments; and other limitations. The financial covenants include metrics for minimum adjusted EBITDA and quick ratio on a consolidated basis.
The foregoing description of the Credit Facility does not purport to be complete and is qualified in its entirety by reference to the Third Amended and Restated Credit Agreement that was filed with a Current Report on Form 8K dated March 2, 2012 and the Second Amendment to Third Amended and Restated Credit Agreement and Amendment to Limited Consent attached hereto as Exhibit 10.2.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits
(a) Financial Statements of the Business Acquired.
The financial statements required by this Item, with respect to the acquisition described in Item 2.01 herein, will be filed as soon as practicable, and in any event not later than 71 days after the date on which this Current Report on Form 8-K was required to be filed pursuant to Item 2.01.
(b) Pro Forma Financial Information.
The financial statements required by this Item, with respect to the acquisition described in Item 2.01 herein, will be filed as soon as practicable, and in any event not later than 71 days after the date on which this Current Report on Form 8-K was required to be filed pursuant to Item 2.01.
(d) Exhibits.
The following exhibits are filed herewith:
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 10.1
This Amendment (this ""), dated June 30, 2012, to the Share and Asset Purchase Agreement, dated April 20, 2012 (the "") is made by and among CareFusion 303, Inc., a Delaware corporation (""), CareFusion 2200, Inc., a Delaware corporation ("", and together with CFN 303, the "") and Natus Medical Incorporated, a Delaware corporation (the "").
Amendment
Agreement
CFN 303
CFN 2200
Sellers
Purchaser
The Sellers and Purchaser wish to amend the Agreement (including certain Schedules and Exhibits thereto) as further set forth herein.
NOW, THEREFORE, intending to be legally bound and in consideration of the premises, and of the representations, warranties, covenants and agreements contained herein and in the Agreement, the parties agree as follows:
Section 1. .
Definitions; Spanish Customer Transfer Agreement
(a) Unless otherwise defined herein, capitalized terms defined in the Agreement shall have the same meaning when used in this Amendment.
(b) A new will be annexed to the Agreement, in the form of hereto, and Section 1.1 of the Agreement is hereby amended by adding the following defined term:
Exhibit D
Exhibit I
"" means the agreement between CareFusion Iberia 308, S.L. and Natus Europe GmbH which provides for the treatment of certain tenders relating to the Business in Spain from Closing, in the form attached hereto as .
Spanish Customer Transfer Agreement
Exhibit D
(c) The defined term "," in Section 1.1 of the Agreement, is hereby amended to include the Spanish Customer Transfer Agreement.
Ancillary Agreements
(d) Section 9.1(b) of the Agreement is hereby amended by (i) deleting the reference to "and" immediately preceding clause (v) therein and inserting a comma in lieu thereof, and adding a new clause (vi) to read as follows:
"(vi) any Taxes resulting from the transactions described in Articles 3 and 4 of the Spanish Customer Transfer Agreement."
Section 2. .
Designated Affiliates
(a) The Designated Affiliates, nominated by Purchaser, are as set forth on hereto.
Exhibit II
(b) Section 8.2 of the Agreement is hereby amended by (i) deleting the reference to "and" immediately preceding clause (c) therein and inserting a comma in lieu thereof, and (ii) adding, at the end of clause (c) thereof, a new clause (d) to read as follows:
", all increases in reasonable out-of-pocket costs in respect of Taxes (such as any Transfer Tax or VAT, including as a result of any resulting failure to be treated as a TOGC), to the Sellers or any Selling Affiliate arising as a result of any Designated Affiliate nominated by Purchaser not being formed or organized in the jurisdiction in which the applicable Purchased Assets or Transferred Employees are located immediately prior to Closing. For the avoidance of doubt, nothing in this Section 8.2 is intended to override or change Section 9.8 of the Agreement."
(c) Section 9.8(d) of the Agreement is hereby amended and restated in its entirety as follows:
"The Purchaser agrees to indemnify and hold harmless the Sellers and each Selling Affiliate against any Liability for VAT, fines, surcharges, interest or penalties arising to the Sellers or a Selling Affiliate as a result of the failure of the transfer of the Purchased Assets to qualify, in whole or in part, as a TOGC, but only to the extent that such failure arises solely as a consequence of (i) the Purchaser breaching the covenants in Section 9.8(b) or the representations and warranties set out in Section 9.8(c); (ii) Purchaser's decision to terminate any Employees; and/or (iii) Purchaser's decision to use third parties to distribute products with respect to the Business in Spain, Italy and/or the Netherlands."
(d) For the avoidance of doubt, the parties acknowledge and agree that, provided that the Sellers have complied in all respects with Section 2.11 of the Agreement, with respect to any assignment or transfer of any Contract or Governmental Authorization to a Designated Affiliate, if such Contract or Governmental Authorization is terminated by the Sellers or their Affiliates, Purchaser shall indemnify and hold harmless the Sellers and their Affiliates for all reasonable out-of-pocket costs incurred with respect to any such termination.
Section 3. . Section 2.2 of the Agreement is hereby amended by adding the following sentence at the end of such section:
Transfer Documents
"Notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained in any Business Transfer Agreement entered into in connection with the Closing (a) any conflict between this Agreement and any Business Transfer Agreement is to be governed by and shall be resolved in favor of the applicable provision of this Agreement (including, by way of example, the formulation of Purchased Assets, Assumed Liabilities, Excluded Assets and Excluded Liabilities, purchase price adjustments, indemnification obligations of Purchaser and the Sellers, and allocation of Liabilities to Purchaser and the Sellers arising out of or related to Transferred Employees or Taxes), and (b) neither the Sellers nor the Purchaser will (and each party will cause its Affiliates not to) use or rely on any Business Transfer Agreement as a means of avoiding the terms and provisions of, or as a defense to any of the Sellers' or Purchaser's obligations under, this Agreement."
Section 4. .
Transfer of Inventory
(a) Section 2.1(b)(i) of the Agreement is hereby amended and restated in its entirety as follows:
 
"(i) All Inventory of the Asset Selling Affiliates as of the Closing Date (collectively, the ""); provided, however, that the Purchaser may not acquire possession of the Purchased Inventory located at the Houten, Netherlands and Florence, Italy facilities until after Closing;"
Purchased Inventory
(b) Section 2.4(a) of the Agreement is hereby amended and restated in its entirety as follows:
"(i) all other Liabilities of the Asset Selling Affiliates to the extent relating to the Purchased Assets (including those reflected in Closing Net Working Capital). For the avoidance of doubt, the Purchaser (and its Designated Affiliates) bear all Liabilities and risk of loss with respect to the Purchased Inventory located at the Houten, Netherlands and Florence, Italy facilities as of and from the Closing;"
(c) The Purchaser has requested that certain Inventory be delivered by the Sellers (or applicable Selling Affiliates or Acquired Companies) to the Purchaser's (or its Affiliate's) facility in Munich, Germany prior to Closing (the ""). The parties hereby acknowledge and agree as follows:
Pre-Delivered Inventory
(i) while legal title in the Pre-Delivered Inventory will not transfer (directly or indirectly) to Purchaser or the applicable Designated Affiliates until Closing, the Purchaser (and its Designated Affiliates) shall bear all Liabilities and risk of loss with respect to the Pre-Delivered Inventory as of and from the date of delivery to Purchaser's (or its Affiliate's) facility in Munich, Germany; and
(ii) if Closing does not occur, Purchaser shall return such Pre-Delivered Inventory to Sellers (or the applicable Selling Affiliates or Acquired Companies), at Purchaser's cost and, upon completion of such delivery, the terms of sub-paragraph (i) above shall no longer apply to such returned Pre-Delivered Inventory.
Section 5. .
Closing Adjustment
(a) Part (a) of the definition of "" is hereby amended and restated in its entirety as follows:
Closing Net Working Capital
"means (a) the sum of all Accounts Receivable, Intercompany Receivables (excluding Non-Trade Intercompany Receivables), Inventory, Additional Gort Inventory, VAT recoverable of the Acquired Companies, and prepaid expenses of the Acquired Companies and to the extent incorporated in the Purchased Assets (provided, however, that Closing Net Working Capital shall exclude any deferred tax assets, deferred tax liabilities, and any VAT recoverable that is attributable to VAT for which Purchaser is required to indemnify or pay Sellers under Section 9.1(f), Section 9.8(a) or Section 9.8(c) of this Agreement), minus (b) the sum of all Accounts Payable, Intercompany Payables (excluding Non-Trade Intercompany Payables), other current accrued liabilities of the Acquired Companies and of the Asset Selling Affiliates with respect to the Transferred Employees (including all Liabilities in respect of accrued PTO (paid time off) or vacation or holiday pay for Transferred Employees to the extent not paid by the Seller or its applicable Affiliate to such employee prior to the Closing), and deferred revenue. All elements of Closing Net Working Capital shall be calculated as of the opening of business on the in the applicable jurisdiction and reflect the exclusion of the Excluded Assets, Excluded
Effective Date
 
Liabilities, Retained Assets and Retained Liabilities. Notwithstanding Section 11.10, to determine the Closing Net Working Capital, all line items expressed in any currency other than U.S. dollars will be converted into U.S. dollars using the closing rate quoted by Bloomberg as of 5 p.m. Eastern time on the last Business Day prior to Effective Date. Notwithstanding the preceding, for the avoidance of doubt, the Final Closing Net Working Capital shall be calculated on a basis consistent with the Reference Calculation."
and a new definition is hereby added to Section 1.1 of the Agreement, as follows:
"" means all inventory of MM Products (as defined in the Transition Services Agreement) and CPET (as defined in the Transition Services Agreement) located at the Gort, Ireland facility of CareFusion Manufacturing Ireland 241 Limited.
Additional Gort Inventory
(b) The first sentence of Section 2.7(a) is hereby amended and restated in its entirety as follows:
"No later than five (5) Business Days prior to the Closing Date, the Sellers shall deliver to the Purchaser a certificate executed by the , President or Chief Executive Officer of each of the Sellers dated as of the date of delivery, certifying as to a good faith estimate of the following (the ""): (i) the Closing Net Working Capital, reflecting the exclusion of the Excluded Assets, Excluded Liabilities, Retained Assets and Retained Liabilities (the "") and the Estimated Closing Net Working Capital Adjustment, (ii) the Closing Indebtedness (the "")."
Vice President
Senior Vice President,
Pre-Closing Adjustment Notice
Estimated Closing Net Working Capital
Estimated Closing Indebtedness
(c) Section 2.7 of the Agreement is hereby amended by adding the following paragraph (l):
"(l) The parties hereby acknowledge that (i) until the completion of the actions required to effect the Reorganization pursuant to Section 5.11 of the Agreement have taken place, various Employees in the United States of America are employed by an Affiliate of Sellers (the ""), and not by CareFusion 209, Inc (an Acquired Company) (""); (ii) the Reorganization will involve the transfer of such employees from the Existing Employer to CareFusion 209; (iii) the Existing Employer will have a Liability for U.S. payroll with respect to such Employees as of the Closing Date (the ""), which is reflected in the books of CareFusion 209; and (iv) notwithstanding any other provision of this Agreement, given that the Existing Employer will be required to settle the U.S. Employee Payroll Liability via payments to the various Employees and Tax authorities and other parties, as appropriate, and yet such amount would otherwise be included in the Closing Net Working Capital, the Closing Net Working Capital will be increased for the amount of the U.S. Employee Payroll Liability, insofar as such liability is paid or settled by the Existing Employer and, for the sake of clarity and to avoid duplication, the amount of such payment or settlement has not been or is not taken into account in calculating the Closing Net Working Capital as another component thereof (e.g., Intercompany Receivable), and reasonably satisfactory
Existing Employer
CareFusion 209
U.S. Employee Payroll Liability
 
evidence of such payment or settlement is provided from the Sellers to the Purchaser."
Section 6. . For purposes of Section 2.8(a) of the Agreement, the parties acknowledge and agree that the Final Allocation Statement shall be as set forth in hereto.
Final Allocation Statement
Exhibit III
Section 7. . Section 2.9 of the Agreement is hereby deleted and replaced with the following:
Closing Date
"The closing of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement (the "") shall occur on the later of (i) July 2, 2012, and (ii) three Business Days after the date on which all of the conditions set forth in Article 6 have been satisfied or waived (other than those conditions that by their nature can only be satisfied at the Closing). The date on which the Closing actually occurs is referred to in this Agreement as the "" while the date on which the transactions contemplated by this Agreement shall be deemed effective is referred to in this Agreement as the "." Subject to the Closing occurring, the Effective Date shall be July 1, 2012. For all purposes under this Agreement and each of the Ancillary Agreements, all matters at Closing will be considered to become effective simultaneously, no delivery of any document will be deemed complete until all transactions and deliveries of documents are completed, and the Effective Date of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement will be deemed to have occurred at 12:01 a.m. in each jurisdiction applicable to the Business on the Effective Date irrespective of the actual occurrence of (but subject to) the Closing."
Closing
Closing Date
Effective Date
Section 8. The parties hereby acknowledge and agree that: (a) an existing employee of CareFusion Austria 322 GmbH, who performs services primarily on behalf of the Business, has tendered his resignation, with effect from July 31, 2012; (b) the Purchaser will have no obligation to offer employment to, or employ, such individual pursuant to Section 10.3 of the Agreement with effect from Closing; and (c) in consideration for not having to employ such individual from Closing, the Purchaser will promptly reimburse the Sellers (on behalf of CareFusion Austria 322 GmbH) the cost of such individual's salary and out-of-pocket benefit costs from the Closing Date through July 31, 2012.
CareFusion Austria 322 GmbH.
Section 9. . The parties hereby acknowledge and agree that: (a) the employment of two employees of CareFusion 209, who perform services in Dublin, Ohio primarily on behalf of the Business, has been terminated, with effect June 30, 2012, (b) the Purchaser will have no obligation to offer employment to, or employ, such individuals pursuant to Section 10.3 of the Agreement with effect from Closing; and (c) the Purchaser will be responsible for, indemnify and hold harmless, or procure that the appropriate Designated Affiliate will be responsible for, indemnify and hold harmless, the Sellers and their Affiliates from any Liabilities and Losses which arise from or are connected with the dismissal of such employees (including all or any severance payments, compensation, damages or penalties (whether awarded by a court or agreed by the Selling Affiliate, or CareFusion 209 prior to the Closing) made to such employee as a result of or in connection with such dismissal).
CareFusion 209 Employees
Section 10. . Section 5.18 of the Agreement is hereby amended by adding the following paragraph (b):
Systems Software Confidentiality
 
"(b) For a period of two years after the Closing, the Purchaser will, and will cause its Affiliates (including the Acquired Companies) to, use commercially reasonable efforts to hold in confidence (in a manner substantially consistent with how the Purchaser protects its own similarly situated confidential information), unless compelled to disclose by judicial or administrative process or by other requirements of Law, all non-public information or data contained within, or transferred in connection with the assignment, transfer or cloning of, the Required Systems Software, to the extent such information or data relates to the business retained by the Sellers or their Affiliates and is not used or held for use in the Business (the ""), except to the extent that such Non-Business Information (i) must be disclosed in connection with the obligations of the Purchaser or the Acquired Companies pursuant to this Agreement and the Ancillary Agreements, (ii) can be shown to have been in the public domain through no fault of the Purchaser, the Acquired Companies or its or their directors, officers, employees and advisors or (iii) was lawfully acquired by the Purchaser from a source that is not restricted by Law, contract or fiduciary duty from disclosing such information. Notwithstanding the foregoing, in no event will this Section 5.18(b) limit or otherwise restrict the right of the Purchaser or the Acquired Companies and their respective Affiliates to disclose such Non-Business Information to any Governmental Authority or arbitrator to the extent reasonably required in connection with any Proceeding relating to the enforcement of this Agreement or any Ancillary Agreement."
Non-Business Information
Section 11. . A new Section 5.23 is hereby added to the Agreement, as follows:
Shared Tooling
". Section 5.23 of the Seller Disclosure Schedule sets forth certain assets (the "") currently used by the Sellers and its Affiliates in each of (i) the Business and (ii) the respiratory sleep diagnostic and service business of the Sellers and its Affiliates (other than the Acquired Companies). To the extent any such Shared Tooling is a Purchased Asset or held by the Acquired Companies, the Purchaser hereby agrees that after the Closing Date, the Sellers, their Affiliates, employees, agents and representatives shall continue to have access to and use of such Shared Tooling consistent with such Persons' access to and use of such Shared Tooling prior to the Closing Date. To the extent any such Shared Tooling is an Excluded Asset or does not otherwise transfer to the Purchaser at Closing, each of the Sellers hereby agree that after the Closing Date, the Purchaser, its Affiliates (including the Acquired Companies), employees, agents and representatives shall continue to have access to and use of such Shared Tooling consistent with such Persons' use of such Shared Tooling prior to the Closing Date. Each of the parties agrees that it shall not divest, relocate or otherwise take any action inconsistent with the terms of this Section 5.23 with respect to any such Shared Tooling without the prior written consent of the other parties hereto provided that such consent shall not be unreasonably withheld or delayed and, in relation to any such relocation (a) would not materially affect such other parties' rights hereunder with respect to such Shared Tooling, (b) would be to a location no more than 30 miles from its previous location and (c) would not impose more than de minimis additional costs on such other parties to continue to access and use such Shared Tooling. Each of the Purchaser (on the one hand) and the Sellers (on the other hand) agree to bear fifty percent (50%) of any maintenance, replacement or insurance costs with respect to any Shared Tooling (whether a Purchased Asset or Excluded Asset). The parties agree to retain any documentation (including design specifications) with respect to the Shared Tooling and afford the other parties and their representatives, during normal business hours of the requested party and at the requesting party's expense, reasonable access to such documentation in such requested party's possession and the right to make copies and extracts therefrom.
Shared Tooling
Shared Tooling
 
Notwithstanding the foregoing, the Purchaser (with respect to any Shared Tooling that is an Excluded Asset or does not otherwise transfer to the Purchaser at Closing) or the Sellers (with respect to any Shared Tooling that is a Purchased Asset or held by the Acquired Companies) may provide notice to the other party hereto terminating its rights (including access and use thereof after the date of such notice) and obligations (including its portion of any maintenance or replacement costs after the date of such notice) under this Section 5.23 with respect to any such Shared Tooling owned by the other party identified in such notice."
Section 12. . A new Section 5.24 is hereby added to the Agreement, as follows:
Import Bond
"(a) As reasonably required, the Purchaser will use its reasonable best efforts to have CareFusion 209, and specifically its IRS EIN, added as importer to the continuous import bond described in Section 5.24 of the Seller Disclosure Schedule (""), and to cause the Sellers and their Affiliates (as applicable) to be fully released and discharged therefrom, as soon as reasonably practicable after the Closing Date and, in any event, within fifteen (15) Business Days after the Closing Date.
Import Bond
(b) Until the Sellers and their Affiliates (as applicable) are fully released and discharged from any obligations under or with respect to the Import Bond, if any, the Purchaser will indemnify and hold the Sellers and their Affiliates harmless from and against, and pay and reimburse the Sellers and all Affiliates of Sellers for, any and all Losses that the Sellers or any of their Affiliates suffer as a result of being required to make any payment under the Import Bond after the Closing Date or as a result of the failure of the Purchaser or any of its Affiliates to meet any obligations under or with respect to the Import Bond."
Section 13. . Section 10.5(b) of the Agreement is hereby amended by adding the following sentence at the end of such section:
Retained Gort Employee
"Notwithstanding the above (i) the Sellers may or may cause an Affiliate to offer employment, from the Closing Date to the date that is 30 days after the Termination Date (as defined in Schedule B to the Transition Services Agreement), to any of those employees listed in Section 10.5(b) of the Seller Disclosure Schedule hereto (such employees offered employment by the Sellers or their Affiliates, the "") unless the employment by a Seller or an Affiliate of a Seller of such employee would compromise the ability of the Purchaser, in its reasonable business discretion, to provide the services required pursuant to Schedule B of the Transition Services Agreement, (ii) if such Retained Gort Employees accept such offer of employment by the Sellers or any of their Affiliates, or any employee identified on Section 10.5(b) of the Seller Disclosure Schedule voluntarily terminates his or her employment prior to the Termination Date (each such person, a ""), then the employees identified on Section 10.5(b) of the Seller Disclosure Schedule will exclude, and the indemnification provided by Sellers under this Section 10.5(b) (other than with respect to the grant under the IDA Agreement) will not apply with respect to, each such Retained Gort Employee and Resigning Gort Employee. The indemnity provided for in this Section 10.5(b) shall (A) only apply provided that in the case of dismissal of any employees listed in Section 10.5(b) of the Seller Disclosure Schedule by the Purchaser or any of its Affiliates (including the Acquired Companies from Closing), such dismissal process is carried out (1) with the prior written approval of the Sellers (such approval not to be unreasonably withheld or delayed, but taking into account any services still to be provided by Purchaser under the Transition Services
Retained Gort Employees
Resigning Gort Employee
 
Agreement) and (2) within 30 days after the Termination Date (as defined in Schedule B to the Transition Services Agreement), and (B) not apply, with respect to repayment of any grant provided for under the IDA Agreement, to the extent Purchaser (or the applicable Acquired Company) repays, but then becomes again entitled to, any such grant (including because Purchaser (or the applicable Acquired Company) dismisses such employees listed in Section 10.5(b) of the Seller Disclosure Schedule and subsequently hires different qualifying employees under the IDA Agreement)."
Section 14. . The parties acknowledge and agree that, if the Purchaser fails to (or fails to cause its Designated Affiliates to) offer employment to the Employees in China (in accordance with the second sentence of Section 10.3 of the Agreement) prior to the Closing, then any dismissal of such Employees by the Sellers (or their Affiliates) will be subject to indemnification by the Purchaser pursuant to Section 10.6(b)(ii) of the Agreement.
China Employees
Section 15. . The parties hereby acknowledge and agree that neither the Sellers, CareFusion Corporation nor any of its Subsidiaries will be in breach of Section 5.14 of the Agreement as a result of any solicitation or employment of any employees listed in Section 10.5(b) of the Seller Disclosure Schedule or that certain Employee listed in Section 5.14 of the Seller Disclosure Schedule.
Exceptions to Non-Solicitation Obligations
Section 16. . Section 5.16(a) of the Agreement is hereby amended and restated in its entirety as follows:
Post-Closing Cooperation
"(a) Subject to Article 9, for the longer of the period required by applicable Law or six (6) years following the Closing Date, each of the Sellers (on the one hand) and the Purchaser (on the other) will (i) retain books and records relating to (A) the Business or the Acquired Companies, and (B) with respect to the Purchaser, any business of the Sellers (or their Affiliates), which are included in the Purchased Assets or otherwise held by the Acquired Companies, in each case to the extent in the respective party's possession with respect to periods prior to the Closing (together, the ""), and (ii) afford the other parties and their representatives, during normal business hours of the requested party and at the requesting party's expense, reasonable access to the Applicable Books and Records in their possession with respect to periods prior to the Closing and the right to make copies and extracts therefrom, to the extent that such access may be reasonably required by the requesting party."
Applicable Books and Records
Section 17. . The Seller Disclosure Schedule is hereby supplemented, as set forth in hereto. Such supplements to the Seller Disclosure Schedule are provided for informational purposes (subject to the terms of Section 11.7 of the Agreement), but no such supplement will be deemed to cure the representations and warranties to which such matters relate with respect to satisfaction of the conditions set forth in Section 6.1(a) or otherwise affect any other term or condition contained in the Agreement.
Amendments to the Seller Disclosure Schedules
Exhibit IV
Section 18. The Transition Services Agreement, a form of which was attached to the Agreement as , is hereby replaced with the form of Transition Services Agreement attached hereto as .
Exhibit A
Exhibit V
Section 19. . On and after the date hereof, each reference in the Agreement to "this Agreement", "hereof", "herein", "herewith", "hereunder" and words of similar import shall, unless otherwise stated, be construed to refer to the Agreement as
Reference to the Agreement
 
amended by this Amendment. No reference to this Amendment need be made in any instrument or document at any time referring to the Agreement, a reference to the Agreement in any such instrument or document to be deemed to be a reference to the Agreement as amended by this Amendment.
Section 20. . The Agreement shall not be amended or otherwise modified by this Amendment except as expressly set forth in this Amendment. The terms, covenants and provisions of the Agreement that have not been amended hereby shall remain in full force and effect in accordance with their respective terms. The terms, covenants and provisions of the Agreement amended hereby shall remain in full force and effect as amended hereby. In the event of any inconsistency or contradiction between the terms of this Amendment and the Agreement, the terms of this Amendment shall prevail and control.
Interpretation
Section 21. . The internal laws of the State of Delaware (without giving effect to any choice or conflict of law provision or rule (whether of the State of Delaware or any other jurisdiction) that would cause the application of laws of any other jurisdiction) govern all matters arising out of or relating to this Amendment and its Exhibits, including its validity, interpretation, construction, performance and enforcement and any disputes or controversies arising therefrom or related thereto.
Governing Law
Section 22. . Any action or proceeding arising out of or relating to this Amendment or the transactions contemplated by this Amendment must be brought in the courts of the State of Delaware, County of Wilmington, or, if it has or can acquire jurisdiction, in the United States District Court for the District of Delaware. Each of the parties knowingly, voluntarily and irrevocably submits to the exclusive jurisdiction of each such court in any such action or proceeding and waives any objection it may now or hereafter have to venue or to convenience of forum. Each party to this Amendment may make service on the other party by sending or delivering a copy of the process to the party to be served at the address and in the manner provided for the giving of notices in Section 11.1 of the Agreement. Nothing in this Section 22, however, affects the right of a party to serve legal process in any other manner permitted by law.
Jurisdiction and Service of Process
Section 23. . The parties may execute this Amendment in multiple counterparts, each of which constitutes an original as against the party that signed it, and all of which together constitute one agreement. This Amendment is effective upon delivery of one executed counterpart from each party to the other party. The signatures of all parties need not appear on the same counterpart. The delivery of signed counterparts by facsimile or email transmission that includes a copy of the sending party's signature(s) is as effective as signing and delivering the counterpart in person.
Counterparts
 
The parties have executed and delivered this Amendment as of the date indicated in the initial sentence of this Amendment.
 
 

Exhibit 10.2
T S A T A R C A A L C (this ) is entered into as of June 29, 2012, among N M I, a Delaware corporation (), certain Material Domestic Subsidiaries of Borrower, and W F B, N A ().
HIS
ECOND
MENDMENT
TO
HIRD
MENDED
AND
ESTATED
REDIT
GREEMENT
AND
MENDMENT
TO
IMITED
ONSENT
"Amendment"
ATUS
EDICAL
NCORPORATED
"Borrower"
ELLS
ARGO
ANK
ATIONAL
SSOCIATION
"Bank"
W Borrower, certain Material Domestic Subsidiaries of Borrower and Bank are party to that certain Third Amended and Restated Credit Agreement, dated as of March 2, 2012 (as amended prior to the date hereof, the "" and, as further amended from time to time, the "");
HEREAS
Existing Credit Agreement
Credit Agreement
W Borrower, certain Material Domestic Subsidiaries of Borrower and Bank are party to that certain Limited Consent Letter, dated as of April 20, 2012 (as amended prior to the date hereof, the "" and, as further amended from time to time, the ""); and
HEREAS
Existing Limited Consent
Limited Consent
W the parties hereto have agreed to certain changes in the terms and conditions set forth in the Existing Credit Agreement and the Existing Limited Consent and have agreed to amend the Existing Credit Agreement and the Existing Limited Consent to reflect such changes;
HEREAS
N, , for valuable consideration, the receipt and sufficiency of which are hereby acknowledged, the parties hereto hereby agree that the Existing Credit Agreement and Existing Limited Consent shall be amended as follows; that nothing contained herein shall terminate any security interests, guaranties, subordinations or other documents in favor of Bank, all of which shall remain in full force and effect unless expressly amended hereby:
OW
THEREFORE
provided
Section 1. . Each capitalized term used but not otherwise defined herein has the meaning assigned to it in the Existing Credit Agreement.
Definitions
Section 2. . Upon the effectiveness of this Amendment in accordance with Section 4 hereof, the Existing Credit Agreement is hereby amended as follows:
Amendments to Credit Agreement
(a) Section 1.1 of the Existing Credit Agreement is hereby amended by inserting the following new defined terms, in a manner that retains alphabetical order, to read in full as follows:
"" means that certain Amendment to Share and Asset Purchase Agreement, dated June [    ], 2012, by and among CFN 303, CFN 2200 and Borrower.
Amendment to Share and Asset Purchase Agreement
"" means CareFusion Corporation, a Delaware corporation.
CFN
"" means CareFusion 2200, Inc., a Delaware corporation.
CFN 2200
"" means CareFusion 303, Inc., a Delaware corporation.
CFN 303
"" means the Acquisition by Borrower of certain shares and other assets of CFN, CFN, 2200 and CFN 303 pursuant to CFN Acquisition Agreement, as further described in that certain Amendment to Share and Asset Purchase Agreement.
CFN Acquisition
"" means that certain Share and Asset Purchase Agreement, made as of April 20, 2012, by and between CFN 303, CFN 2200 and Borrower.
CFN Acquisition Agreement
"" has the meaning ascribed to such term in Section 2.1(a)(i).
Revolving Credit Loan
"" has the meaning ascribed to such term in Section 2.1(a)(ii).
Term Out Loan
"" means June 28, 2015.
Term Out Loan Maturity Date
(b) Section 1.1 of the Existing Credit Agreement is hereby amended by amending and restating the following defined terms to read in full as follows:
"" has the meaning ascribed to such term in Section 2.1(a)(i).
Note
"" means, as of any date of determination, for Borrower and its Subsidiaries on a consolidated basis, the ratio of: (a) the sum of (i) unrestricted cash (ii) unrestricted short-term marketable securities (iii) net accounts receivable to (b) the sum of (i) current liabilities (ii) any outstanding Revolving Credit Loans (excluding the Term Out Loan) (iii) the current outstanding portion of the Term Out Loan.
Quick Ratio
plus
plus
plus
plus
"" has the meaning ascribed to such term in Section 2.1(a)(i).
Revolving Line of Credit
(c) Section 1.1 of the Existing Credit Agreement is hereby amended by amending and restating paragraph (d) of the definition of "" to read in full as follows:
Permitted Acquisition
(d) (i) with respect to the Acquisition of any Acquired Business (other than the CFN Acquisition), the Total Consideration for such Acquired Business shall not exceed $30,000,000, (ii) with respect to the CFN Acquisition, the Total Consideration for such Acquisition shall not
 
exceed $60,000,000, and (iii) the Total Consideration for such Acquisition, when taken together with the Total Consideration for all Acquired Businesses acquired after the date of this Agreement, shall not exceed $100,000,000 in the aggregate;
(d) Section 1.1 of the Existing Credit Agreement is hereby amended by amending and restating paragraph (e) of the definition of "" to read in full as follows:
Permitted Investments
(e) Investments by Borrower constituting Permitted Acquisitions, including, without limitation, the CFN Acquisition;
(e) Section 1.1 of the Existing Credit Agreement is hereby amended by amending and restating paragraph (h) of the definition of "" to read in full as follows:
Permitted Investments
(h) Investments by Borrower (i) not to exceed $50,000.00 in the aggregate outstanding at any time consisting of notes receivable of, or prepaid royalties and other credit extensions to, customers and suppliers who are not affiliates, in the ordinary course of business and (ii) consisting of a note receivable of Dutch American Manufacturers (D.A.M.) BV in the original principal amount of in a $11,500,000.00 acquired in connection with the CFN Acquisition; provided that this paragraph (h) shall not apply to investments of Borrower in any Subsidiary.
(f) Section 2.1(a) of the Existing Credit Agreement is hereby amended and restated in its entirety to read in full as follows:
(a) .
Revolving Line of Credit
(i) Subject to the terms and conditions of this Agreement, Bank hereby agrees to make loans (each such loan, a "") to Borrower from time to time on any Business Day during the Availability Period, not to exceed at any time the aggregate principal amount of Fifty Million Dollars ($50,000,000.00) (the ""). The proceeds of the initial advance under the Revolving Line of Credit shall be used to refinance all outstanding indebtedness owing under the Existing Agreement (with any such advances having the same characteristics, including, without limitation, Type and remaining Interest Period, if applicable, as the indebtedness refinanced thereby) and the proceeds of all other advances under the Revolving Line of Credit shall be used for working capital and general corporate purposes. Borrower's obligation to repay advances under the Revolving Line of Credit shall be evidenced by a promissory note dated March 2, 2012 (as amended, restated, supplemented or otherwise modified from time to time, the ""), in the form attached hereto as , all terms of which are incorporated herein by this reference.
Revolving Credit Loan
Revolving Line of Credit
Note
Exhibit A
 
(ii) As a subfacility under the Revolving Line of Credit, Bank hereby agrees to make a single Revolving Credit Loan on June 28, 2012 in an aggregate initial principal amount equal to Twenty-Five Million Dollars ($25,000,000.00) (the ""). The proceeds of the Term Out Loan shall be used solely to consummate the CFN Acquisition. The entire initial principal amount of the Term Out Loan shall be reserved under the Line of Credit and shall not be available for borrowings thereunder following the advance of the Term Out Loan.
Term Out Loan
(g) Section 2.1(c) of the Existing Credit Agreement is hereby amended and restated in its entirety to read in full as follows:
(c) Borrower may from time to time during the Availability Period, partially or wholly repay its outstanding borrowings under the Revolving Line of Credit, and reborrow, subject to all of the limitations, terms and conditions contained herein; that, the total outstanding borrowings under the Revolving Line of Credit shall not at any time exceed the maximum principal amount available thereunder, as set forth above. On the Revolving Credit Maturity Date, Borrower shall repay to Bank in full the aggregate outstanding principal balance of all Revolving Credit Loans, together with all accrued and unpaid interest due thereon; that notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained in this Section 2.1(c), Borrower shall repay the outstanding principal balance of the Term Out Loan in accordance with Section 2.3(b). Borrower shall not be permitted to reborrow any amounts advanced under the Term Out Loan without the express written consent of Bank.
Borrowing and Repayment.
provided
provided
(h) Section 2.3 of the Existing Credit Agreement is hereby amended and restated in its entirety to read in full as follows:
S 2.3. P P P.
ECTION
RINCIPAL
AYMENTS
AND
REPAYMENTS
(a) Borrower may, upon notice to Bank, at any time or from time to time voluntarily prepay Loans in whole or in part without premium or penalty but subject to Section 3.4; that: (A) such notice must be received by Bank not later than 11:00 a.m.: (1) three Business Days prior to any date of prepayment of Loans that are LIBOR Loans; and (2) one Business Day prior to the date of prepayment of Loans that are Base Rate Loans; and (B) any prepayment of any Loans that are: (1) LIBOR Loans shall be in a principal amount of $1,000,000 or a whole multiple of $1,000,000 in excess thereof, or, if less, the entire principal amount thereof then outstanding; and (2) Base Rate Loans shall be in a principal amount of $1,000,000 or a whole multiple of $1,000,000 in excess thereof, or, if less, the entire principal amount thereof then outstanding. Each such notice shall specify the date and amount of such prepayment and the Type(s) of Loans to be prepaid. If Borrower gives such notice, then Borrower's prepayment obligation shall be irrevocable, and Borrower shall make such prepayment and the payment amount specified in such notice shall be due and payable on the
provided
 
date specified therein. Any prepayment of a Loan that is a LIBOR Loan shall be accompanied by all accrued interest on the amount prepaid, together with any additional amounts required pursuant to Section 3.4.
(b) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained in this Agreement or the other Loan Documents, with respect to the Term Out Loan, in addition to the principal payment and prepayment provisions described in Section 2.3(a), Borrower shall repay the aggregate outstanding principal amount of the Term Out Loan in consecutive quarterly installments on the last Business Day of each of March, June, September and December as set forth below, except as the amounts of individual installments may be adjusted pursuant to Section 2.3(c):
 
If not paid sooner, the outstanding principal balance of the Term Out Loan shall be paid in full, together with accrued interest thereon, on the Term Out Loan Maturity Date. In no event shall Borrower be permitted to make a Revolving Credit Borrowing in order to make any scheduled or optional prepayment or repayment of the Term Out Loan.
 
(c) Each prepayment of the Term Out Loan shall be applied to reduce in inverse order of maturity the remaining scheduled principal installments of the Term Out Loan pursuant to Section 2.3(b).
(i) Section 6.3(b) of the Existing Credit Agreement is hereby amended and restated in its entirety to read in full as follows:
(b) (i) promptly after the sending or filing thereof, but in no event later than 45 days after the end of each fiscal quarter of Borrower (other than the fourth fiscal quarter in each fiscal year), copies of each Form 10-Q report filed by Borrower with the United States Securities and Exchange Commission or any successor agency; and (ii) not later than 45 days after the end of each fiscal quarter of Borrower, consolidated and consolidating financial statement of Borrower, prepared by Borrower, which financial statements shall include Borrower's balance sheet as of the end of such fiscal quarter and the related statements of Borrower's income, reconciliation of retained earnings and cash flows for the fiscal quarter then ended, all in reasonable detail and prepared in accordance with GAAP;
(j) Section 6.9(a) of the Existing Credit Agreement is hereby amended and restated in its entirety to read in full as follows:
(a) As of each fiscal quarter end of Borrower, Consolidated EBITDA, determined on a rolling four-quarter basis, not less than the amounts set forth below:
 
(k) Section 7.8 of the Existing Credit Agreement is hereby amended and restated in its entirety to read in full as follows:
 
S 7.8. D, D. Declare or pay any dividend or distribution either in cash, stock or any other property on such Person's stock now or hereafter outstanding, nor redeem, retire, repurchase or otherwise acquire any shares of any class of such Person's stock now or hereafter outstanding; that each Subsidiary may declare or pay dividends or distributions to Borrower or any wholly-owned Material Domestic Subsidiary of Borrower that is a Guarantor; that each Subsidiary may declare or pay dividends or distributions to Borrower or any Subsidiary of Borrower in order to effectuate the CFN Acquisition.
ECTION
IVIDENDS
ISTRIBUTIONS
provided
provided further
(l) Schedule 1 to Exhibit C of the Existing Credit Agreement is hereby amended and restated in its entirety to read as set forth on Exhibit A attached hereto.
Section 3. . Upon the effectiveness of this Amendment in accordance with Section 4 hereof, the Existing Limited Consent is hereby amended as follows:
Amendments to Limited Consent
(a) Section (j) of the Existing Limited Consent is hereby amended and restated in its entirety to read in full as follows:
(j) [Intentionally omitted.]
(b) Section (l) of the Existing Limited Consent is hereby amended and restated in its entirety to read in full as follows:
(l) receipt by Bank of evidence that the total fees and expenses paid by Borrower and its Subsidiaries in connection with the CFN Acquisition do not exceed $2,000,000.00;
Section 4. . This Amendment, including, without limitation the amendments to the Existing Credit Agreement and Existing Limited Consent contained herein, shall become effective as of the date first set forth above (the "") upon satisfaction of all of the conditions set forth in this Section 4 to the satisfaction of Bank; that, in the event such conditions are not so satisfied on or before July 2, 2012, then this Amendment shall be of no further force and effect:
Conditions Precedent
Effective Date
provided
(a) Bank shall have received each of the following, duly executed and delivered by each of the applicable parties thereto:
(i) this Amendment;
(ii) such other documents as Bank may require under any other Section of this Amendment; and
(b) No Event of Default or event which, with the giving of notice, the lapse of time or both would constitute an Event of Default, shall have occurred and be continuing.
 
Section 5. . Except as expressly amended pursuant hereto, the Existing Loan Agreement, the Existing Limited Consent and each of the other Loan Documents shall remain unchanged and in full force and effect and are hereby ratified and confirmed in all respects, and the Collateral described in the Loan Documents shall continue to secure the Obligations. This Amendment and the Existing Credit Agreement shall be read together, as one document. This Amendment and the Existing Limited Consent shall be read together, as one document. The Recitals hereto, including the terms defined therein, are incorporated herein by this reference and acknowledged by Borrower to be true, correct and complete.
Interpretation
Section 6. . Borrower hereby remakes all representations and warranties contained in the Existing Credit Agreement and reaffirms all covenants set forth in the Credit Agreement as of the date of this Amendment. Borrower further certifies that as of the date of this Amendment there exists no Event of Default, nor any condition, act or event which with the giving of notice or the passage of time or both would constitute an Event of Default.
Representations, Warranties and Covenants
Section 7. . Borrower will make, execute, endorse, acknowledge, and deliver any agreements, documents, or instruments, and take any and all other actions, as may from time to time be reasonably requested by Bank to perfect and maintain the validity and priority of the liens and security interests granted to Bank pursuant to the Credit Agreement and the other Loan Documents and to effect, confirm, or further assure or protect and preserve the interests, rights, and remedies of Bank under the Credit Agreement and the other Loan Documents.
Further Assurances
Section 8. . This Amendment may be executed in any number of identical counterparts, any set of which signed by all the parties hereto shall be deemed to constitute a complete, executed original for all purposes. Delivery of an executed counterpart of a signature page of this Amendment by telefacsimile transmission shall be as effective as delivery of a manually executed counterpart hereof.
Counterparts
Section 9. . This Amendment shall be governed by and construed in accordance with the internal laws of the State of California.
Governing Law
 
I , the parties hereto have caused this Amendment to be executed as of the date first written above.
N
WITNESS
WHEREOF
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
Natus Completes Acquisition of Nicolet Neurodiagnostic Business
(Nasdaq:BABY) today announced that it has completed the acquisition of the Nicolet neurodiagnostic business from CareFusion (NYSE: CFN) that was announced on April 23, 2012. Based in Middleton, Wis., the Nicolet business employs more than 400 people worldwide and generated sales of approximately $95 million in 2011.
SAN CARLOS, Calif. (July 2, 2012)  Natus Medical Incorporated
"The Nicolet acquisition strengthens our leadership position in neurodiagnostic and monitoring products. The Nicolet portfolio of electroencephalography (EEG) and electromyography (EMG) systems and related accessories, as well as vascular and obstetric Doppler sensors and connectivity products, will allow us to bring additional value to our customers as well as adding to our customer base around the world," said Jim Hawkins, Chief Executive Officer of Natus.
"Further, we expect this acquisition to be marginally accretive to non-GAAP earnings in the fourth quarter of this year and to significantly improve our profitability in 2013. Integration activities should be substantially completed by the end of 2012," added Hawkins.
Natus funded the approximate $58 million cash purchase price with existing cash and borrowings under its credit facility.
About Natus Medical
Natus is a leading provider of healthcare products used for the screening, detection, treatment, monitoring and tracking of common medical ailments in newborn care, hearing impairment, neurological dysfunction, epilepsy, sleep disorders, and balance and mobility disorders. Product offerings include computerized neurodiagnostic systems for audiology, neurology, polysomnography, and neonatology, as well as newborn care products such as hearing screening systems, phototherapy devices for the treatment of newborn jaundice, head-cooling products for the treatment of brain injury in newborns, incubators to control the newborn's environment, and software systems for managing and tracking disorders and diseases for public health laboratories.
This press release contains forward-looking statements as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, particularly statements regarding the expectations, beliefs, plans, intentions and strategies of Natus. These forward-looking statements include, but are not limited to, statements regarding the benefits of the Nicolet acquisition including the contribution to non-GAAP earnings and profitability. These statements relate to current estimates and assumptions of our management as of the date of this press release. Future events or Natus' future financial performance or results involve known and unknown risks, uncertainties, and other factors that may cause actual results, levels of activity, performance, or achievements to differ materially from those expressed or implied by the forward-looking statements, including the successful integration of the Nicloet business, competitive factors in our markets, general economic conditions in our markets, and our ability to produce and ship products in a timely manner. Natus disclaims any obligation to update information contained in any forward looking statement.
More information about potential risk factors that could affect the business and financial results of Natus is included in Natus' annual report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2011, and its quarterly
reports on Form 10-Q, and in other reports filed from time to time by Natus with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission.
Additional information about Natus Medical can be found at .
www.natus.com
COMPANY CONTACT:
Natus Medical Incorporated
Steven J. Murphy
Chief Financial Officer
(650) 802-0400
InvestorRelations@Natus.com


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BABY/BABY-8K-20120709090102.txt.gz
TIME:20120709090102
EVENTS:	Cost Associated with Exit or Disposal Activities
TEXT:
ITEM: Cost Associated with Exit or Disposal Activities
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 2.05 Costs Associated with Exit or Disposal Activities.
On July 2, 2012, Natus Medical Incorporated (the "Company") completed the acquisition of the Nicolet neurodiagnostic business ("Nicolet") from CareFusion and on July 3, 2012 filed a Current Report on Form 8-K describing the acquisition.
As of the acquisition date, Nicolet, based in Middleton, Wisconsin, had approximately 375 employees worldwide excluding employees covered under a post-acquisition Transition Services Agreement, as more fully described below.
On July 2, 2012, the Company initiated an integration and reorganization plan (the "Plan") related to the acquisition of Nicolet.
Under the Plan, the Company will be reducing the size of its combined workforce by approximately 95 employees, representing approximately 8% of the workforce of the Company. The objectives of the Plan are to eliminate redundant costs, improve efficiencies in operations, and to move to an indirect sales model in certain countries in Europe, where Nicolet had previously sold under a direct sales model. The Company expects that substantially all of the staff reductions will be completed by December 31, 2012.
The Company also expects to hire up to 20 new employees to backfill some roles in new locations. The Company anticipates its combined workforce will be approximately 1,100 employees once the Plan is completed.
The cost of the plan including employee severance and a change in control agreement is expected to be approximately $6.4 million, substantially all of which will be cash based expenditures. All costs will be accrued and charged to expense as of the date the Plan was initiated.
The Company expects that the Plan will result in a net reduction of annual personnel-related costs of approximately $9.2 million that will be partially recognized beginning in the second half of 2012 and fully recognized beginning January 1, 2013.
Concurrent with the purchase of the Nicolet business, the Company and CareFusion entered into a Transition Services Agreement ("TSA") for certain activities performed at a production facility in Gort, Ireland that the Company acquired. The production activities covered under the TSA are for products that CareFusion will retain and for which the Company has agreed to continue production for a period not to exceed six months. Severance costs associated with employees covered under the TSA will be borne by CareFusion.
Certain of the above statements regarding employee reductions, restructuring expense, the timing of those actions, and anticipated savings constitute "forward-looking statements." These statements are protected by the safe harbor for forward-looking statements contained in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. There can be no assurance that these forward-looking statements will be accurate since they are based on many assumptions which involve risks and uncertainties, both known and unknown. The following important factors could cause the estimated employee reductions, restructuring expense, estimated savings, and timing to differ: changes in economic or industry conditions, issues arising from rationalization of operations, and other risks identified in the Company's Securities and Exchange Commission reports and public announcements. Any forward-looking statements included in this report are as of the date made and the Company does not intend to update them if its views later change. These forward-looking statements should not be relied upon as representing the Company's views as of any date subsequent to the date of this report.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BABY/BABY-8K-20120726070419.txt.gz
TIME:20120726070419
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C.  20549
Form 8-K
Current Report
Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported):
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
July 26, 2012
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 - 
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 - 
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 - 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 - 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
ITEM 2.02.      Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On July 26, 2012, Natus Medical Incorporated (the Company) is issuing a press release and holding a conference call regarding its financial results for the second quarter ended June 30, 2012 and other financial information.  A copy of the press release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 to this Form 8-K.
The information in this Form 8-K and the exhibit attached hereto shall not be deemed filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the Exchange Act) or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that Section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
ITEM 9.01.     Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d) Exhibits.
SIGNATURES
          Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Exhibit Index

Exhibit 99.1
Natus Medical Announces 2012 Second Quarter Financial Results
SAN CARLOS, Calif.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--July 26, 2012-- (NASDAQ:BABY) today announced financial results for the three and six months ended June 30, 2012.
Natus Medical Incorporated
For the second quarter ended June 30, 2012, the Company reported revenue of $61.0 million, compared to $58.1 million in the comparable quarter of the previous year. Net income was $445,000, or $0.01 per diluted share, compared with net income of $2.4 million, or $0.08 per diluted share for the second quarter of 2011.
For the six months ended June 30, 2012, the Company reported revenue of $120.5 million, compared to $117.2 million in the comparable period of the previous year. Net income was $803,000, or $0.03 per diluted share, compared with net income of $5.5 million, or $0.18 per diluted share in for the first half of 2011.
The Company reported non-GAAP earnings per share of $0.12 per diluted share for the second quarter of 2012 compared to $0.13 per diluted share for the second quarter of 2011 and $0.18 per diluted share for the six months ended June 30, 2012, compared to $0.26 per diluted share for the same period in the previous year.
I am pleased to report on the excellent execution by our operating teams in the second quarter, said Jim Hawkins, Chief Executive Officer of the Company. Our non-GAAP earnings came in at the high end of the guidance range while our revenue was in line with our guidance. This was a considerable achievement, given the efforts that were also underway throughout the quarter related to the Nicolet acquisition.
Prior to the close of the acquisition on July 2nd, the Natus team completed the Nicolet integration and operating plans as well as the carve-out of the business from CareFusion, added Hawkins. With this acquisition, Natus is now the leading provider of products into the worldwide neurodiagnostic market. We have market leading positions in EEG, EMG, and PSG in both the United States and abroad. While we expect Nicolet to be marginally accretive to our non-GAAP earnings in the fourth quarter, we expect it to be substantially accretive throughout 2013.
I am also pleased to report that the introduction of our first incubator into the U.S. market is attracting a lot of interest. We remain convinced the incubator market will be an area of solid growth for Natus in the years ahead, said Hawkins.
As of June 30, 2012, the Company had cash, cash equivalents, and short-term investments of $17 million, stockholders' equity of approximately $259 million, and working capital of approximately $111 million. On June 28, the Company borrowed $31 million on its line of credit and used approximately $27 million of its existing cash to fund the Nicolet acquisition. The approximate $58 million purchase consideration will be reported as a deposit on the Companys June 30, 2012 balance sheet.
Financial Guidance
Natus updated its 2012 financial guidance. For the full year 2012, the Company expects to report revenue of $295 million to $300 million and non-GAAP earnings per share of $0.58 to $0.63. The Company had earlier said that it expected to report revenue of $256 million to $262 million and non-GAAP earnings per share of $0.57 to $0.62 without giving effect to the Nicolet acquisition.
For the third quarter of 2012, the Company expects to report revenue of $80 million to $82 million and non-GAAP earnings per share of $0.12 to $0.14. This compares to revenue of $51.3 million and non-GAAP earnings per share of $0.07 reported in the third quarter of 2011.
For the fourth quarter of 2012, the Company expects to report revenue of $94.5 million to $97.5 million and non-GAAP earnings per share of $0.27 to $0.30. This compares to revenue of $64.1 million and non-GAAP earnings per share of $0.14 reported in the fourth quarter of 2011.
The Company's full year 2012 and quarterly non-GAAP earnings per share guidance exclude the following charges:
- Amortization expense associated with acquisition-related intangible assets.
- Restructuring charges that the Company expects to incur in 2012 associated with acquisitions, which charges were $1.3 million for the first half of 2012. In a Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the SEC on July 9, 2012, the Company reported that it had initiated an integration and reorganization plan related to the acquisition of Nicolet and further reported that it expected the cost of the plan would be approximately $6.4 million, which the Company expects to record as of the date of the plan. For the remainder of 2012, the amount and timing of other potential restructuring charges have not yet been determined.
- Direct costs associated with acquisitions that were $2.0 million in the first half of 2012, principally for pre-acquisition due diligence and outside legal costs. The Company expects that during the third quarter of 2012 it will incur additional direct costs of the Nicolet acquisition related to valuation and audit-related services.
- The incremental accelerated depreciation of previously capitalized software costs of $900,000 during the first half of the year due to the Companys implementation of a world-wide enterprise resource planning platform in 2012, which the Company expects will reduce GAAP earnings per share by approximately $0.02 for the full year.
- The impact on gross profit of the fair value adjustment to inventory associated with Embla purchase accounting that will be $56,000 for the full year 2012, and for Nicolet, the amount and timing of which have not been determined.
The Companys non-GAAP guidance includes the impact of expensing employee share based compensation. All earnings per share amounts are on a diluted basis.
Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures
The Company's non-GAAP results for the three and six months ended June 30, 2012 exclude amortization expense associated with certain acquisition-related intangible assets, restructuring charges, direct costs associated with acquisitions, the accelerated write off of capitalized software, and the impact of inventory fair value adjustments recorded through purchase accounting, as more fully detailed below.
The Company believes that the presentation of results excluding these charges provides meaningful supplemental information to both management and investors that is indicative of the Company's core operating results. Therefore, the Company believes these non-GAAP financial measures facilitate comparison of operating results across reporting periods. A reconciliation between the Company's results of operations on a GAAP and non-GAAP basis for the periods reported is included as part of the condensed consolidated statements of operations at the end of this release.
The Company believes that both management and investors benefit from referring to these non-GAAP financial measures in assessing the Company's performance and when planning, forecasting, and analyzing future periods. These non-GAAP financial measures also facilitate management's internal comparisons to the Company's historical performance. The non-GAAP financial measures disclosed by the Company should not be considered a substitute for or superior to financial measures calculated in accordance with GAAP, and the financial results calculated in accordance with GAAP and reconciliations to those financial statements should be carefully evaluated.
Conference Call
Natus has scheduled an investment-community conference call to discuss this announcement beginning at 11:00 a.m. Eastern Time (8:00 a.m. Pacific Time) today, July 26, 2012. Individuals interested in listening to the conference call may do so by dialing 866-804-6924 for domestic callers, or 1-857-350-1670 for international callers, and entering reservation code 26942556. A telephone replay will be available for 48 hours following the conclusion of the call by dialing 888-286-8010 for domestic callers, or 1-617-801-6888 for international callers, and entering reservation code 93774209.
The conference call also will be available real-time via the Internet at , and a recording of the call will be available on the Companys Web site for 90 days following the completion of the call.
http://investor.natus.com
About Natus Medical Incorporated
Natus is a leading provider of healthcare products used for the screening, detection, treatment, monitoring and tracking of common medical ailments in newborn care, hearing impairment, neurological dysfunction, epilepsy, sleep disorders, and balance and mobility disorders. Product offerings include computerized neurodiagnostic systems for audiology, neurology, polysomnography, and neonatology, as well as newborn care products such as hearing screening systems, phototherapy devices for the treatment of newborn jaundice, head-cooling products for the treatment of brain injury in newborns, incubators to control the newborn's environment, and software systems for managing and tracking disorders and diseases for public health laboratories.
Additional information about Natus Medical can be found at .
www.natus.com
This press release contains forward-looking statements as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, particularly statements regarding the expectations, beliefs, plans, intentions and strategies of Natus. These forward-looking statements include statements regarding the contribution of the Nicolet business to profitability, growth in the incubator market, and revenue and non-GAAP profitability in the third and fourth quarters and full year 2012 These statements relate to current estimates and assumptions of our management as of the date of this press release, and future events or Natus' future financial performance or results, and involve known and unknown risks, uncertainties and other factors that may cause actual results, levels of activity, performance, or achievements to differ materially from those expressed or implied by the forward-looking statements. Forward-looking statements are only predictions and the actual events or results may differ materially. Natus cannot provide any assurance that its future results or the results implied by the forward-looking statements will meet expectations. Our future results could differ materially due to a number of factors, including the effects of competition, the demand for our products and services, the impact of adverse global economic conditions on our target markets, our ability to expand our sales in international markets, our ability to maintain current sales levels in a mature domestic market, our ability to control costs, risks associated with bringing new products to market and integrating acquired businesses, and our ability to fulfill product orders on a timely basis. Natus disclaims any obligation to update information contained in any forward looking statement.
More information about potential risk factors that could affect the business and financial results of Natus is included in Natus' annual report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2011, and its quarterly reports on Form 10-Q, and in other reports filed from time to time by Natus with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission.
Note:
The Company has elected to provide non-GAAP financial results that exclude the items below as this presentation is common among companies that are active acquirors and whose results are, accordingly, affected by such charges, because this information is used by management to evaluate operating results and because it believes this information will assist investors in making period to period comparisons of the Company's operating results.
CONTACT: Natus Medical Incorporated Steven J. Murphy, 650-802-0400 Vice President Finance and Chief Financial Officer
InvestorRelations@Natus.com


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BABY/BABY-8K-20120913154712.txt.gz
TIME:20120913154712
EVENTS:	Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 5.03 Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year
At the 2012 Annual Meeting of Stockholders of Natus Medical Incorporated (the "Company") held on June 8, 2012, the Company's stockholders, upon recommendation of the Company's Board of Directors, approved an amendment (the "Amendment") to the Company's Amended and Restated Certificate of Incorporation (the "Restated Certificate") to eliminate the required supermajority vote of the Company's stockholders to approve certain amendments to the Company's Restated Certificate and to replace such supermajority vote with a majority vote of the Company's stockholders instead. The Amendment is described in more detail as Proposal No. 4 in the Company's definitive proxy statement filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on April 23, 2012. On September 12, 2012, the Company filed a Certificate of Amendment of the Restated Certificate of the Company with the Delaware Secretary of State to effect the Amendment, which became effective on September 12, 2012.
The foregoing description of the Certificate does not purport to be complete and is qualified in its entirety by reference to the Certificate attached hereto as Exhibit 3.1.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits
(d) Exhibits.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
Dated: September 13, 2012
 

Exhibit 3.1
Natus Medical Incorporated, a corporation organized and existing under and by virtue of the General Corporation Law of the State of Delaware (the ""),
Corporation
DOES HEREBY CERTIFY THE FOLLOWING:
: That the name of the Corporation is Natus Medical Incorporated.
FIRST
: That the date on which the Certificate of Incorporation of the Corporation was originally filed with the Secretary of State of Delaware is July 20, 2000 under the name Natus Medical Incorporated.
SECOND
: That the following amendment to the Corporation's Amended and Restated Certificate of Incorporation has been duly adopted in accordance with the provisions of Section 242 of the Delaware General Corporation Law, with the approval of such amendment by the Corporation's stockholders having been given in accordance with the provisions of Section 211 and Section 242 of the Delaware General Corporation Law:
THIRD
Section 4 of Article FIFTH of the Amended and Restated Certificate of Incorporation is amended to read in its entirety as follows:
"The affirmative vote of a majority of the voting power of the then outstanding shares of Voting Stock, voting together as a single class, shall be required for the adoption, amendment or repeal of the following sections of the corporation's Bylaws by the stockholders of this corporation: 2.3 (Annual Meeting) and 2.4 (Special Meeting)."
Section 7 of Article FIFTH of the Amended and Restated Certificate of Incorporation is amended to read in its entirety as follows:
"Any director, or the entire Board of Directors, may be removed from office at any time with or without cause by the affirmative vote of the holders of at least a majority of the voting power of all of the then-outstanding shares of the Voting Stock, voting together as a single class."
3. Article SIXTH of the Amended and Restated Certificate of Incorporation is amended to read in its entirety as follows:
"Notwithstanding any other provision in this Certificate of Incorporation or in any provision of law which might otherwise permit a lesser vote or no vote, but in addition to any affirmative vote of the holders of any particular class or series of the Voting Stock required by law, this Certificate of Incorporation or any Preferred Stock Designation, the affirmative vote of the holders of at least a majority of the voting power of all of the then-outstanding shares of the Voting Stock, voting together as a single class, shall be required to alter, amend or repeal Article FIFTH or this Article SIXTH."
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the Corporation has caused this Certificate of Amendment of the Amended and Restated Certificate of Incorporation to be signed by its Vice President and Chief Financial Officer this 11
th
day of September 2012 and the foregoing facts stated herein are true and correct.
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BABY/BABY-8K-20120921172103.txt.gz
TIME:20120921172103
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 5.02 Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
(b) In connection with an internal restructuring plan, on September 20, 2012 Natus Medical Incorporated (the "Company") notified William L. Mince, Vice President North American Operations, that his position within the Company will be eliminated. It is anticipated that Mr. Mince will continue with the Company during a transition period that extends through December 31, 2012. Pursuant to an employment agreement between the Company and Mr. Mince, upon his departure he will be entitled to certain severance benefits as described under in the Company's 2012 definitive proxy statement filed with the Commission on April 23, 2012.
Employment Agreements and Change of Control Agreements
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BABY/BABY-8K-20121107070527.txt.gz
TIME:20121107070527
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C.  20549
Form 8-K
Current Report
Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported):
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
November 7, 2012
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 - 
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 - 
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 - 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 - 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
ITEM 2.02.      Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On November 7, 2012, Natus Medical Incorporated (the Company) is issuing a press release and holding a conference call regarding its financial results for the third quarter ended September 30, 2012 and other financial information.  A copy of the press release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 to this Form 8-K.
The information in this Form 8-K and the exhibit attached hereto shall not be deemed filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the Exchange Act) or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that Section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
ITEM 9.01.     Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d) Exhibits.
SIGNATURES
          Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Exhibit Index

Exhibit 99.1
Natus Medical Announces 2012 Third Quarter Financial Results
SAN CARLOS, Calif.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--November 7, 2012-- (Nasdaq:BABY) today announced financial results for the three and nine months ended September 30, 2012.
Natus Medical Incorporated
For the third quarter ended September 30, 2012, the Company reported revenue of $80.7 million, compared to $51.3 million in the comparable quarter of the previous year. Net loss was $1.9 million, or a net loss of $0.07 per share, compared with net income of $154,000 or $0.01 per diluted share for the third quarter of 2011.
For the nine months ended September 30, 2012, the Company reported revenue of $201.2 million, compared to $168.5 million in the comparable period of the previous year. Net loss was $1.1 million, or $0.04 per share, compared with net income of $5.6 million, or $0.19 per diluted share, for the nine months ended September 30, 2011.
The Company reported non-GAAP earnings per share of $0.15 per diluted share for the third quarter of 2012 compared to $0.07 per diluted share for the third quarter of 2011, and $0.33 per diluted share for the nine months ended September 30, 2012, compared to $0.34 per diluted share for the same period in the previous year.
I am pleased with our third quarter results as our non-GAAP earnings exceeded our expectations and revenue was in line with our guidance, said Jim Hawkins, Chief Executive Officer of the Company.
During the quarter we completed the acquisition of the Nicolet business from CareFusion. This is the most significant acquisition in the history of the Company. Natus is now the leading provider of products into the worldwide neurodiagnostic market, with market-leading positions in EEG, EMG, and PSG technologies in both the United States and abroad, added Hawkins.
In the third quarter we also initiated the reorganization of the Company into two Strategic Business Units: Natus Newborn Care and Natus Neurology. As we drive Natus towards our goal of $500 million in annual revenue, the new SBU structure will give added focus to our business, said Hawkins.
Our Newborn Care hearing business posted increased revenue in the third quarter compared to the 2011 quarter, signaling that birth rates around the world may have stabilized, reversing the downward trend of the last few years, added Hawkins. Nicolet also had excellent results in their first quarter as part of Natus.
We remain committed to achieving our goal of a 12% pretax operating profit in 2013 on a non-GAAP basis and believe our third quarter results clearly demonstrate progress towards this objective, stated Hawkins.
As of September 30, 2012, the Company had cash and cash equivalents of $19.5 million, stockholders' equity of approximately $260 million, and working capital of approximately $64 million. On June 28, 2012 the Company borrowed $31 million on its line of credit and on July 2, 2012 used those proceeds and approximately $27 million of its existing cash to fund the Nicolet acquisition.
Financial Guidance
Natus updated its 2012 financial guidance. For the full year 2012, the Company expects to report revenue of $293 million to $296 million and non-GAAP earnings per share of $0.58 to $0.61. The Company had earlier said that it expected to report revenue of $295 million to $300 million and non-GAAP earnings per share of $0.58 to $0.63.
For the fourth quarter of 2012, the Company expects to report revenue of $92 million to $95 million and non-GAAP earnings per share of $0.25 to $0.28. This compares to revenue of $64.1 million and non-GAAP earnings per share of $0.14 reported in the fourth quarter of 2011.
The Company's full year 2012 and quarterly non-GAAP earnings per share guidance exclude the following charges:
- Amortization expense associated with acquisition-related intangible assets.
- Restructuring charges that the Company expects to incur in 2012 associated with acquisitions and reorganizations, which charges were $8.9 million for the nine months ended September 30, 2102. The charges are comprised primarily of employee severance benefits and associated exit and disposal costs.
- Direct costs associated with acquisitions of $2.8 million in the nine months ended September 30, 2012, principally for pre-acquisition due diligence and outside legal costs. The Company does not expect to incur additional direct costs associated with completed acquisitions.
- The impact on gross profit of the fair value adjustment to inventory associated with Embla and Nicolet purchase accounting that was $626,000 during the nine months ended September 30, 2012. The Company expects to write off the remaining approximately $135,000 of inventory fair value adjustment associated with Nicolet purchase accounting in the fourth quarter of 2012.
- During the three months ended September 30, 2012, the impact on marketing and selling expense of recording the fair value of backlog associated with Nicolet purchase accounting of $720,000. The Company does not expect additional charges associated with the fair value of Nicolet backlog.
- During the first half of the year, the incremental accelerated depreciation of previously capitalized software costs of $902,000 due to the Companys implementation in 2012 of the North American phase of a world-wide enterprise resource planning platform.
The Companys non-GAAP guidance includes the impact of employee share based compensation. All non-GAAP earnings per share amounts are on a diluted basis.
Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures
The Company's non-GAAP results for the three and nine months ended September 30, 2012 exclude amortization expense associated with certain acquisition-related intangible assets, restructuring and severance charges, direct costs associated with acquisitions, the impact of inventory and backlog fair value adjustments recorded through purchase accounting, and the accelerated write off of capitalized software as more fully detailed below.
The Company believes that the presentation of results excluding these charges provides meaningful supplemental information to both management and investors that is indicative of the Company's core operating results. Therefore, the Company believes these non-GAAP financial measures facilitate comparison of operating results across reporting periods. A reconciliation between the Company's results of operations on a GAAP and non-GAAP basis for the periods reported is included as part of the condensed consolidated statements of operations at the end of this release.
The Company believes that both management and investors benefit from referring to these non-GAAP financial measures in assessing the Company's performance and when planning, forecasting, and analyzing future periods. These non-GAAP financial measures also facilitate management's internal comparisons to the Company's historical performance. The non-GAAP financial measures disclosed by the Company should not be considered a substitute for or superior to financial measures calculated in accordance with GAAP, and the financial results calculated in accordance with GAAP and reconciliations to those financial statements should be carefully evaluated.
Conference Call
Natus has scheduled an investment-community conference call to discuss this announcement beginning at 11:00 a.m. Eastern Time (8:00 a.m. Pacific Time) today, November 7, 2012. Individuals interested in listening to the conference call may do so by dialing 866-700-7477 for domestic callers, or 1-617-213-8840 for international callers, and entering reservation code 84219701. A telephone replay will be available for 48 hours following the conclusion of the call by dialing 888-286-8010 for domestic callers, or 1-617-801-6888 for international callers, and entering reservation code 60830781.
The conference call also will be available real-time via the Internet at , and a recording of the call will be available on the Companys Web site for 90 days following the completion of the call.
http://investor.natus.com
About Natus Medical Incorporated
Natus is a leading provider of healthcare products used for the screening, detection, treatment, monitoring and tracking of common medical ailments in newborn care, hearing impairment, neurological dysfunction, epilepsy, sleep disorders, and balance and mobility disorders. Product offerings include computerized neurodiagnostic systems for audiology, neurology, polysomnography, and neonatology, as well as newborn care products such as hearing screening systems, phototherapy devices for the treatment of newborn jaundice, head-cooling products for the treatment of brain injury in newborns, incubators to control the newborn's environment, and software systems for managing and tracking disorders and diseases for public health laboratories.
Additional information about Natus Medical can be found at .
www.natus.com
This press release contains forward-looking statements as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, particularly statements regarding the expectations, beliefs, plans, intentions and strategies of Natus. These forward-looking statements include statements regarding non-GAAP pre-tax operating margins in 2013, a goal of $500 million in annual revenue, benefits of moving to the SBU structure, and revenue and non-GAAP profitability in the fourth quarter and full year 2012 These statements relate to current estimates and assumptions of our management as of the date of this press release, and future events or Natus' future financial performance or results, and involve known and unknown risks, uncertainties and other factors that may cause actual results, levels of activity, performance, or achievements to differ materially from those expressed or implied by the forward-looking statements. Forward-looking statements are only predictions and the actual events or results may differ materially. Natus cannot provide any assurance that its future results or the results implied by the forward-looking statements will meet expectations. Our future results could differ materially due to a number of factors, including the effects of competition, the demand for our products and services, the impact of adverse global economic conditions on our target markets, our ability to expand our sales in international markets, our ability to maintain current sales levels in a mature domestic market, our ability to control costs, risks associated with bringing new products to market and integrating acquired businesses, and our ability to fulfill product orders on a timely basis. Natus disclaims any obligation to update information contained in any forward looking statement.
More information about potential risk factors that could affect the business and financial results of Natus is included in Natus' annual report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2011, and its quarterly reports on Form 10-Q, and in other reports filed from time to time by Natus with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission.
Note:
The Company has elected to provide non-GAAP financial results that exclude the items below as this presentation is common among companies that are active acquirors and whose results are, accordingly, affected by such charges, because this information is used by management to evaluate operating results and because it believes this information will assist investors in making period to period comparisons of the Company's operating results.
CONTACT: Natus Medical Incorporated Steven J. Murphy, 650-802-0400 Vice President Finance and Chief Financial Officer
InvestorRelations@Natus.com


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BABY/BABY-8K-20130104171058.txt.gz
TIME:20130104171058
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 5.02. Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers.
At its January 3, 2013 meeting, the Compensation Committee of the Board of Directors of Natus Medical Incorporated (the "Company") approved the base salaries and bonus program for the Company's executive officers for the period beginning January 1, 2013 and ending December 31, 2013.
The Compensation Committee approved the base salary amounts set forth in the table below:
 
The Compensation Committee also approved a cash bonus plan for executive officers of the Company for 2013. Cash bonuses, if paid, may range from 50% to a maximum of 200% of the target amount.
The target bonus as a percentage of 2013 base salary is 100% for Mr. Hawkins, 75% for Mr. Buhler, 45% for each of Messrs. Murphy, Noll, and Traverso, and 35% for Dr. Chung.
For Mssrs. Hawkins, Buhler, Murphy, and Chung, the target bonus is based on the achievement of three metrics: (i) the consolidated pre-tax earnings contained in the Company's 2013 business plan ("2013 Plan") weighted at 60%, (ii) the consolidated revenue contained in the 2013 Plan weighted at 20%, and (iii) successful completion of discrete operational goals in 2013 weighted at 20%.
For Mssrs. Noll and Traverso, the target bonus is based on the achievement of four metrics: (i) the consolidated pre-tax earnings contained in the 2013 Plan weighted at 20%, (ii) the pre-tax earnings of their respective strategic business units ("SBUs") contained in the 2013 Plan weighted at 40%, (iii) the revenue of their SBUs contained in the 2013 Plan weighted at 20%, and (iv) successful completion of discrete operational goals in 2013 weighted at 20%.
The payment of any bonus remains subject to the discretion of the Compensation Committee and in determining the attainment of operational financial metrics the Committee expects to refer to the Company's reported operating results as adjusted to eliminate the effects of any subsequent event not taken into account in establishing the 2013 Plan.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BABY/BABY-8K-20130107083125.txt.gz
TIME:20130107083125
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
Washington, D.C.  20549
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
_______________
Form 8-K
_______________
CURRENT REPORT
PURSUANT TO SECTION 13 OR 15(d) OF THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934
Date of Report (date of earliest event reported):
January 4, 2013
_______________
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
Natus Medical Incorporated
_______________
(Commission File Number)
000-33001
(Address of principal executive offices)
1501 Industrial Road
San Carlos, CA  94070
(Registrants telephone number, including area code)
650-802-0400
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 - 
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 - 
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 - 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 - 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Item 1.01 Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
On January 5, 2013, Natus Medical Incorporated (the Company) and Astro-Med Inc. (Astro-Med) and Grass Technologies Corporation, a wholly-owned subsidiary of Astro-Med, entered into an Asset Purchase Agreement (the Purchase Agreement) pursuant to which the Company will acquire the Grass Technologies Product Group (the Business) from Astro-Med.
Pursuant to the Purchase Agreement, the Company will acquire for a cash purchase price of $18.6 million the assets of the Business consisting principally of working capital of not less than $2.0 million, the assembled workforce, intellectual property, and certain other related assets. The purchase price is subject to adjustment depending upon the level of working capital in the Business on the date of the acquisition.
Based in West Warwick, Rhode Island, the Grass Technologies Product Group includes clinically differentiated neurodiagnostic and monitoring products, including a portfolio of polysomnography (PSG) and electroencephalography (EEG) systems for both clinical and research use and related accessories and proprietary electrodes. The Business generated sales of approximately $18.5 million in the year ended January 31, 2012.
It is expected that the transaction contemplated by the Purchase Agreement will be consummated on January 31, 2013.
The acquisition will be funded by existing cash of the Company and borrowings on the Companys existing credit facility with Wells Fargo Bank National Association (Wells Fargo).
SIGNATURES
          Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BABY/BABY-8K-20130228070513.txt.gz
TIME:20130228070513
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C.  20549
Form 8-K
Current Report
Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported):
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
February 28, 2013
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 - 
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 - 
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 - 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 - 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
ITEM 2.02.      Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On February 28, 2013, Natus Medical Incorporated (the Company) is issuing a press release and holding a conference call regarding its financial results for its fourth quarter and fiscal year ended December 31, 2012 and other financial information.  A copy of the press release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 to this Form 8-K.
The information in this Form 8-K and the exhibit attached hereto shall not be deemed filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the Exchange Act) or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that Section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
ITEM 9.01.     Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d) Exhibits.
SIGNATURES
          Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Exhibit Index

Exhibit 99.1
Natus Medical Announces Fourth Quarter and Full Year 2012 Results
- Non-GAAP Profit Increases over 100% Leading to Record Fourth Quarter Results
SAN CARLOS, Calif.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--February 28, 2013-- (Nasdaq:BABY) today announced financial results for the fourth quarter and full year ended December 31, 2012.
Natus Medical Incorporated
For the fourth quarter ended December 31, 2012, Natus reported revenue of $90.5 million, compared to $64.1 million reported in the comparable quarter of the previous year. The Company reported net income of $4.8 million or $0.16 per diluted share for the fourth quarter 2012, compared to a loss of $17.3 million, or a loss of $0.61 per share, for the fourth quarter of 2011.
For the year ended December 31, 2012, Natus reported revenue of $291.7 million, compared to $232.7 million reported in 2011. Net income was $3.6 million, or $0.12 per diluted share for the year ended December 31, 2012, compared to a loss of $11.7 million, or a loss of $0.41 per share in 2011.
On a non-GAAP basis the Company reported net income of $8.6 million, or $0.29 per diluted share, for the fourth quarter of 2012, compared with net income of $4.1 million, or $0.14 per diluted share, for the fourth quarter of 2011, and net income of $18.4 million, or $0.62 per diluted share, for the full year 2012, compared with net income of $14.0 million, or $0.47 per diluted share, for the full year 2011.
I am pleased with our record fourth quarter non-GAAP profitability and improved gross profit margin, said Jim Hawkins, Chief Executive Officer of the Company, Although delayed orders and softness in some international markets and in our domestic neurology business caused our revenue to come in below guidance, organic revenue still grew approximately 2.3% on a year-over-year basis. We believe our fourth quarter results reflect improved operating efficiencies at Natus. We remain committed to achieving our goal of a 12% non-GAAP pretax profit for fiscal 2013.
We successfully integrated the Nicolet sales organization into Natus during the fourth quarter, creating what we believe to be the largest sales and service organization in the world selling into the neurodiagnostic market, said Hawkins. After first entering this market only seven years ago, we have now become the worldwide market leader. We are very proud of this accomplishment.
During January, Natus announced and then successfully closed the acquisition of the Grass Technology Products Group, a provider of clinically differentiated neurodiagnostic and monitoring products, said Hawkins. This acquisition expands our presence in certain international markets, adds to our disposable product offering, and provides Natus with an entry into the research segment of the neurodiagnostic market.
Natus remains one of the fastest growing medical device companies in the world. With strong earnings growth and an emphasis on generating cash in 2013, we are enthusiastic about our prospects in the year ahead, added Hawkins.
Financial Guidance
Natus reiterated its financial guidance for 2013.
For the full year 2013, the Company expects to report revenue of $362 million to $367 million and non-GAAP earnings per share of $0.81 to $0.84. For the first quarter of 2013, the Company expects to report revenue of $83 million to $85 million and non-GAAP earnings per share of $0.09 to $0.10.
The revenue and non-GAAP earnings per share guidance include the impact of the acquisition of the Grass Technologies Product Group. The guidance does not give effect to the impact of any other potential future acquisitions.
The Companys non-GAAP earnings per share guidance excludes charges for amortization expense associated with intangible assets from prior acquisitions and the Grass Technologies acquisition, which the Company expects to be approximately $6.4 million and $1.6 million for the full year and first quarter 2013, respectively, and which the Company expects will reduce GAAP earnings per share by approximately $0.14 and $0.03 for the respective periods.
In addition, the non-GAAP earnings per share guidance excludes the effects of restructuring charges that the Company expects to incur in 2013 associated with recent acquisitions, the amount and timing of which have not yet been determined, and acquisition-related expenses associated with the Grass Technologies acquisition.
The Companys non-GAAP guidance includes the impact of expensing employee share-based compensation. All earnings per share amounts are on a diluted basis.
Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures
The Company's non-GAAP results for 2012 exclude amortization expense and trade name impairment charges associated with certain acquisition-related intangible assets, restructuring and severance charges, direct costs associated with acquisitions, the impact of inventory and backlog fair value adjustments recorded through purchase accounting, and the accelerated write off of capitalized software as more fully detailed below.
The Company believes that the presentation of results excluding these charges provides meaningful supplemental information to both management and investors that is indicative of the Company's core operating results. Therefore, the Company believes these non-GAAP financial measures facilitate comparison of operating results across reporting periods. A reconciliation between the Company's results of operations on a GAAP and non-GAAP basis for the periods reported is included as part of the condensed consolidated statements of operations at the end of this release.
The Company believes that both management and investors benefit from referring to these non-GAAP financial measures in assessing the Company's performance and when planning, forecasting, and analyzing future periods. These non-GAAP financial measures also facilitate management's internal comparisons to the Company's historical performance. The non-GAAP financial measures disclosed by the Company should not be considered a substitute for or superior to financial measures calculated in accordance with GAAP, and the financial results calculated in accordance with GAAP and reconciliations to those financial statements should be carefully evaluated.
Conference Call
Individuals interested in listening to the conference call may do so by dialing 866-783-2146 or 857-350-1605, and entering reservation code 53672998. A telephone replay will be available for 48 hours following the conclusion of the call by dialing 888-286-8010 for or 617-801-6888 and entering reservation code 58814594.
The conference call also will be available real-time via the Internet at , and a recording of the call will be available on the Company's Web site for 90 days following the completion of the call.
http://investor.natus.com
About Natus Medical Incorporated
Natus is a leading provider of healthcare products used for the screening, detection, treatment, monitoring and tracking of common medical ailments in newborn care, hearing impairment, neurological dysfunction, epilepsy, sleep disorders, and balance and mobility disorders. Product offerings include computerized neurodiagnostic systems for audiology, neurology, polysomnography, and neonatology, as well as newborn care products such as hearing screening systems, phototherapy devices for the treatment of newborn jaundice, head-cooling products for the treatment of brain injury in newborns, incubators to control the newborn's environment, and software systems for managing and tracking disorders and diseases for public health laboratories.
Additional information about Natus Medical can be found at .
www.natus.com
This press release contains forward-looking statements as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, particularly statements regarding the expectations, beliefs, plans, intentions and strategies of Natus. These forward-looking statements include statements regarding non-GAAP earnings in the first quarter and full year 2013 and expected amortization expense associated with acquired intangible assets. These statements relate to current estimates and assumptions of our management as of the date of this press release, and future events or Natus' future financial performance or results, and involve known and unknown risks, uncertainties and other factors that may cause actual results, levels of activity, performance, or achievements to differ materially from those expressed or implied by the forward-looking statements. Forward-looking statements are only predictions and the actual events or results may differ materially. Natus cannot provide any assurance that its future results or the results implied by the forward-looking statements will meet expectations. Our future results could differ materially due to a number of factors, including the effects of competition, the demand for our products and services, the impact of adverse global economic conditions on our target markets, our ability to expand our sales in international markets, our ability to maintain current sales levels in a mature domestic market, our ability to control costs, risks associated with bringing new products to market and integrating acquired businesses, and our ability to fulfill product orders on a timely basis. Natus disclaims any obligation to update information contained in any forward looking statement.
More information about potential risk factors that could affect the business and financial results of Natus is included in Natus' annual report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2011, and its quarterly reports on Form 10-Q, and in other reports filed from time to time by Natus with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission.
Note:
The Company has elected to provide non-GAAP financial results that exclude the items below as this presentation is common among companies that are active acquirors and whose results are, accordingly, affected by such charges, because this information is used by management to evaluate operating results and because it believes this information will assist investors in making period to period comparisons of the Company's operating results.
CONTACT: Natus Medical Incorporated Steven J. Murphy, 650-802-0400 Chief Financial Officer
InvestorRelations@Natus.com


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BABY/BABY-8K-20130313161211.txt.gz
TIME:20130313161211
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
ITEM 5.02. Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
On March 10, 2013 the Board of Directors of Natus Medical Incorporated approved the appointment of Jonathan Kennedy as Senior Vice President and Chief Financial Officer of the Company. In that capacity he will also serve as the principal financial officer and principal accounting officer of the Company. Mr. Kennedy will join the Company on April 8, 2013.
Mr. Kennedy, age 41, has served as Intersil Corporation's Senior Vice President and CFO since April 2009. From December 2008 to April 2009, he was Intersil's Interim CFO. From April 2005 to December 2008, he was Intersil's Corporate Controller. From June 2004 to April 2005, he was Intersil's Director of Finance. Prior to that time Mr. Kennedy served as Director of Finance and Information Technology of Alcon, Inc. from July 2000 to June 2004 and held various finance and information technology positions at Autonomous Technologies and Harris Corporation.
Mr. Kennedy entered into an employment agreement that is effective upon his joining the Company providing for initial compensation of an annual base salary of $350,000, participation in the Company's cash bonus plan for 2013 with a target bonus of 65% of base salary, with a guaranteed payment of not less than the pro-rated target amount for 2013. In addition, he was awarded a signing bonus of $75,000. Mr. Kennedy will also receive options for the purchase of 110,000 shares of the Company's common stock and 60,000 shares of restricted stock.
Steven J. Murphy, who has served as the Company's Vice President Finance and Chief Financial Officer, and as principal financial officer and principal accounting officer, since 2003 will continue to serve as Vice President Finance.
ITEM 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d) Exhibits.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
Dated: March 13, 2013
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
Natus Appoints Jonathan Kennedy as Senior Vice President and Chief Financial Officer
(Nasdaq:BABY) today announced it has named Jonathan Kennedy, former Chief Financial Officer of Intersil Corporation (Nasdaq:ISIL), to the position of Senior Vice President and Chief Financial Officer.
SAN CARLOS, Calif. (March 11, 2013)  Natus Medical Incorporated
Jonathan will report to Jim Hawkins, Chief Executive Officer, and oversee Natus Medical's finance and administration, accounting, tax, and treasury functions. He will join Hawkins and John Buhler, President and Chief Operating Officer, on the Natus executive management team that is responsible for directing all aspects of the Company's strategy, planning and operations.
"Jonathan is an excellent fit for the fast paced culture of Natus," said Hawkins. "He is a dynamic financial leader with experience in both technology and medical device companies. The experience he has gained over the years in driving acquisition integration efforts, developing and implementing cost reduction initiatives on a worldwide basis, and evolving the finance function in growing enterprises positions him well for Natus."
"I am pleased to join Natus during an exciting time in the Company's evolution," said Mr. Kennedy. "In just a few years, Natus has taken leadership roles in its markets and grown at an extraordinary pace. I look forward to being a part of its already successful team."
Mr. Kennedy has been Senior Vice President and Chief Financial Officer of Intersil Corporation since April 2009. Prior to that, he was Intersil's Corporate Controller since 2005 and Director of Finance since 2004. Before joining Intersil, Mr. Kennedy held management roles in Finance and IT with Alcon, Inc. and Harris Corporation. He holds a Bachelor of Science degree in Business Administration and a Master of Science degree in Accounting from the University of Central Florida. Mr. Kennedy also is a Certified Public Accountant.
Mr. Kennedy is expected to join Natus on April 8, 2013. At that time he will assume the CFO role currently held by Steven J. Murphy, who will remain with the Company as Vice President Finance, a position he has held since 2003. During Mr. Murphy's tenure with the Company it has grown from $30 million in annual revenue to the current run rate of over $350 million.
About Natus Medical Incorporated
Natus is a leading provider of healthcare products used for the screening, detection, treatment, monitoring and tracking of common medical ailments in newborn care, hearing impairment, neurological dysfunction, epilepsy, sleep disorders, and balance and mobility disorders. Product offerings include computerized neurodiagnostic systems for audiology, neurology, polysomnography, and neonatology, as well as newborn care products such as hearing screening systems, phototherapy devices for the treatment of newborn jaundice, head-cooling products for the treatment of brain injury in newborns, incubators to control the newborn's environment, and software systems for managing and tracking disorders and diseases for public health laboratories.
Additional information about Natus Medical can be found at www.natus.com.
COMPANY CONTACT:
Natus Medical Incorporated
Steven J. Murphy
Chief Financial Officer and Vice President Finance
(650) 802-0400
InvestorRelations@Natus.com


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BABY/BABY-8K-20130410161018.txt.gz
TIME:20130410161018
EVENTS:	Notice of Delisting or Failure to Satisfy a Continued Listing Rule or Standard; Transfer of Listing	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Notice of Delisting or Failure to Satisfy a Continued Listing Rule or Standard; Transfer of Listing
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On April 4, 2013, Natus Medical Incorporated (the "Company") received a notice from The Nasdaq Stock Market LLC stating that because the Company had not yet filed its Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2012 (the "2012 Annual Report"), the Company no longer complied with the Nasdaq listing requirements and specifically with Nasdaq Listing Rule 5250(c)(1). Nasdaq Listing Rule 5250(c)(1) requires that listed companies timely file all required periodic financial reports with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the "Commission").
In a Form 12b-25 Notification of Late Filing filed by the Company with the Commission on March 18, 2013, the Company had reported that while its 2012 Annual Report could not be filed by the prescribed due date of March 18, 2013, the Company expected to file the 2012 Annual Report on or before April 2, 2013, which was the extended due date under Rule 12b-25. The Company was not, however, able to file the 2012 Annual Report within the extended filing period.
On April 10, 2013, the Company filed the 2012 Annual Report with the Commission and, by making such filing, has regained compliance with the Nasdaq listing requirements and specifically with Nasdaq Listing Rule 5250(c)(1).
On April 10, 2013, the Company is issuing a press release announcing the filing of the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K with the Securities and Exchange Commission, the receipt of the notice from the Nasdaq Stock Market LLC, and other information.
 
(d) Exhibits.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
Natus Files 2012 Form 10-K
- Cures Lack of Compliance Notice from Nasdaq
(Nasdaq:BABY) today announced that it has filed its Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2012 ("Annual Report") with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the "Commission").
SAN CARLOS, Calif. (April 10, 2013)  Natus Medical Incorporated
For the year ended December 31, 2012 the Company's results reported in the Annual Report were marginally favorable relative to the amounts it reported on February 28, 2013, reflecting an increase in revenue of $581,000, an increase in net income of $263,000, and an increase in diluted earnings per share of $0.01.
The Company also announced that it received a notice from the Nasdaq Stock Market on April 4, 2013 stating that the Company was not in compliance with the continued listing requirements under Nasdaq Rule 5250(c)(1), because it had not filed its Annual Report. With the filing of its Annual Report on April 10th, Natus is again compliant with Nasdaq listing requirements.
About Natus Medical Incorporated
Natus is a leading provider of healthcare products used for the screening, detection, treatment, monitoring and tracking of common medical ailments in newborn care, hearing impairment, neurological dysfunction, epilepsy, sleep disorders, and balance and mobility disorders. Product offerings include computerized neurodiagnostic systems for audiology, neurology, polysomnography, and neonatology, as well as newborn care products such as hearing screening systems, phototherapy devices for the treatment of newborn jaundice, head-cooling products for the treatment of brain injury in newborns, incubators to control the newborn's environment, and software systems for managing and tracking disorders and diseases for public health laboratories.
Additional information about Natus Medical can be found at www.natus.com.
COMPANY CONTACT:
Natus Medical Incorporated
Jonathan Kennedy
Senior Vice President and Chief Financial Officer
(650) 802-0400
InvestorRelations@Natus.com


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BABY/BABY-8K-20130419191255.txt.gz
TIME:20130419191255
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 5.02 Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers.
An amended employment agreement was executed on April 19, 2013 between Natus Medical Incorporated and its Chief Executive Officer, James B. Hawkins (the "Amended Employment Agreement").
The agreement provides that if Mr. Hawkins' employment is terminated without cause (as defined in the Amended Employment Agreement) or for a reason other than in connection with a change in control of the Company, then Mr. Hawkins will receive (i) a lump sum payment due and payable within thirty (30) days after the date of separation, less applicable withholding taxes, equal to two times the sum of his Base Salary (as defined in the Amended Employment Agreement) as then in effect, (ii) the immediate vesting of his then unvested stock options, restricted stock and other equity awards, and (iii) continued provision of COBRA or similar benefits through the lesser of eighteen months or the date upon which Mr. Hawkins becomes covered under similar plans.
Mr. Hawkins' employment agreement with the Company previously provided that the amount defined in section (i) above was a sum equal to the Base Salary, while the timeframe in section (iii) above was twelve months.
To be eligible for termination benefits, Mr. Hawkins must comply with certain non-competition and non-solicitation provisions and payment of these termination benefits is conditioned on execution of a release of claims.
The Amended Employment Agreement is attached as Exhibit 99.1 to this report and incorporated herein by reference.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits
(d) Exhibits
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
This Agreement is entered into as of April 19, 2013, ("") by and between Natus Medical Incorporated ("" or the ""), and James B. Hawkins ("") and is an amendment and restatement of the agreement entered into by the parties on April 25, 2008 and subsequent Amendment of December 2008.
Effective Date
Natus
Company
Executive
1. .
Duties and Scope of Employment
(a) . As of the Effective Date, Executive shall be an employee of the Company, and serve as President and Chief Executive Officer of the Company. Executive will render such business and professional services in the performance of his duties, consistent with Executive's position within the Company, as shall reasonably be assigned to him by the Company's Board of Directors ("Board"). The period of Executive's employment under this Agreement is referred to herein as the "Employment Term."
Positions and Duties
(b) . During the Employment Term, Executive will perform his duties faithfully and to the best of his ability and will devote his full business efforts and time to the Company. For the duration of the Employment Term, Executive agrees not to actively engage in any other employment, occupation or consulting activity for any direct or indirect remuneration without the prior approval of the Board.
Obligations
2. . The parties agree that Executive's employment with the Company will be "at-will" employment and may be terminated at any time with or without cause or notice. Executive understands and agrees that neither his job performance nor promotions, commendations, bonuses or the like from the Company give rise to or in any way serve as the basis for modification, amendment, or extension, by implication or otherwise, of his employment with the Company.
At-Will Employment
3. .
Compensation
(a) . During the Employment Term, the Company will pay Executive an annual salary (the "Base Salary") of five-hundred ($500,000.00) as compensation for his services. The Base Salary will be paid periodically in accordance with the Company's normal payroll practices and be subject to the usual, required withholding. The Base Salary will be subject to review and adjustments will be made based upon the Company's normal performance review practices.
Base Salary
(b) . Executive shall be eligible to receive an annual bonus upon achievement of performance objectives to be determined by the Board or the Compensation Committee of the Board ("").
Performance Bonus
Compensation Committee
(c) . Executive shall be eligible to receive stock options to purchase shares of Common stock of the Company, pursuant to and governed by the terms of the Natus 2011 Stock Awards Plan, with an exercise price per share at the last closing market price on the day prior to the date of grant of such stock options. Vesting requirements shall be determined by the Board or Compensation Committee.
Stock Awards
4. . During the Employment Term, Executive will be entitled to participate in the employee benefit plans currently and hereafter maintained by the Company of general applicability to other senior executives of the Company, including, without limitation, the Company's group medical, dental, vision, disability, life insurance, and flexible-spending account plans. The Company reserves the right to cancel or change the benefit plans and programs it offers to its employees at any time.
Employee Benefits
5. Executive is entitled to receive PTO pursuant to Natus' standard benefit policy currently and hereafter maintained by the Company, and as may be cancelled or changed from time to time.
Paid Time Off ("PTO").
6. . The Company will reimburse Executive for reasonable travel, entertainment or other expenses incurred by Executive in the furtherance of or in connection with the performance of Executive's duties hereunder, in accordance with the Company's expense reimbursement policy as in effect from time to time.
Expenses
7. .
Severance
(a) . If Executive's employment with the Company terminates other than for "Cause" (as defined herein), death or disability, and subject to Section 11, Executive shall be entitled to (i) a lump sum payment due and payable within thirty (30) days after the date of Executive's "separation from service" (as defined in regulations promulgated under Section 409A of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended ("")) and equal to two times his Base Salary as then in effect; (ii) the immediate vesting and exercisability (if applicable) of 100% of the shares subject to all of Executive's stock awards to acquire Company Common Stock outstanding on the date of such termination (the "") and (iii) continued provision by the Company of the level of group health coverage provided by the Company to Executive at the time of such termination, including payment by the Company of the necessary premiums for coverage of Executive and Executive's eligible dependents with group health continuation coverage under Title X of the Consolidated Budget Reconciliation Act of 1985, as amended ("") and then, if applicable, individual health coverage under
Involuntary Termination
Code
Stock Awards
COBRA
the individual policy required to be offered Executive for coverage of Executive and Executive's eligible dependents at the end of the COBRA coverage period through the lesser of (x) eighteen (18) months from the effective date of such termination, or (y) the date upon which Executive and each of Executive's eligible dependents become covered under similar plans; provided, however, that Executive timely elects such COBRA coverage.
(b) . If Executive's employment with the Company terminates voluntarily by Executive (other than as described in subsection (c) below) or for Cause by the Company or due to Executive's death or disability, or involuntarily for any reason within one hundred and eighty (180) days of commencement of employment, then (i) all vesting of Stock Awards will immediately cease, (ii) all payments of compensation by the Company to Executive hereunder will terminate immediately (except as to amounts already earned), and (iii) Executive will only be eligible for severance benefits, if any, in accordance with the Company's established policies as then in effect.
Voluntary Termination; Termination for Cause
(c) . If within twelve (12) months following a "Change of Control" (as defined below) (i) Executive terminates Executive's employment with the Company for Good Reason after providing the Company with written notice within the ninety (90) days after the occurrence of an event constituting Good Reason and an opportunity for the Company to cure such occurrence of not less than thirty (30) days, or (ii) the Company or the successor corporation terminates Executive's employment with the Company for other than Cause, death or disability, then Executive shall be entitled to receive the benefits provided for in subsection (a) above, except that (A) the amount of the cash payments provided for in (a)(i) above shall be replaced by a cash payment equal to two times the sum of (x) the greater of Executive's Base Salary as in effect immediately prior to the date of the Company's entering into an agreement providing for such Change of Control (or, if no such agreement is entered into, immediately prior to the Change of Control), or Executive's Base Salary as in effect at the time of Executive's termination after the date of the Change of Control, and (y) the greater of Executive's target bonus as most recently established by the Board or Compensation Committee prior to the date of the Company's entering into an agreement providing for such Change of Control (or, if no such agreement is entered into, prior to the date of the Change of Control), or Executive's target bonus as in effect at the time of Executive's termination after the date of the Change of Control; and (B) the reference in subsection (a)(iii)(x) to "twelve (12) months" shall for this purpose be "twenty-four (24) months". Executive shall only be permitted to receive the benefits provided for in subsection (a) once and shall not be permitted to claim such benefits under both subsection (a) and (c) such that Executive would receive the benefits pursuant to subsection (a) twice.
Change of Control Benefits
8. . In the event that the severance and other benefits provided for in this Agreement or otherwise payable to the Executive (i) constitute "parachute payments" within the meaning of Section 280G of the Code and (ii) but for this Section 8, would be subject to the excise tax imposed by Section 4999 of the Code, then the Executive's severance benefits under Section 4(a)(i) shall be either: (A) delivered in full, or (B) delivered as to such lesser extent which would result in no portion of such severance benefits being subject to excise tax under Section 4999 of the Code, whichever of the foregoing amounts, taking into account the applicable federal, state and local income taxes and the excise tax imposed by Section 4999, results in the receipt by Executive on an after-tax basis, of the greatest amount of severance benefits, notwithstanding that all or some portion of such severance benefits may be taxable under Section 4999 of the Code. Unless the Company and Executive otherwise agree in writing, any determination required under this Section 8 shall be made in writing by the Company's independent public accountants immediately prior to Change of Control (the ""), whose determination shall be conclusive and binding upon Executive and the Company for all purposes. For purposes of making the calculations required by this Section 8, the Accountants may make reasonable assumptions and approximations concerning applicable taxes and may rely on reasonable, good faith interpretations concerning the application of Sections 280G and 4999 of the Code. The Company and Executive shall furnish to the Accountants such information and documents as the Accountants may reasonably request in order to make a determination under this Section. The Company shall bear all costs the Accountants may reasonably incur in connection with any calculations contemplated by this Section 8.
Limitation on Payments
Accountants
9. .
Definitions
(a) . For purposes of this Agreement, "" shall mean (i) commission of any act of dishonesty, fraud, misrepresentation or other act of moral turpitude by Executive, (ii) Executive's conviction of a felony, (iii) a willful act by Executive which constitutes disloyalty or gross misconduct injurious to the Company, (iv) misrepresentation or concealment by Executive of any fact for the purpose of securing or maintaining this Agreement, or (v) continued violations by Executive of Executive's employment duties which are willful on Executive's part after Executive has been given written demand for performance from the Board which specifically sets forth the factual basis for the Board's belief that Executive has not substantially performed Executive's duties.
Cause
Cause
(b) . For purposes of this Agreement, "" of the Company is defined as:
Change of Control
Change of Control
(i) any "person" (as such term is used in Sections 13(d) and 14(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended) is or becomes the "beneficial owner" (as defined in Rule 13d-3 under said Act), directly or indirectly, of securities of the Company representing 50% or more of the total voting power represented by the Company's then outstanding voting securities; or
(ii) the date of the consummation of a merger or consolidation of the Company with any other corporation that has been approved by the stockholders of the Company, other than a merger or consolidation which would result in the voting securities of the Company outstanding immediately prior thereto continuing to represent (either by remaining outstanding or by being converted into voting securities of the surviving entity) more than forty percent (40%) of the total voting power represented by the voting securities of the Company or such surviving entity outstanding immediately after such merger or consolidation, or
(iii) the stockholders of the Company approve a plan of complete liquidation of the Company; or
(iv) the date of the consummation of the sale or disposition by the Company of all or substantially all the Company's assets.
(c) . For purposes of this Agreement, "" shall mean without the Executive's express written consent shall mean (i) the material reduction of the Executive's duties or responsibilities relative to Executive's duties or responsibilities in effect immediately prior to such reduction; provided, however, that a reduction in duties or responsibilities solely by virtue of the Company being acquired and made part of a larger entity (as, for example, when the Chief Financial Officer remains as such following a Change of Control and is not made the Chief Financial Officer of the acquiring corporation) shall not constitute "Good Reason;" (ii) a material reduction by the Company in Executive's Base Salary as in effect immediately prior to such reduction; (iii) a material reduction by the Company in the kind or level of employee benefits to which Executive is entitled immediately prior to such reduction with the result that Executive's overall benefits package is significantly reduced; (iv) the relocation of Executive's ongoing worksite to a facility or a location that increases Executive's commute distance by more than 35 miles from Executive's then ongoing worksite, without Executive's express written consent; or (v) the failure of the Company to obtain the assumption of this Agreement by any successors contemplated in Section 12.
Good Reason
Good Reason
10. . Executive agrees to enter into the Company's standard Confidential Information and Invention Assignment Agreement (the "") upon commencing employment hereunder. Executive represents and warrants that all personal background information provided by him, or to be provided during the term of his employment, in response to background questions asked by the Company pertaining to Executive's employment, is true and accurate, and does not and will not contain any material omissions, nor shall it omit any material information. Executive further represents and warrants that he has not committed any act as described in section 9(a)(i), (ii) or (iv) hereof.
Confidential Information; Representation
Confidential Information Agreement
11. .
Conditional Nature of Severance Payments
(a) . Executive acknowledges that the nature of the Company's business is such that if Executive were to become employed by, or substantially involved in, the business of a competitor of the Company following the termination of Executive's employment with the Company, it would be very difficult for Executive not to rely on or use the Company's trade secrets and confidential information. Thus, to avoid the inevitable disclosure of the Company's trade secrets and confidential information, Executive agrees and acknowledges that Executive's right to receive the severance payments set forth in Section 7 (to the extent Executive is otherwise entitled to such payments) shall be conditioned upon Executive not directly or indirectly engaging in (whether as an employee, consultant, agent, proprietor, principal, partner, stockholder, corporate officer, director or otherwise), nor having any ownership interest in or participating in the financing, operation, management or control of, any person, firm, corporation or business that competes with Company or is a customer of the Company. Upon any breach of this section, all severance payments pursuant to this Agreement shall immediately cease and Executive shall immediately return a pro-rated amount of all cash paid to him pursuant to subsection 7(a) or (c), as the case may be, with the pro-rated amount determined by multiplying the aggregate of the cash payments made to Executive pursuant to subsection 7(a) or (c) in each instance by a fraction, the denominator of which is twelve (12) if termination is pursuant to subsection 7(a) and twenty-four (24) if termination is pursuant to subsection 7(c) and the numerator is the number (not to be less than zero) obtained by subtracting from the number used in the denominator the number of months from the date of termination to the date of the breach as determined in good faith by the Board.
Noncompete
(b) . Until the date eighteen (18) months after the termination of Executive's employment with the Company for any reason, Executive agrees not, either directly or indirectly, to solicit, induce, attempt to hire, recruit, encourage, take away, hire any employee of the Company or cause an employee to leave his or her employment either for Executive or for any other entity or person. Additionally, Executive acknowledges that Executive's right to receive the severance payments set forth in Section 7 (to the extent Executive is otherwise entitled to such payments) are contingent upon Executive complying with this Section 11(b) and upon any breach of this section all severance payments pursuant to this Agreement shall immediately cease and Executive shall immediately return a pro-rated amount of all cash paid to him pursuant to subsection 7(a) or (c), with the pro-rated amount determined by multiplying the aggregate cash payments made to Executive pursuant to subsection 7(a) or (c) in each instance by a fraction, of which the denominator is eighteen (18) and the numerator is the number (not to be less than zero) equal to eighteen (18) minus the number of months from the date of termination to the date of the breach as determined in good faith by the Board.
Non-Solicitation
In no event shall Executive be required to make a payment back to the Company under both subsections (a) and (b) above of amounts received under subsections (a) and (c) of section 7. The Company's election to require a return of payment under either (a) or (b) above shall preclude it from seeking payment under the other, but shall not prevent it from otherwise seeking to enforce the covenants contained by Executive in such subsections.
(c) . Executive represents that Executive (i) is familiar with the foregoing covenants not to compete and not to solicit, and (ii) is fully aware of Executive's obligations hereunder, including, without limitation, the reasonableness of the length of time, scope and geographic coverage of these covenants.
Understanding of Covenants
(d) . Executive agrees and acknowledges that Executive's right to receive the severance payments pursuant to Section
Release of Claims
7(a) (to the extent Executive is otherwise entitled to such payments) is conditioned upon Executive executing a release of claims in favor of the Company and its officers and directors. If Executive does not sign, or signs but then timely revokes his acceptance (as determined by reference to the U.S. Age Discrimination in Employment Act, as amended), of a standard release of claims with the Company, then Executive shall immediately return all sums paid to him and all property received by him pursuant to subsection 7(a).
12. . This Agreement will be binding upon and inure to the benefit of (a) the heirs, executors and legal representatives of Executive upon Executive's death and (b) any successor of the Company. Any such successor of the Company will be deemed substituted for the Company under the terms of this Agreement for all purposes. For this purpose, "" means any person, firm, corporation or other business entity which at any time, whether by purchase, merger or otherwise, directly or indirectly acquires all or substantially all of the assets or business of the Company. None of the rights of Executive to receive any form of compensation payable pursuant to this Agreement may be assigned or transferred except by will or the laws of descent and distribution. Any other attempted assignment, transfer, conveyance or other disposition of Executive's right to compensation or other benefits will be null and void.
Assignment
successor
13. . All notices, requests, demands and other communications called for hereunder shall be in writing and shall be deemed given (i) on the date of delivery if delivered personally, (ii) one (1) day after being sent by a well established commercial overnight service, or (iii) four (4) days after being mailed by registered or certified mail, return receipt requested, prepaid and addressed to the parties or their successors at the following addresses, or at such other addresses as the parties may later designate in writing:
Notices
If to the Company:
Natus Medical Incorporated
1501 Industrial Road
San Carlos, CA 94070
:
Attn
Chairman of the Board
If to Executive:
at the last residential address known by the Company.
14. . In the event that any provision hereof becomes or is declared by a court of competent jurisdiction to be illegal, unenforceable or void, this Agreement will continue in full force and effect without said provision.
Severability
15. .
Arbitration
(a) In consideration of Executive's service to the Company, its promise to arbitrate all employment related disputes and Executive's receipt of the compensation, pay raises and other benefits paid to Executive by the Company, at present and in the future, Executive agrees that any and all controversies, claims, or disputes with anyone (including the Company and any employee, officer, director, shareholder or benefit plan of the Company in their capacity as such or otherwise) arising out of, relating to, or resulting from Executive's service to the Company under this Agreement or otherwise or the termination of Executive's service with the Company, including any breach of this Agreement, shall be subject to binding arbitration under the Arbitration Rules set forth in California Code of Civil Procedure Section 1280 through 1294.2, including Section 1283.05 (the "") and pursuant to California law. Disputes which Executive agrees to arbitrate, and thereby agrees to waive any right to a trial by jury, include any statutory claims under state or federal law, including, but not limited to, claims under Title VII of the Civil Rights Act of 1964, the Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990, the Age Discrimination in Employment Act of 1967, the Older Workers Benefit Protection Act, the California Fair Employment and Housing Act, the California Labor Code, claims of harassment, discrimination or wrongful termination and any statutory claims. Executive further understands that this Agreement to arbitrate also applies to any disputes that the Company may have with Executive.
General.
Rules
(b) . Executive agrees that any arbitration will be administered by the American Arbitration Association ("") and that a neutral arbitrator will be selected in a manner consistent with its National Rules for the Resolution of Employment Disputes. The arbitration proceedings will allow for discovery according to the rules set forth in the . Executive agrees that the arbitrator shall have the power to decide any motions brought by any party to the arbitration, including motions for summary judgment and/or adjudication and motions to dismiss and demurrers, prior to any arbitration hearing. Executive agrees that the arbitrator shall issue a written decision on the merits. Executive also agrees that the arbitrator shall have the power to award any remedies, including attorneys' fees and costs, available under applicable law. Executive understands the Company will pay for any administrative or hearing fees charged by the arbitrator or AAA except that Executive shall pay the first $200.00 of any filing fees associated with any arbitration Executive initiates. Executive agrees that the arbitrator shall administer and conduct any arbitration in a manner consistent with the Rules and that to the extent that the AAA's National Rules for the Resolution of Employment Disputes conflict with the Rules, the Rules shall take precedence.
Procedure
AAA
National Rules for the Resolution of Employment Disputes or California Code of Civil Procedure
(c) . Except as provided by the Rules, arbitration shall be the sole, exclusive and final remedy for any dispute between Executive and the Company. Accordingly, except as provided for by the Rules, neither Executive nor the Company will be permitted to pursue court action regarding claims that are subject to arbitration. Notwithstanding, the arbitrator will not have the authority to disregard or refuse to enforce any lawful Company policy, and the arbitrator shall not order or require the Company to adopt a policy not otherwise required by law that the Company has not adopted.
Remedy
(d) . In addition to the right under the Rules to petition the court for provisional relief, Executive agrees that any party may also petition the court for injunctive relief where either party alleges or claims a violation of this Agreement or the Confidentiality Agreement or any other agreement regarding trade secrets, confidential information, nonsolicitation or Labor Code 2870. In the event either party seeks injunctive relief, the prevailing party shall be entitled to recover reasonable costs and attorneys' fees.
Availability of Injunctive Relief
(e) . Executive understands that this Agreement does not prohibit Executive from pursuing an administrative claim with a local, state or federal administrative body such as the Department of Fair Employment and Housing, the Equal Employment Opportunity Commission or the workers' compensation board. This Agreement does, however, preclude Executive from pursuing court action regarding any such claim.
Administrative Relief
(f) . Executive acknowledges and agrees that Executive is executing this Agreement voluntarily and without any duress or undue influence by the Company or anyone else. Executive further acknowledges and agrees that Executive has carefully read this Agreement and that Executive has asked any questions needed for Executive to understand the terms, consequences and binding effect of this Agreement and fully understand it, including that Executive is waiving Executive's right to a jury trial. Finally, Executive agrees that Executive has been provided an opportunity to seek the advice of an attorney of Executive's choice before signing this Agreement.
Voluntary Nature of Agreement
16. . This Agreement, together with the Option Plan, Option Agreement and the Confidential Information Agreement represents the entire agreement and understanding between the parties as to the subject matter herein and supersedes all prior or contemporaneous agreements whether written or oral. No waiver, alteration, or modification of any of the provisions of this Agreement will be binding unless it is in writing and specifically mentions this Section 16 and it is signed by duly authorized representatives of the parties hereto.
Integration
17. . The waiver of a breach of any term or provision of this Agreement, which must be in writing, shall not operate as or be construed to be a waiver of any other previous or subsequent breach of this Agreement.
Waiver of Breach
18. . All captions and section headings used in this Agreement are for convenient reference only and do not form a part of this Agreement.
Headings
19. . All payments made pursuant to this Agreement will be subject to withholding of applicable taxes.
Tax Withholding
20. . This Agreement will be governed by the laws of the State of California (with the exception of its conflict of laws provisions).
Governing Law
21. . Executive acknowledges that he has had the opportunity to discuss this matter with and obtain advice from his private attorney, has had sufficient time to, and has carefully read and fully understands all the provisions of this Agreement, and is knowingly and voluntarily entering into this Agreement.
Acknowledgment
22. . This Agreement may be executed in counterparts, and each counterpart shall have the same force and effect as an original and shall constitute an effective, binding agreement on the part of each of the undersigned.
Counterparts
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, each of the parties has executed this Agreement, in the case of the Company by its Chairman of the Board, as of the day and year first above written.
NATUS MEDICAL INCORPORATED
COMPANY:
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BABY/BABY-8K-20130501172204.txt.gz
TIME:20130501172204
EVENTS:	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Natus Medical Incorporated (the "Company") previously filed a Current Report on Form 8-K on July 3, 2012 to report that the Company had completed the acquisition of the Nicolet neurodiagnostic business ("Nicolet") from CareFusion.
The purpose of this report is to provide financial statements required by part (a) of Item 9.01 of Form 8-K. The financial statements provided consist of a Statement of Revenues and Direct Expenses and a Statement of Assets Acquired and Liabilities Assumed as of and for the year ended June 30, 2012, as it is not practical to obtain full financial statements of Nicolet. The Company has not included a pro forma balance sheet and statement of operations because it has previously filed its Form 10-K for the period ended December 31, 2012, which reflects the acquisition and the use of forward-looking information is necessary to meaningfully present the effects of the acquisitions.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits
(a) Financial Statements of the Business Acquired.
The following financial statements are being filed with this report as Exhibit 99.1: Statement of Revenues and Direct Expenses and Statement of Assets Acquired and Liabilities Assumed of the Nicolet Business of CareFusion as of and for the year ended June 30, 2012.
(d) Exhibits.
The following exhibits are filed herewith:
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 

EXHIBIT 23.1
We consent to the incorporation by reference in the following Registration Statements:
 
 
 
of our report dated April 30, 2013, with respect to the Statement of Revenues and Direct Expenses and Statement of Assets Acquired and Liabilities Assumed of the Nicolet Business of CareFusion Corporation as of and for the year ended June 30, 2012, included in this Form 8-K/A of Natus Medical Incorporated dated May 1, 2013.
/s/ Ernst & Young LLP
Irvine, California
April 30, 2013

Exhibit 99.1
 
To the Board of Directors and Stockholders of
Natus Medical Incorporated
San Carlos, California
We have audited the accompanying Statement of Assets Acquired and Liabilities Assumed as of June 30, 2012 and Statement of Revenues and Direct Expenses of the Nicolet Business of CareFusion Corporation for the year ended June 30, 2012. These statements are the responsibility of the Company's management. Our responsibility is to express an opinion on these statements based on our audit.
We conducted our audit in accordance with standards of the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board (United States). Those standards require that we plan and perform the audit to obtain reasonable assurance about whether the Statement of Assets Acquired and Liabilities Assumed and Statement of Revenues and Direct Expenses are free of material misstatement. An audit includes examining, on a test basis, evidence supporting the amounts and disclosures in the Statement of Assets Acquired and Liabilities Assumed and Statement of Revenues and Direct Expenses. An audit also includes assessing the accounting principles used and significant estimates made by management, as well as evaluating the overall presentation of the Statement of Assets Acquired and Liabilities Assumed and Statement of Revenues and Direct Expenses. We believe that our audit provides a reasonable basis for our opinion.
The accompanying Statement of Assets Acquired and Liabilities Assumed and Statement of Revenues and Direct Expenses were prepared for the purpose of complying with the rules and regulations of the Securities and Exchange Commission for inclusion in the Current Report on Form 8-K of Natus Medical Incorporated as described in Note 1, and are not intended to be a complete presentation of Nicolet's financial position or results of operations.
In our opinion, the Statement of Assets Acquired and Liabilities Assumed and Statement of Revenues and Direct Expenses referred to above present fairly, in all material respects, the assets acquired and liabilities assumed as of June 30, 2012 and revenue and direct expenses for the year ended June 30, 2012 as described in Note 1 in conformity with U.S. generally accepted accounting principles.
/s/ Ernst & Young
Irvine, California
April 30, 2013
 
 
 
 
 
1  Description of Transaction, Description of the Business, and Basis of Presentation
Description of Transaction
On April 22, 2012 CareFusion 303, Inc., a Delaware corporation and CareFusion 2200, Inc., a Delaware corporation, both wholly owned subsidiaries of CareFusion Corporation (together "CareFusion") and Natus Medical Incorporated ("Natus") entered into a Stock and Asset Purchase Agreement, pursuant to which Natus would acquire the Nicolet Business ("Nicolet", the "Business") from CareFusion. The transaction closed July 2, 2012.
Natus acquired for a cash purchase price of $57.9 million all outstanding common shares of CareFusion subsidiaries comprising the Business in the United States, Ireland, and the United Kingdom (collectively the "Legal Entities"), and certain assets and liabilities of Nicolet sales divisions principally in Germany, Italy, the Netherlands, and Spain (collectively the "Direct Countries"). In December 2012 Natus recorded a reduction in the purchase consideration based on a working capital provision of the purchase agreement that resulted in CareFusion returning $2.4 million to Natus.
Description of the Business
Nicolet was operated as a part of CareFusion and develops clinically differentiated neurodiagnostic and monitoring products, including a portfolio of electroencephalography (EEG) and electromyography (EMG) systems and related accessories, as well as vascular and obstetric doppler sensors and connectivity products. As of the closing date, Nicolet had discrete operations in the United States, the United Kingdom and Ireland, operated through an existing CareFusion infrastructure in Germany, Italy, the Netherlands, Spain, and Japan, and sold through distribution partners into approximately 80 other countries.
Basis of Presentation
The accompanying Statement of Revenues and Direct Expenses and Statement of Assets Acquired and Liabilities Assumed of the Business were prepared for the purpose of complying with the rules and regulations of the Securities and Exchange Commission ("SEC") and are not intended to be a complete presentation of the Business' financial position, results of operations, or cash flows. In particular and as more fully described below under , in certain countries Nicolet products were sold by a direct sales organization; however, all general and administrative support for Nicolet operations in those countries was provided by other divisions of CareFusion. The Financial Statements exclude certain of the costs borne by the CareFusion organization to support the sales function in those countries. As such, the financial statements are not indicative of the financial condition or results of operations of the Business going forward due to the omission of various operating expenses that will be incurred to operate the Business in the future.
The Direct Countries
It is impracticable to prepare full financial statements as required by SEC Regulation S-X because discrete financial statements for the Business in the Direct Countries were never maintained by CareFusion. Additionally, certain products developed and manufactured by the Business in Ireland were not acquired by Natus. In its internal financial reporting CareFusion did not undertake to separate these products from the products of the Business that Natus acquired.
The financial statements contain revenue pertaining to the business and, as more fully described below, all costs directly involved with the revenue producing activities, accounted for in conformity with U.S. generally accepted accounting principles ("U.S. GAAP").
The financial statements have been derived from the accounting records of the Business and include adjustments by Natus to properly reflect balances as of the reporting date. To the extent that an asset, liability, revenue or expense is identifiable and directly related to the Business, it is reflected in the financial statements.
 The Business consists of the following wholly-owned subsidiaries of CareFusion:
The Legal Entities
 
 
 
The financial statements include all of the assets and liabilities, both tangible and intangible, of the Legal Entities and all revenue, including revenue generated through sales to international distribution partners, and direct expenses attributable to the Legal Entities.
No allocation of CareFusion corporate overhead is included in the expenses, and as discussed below, the cost of certain shared-service functions benefitting the Business that were hosted by CareFusion are not included in expenses of the Business.
 In addition to the Legal Entities, the Business operated within the Direct Countries, where Nicolet sold to end users through a local direct sales organization. The assets acquired and liabilities assumed in the Direct Countries, consist of the following:
The Direct Countries
 
 
 
The revenue and direct expenses in the Direct Countries consist of:
 
 
 
In 2007 the Business was owned by Viasys Healthcare, a publicly traded company. Cardinal Health, a publicly traded company, acquired Viasys in November 2007 for $1.5 billion. In September 2008 Cardinal completed the spinoff of its clinical and medical products division to CareFusion, a newly formed publicly traded company.
Impairment -
During the quarter ended March 31, 2012, CareFusion committed to a plan to sell the Business, resulting in held for sale classification of the underlying assets. As a result, the assets and liabilities of the Business were written down to fair value less costs to sell and CareFusion recorded an impairment charge of $78.2 million. The impairment charge related primarily to intangible assets and goodwill associated with the 2007 acquisition of Viasys.
The Statement of Revenues and Direct Expenses includes an asset impairment charge of $84.9 million that consists of the $78.2 million charge recorded by CareFusion and an additional charge of $6.7 million related primarily to the write-down of capitalized software in the U.S. and buildings in Ireland and the U.K. The Statement of Assets Acquired and Liabilities Assumed gives effect to the $84.9 million charge as of June 30, 2012.
 For the Legal Entities the following expenses have been excluded from the Statement of Revenues and Direct expenses:
The Excluded Expenses
 
 
The Statement of Revenues and Direct Expenses excludes interest income and expense, foreign currency translation gains or losses, other non-operating income, expenses, or charges, income taxes, or any other indirect expenses not noted in Note 2.
 
All cash flow requirements of the Business were funded by CareFusion and cash management functions were not performed at the business level. Therefore, it is impracticable to present a statement of cash flows, including cash flows from operating and financing activities, as the Business did not maintain cash balances of that nature.
Cash flows 
2  Summary of Significant Accounting Policies
The use of the terms "we" and "our" in the following sections is attributed to the Business.
 All intercompany accounts and transactions of the Business have been eliminated.
Intercompany Eliminations
 The preparation of financial statements in conformity with U.S. GAAP requires management to make estimates and assumptions that affect the reported amounts of assets and liabilities, disclosure of contingent assets and liabilities, and the reported amount of revenues and expenses during the reporting period. Such estimates include, but are not limited to, allowances for potentially uncollectible accounts receivable, valuation of inventory, intangible assets, reserves for warranty obligations, and allocation of certain infrastructure costs. Actual results could differ from those estimates.
Use of Estimates
We generate revenue through the sale of medical devices, services, supplies, and software. We recognize revenue when:
Revenue Recognition
 
 
 
 
Revenue is recognized net of sales returns and allowances, administration fees, incentives, and estimated rebates.
The majority of our revenue transactions are multiple element arrangements in which we sell equipment, installation and training services, extended service contracts, and/or software maintenance contracts. Revenue is recognized for each unit of accounting individually. We allocated revenue in multiple element arrangements to each unit of accounting using the relative selling price method. Selling prices used during the allocation process are based on; vendor specific objective evidence ("VSOE") of fair value if available, third-party evidence if VSOE of fair value is not available, or estimated selling price if neither VSOE of fair value or third-party evidence is available.
Equipment sale revenue consists of neurology and sleep diagnostic equipment. We recognize equipment sale revenue upon customer acceptance, which occurs after the transfer of title and risk of loss to the customer and the substantial completion of installation or training services. When related training services are considered inconsequential, delivery is deemed to occur upon the transfer of title and risk of loss, at which time revenue and the costs associated with installation and training are recognized. When related training services are consequential, revenue associated with training services is deferred until delivery is deemed to occur.
We generally negotiate the prices of medical device products and supplies directly with end customers under pricing agreements. We also sell to hospitals in the U.S. who are members of group purchasing organizations ("GPO"s). GPO's negotiate volume purchase agreements for member hospitals, group practices, and other clinics; these negotiated prices are typically lower than the prices charged when we sell direct to end customers.
We recognize product revenue on sales to unrelated third parties when title transfers, typically upon shipment from us, net of estimated rebates.
 All highly liquid instruments purchased with an original maturity of three months or less are classified as cash equivalents.
Cash Equivalents
 Trade receivables are primarily comprised of amounts owed to us through our operating activities and are presented net of an allowance for doubtful accounts and accrued rebates. An account is considered past due on the first day after its due date. We monitor past due accounts on an ongoing basis and establish appropriate reserves to cover probable losses. We write off any amounts deemed uncollectible against allowance for doubtful accounts.
Allowance for Doubtful Accounts
 
 Financial instruments include cash and cash equivalents, accounts receivable and accounts payable. Cash and cash equivalents are reported at their respective fair values on the balance sheet. The recorded carrying amount of accounts receivable and accounts payable approximates their fair value due to their short-term maturities.
Fair Value of Financial Instruments
 We determine inventory cost primarily on a currently adjusted standard basis that approximates actual cost on a first-in, first-out basis. We reduce the carrying value of inventories to a lower of cost or market basis for those items that are potentially excess, obsolete, or slow-moving. We reserve for excess and obsolete inventory based upon historical experience, sales trends, specific categories of inventory, and age of on-hand inventory. Work-in-process and finished goods inventories include raw materials, direct labor, and manufacturing overhead.
Inventories
 Property and equipment are stated at cost less accumulated depreciation. Property and equipment held for sale are recorded at the lower of cost or fair value less costs to sell. Depreciation expense is computed using the straight-line method over the estimated useful lives of the assets, including capital lease assets that are depreciated over the shorter of the terms of their respective leases or their estimated useful lives. We use the following range of useful lives for our property and equipment categories: (i) buildings and improvements, one to 39 years, (ii) machinery and equipment, three to 15 years, and (iii) furniture and fixtures, three to seven years.
Property and Equipment
Goodwill is the excess of the purchase price of an acquired business over the amounts assigned to net assets acquired in the business combination. Purchased goodwill and intangible assets with indefinite lives are not amortized, but instead are tested for impairment at least annually in the fourth quarter of each fiscal year, or more frequently if certain indicators are present or changes in circumstances suggest impairment exists. Intangible assets with finite lives are amortized over their useful lives.
Goodwill and Intangible Assets 
When certain events or changes in operating conditions occur, an impairment assessment may be performed on the recoverability of the carrying amounts. As discussed more fully under , during the quarter ended March 31, 2012, CareFusion committed to a plan to sell the Business, resulting in held for sale classification of the underlying assets. As a result, the assets of the Business were written down to fair value less costs to sell.
Basis of Presentation
We offer warranties on certain products for various periods of time. The estimated cost of product warranties is accrued at the time revenue is recognized and reported as a component of cost of revenue. Our product warranty liability reflects our best estimate of probable liability under our product warranties. We estimate the liability based on our stated warranty policies and practices, the historical frequency of claims, and the cost to replace or repair our products under warranty. Factors that affect our warranty liability include the number of units sold, the length of the warranty, historical and anticipated rates of warranty claims, and cost per claim. We regularly assess the adequacy of our recorded warranty liabilities and adjust the amounts as necessary.
Product Warranties 
Our liability for product warranties as of June 30, 2012 was approximately $600,000 and is included as a component of accrued liabilities in the Statement of Assets Acquired and Liabilities Assumed.
 Costs incurred in connection with development of new products and manufacturing methods are charged to expense as incurred, except certain software development costs which are capitalized after technological feasibility of the software is established.
Research & Development and Capitalized Software Development Costs
 The functional currency of our foreign subsidiaries is generally the local currency of the country where the subsidiary is located. Accordingly, changes in the value of foreign currencies affect the consolidated financial statements when translated into U.S. Dollars. Financial statements for these subsidiaries are translated into U.S. Dollars at period-end exchange rates as to the assets and liabilities and monthly average exchange rates as to revenues and direct expenses.
Foreign Currency
 Financial instruments that potentially subject us to credit risk consist principally of cash and cash equivalents and accounts receivable. Cash and cash equivalents consist primarily of cash in bank accounts and investments in money market funds.
Certain Significant Risks and Uncertainties
We sell our products primarily to hospitals and medical institutions. Customers are generally not required to provide collateral or other security to support accounts receivable. Allowances for estimated potential bad debt losses are maintained. No single customer or distributor accounted for more than 10% of accounts receivable at June 30, 2012.
 
3  Inventories
Inventories at June 30, 2012 consists of the following (in thousands):
 
4  Property and Equipment, net
Property and equipment at June 30, 2012 consists of the following (in thousands):
 
5  Deferred Income Tax
Deferred income tax at June 30, 2012 consists of the following (in thousands):
 
A valuation allowance is provided for deferred tax assets when it is more likely than not that some portion or all of the deferred tax assets will not be realized. Management believes the deferred tax assets will be fully realized and no valuation allowance has been placed against them.
6  Notes Payable
Notes payable at June 30, 2012 consist of the following (note amounts in thousands):
 
 
Natus acquired the two notes from Dutch American Manufacturers, B.V. and CareFusion U.K. 305 Limited concurrently with the close of the acquisition. The terms of the notes were amended such that the interest rate on the notes is the mid-term Applicable Federal Rate published by the U.S. Internal Revenue Service as of June 29, 2013. The notes renewed automatically on February 27, 2013 and by their terms will renew annually on February 27.
7  Commitments and Contingencies
 The Business owns operating facilities in Ireland and the U.K. and leases an operating facility in the U.S. Minimum lease payments under the operating lease for the U.S. facility are as follows (in thousands):
Leases
 
 At the time CareFusion sold the Business to Natus, the Business manufactured a product line for CareFusion at its Gort, Ireland production facility that was not included in the products acquired by Natus. On July 2, 2012 Natus and CareFusion entered into a transition services agreement under which the Business committed to continue the manufacture of that product line for CareFusion from July 2, 2012 through December 31, 2012.
Transition services agreement
 The Business may from time to time become a party to various legal proceedings or claims that arise in the ordinary course of business. Management does not believe that any current legal or administrative proceedings are likely to have a material effect on our business, financial condition, or results of operations.
Legal matters
8  Subsequent Events
As noted above, on July 2, 2012 Natus acquired the Business from CareFusion.
Subsequent events have been evaluated through April 30, 2013. Management has determined that there are no additional subsequent events to disclose.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BABY/BABY-8K-20130507120317.txt.gz
TIME:20130507120317
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On May 6, 2013, Natus Medical Incorporated (the "Company") issued a press release regarding its financial results for its first quarter ended March 31, 2013 and other financial information. A copy of the press release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 to this Form 8-K.
The information in this Form 8-K and the exhibit attached hereto shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act") or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that Section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
 
(d) Exhibits.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
Dated: May 7, 2013
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
Natus to Delay Reporting of its First Quarter Financial Results
- Provides First Quarter Estimates of Revenue and non-GAAP Earnings
- Provides Second Quarter and Updated Full Year 2013 Guidance
(Nasdaq:BABY) today announced that it expects to report revenue of $84 million to $86 million and non-GAAP earnings per share of $0.11 to $0.14 for the first quarter of 2013. The Company previously guided first quarter revenue of $83 million to $85 million and non-GAAP earnings per share of $0.09 to $0.10. Natus further advised that it will delay the definitive reporting of its first quarter 2013 financial results that was previously scheduled for Tuesday, May 7.
SAN CARLOS, Calif. (May 6, 2013)  Natus Medical Incorporated
Natus recently implemented an ERP System that delayed the Company's annual 10-K filing to April 10, 2013. The year-end delay has impacted the timing of the preparation and the completion of its auditor's review of the Company's first quarter financial report. A conference call will be scheduled to discuss the financial results upon completion of the quarterly report.
"Natus had a very good first quarter as reflected in our estimated results. Both our Neurology and Newborn Care businesses performed very well," said Jim Hawkins, Chief Executive Officer of the Company.
Financial Guidance
For the full year 2013, the Company now expects to report revenue of $362 million to $367 million and non-GAAP earnings per share of $0.84 to $0.87. The Company had earlier said it expected to report non-GAAP earnings per share of $0.81 to $0.84. For the second quarter of 2013, the Company expects to report revenue between $86 million to $90 million and non-GAAP earnings per share of $0.17 to $0.20.
The Company's second quarter and full year 2013 non-GAAP guidance and first quarter non-GAAP earnings estimate exclude acquisition related amortization expense and acquisition related restructuring charges and the tax effects of these items.
The Company's non-GAAP guidance includes the impact of expensing employee share based compensation. All earnings per share amounts are on a diluted basis.
About Natus Medical
Natus is a leading provider of healthcare products used for the screening, detection, treatment, monitoring and tracking of common medical ailments in newborn care, hearing impairment, neurological dysfunction, epilepsy, sleep disorders, and balance and mobility disorders. Product offerings include computerized neurodiagnostic systems for audiology, neurology, polysomnography, and neonatology, as well as newborn care products such as hearing screening systems, phototherapy devices for the treatment of newborn jaundice, head-cooling products for the treatment of brain injury in newborns, incubators to control the newborn's environment, and software systems for managing and tracking disorders and diseases for public health laboratories.
Additional information about Natus Medical can be found at .
www.natus.com
This press release contains forward-looking statements as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, particularly statements regarding the expectations, beliefs, plans, intentions and strategies of Natus. These forward-looking statements include statements regarding revenue and non-GAAP earnings in the first and second quarter and full year 2013 and expected amortization expense associated with acquired intangible assets. These statements relate to current estimates and assumptions of our management as of the date of this press release, and future events or Natus' future financial performance or results, and involve known and unknown risks, uncertainties and other factors that may cause actual results, levels of activity, performance, or achievements to differ materially from those expressed or implied by the forward-looking statements. Forward-looking statements are only predictions and the actual events or results may differ materially. Natus cannot provide any assurance that its future results or the results implied by the forward-looking statements will meet expectations. Our future results could differ materially due to a number of factors, including the effects of competition, the demand for our products and services, the impact of adverse global economic conditions on our target markets, our ability to expand our sales in international markets, our ability to maintain current sales levels in a mature domestic market, our ability to control costs, risks associated with bringing new products to market and integrating acquired businesses, and our ability to fulfill product orders on a timely basis. Natus disclaims any obligation to update information contained in any forward looking statement.
More information about potential risk factors that could affect the business and financial results of Natus is included in Natus' annual report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2012, and its quarterly reports on Form 10-Q, and in other reports filed from time to time by Natus with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission.
COMPANY CONTACT:
Natus Medical Incorporated
Jonathan A. Kennedy
Sr. Vice President Finance and Chief Financial Officer
(650) 802-0400
InvestorRelations@Natus.com


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BABY/BABY-8K-20130520071026.txt.gz
TIME:20130520071026
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C.  20549
Form 8-K
Current Report
Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported):
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
May 20, 2013
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 - 
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 - 
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 - 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 - 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
ITEM 2.02.      Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On May 20, 2013, Natus Medical Incorporated (the Company) is issuing a press release and holding a conference call regarding its financial results for the first quarter ended March 31, 2013 and other financial information.  A copy of the press release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 to this Form 8-K.
The information in this Form 8-K and the exhibit attached hereto shall not be deemed filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the Exchange Act) or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that Section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
ITEM 9.01.     Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d) Exhibits.
SIGNATURES
          Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Dated:  May 20, 2013
Exhibit Index

Exhibit 99.1
Natus Medical Announces 2013 First Quarter Financial Results
- Increases Full Year 2013 Non-GAAP EPS Guidance
SAN CARLOS, Calif.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--May 20, 2013-- (Nasdaq:BABY) today announced financial results for the three months ended March 31, 2013.
Natus Medical Incorporated
For the first quarter ended March 31, 2013, the Company reported revenue of $85.8 million, compared to $59.4 million in the comparable quarter of the previous year. Net income was $3.4 million, or $0.11 per diluted share, compared to net income of $289,000, or $0.01 per diluted share, in the first quarter of 2012.
The Company reported non-GAAP earnings per share of $0.15 per diluted share for the first quarter 2013 compared to $0.07 per diluted share in the first quarter of 2012.
I am very pleased with our first quarter results which were driven by record revenues, margins and improved operating efficiencies, said Jim Hawkins, Chief Executive Officer of the Company. Both our Neurology and Newborn Care businesses performed well in the first quarter. While Europe continues to be soft, our domestic business was strong in both Neurology and Newborn Care. Notably, our newborn care hearing supplies business saw growth during the quarter, which we believe is attributable to rising birth rates in the United States, continuing a trend that we have seen over the last three quarters. Rising birth rates are certainly a positive for our business.
Our first quarter results also reflect the improved operating efficiencies that we have been targeting at Natus, and which we will continue to focus on for further progress, said Hawkins. "We are also encouraged by the improvement we have seen in our gross profit margins. As we have communicated in the past, we are committed to returning our non-GAAP operating margins to the 13% to 17% levels and have set a goal for 2013 to achieve a 12% non-GAAP pretax operating profit margin for the year. Our first quarter results demonstrate that we are progressing towards this goal.
During the first quarter, Natus announced and closed the acquisition of the Grass Technology Products Group, a manufacturer of clinically differentiated neurodiagnostic and monitoring products, said Hawkins. The Grass acquisition expands our presence in certain international markets and adds to our disposable product offering, providing Natus with an entry into the research segment of the neurodiagnostic market.
Natus remains one of the fastest growing medical device companies in the world. Our strong earnings growth combined with our emphasis on generating free cash flow positions Natus for a strong 2013, added Hawkins.
As of March 31, 2013, the Company had cash, cash equivalents, and short-term investments of $24.4 million, stockholders' equity of approximately $273 million, and working capital of approximately $57 million.
Financial Guidance
The Company reiterated its guidance for the second quarter 2013 and updated its guidance for the full year 2013.
For the second quarter 2013, the Company expects to report revenue of $86 million to $90 million and non-GAAP earnings per share of $0.17 to $0.20. For the full year 2013 the Company expects to report revenue of $362 million to $367 million and non-GAAP earnings per share of $0.85 to $0.88. The Company most recently reported that it expected to report non-GAAP earnings per share of $0.84 to $0.87.
The Company's 2013 full year and second quarter non-GAAP earnings per share guidance exclude the following:
- Amortization expense associated with acquisition-related intangible assets, which the Company expects to be approximately $1.8 million and $7.1 million for the second quarter and full year, respectively, and which the Company expects will reduce GAAP earnings per share by approximately $0.04 and $0.14 for the respective periods.
- Accruals for restructuring charges that the Company expects to incur in 2013 associated with acquisitions. For the remainder of 2013, the amount and timing of such charges have not yet been determined.
The Companys non-GAAP guidance includes the impact of expensing employee share based compensation. All earnings per share amounts are on a diluted basis.
Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures
The Company's non-GAAP results for the 2013 first quarter exclude amortization expense associated with certain acquisition-related intangible assets and direct costs associated with the acquisitions of Nicolet and the Grass Technologies product group.
The non-GAAP results also exclude the benefit from the reversal of restructuring charges accrued in prior periods netted against current period accruals and the reduction of income tax expense related to the retroactive reinstatement of the U.S. research and development (R&D) tax credit, which together had the effect of reducing non-GAAP net income by $0.6 million and non-GAAP earnings per share by $0.02.
The Company believes that the presentation of results excluding these items provides meaningful supplemental information to both management and investors that is indicative of the Company's core operating results. Therefore, the Company believes these non-GAAP financial measures facilitate comparison of operating results across reporting periods. A reconciliation between the Company's results of operations on a GAAP and non-GAAP basis for the periods reported is included as part of the condensed consolidated statements of operations at the end of this release.
The Company believes that both management and investors benefit from referring to these non-GAAP financial measures in assessing the Company's performance and when planning, forecasting, and analyzing future periods. These non-GAAP financial measures also facilitate management's internal comparisons to the Company's historical performance. The non-GAAP financial measures disclosed by the Company should not be considered a substitute for or superior to financial measures calculated in accordance with GAAP, and the financial results calculated in accordance with GAAP and reconciliations to those financial statements should be carefully evaluated.
Historical Results as Adjusted
The Company's results for the 2012 first quarter reflect the impact of immaterial corrections to previously released results as more fully described in the Company's 2012 Annual Report.
Conference Call
Natus has scheduled an investment-community conference call to discuss this announcement beginning at 8:00 a.m. Eastern Time (5:00 a.m. Pacific Time) today, May 20, 2013. Individuals interested in listening to the conference call may do so by dialing 866-318-8615 for domestic callers, or 1-617-399-5134 for international callers, and entering reservation code 41561822. A telephone replay will be available for 48 hours following the conclusion of the call by dialing 888-286-8010 for domestic callers, or 1-617-801-6888 for international callers, and entering reservation code 43143142.
The conference call also will be available real-time via the Internet at , and a recording of the call will be available on the Companys Web site for 90 days following the completion of the call.
http://investor.natus.com
About Natus Medical Incorporated
Natus is a leading provider of healthcare products used for the screening, detection, treatment, monitoring and tracking of common medical ailments in newborn care, hearing impairment, neurological dysfunction, epilepsy, sleep disorders, and balance and mobility disorders. Product offerings include computerized neurodiagnostic systems for audiology, neurology, polysomnography, and neonatology, as well as newborn care products such as hearing screening systems, phototherapy devices for the treatment of newborn jaundice, head-cooling products for the treatment of brain injury in newborns, incubators to control the newborn's environment, and software systems for managing and tracking disorders and diseases for public health laboratories.
Additional information about Natus Medical can be found at .
www.natus.com
This press release contains forward-looking statements as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, particularly statements regarding the expectations, beliefs, plans, intentions and strategies of Natus. These forward-looking statements include statements regarding the benefit of cost cutting measures, the goal of driving profitability and operating margins back to historical levels, revenue and non-GAAP profitability in the second quarter and full year 2013, the impact of amortization expense associated with acquisition-related intangible assets, and the potential for future restructuring charges. These statements relate to current estimates and assumptions of our management as of the date of this press release, and future events or Natus' future financial performance or results, and involve known and unknown risks, uncertainties and other factors that may cause actual results, levels of activity, performance, or achievements to differ materially from those expressed or implied by the forward-looking statements. Forward-looking statements are only predictions and the actual events or results may differ materially. Natus cannot provide any assurance that its future results or the results implied by the forward-looking statements will meet expectations. Our future results could differ materially due to a number of factors, including the effects of competition, the demand for our products and services, the impact of adverse global economic conditions on our target markets, our ability to expand our sales in international markets, our ability to maintain current sales levels in a mature domestic market, our ability to control costs, risks associated with bringing new products to market and integrating acquired businesses, and our ability to fulfill product orders on a timely basis. Natus disclaims any obligation to update information contained in any forward looking statement.
More information about potential risk factors that could affect the business and financial results of Natus is included in Natus' annual report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2012, and its quarterly reports on Form 10-Q, and in other reports filed from time to time by Natus with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission.
CONTACT: Natus Medical Incorporated Jonathan A. Kennedy, 650-802-0400 Snr. Vice President Finance and Chief Financial Officer
InvestorRelations@Natus.com


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BABY/BABY-8K-20130522073020.txt.gz
TIME:20130522073020
EVENTS:	Notice of Delisting or Failure to Satisfy a Continued Listing Rule or Standard; Transfer of Listing	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Notice of Delisting or Failure to Satisfy a Continued Listing Rule or Standard; Transfer of Listing
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
Washington, D.C.  20549
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
_______________
Form 8-K
_______________
CURRENT REPORT
PURSUANT TO SECTION 13 OR 15(d) OF THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934
Date of Report (date of earliest event reported):
May 16, 2013
_______________
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
Natus Medical Incorporated
_______________
(Commission File Number)
000-33001
(Address of principal executive offices)
1501 Industrial Road
San Carlos, CA  94070
(Registrants telephone number, including area code)
650-802-0400
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 - 
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 - 
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 - 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 - 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Item 3.01 Notice of Delisting or Failure to Satisfy a Continued Listing Rule or Standard; Transfer of Listing  
On May 16, 2013, Natus Medical Incorporated (the Company) received a notice from The Nasdaq Stock Market LLC stating that because the Company had not filed its Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the three months ended March 31, 2013 (the Quarterly Report), the Company no longer complied with the Nasdaq listing requirements and specifically with Nasdaq Listing Rule 5250(c)(1). Nasdaq Listing Rule 5250(c)(1) requires that listed companies timely file all required periodic financial reports with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the Commission).
In a Form 12b-25 Notification of Late Filing filed by the Company with the Commission on May 13, 2013, the Company had reported that it expected that it would not be able to file its Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2013 on or before the fifth calendar day following the prescribed due date.
On May 21, 2013, the Company filed the Quarterly Report with the Commission and, by making such filing, has regained compliance with the Nasdaq listing requirements and specifically with Nasdaq Listing Rule 5250(c)(1).
On May 22, 2013, the Company is issuing a press release announcing the filing of the Company's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q with the Securities and Exchange Commission and other information.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits
 (d) Exhibits.
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Exhibit Index

Exhibit 99.1
Natus Files 2013 First Quarter Form 10-Q
- Cures Lack of Compliance Notice from Nasdaq
SAN CARLOS, Calif.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--May 22, 2013-- (Nasdaq:BABY) today announced that it has filed its Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the three months ended March 31, 2013 (Quarterly Report) with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
Natus Medical Incorporated
The Company also announced that it received a notice from the Nasdaq Stock Market on May 16, 2013 stating that the Company was not in compliance with the continued listing requirements under Nasdaq Rule 5250(c)(1), because it had not filed it Quarterly Report. With the filing of its Quarterly Report on May 21, Natus is again compliant with Nasdaq listing requirements.
About Natus Medical Incorporated
Natus is a leading provider of healthcare products used for the screening, detection, treatment, monitoring and tracking of common medical ailments in newborn care, hearing impairment, neurological dysfunction, epilepsy, sleep disorders, and balance and mobility disorders. Product offerings include computerized neurodiagnostic systems for audiology, neurology, polysomnography, and neonatology, as well as newborn care products such as hearing screening systems, phototherapy devices for the treatment of newborn jaundice, head-cooling products for the treatment of brain injury in newborns, incubators to control the newborn's environment, and software systems for managing and tracking disorders and diseases for public health laboratories.
Additional information about Natus Medical can be found at .
www.natus.com
CONTACT: Natus Medical Incorporated Jonathan Kennedy, 650-802-0400 Senior Vice President and Chief Financial Officer
InvestorRelations@Natus.com


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BABY/BABY-8K-20130607172622.txt.gz
TIME:20130607172622
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 5.02 Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers.
On Thursday June 6, 2013, John T. Buhler, who had served as President and Chief Operating Officer of Natus Medical Incorporated (the "Company") ceased to be employed by the Company. At a meeting of the Board of Directors of the Company on June 7, 2013, the Board of Directors restored to James B. Hawkins the office of President, which he had previously held prior to the employment of Mr. Buhler. Mr. Hawkins will continue to serve as the Company's President and Chief Executive Officer, and Director.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BABY/BABY-8K-20130611121004.txt.gz
TIME:20130611121004
EVENTS:	Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders
TEXT:
ITEM: Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On June 7, 2013, Natus Medical Incorporated (the "Company") held its annual meeting of stockholders. At this meeting, Robert A. Gunst and James B. Hawkins were both re-elected to serve on the Board of Directors for a three-year term until 2016. Additionally, shareholders ratified the appointment of Deloitte & Touche LLP as the Company's independent registered public accounting firm for the fiscal year ending December 31, 2013, and provided advisory approval of the Company's executive compensation.
Proposal 1: Election of Directors
 
No other matters were considered or voted upon at the meeting.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 


</DOCUMENT>
